Hill almost elevates cinema violence into an art form... As Sam Peckinpah's 'The Getaway,' Walter Hill's 'The Long Riders' almost elevates cinema violence into an art form...Visually, 'The Long Riders' contains much that is stunning, even mesmerizing: the green Missouri scenic landscapes; the train robbery sequence; the stagecoach heist; the crossing of a wild river; but there is no question that it is the scene of the gang's disastrous foray into Northfield, Minnesota - that highlight this film... These specific episodes give 'The Long Riders' its rhythm, power, spectacle, and excitement...With his slow motion 'terror shootout,' Hill seems to impress his viewers by showing them an inventive montage of high-level gory violence... But Hill's most wonderful sequences are those that were the most reserved: the wonderful moment when Frank is cutting the hardest wood with a forest ax and his brother Jesse, walking with his fiance, attempting to settle down and raise a family...Hill may have a reputation for being a tough guy, but his best screen moments (in "Hard Times", "The Warriors", "Streets of Fire") are the ones in which he allows his romantic tendencies to slip through, when he gives his characters the dignity that means so much to them... Hill tries to debunk the American myth that Western gunfighters were "heroes," and to show these embittered guys for the 'rough men that they really were.'Hill's real intention is to present us with a gang of four families of brothers, and get us to accept them on their own terms, in their own brutal world... The men of 'The Long Riders' are at their most dastardly at the beginning of the film when Ed Miller (Dennis Quaid) indiscriminately shoots an innocent clerk, but for the rest of the film - one by one - Hill reveals their better, more 'human' sides... We further get to appreciate them as we compare them to the awful men around them; next to the Pinkertons killing a simple-minded 15 year old boy, they come out best, the 'good guys.'To Hill, good and bad aren't on opposite sides of the coin; they share the edge...
Never has a movie so fully redeemed itself in the last 15 minutes. Unlike Saw II, Saw III starts off on shaky ground and feels a bit forced. The traps are gorier and harder, while we find that we don't care all that much about the characters themselves. The acting is still good, but the story doesn't seem to meet the muster of the first sequel.The unresolved surprise ending involving Detective Matthews in Saw II is dealt with thoroughly here and answers many questions. But Saw III involves a new cast of characters to be tested by Jigsaw's games. Along with his sidekick Amanda, Jigsaw has kidnapped a female doctor and hooked his life support system to a device around her neck that will fire six rounds into her head if his heartbeat ever stops. Meanwhile a man whose son was a victim of a hit and run is forced to walk through rooms where each person who took part in that incident is being tortured in front of him.As the film goes on, the suspense seems to be dropping as the audience wonders why they should care about any of this. And although Jigsaw and Amanda provide a formidable evil duo, the momentum begins to drop due to an excess of gore and a cacophany of screams.In the end, though, it all pays off, and although the film itself doesn't live up to the original sequel, it's still much more interesting and mind-bending than most other horror films of this time. For a 3rd installment in a franchise, Saw III is a top-quality movie. The twists and the twisted nature of the film will leave fans eager for a fourth
Awesome. The Lord of the Rings movies made superstars out of dozens of actors and actresses.  Many have gone on to star in movies that made lots of money, but without the awards and critical recognition of the LOTR movies.  Not so with Viggo Mortensen.  Right after LOTR he followed with this awesome adventure story by Disney.  Coming out the summer after Pirates of the Caribbean, this was supposed to be Disney's next big live-action, summer adventure hit.  Unfortunately, it flopped at the box office.  Luckily, it has made a comeback on the DVD market, which is where this reviewer saw it.  All in all, it is a great movie, and probably one of the best live-action movies Disney has produced in a long while; judging from its ratings here on amazon and on imdb.com.In short, this movie is about Frank Hopkins, half-white, half-native american horserider who is mired in middle-age guilt and self remorse.  Along comes an opportunity for a change in scenery - a trip to the Arabian desert for a race.  Frank takes the challenge with his horse Hidalgo and of they go.  The race across the Arabian desert tests both rider and horse, and introduces them to a cast of characters that only an accomplished movie studio like Disney could have created.  We have the strong-willed girl full of innocence and inner strength, a fierce father and tribe leader who suffers no insults to his honor or intelligence, a backstabbing fellow racer who smiles until the final death, a seductive beauty willing to win at any costs, an arrogant prince with no moral bounds, etc, etc...  It all reminds our protagonist of his days in Montana!  During the course of the race, which Frank and Hidalgo win of course; both of them are tested to the limit.  The movie ends on a triumphal note for both.  The rider redeems his guilt by freeing Hidalgo from human ownership forever, and freeing his consciensce of past betrayals.The soundtrack is awesome, the cinematography is great, the dialogue is realistic, and for once, a movie set in a foreign land that actually uses actors from that area speaking the language of that area!  My compliments to Disney and the cast and crew of this movie.  I highly recommend it to all audiences from teenagers on up
WHAT?!!? No awards or nominations for this beautiful film?!?. This movie was moving, brilliantly filmed, consistent and thought provoking throughout. Each portrait is beautifully portrayed, each woman struggling with her own story, ghosts and baggage, fears and hopes, searching for a sense of her own power, all the while looking for something better... What will it take to seize the moment fearlessly?Delia's story was heartbreaking: her roots, her history.  Gripping fear keeps her from utilizing those chances to be vulnerable (since vulnerability has failed her in the past),to break free and to choose those people who can truly help her. She chooses, instead, her old survival tools--a tough exterior, self-sufficiency, and sexual power--which, in the end, is what she knows best.Watching Greta was disconcerting...I am still not sure if she is a woman moving towards her own truth (ambition and power) or away from it (family and the beautiful husband). Still, attempting to figure her out, and coming up with a different answer each time, reminds me to be non-judgmental and allow everyone his or her own path.Paula comes full circle: a runaway once herself, befriended and "adopted" by the gentle Haitian, she has one foot out the door when she learns she is pregnant. A near death experience and she bolts, she picks up a boy, also running and covered with visible cuts and bruises that mirror her own inner ones. She responds with such tenderness and vulnerability and  forgives the boy for stealing her car...she has been transformed somehow by the experience, enough to feel the stirrings of life within her and taste joy.  Which home will she choose?Life is filled with opportunities to do things differently.  My life has shown me that rigid formulas don't work in the long run. Every time that moment of transition calls us to take pause, we are offered, as our women were, a new opportunity to discern how we will respond.
Cagney's first starring role and one of the first true talkies. The Public Enemy is one of the big three original gangster films along with "Little Caesar" and "Scarface". I call it one of the first true talkies because true dramatic acting is being employed by all of the characters with none of the dramatic posturing and gesturing that were common before. Also, much effect is made of the presence of sound itself, such as in the frequent gunplay and especially in the last scene with Cagney's character's "homecoming" with the sound of the song "I'm Forever Blowing Bubbles" playing in the background on the Victrola phonograph. The film's screenplay received the film's only Academy Award nomination, and was based upon the novel "Beer and Blood". However, the film wasn't given a Best Picture nomination, nor was Cagney nominated for Best Actor for his portrayal of gangster Tom Power. This film was released at approximately the same time Little Caesar was making a star out of Edward G. Robinson. Cagney's character was the scarier of the two gangsters, though, because Cagney came across as more physical than Robinson."Public Enemy" was one of the first gangster pictures to talk about the "whys" of crime as well as the specific criminal activity.  In the case of lead character Tom Power, the root causes clearly included a doting mother and a brutish father. As for the specific criminal actions shown in the film, these were largely borrowed from actual events in the biographies of gangsters Earl Weiss and Charles O'Banion, and rewritten for the screen to accomodate the script. James Cagney's spot-on portrayal of a murderous thug was the role that made him a star. Unfortunately, it also typecast him as a gangster for the duration of the 1930's. The combination of the Hays code and his Oscar winning performance in "Yankee Doodle Dandy" finally began to diversify the roles he played.As an aside, for such a well-made film, I did spot one particularly "Ed Wood" worthy moment. Clearly after prohibition has started, Tom and his partner in crime are loading beer into a truck that they then force on speak-easies around town. There is a huge sign on the building marked "BREWERY". Today, that would be like a house having a sign on it reading "METH MANUFACTURED HERE", inviting a quick visit by the authorities. If you enjoy this film, you might find "The Warner Gangsters Collection" a better value since it not only has this film but also includes "Little Caesar" and four other movies
I was surprised by how good this was. I am surprised that this was never recommended to me! It also surprised me with how long it was, not a rushed 2 hour version but one that takes its time to develop the storyline and characters. Highly Recomended
Extremely Funny Movie. Election is one of the best comedies I have seen in a long time.  The story centers on three high school students (the class overachiever, the football captain, and the football captain's little sister) who run for class president.  Overseeing the election is Mr. M, who secretly wants the overachieving Tracy Flick to lose.Alexander Payne uses many diverse stylistics (mutliple voice over, freeze frames, flashbacks) to build a story that is both intelligent and filled with many unique plot twists.  Reese Witherspoon is great in it, and got good reviews, but Matthew Broderick is just as good--the best performance of his career.  The story is filled with big laughs--from crude humor to some of the most intelligent dialogue I've probably ever heard.If you like the movie, it's worth checking out the book by Tom Perrotta, which is very different in tone and style.  While the plot is nearly identical, Alexander Payne (director) treats his characters much harsher than Perrotta.The only special feature is an audio commentary by Alexander Payne, which is pretty good but nothing exceptional.  Left off the DVD is the original ending (based on the book's ending).  In the context of the movie, the final ending works better, but I would have liked to have seen the original ending
A fascinating period piece. This bleak, B&W film from 1950 was revolutionary in its time, but I have a bit of sympathy for those who might find it stylized and even a little pretentious today. What is truth?--surely a hard theme to tackle. Seems to me that whether the samurai was killed with a dagger or a sword could be easily determined--at least today. There would be fingerprints, etc. On the other hand, consider how much of the story depends on interpretation. Does the samurai really look at his wife with disgust after she is raped? After all, only she would really know--he doesn't say anything. Is she really fierce, as the bandit says, or weeping and weak as she appears in court? Was Kurosawa really poking fun at the genre with the clumsy fighting, or was he depicting stark reality for an audience that still romanticized ancient times? And is the ending really redemptive--I found myself wondering if the woodcutter would go off and sell the child if it was a girl. Even though Kurosawa intended it to be uplifting--note the shining sun--couldn't we wonder otherwise?I found this film extremely interesting as a precursor to the notion that truth is ambiguous--but not non-existent.Did anyone notice that during Machiko Kyo's (the wife) testomony, the score sounded suspiciously like Bolero--but not quite. It was written by a composer named Hayasaka, but I haven't uncovered anything, except that I'm not the first one to think this.
great movie. Why this film got bad reviews I don't know I guess they don' like Horror films like Hostel.  This film is brutal, gory, crazy, and henious which is what makes it so good.  It also has a really good story.  Highly recommended to gorehounds or if you are open minded and what to see a great thrilling film
They may be onto something... Despite my cynical approach to the subject, these movies that champion the sometimes irretrievable quality of children just may be onto something. Though this movie does a tremendous deal more justice than those of Stephen King which touch on the subject in a roundabout way while having clowns kill you, monsters emerge from your rectum, vampires bite you, etc. (no, that's not a joke, you'll see the theme in It, Dreamcatcher, Salem's Lot, etc. not to mention his forays into drama).But back to the topic, do yourself a favor and watch the outtakes. I laughed harder to them than anything I can recall in recent memory.4.5 stars rounded up to 5
Judy Does Judy. In a review (basically favorable) I posted recently of the film HILARY AND JACKIE, I made the observation that film-bio's are, by definitiion, problematic.  Every bit of cinematic license one takes with the story is going to be picked up by SOMEONE somewhere who will be quick to denounce said film as little more than a pack of lies.  Or at least, if they're feeling generous, a jumble of truths and fictions.Perusing some of the reviews below, I see that more avid fans of Judy Garland than I take exception to some of this film's representation's about the life and times of this hugely talented performer.  Overall, however, it seems to be a more accurate film biography than many others I've seen (including the above cited HILARY & JACKIE).  Like many casual fans, I am aware of the outlines of Ms. Garland's life and career, and the film, and by and large, the film adheres to those outlines.Contributor Gary Taylor cites the scene where Judy's body is discovered by her last husband Mickey Deans as an example of the kind of innacuracies and distortions he finds disturbing.  In reality, he reminds us, Deans didn't just walk into the bathroom to find Judy dead on the floor; he actually had to crawl out on the roof and through the window.That's an interesting tid-bit and I thank Gary for it, since I certainly was not aware of that fact.  And you know, it's just dramatic a true life event to make you wonder why the filmmakers did NOT incorporate it into the film.  Wouldn't that have made a real corker of a scene?  Well, maybe, but here's my take on it.  Britisher Mickey Deans was married to Judy Garland only for a matter of weeks.  Her family back in the States had never even met the man.  The filmmakers (correctly, I think) did not attempt to flesh out Mr. Deans as a character or as a presence in Ms. Garland's life.  Giving him a big dramatic moment when his character has never been established would likely have seemed a bit odd, dramatically speaking.(It probably does not need to be reiterated once again that this film is based on a memoir by daughter-from-Judy's-second-marriage Lorna Luft, who does serve as narrator in the everpresent voiceover. For that reason alone the lack of emphasis on Judy's later marriages makes sound narrative sense.  There also seems to be little reason to believe that neither her last marriage to Deans or the previous short lived liaison with Mark Herron were anywhere near as significant to Garland herself as either her first marriage to Vincente Minelli or her second to Sid Luft).So I personally have little argument with the minor liberties this film takes with the facts of Judy Garland's life.  And like many others who have posted reviews of the film, I have nothing but kudos for both actresses who portrayed Garland at different stages of her life and career.  Judy Davis is just riveting as the older Judy.  And Tammy Blanchard is a wonder as the adolescent star.  Both certainly deserved the Emmys they won for their work on this film.  Probably the only argument one could make regarding thecasting would be whether or not Blanchard should have been aged "up" a little to play Garland in her 20s rather than having Davis age "down" to take on those scenes.  But then, 50-50 screen time for both actresses would likely have meant that neither of them would have walked away with an Emmy in either the "lead" or "supporting" categories.
ONE OF THE CLASSICS. I see some people saying this movie was not all it was said to have been.  But you definately had to have seen this during the early 80's to relate to it and it was only meant for the people that actually lived in this time era.  For most of you seeing it for the first time in 2006, it wont make sense to you and seem outdated.  If your recollection of Hip Hop is N.W.A. or the likes, you will know nothing about this movie or relate to it in anyway - this is raw Hip Hop
Classic 4th Doctor. This is one of the Dr. Who stories that I actually remembered seeing as a kid in the early 80s on TV.  I watched the show every time it was on, so only the strongest stories made that kind of impression.The Doctor and Leela find themselves inside of a giant mining machine that roves the surface of a wasteland planet.  It's a huge thing, with several people and many robots working and living inside for apparently many months at a time.  Some of these people start turning up dead, and the mystery begins.The robots still look cool.  The people's costumes are fairly ridiculous, but that seems to have been the intention.  The ostentatiousness of the folks' dress indicates how decadent their society has become.  (Thus dependence on robots for so much, etc.)  Visually, they recall old Flash Gordon comic strips and movie serials
Great product and movie. I was completely satisfied with the  quality of the product and timely deliver
The weight of life. It is often the beauty of disparate moments within art that stick in our minds rather than the general thrust of morality, narrative or end scene.  Even with a medium as slavishly submissive to the narrative as cinema it is the play of the dusk sun in Mallick's "Days Of heaven", the chiaroscuro of Cortez's camerawork in "The Magnificent Ambersons" and the mournful wide-eyed stare of Celia Johnson in "Brief Encounter" that linger longest in the mind.  These supposedly fleeting pleasures of cinema are paradoxically the dearest to us.  And like all great ideas in the progress of artistic ideas, a method of making film which favours these moments of exquisite detail is a glaringly simple proposition that surprisingly few have tried before.  Mexican director's Alejandro Gonzalez Inarritu's achievement in "21 Grams" is to favour the moments of detail over the slavish requirements of narrative integrity: as a result of these, he actually heightens our interest in the lives of the characters in the film."21 grams" of course has the pay-off that it is indeed a film about the coming together of three sets of people: Penn's heart-transplant nominee, Watts's bereaved mother/wife, and Del Toro's reformed criminal-turned religious zealot.  It is about a central tragic incident, but unlike Inarritu's previous "Amorros Perros", the event plays a less crucial role because the structure of the film (seemingly random but actually cleverly playing on our expectations as to the behaviour of both the characters and narrative cinema in general): the result is the elevation of single moments to the role of independence from other scenes in the film.  Thus, the abandoned churning of a leaf blower and the smoking of a cigarette take on a biting, isolated and therefore poetic quality often lacking from conventional A-B-C cinema.I feel that this film owes much to the aforementioned work of Terence Mallick.  It is about the placing of moments above the relentless call in the cinema industry to produce "stories": I think of many of the scenes in this film as refuges from the kinds of film which demand payoff; big scenes, the revelation of the bad guy unmasked, the salvation of the world from the evil genius, etc.  it is a cinema of the Proustian, a remembrance of incidental sensual excitements that bring us back to cherished childhood memories.On the issue of technical accomplishments in the film, it is also hard to fault: Penn, Aussie actress Watts and Del Toro are all superb, with excellent support work from Charlotte Gainsbourg and Brit Eddie Marsan.  The music is haunting, insinuating itself in to the subconscious and adding both to the sense of tragedy and also acting as a chameleon-like backdrop to the more incidental pleasures.  The camerawork is often frenetic but perfectly matches the fragmentary technique.The movie's tagline "How much does a life weigh?" is rather a misleading existential bauble for a film so uninterested in the play of cause and effect, and of the weights and measures of dumb gravity.
Amok T'Wow. This is the best episode. Not only does it show insite into Spock and Vulcan but it also is acted and writtin in a way that sets it apart from the others in the original series. There are always a few episodes in each of the Star Treks that jumps much farther ahead and sets a new standard for space drama and this is the perfect example. When Kirk says &quot;I have heard nothing you said, but I will get you to Vulcan.&quot; So mysteriously formal. Wonderful.  If you cry when Sarek says &quot;So human&quot; in Star Trek V, this is the episode you have been waiting for
if noel coward were french, hahaha ... easily one of the greatest movies ever, a disastrous failure in its premiere for its scathing view of the french on the eve of ww2, and it makes one as uncomfortable today as then. word of warning: do NOT watch this movie with any young rabbits, as there is a hunting scene that will traumatize them (i did not allow the kids to see this one)
Doctor Who, First Season. At first I had a hard time getting used to the new Doctor, having such a fondness for Tom Baker.  I soon fell in love with the whole show, however.  I find the interaction of Rose with the characters from different times interesting; it's more personal and engaging than the older series.  More suspensful, too.  The fact that the film makers kept most of the series Earth-related is slightly disappointing, but I think it was because of both budget and visual considerations.  It adds something to the show to have a lot of outdoor shots and not just studio scenes; it makes it more easy to relate to.  Overall, I think it's fantastic!
Why Not A Restaurant?. I first saw this film on Turner Classic one night a few years ago, shortly into the film as I was skimming through the channels. I saw the murder take place, and I was hooked. I watched the rest of the film, glued to the screen. To say that Joan Crawford ruled this film is a major understatement. She thouroughly dominated the screen from beginning to end. In a way, she WAS Mildred, the story drew strong parallels to her own life. Ann Blyth was PERFECT as the wanna-be rich snob Veda. Eve Arden should have had more time in this film, she was needed relief from the seriousness of the story. All three principle female leads got academy award nominations for this film, Crawford won Best Actress, and there's no arguing she deserved it. As the plot has been dissected and gone over repeatedly before, I'll focus on the DVD release. The film transferred beautifully, with razor-sharp definition and wonderful light and dark areas. This film is true film noir, and the lighting played a major role in the movie. On the disc flip side, there is a wonderful documentary on Crawford's life called "Joan Crawford: The Ultimate Movie Star". The documentary is well-worth watching on its own, so to have it included is great. All in all, it's easy to see why Crawford was very proud of this film, it represented her commercial comeback after MGM put her out to pasture, saying she was too old, and box office poison. Amazing what the right role, script, and director can do for a strong actor. This film is a true classic, so get this DVD and enjoy
good movie. depicted a good view of the stress that air traffic controllers are under every day.  guess it makes you appreciate them every time you get on a plane to fly somewhere
THE VERY BEST. THIS DVD VIDEO COLLECTION CONTAINS THE BEST OF EURYTHMICS IN THE 80`S,THERE ARE ALL THE GREATEST HITS,  THIS IS MUCH BETTER THAN THE CD.YOU`LL NEVER REGRET !
Roaring Transition Of A Great Game Line Into A Great Movie. "Resident Evil" starts off with a slam-bang double-opening - inside an ultra high-tech underground research-and-development facility, something goes terribly wrong and a gas escapes as the facility's emergency system kicks in, locking down the building and resulting in the apparant deaths of hundreds of employees;  at about the same time, above ground, a young woman named Alice (Milla Jovovich) wakes up inside a grand mansion with no memory of who she is, only minutes before the place is stormed by a group of well-armed commandoes.  Thus begins the successful movie adaptation of the "Resident Evil" series of video games.With "Resident Evil", it was far from a given that it could make such a good transition into a movie, to me at least.  It's not like "Silent Hill" (which has also generated an excellent movie) or "Fatal Frame" (which I'm still waiting for the movie version of), both of which had lots of identifiable movie potential from the beginning.  The "Resident Evil" games are a bit different, almost nonstop action, most of them not as developed along character or story purposes (these aspects have begun growing in some of the more recent Resident games).  They needed to fill in some areas for the movie to be as good as the games.  Most of the games pit S.T.A.R. (a highly trained law enforcement organization) agents against hordes of ravenous zombies, occasionally teaming the S.T.A.R. agents with other characters.  It's made a lot of great games, but could it move into just as great a movie?  One thing they did was split the focus up among more characters of different backgrounds - you've got the S.T.A.R. team, you've got the amnesiac Alice - whose nature is kept a mystery until near the movie's end) - as a main point-of-view character, there are the Umbrella (the name of the corporation that owns the underground facility) people and you've got another major character coming into it from outside the main 'groups'.  (This trend of character diversifaction has continued with the "Resident Evil: Apocalypse" sequel, and some of the more recent entries to the game line)  It takes longer to build into where the zombie carnage really starts flying, which is fitting for the first entry of a movie series. It introduces the elements at a pace that's equally good for longtime fans of the games and books as well as for viewers who've never even heard of the concept.  All in all, the transition was more successful than I thought it could be - this is a great, hi-octane horror-action movie which succeeds in establishing good characters and a great 'edge-of-catacylsm' air.  The ending flows directly into "Apocalypse"; and a third "Resident Evil" movie is coming in Fall 2007.Great beginning to what's shaping up to be a great, and long-running, horror saga
A very good movie .... This movie lacked the oomph that the book had but it was still great.  The action scenes are particularly terrifying; particularly when the T-Rex breaks through the fence; also, when the raptors hunt for the two obnoxious kids in the kitchen -- too bad I was rooting for the raptors.  But still, these scenes in particular were very, very real, very scary and pulse-pounding!It's equally interesting to judge what didn't work in this movie: the characters, not quite as weak as those in the book but close; many of the computer generated shots looked surprisingly fake; and of course the bulk of the book's great science got lost.But still, none of this really matters that much.  The scary scenes were awfully scary!  Those dinosaurs looked REAL!  I can watch those scenes over and over and over again; so owning a quality DVD like this makes it easy!  If you don't have it already, Give it a shot!
Solid. This is a good solid documentary that sticks to its subject.  The clips of Ginsberg &amp; Burroughs are especially effective.  The celeb performances in the second half are all of the work itself &amp; not just empty theatrics. The Beats are still a source to return to for inspiration &amp; insight.  The world they emerged from is not all that different from the one in which we find ourselves now.  Of course there's more, but this video gives you enough to get you started &amp; gives you enough of the good stuff to go back to late
Pleasant story. Ok, I have no idea what the Lavender part of the title means since they never wear lavender, but it's a cute story nonetheless.  Maggie Smith and Judi Dench do a fantastic job in their roles as always.  The supporting cast is great as well.  I think the movie could've done just a little more explaining the ladies' lives before the start of the movie, but you get enough along the way to get it
Someone doesn't want you to watch this???!??!??!!!!?. I tried to rent this DVD from an online service about a week ago. Unfortunately, the DVD was damaged and unplayable, but not in the usual way I've seen before (like a disc cracked all the way through). It looked like someone had turned the playable side face-up and tapped a small nail with a hammer on it. The cracks had that kind of splintery pattern like a broken window. Anyway, I returned the copy and ordered another, which I received today. Again, this one is also unplayable and is cracked in an odd way. I just reported this problem online to the DVD rental company and ordered a replacement copy. However, I let them know that they may want to check their inventory of this DVD as someone may be intentionally destroying the DVDs. If I get another one that is cracked or unplayable in any way, I'm going to just buy a copy because the movie must really have gotten under someone's skin for them to do something like that.
Great B-Flick. I love "B"-HorrorMovies and this one fits every detail of a "good" (i use the term good loosely) B-movie. It has humor (I cracked up when i saw the head was still attached to the axe), it has gore (the aforementioned head-on-an-axe), and nudity (Tiffany Shepis is my future ex-wife). The movie was all around entertaining and that's what i watch movies for. If you're looking for some type of mental stimulation (which isn't a BAD thing) this ain't ya movie, but if ya lookin for some cheesy fun...The Hazing definitely fits the bill... 4/
Your sides are going to hurt!. "Overboard" is a Goldie Hawn classic! "Bird on a wire" and "Overboard" are neck and neck for all time funniest Goldie Hawn flicks. Either way, "Overboard" is playfully entertaining from start to finish
Good MOVIE!  Who has Slept with you WIFE  ?. The movie has very traditional format.  The movie was done very well.The plot was good.There were twists, and turns.  Friendships challenged, Pretty women with emotions running wild.3 friends supporting their best friend getting married.  There are couple big secrets shared before marriage.   One is one his best friend have slept with his future wife.good romantic comedy you will be happy.Jubril[...]Teenage Business Pheno
What a Charade. Cary Grant. Audrey Hepburn. A hidden megafortune. Three nasty pursuers. A slick, chic thriller with a Hitchcockian edge.With that kind of formula, it's not surprising that "Charade" deserves every shred of praise it receives -- and over the years, this classic has received a lot. Director Stanlet Donen had his finest moment when he created this funny, witty, tightly-plotted little thriller, where you're left with questions right up to the final scene.While on vacation at a ski lodge, Regina Lampert (Hepburn) decides to get a divorce. But when she returns home, she finds that her husband has been tossed off a train -- and even stranger, she finds that he was mixed up in a gold robbery many years ago. To get her mind off her problems, Reggie goes out on the town with Peter Joshua (Grant), a guy she met at the resort.But during her outing, she's cornered by three strange, creepy men -- and the worst part is, she finds that Joshua may be in on their plot. Unsure whom to trust, Reggie starts digging to find out where the gold is -- and then her pursuers are murdered one by one. Will she be the next target?It's a sharp, taut little thriller, reminiscent of the more commercial thrillers by Hitchcock, though set in a chic 1960s Paris setting, and with a New Wave edge. Stanlet Donen did mostly comedies in his career, which makes the tight plot and wry wit of this movie stand out even more.The movie moving along at a fairly steady pace, with one or two dead spots, but mostly just following the twisted plot threads. There are some really harrowing moments, like Regina being attacked by the Hook-man. By the tense finale, a lot of the odd little clues suddenly fall into place, especially the murder of the three thugs. It's a brilliant piece of scripting, even if the storyline is a bit unreal.Fortunately it's not all spy-thrills and revenge. Donen could change from action to horror to comedy in a moment, and he keeps the quieter moments lively with funny dialogue and some sophisticated slapstick, like Grant showering fully-clad. The witty dialogue is full of glorious one-liners. "You won't be able to lie on your back for awhile," Reggie quips, "but then you can lie from any position."Though Grant wasn't wholly comfortable playing opposite Hepburn, the two actors have kinetic chemistry. Whether they're goofing off, or chasing a kiss in a nightclub, they feel entirely real and romantic. Better yet, nobody knows who Grant really is or what he's doing, so there's an added element of danger to their relationship.Unfortunately the Delta print of this isn't worth the savings, since it was taken from a spotty, scratchy older print, with odd visual and sound jumps. It's disconcerting, to say the least. Better check out the double-bill of "Charade" and its remake "Truth about Charlie," since that print has been lovingly restored.This tightly-plotted, fast-moving thriller deserves to be as well-loved as it is, and cinephiles should be ashamed of themselves if they haven't yet seen it. A must-have
Really Eye Catching. This Nova episode is something I saw on TV last evening.I knew about Typhoid Mary from historical legend but knew nothing about the facts.And as the actress portraying her so bluntly put it her NAME was Mary Mallon,an Irish immigrant cook living in New York at the turn of the 20'th century.And as this show so properly points out was responcible for one of the most mysterious and often deadly epidemics of the day.Only trouble is that in some significant ways Mary Mallon didn't come off as a particularly sympathetic character-she attacked Dr.Swoop,who inicially informed her of her health status with a fork and constantly avaded the attentions of health service officials trying to track her down,while having killed three people and infecting others,unintentionally of course.Mary was what was known as a healthy carrier.She was infected with Typhoid and was able to spread it to others but experienced no symptoms herself.There were in fact at least several dozen more like her but because of her unique case she got the most publicity by far.That was all compounded by the fact that dues to sexism and social Darwinism of her time she also became the literal poster child for Typhoid.She died in the 1930's,near 70 years old and having been exhiled for years on North Brother Island,the American equivilent of a leper colony.The story itself as well as that of much of Mary's life is a tragic and sad one.But all sides made serious errors in judgement,and perhapes Mary's lack of respect over the years may have been due to her constant denials about having carried the disease and lack of remourse for those she's infected.Maybe the idea horrified her too much to bare and it drove her close to madness.She was afterall something of a caregiver and likely resented having been blamed for causing so much misery.That's my personal opinion but nobody as this shows really knew what was going on inside her head.And if this is to prove factual I don't know if we'd want to.So was she a victem or victemizer?Probably both but as such likely too frightened to live with it but to proud to admit it.But anyway this will prove very educational and eye catching
Tommy, a forgotten classic. Tommy was the epitome of the 1970's. This movie included Elton John and Tina Turner in their youth, not to mention all the member of The Who. Worth the price just to watch Ann Margaret swimming in a living room flooded with baked beans! That deaf, dumb and blind kid, sure plays a mean pinball
Yet another great season for Seinfeld (4.5 stars). Seinfeld-Season 5 would be the first season where the sitcom would be among the most popular shows on TV. Filling the void left behind by the end of the very successful sitcom, Cheers, Seinfeld would finish #3 in the Nielsen ratings during Season 5, thus continuing NBC's dominance on Thursday nights. The writing was still creative and continued to push the envelope of what could be shown on network television. This was also the first season to prominently Frank and Estelle Costanza as well as the season where Jerry actually held on to a girlfriend for a whopping 3 episodes. Disc 1 is very good with the best episodes being "The Mango", "The Sniffing Accountant", which features one of Kramer's most memorable scenes, and "The Puffy Shirt", one of several classic episodes from the season. And as with Seasons 3 & 4, Disc 2 is another winner as all of the episodes are very strong, the best being "The Non Fat Yogurt", which is featured in two different versions, "The Barber", and "The Cigar Store Indian." Disc 3 is also very good with the underrated episode, "The Conversion", and two classics in "The Stall", which gave us Elaine's most famous catchphrase, `I can't spare a square', and the season's best episode, "The Marine Biologist." Disc 4 ends the season on a high note with the excellent episodes, "The Fire", also known as "The Pinky Toe", "The Raincoats", which features a memorable appearance from Judge Reinhold as the close talker, and the finale, "The Opposite", probably the only episode in the entire series where things actually work out for George in the end. As with the other volumes, the special features are awesome. In addition to bloopers, inside looks, deleted scenes, and the notes about nothing, there is also a great segment on the evolution of the George character. Also worth noting is that for the first time since Season 2, not every show is top notch as noted in the mediocre episodes "The Dinner Party" and "The Bris." All told, Season 5 continued Seinfeld's winning streak which would ultimately lead to the sitcom becoming the #1 show on television in Season 6. Highly recommended.
amazing. I'M THE BIGGEST FAN OF THIS MOVIE IN THE WHOLE WORLD ,THERE'S NOTHING LIKE THIS FILM,GREAT ACTORS,I LOVE THE MANIAC PERFORMED BY FREDDIE JONES AND THE EXPLOSIVES SQUAD TOO WITH A WONDERFUL,INCREDIBLE,AWESOME,UNFORGETTABLE RICHARD HARRIS AS THE HEAD OF THE TEAM,WITHOUT DISREGARDING THE LIKES OF ANTHONY HOPKINS OMAR SHERIFF,IAN HOLM...JUGGERNAUT I'LL NEVER FORGET YOU!!!I'LL LIVE FOREVER IN THE BRITANNIC AND I COULD SWEAR I'M LISTENING THE EXPLOSIONS...IS IT THE BLUE WIRE OR THE RED ONE ?  I WANT THAT DVD NOW !!
Christopher Walken is awesome. Christoper Walken is the best SNL DVD.  almost every skit is hilarious.  The Cowbell is classic.  The other great one is the 2000 US Census with Tim Meadows.  The Centaur and Ed Glosser Trivial Psychic are also great.  His continental skits are funny to see once but never again.  The boat captain skit is great, as is the Pranksters
I was starting to wonder ... ... if we would ever get another Without a Trace season in region 1.  And this season contains some fascinating cases: a bus of kids abudcted, a satire-laden fake kidnapping, a murderous twin (but who knows which one?), and many more.  We're also treated to some great character moments.  Martin loses control and ends up shooting a suspect; Vivian makes an irreversible choice to lie to protect both their careers, and both have to deal with the consequences in later episodes.  Samantha is forced into counseling after being shot in the Season One finale; she says she's fine, but we know she isn't.  Danny has to choose whether to testify on his brother's behalf, or abandon him the way he once abandoned Danny.  An Alzheimer's diagnosis forces Jack to re-evaluate the strained relationship with his father (wonderfully played by Martin Landau), and a certain case causes him to relive his painful adolescence with an emotionally unstable mother.Overall, this season continues the watchability and excellent writing begun by Season One.For the curious, here is the episode list, first aired 09/25/03-05/20/04.The BusRevelationsConfidenceProdigyCopycatOur Sons And DaughtersA Tree FallsTrip BoxMoving OnComing HomeExposureHawks And HandsawsLife RulesThe LineWannabeRisenGung HoLegacyDoppelgangerShadowsTwo FamiliesThe SeasonLost And FoundBai
Best of the post Schultz era. The immortal "Charlie Brown All Stars" - 5 starsThe new "Lucy Must be Traded" - 4 starsThe mediocre "Spring Training" - 3 starsSince "All Stars" and "Spring Training" have been around a long time, I'll limit my comments to "Lucy Must be Traded".This is definetly the best of the post Schultz era so far. It recaptures some of the old magic. The jazzy piano background music is very reminiscent of the glory days.Charlie is a little less wishy-washy in this outing. He's determined to get his worst player, Lucy, off the team.  You'll have to watch to see what happens.I recommend this DVD to any true Peanuts fan
Heartbreaking. Honkytonky Man starts in a casual manner. The first hour made me think it's one of those films by Eastwood that are not be taken too seriously. As Red's illness grows worse day by day, his character becomes more and more pityable. Clint Eastwood plays the dying man in this movie. It was nearly tearjerking to see him cry out for his love when his end is near. Towards the last half hour of the film, the film manages to reach it's peak in terms of moving script. I dont know how he does it but Clint Eastwood somehow manages to make "not so serious films" into gulp inducing trips. If I could start again, I would say this film is about a man who makes music. He ain't a big shot and he doesnt have many big dreams. Towards the end of his life(Thanks to TB which he suffers from) he realises he must record his music. His nephew is his only friend and he's always around. The core of this movie would interest a person who likes travelling,beer,acoustic guitar and casual flings. I can't possibly comprehend just how terribly serious this film got towards the end.I have seen 5 Clint Eastwood films before this. Escape from Alcatraz, Absolute Power and MDB are his best. This one will earn more respect if I ever give it a watch again. I would look back at Honkytonky Man as a film in which Clint Eastwood played the character of a semi cowboy who lived his life to what he stood for. Kyle Eastwood acted well considering this might have been his debut.All in all, a winner of its own sort with a very good touching end
An inspirational documentary about an amazing man. "Frazetta - Painting with Fire" is a captivating documentary about an amazing man: Frank Frazetta.  This film is truly inspiring as Frazetta is just as interesting as his art.  You really can lean a lot about Frazetta's life and art from this movie.  The documentary is segmented into various parts that span Frazetta's life and his influence on fantasy art.Like so many other people, the book covers that had Frazetta's paintings always impressed me.  They were so interesting and distinctive, so I took instant notice and liking to them.  They had a style of their own and it did not take much to spot a Frazetta cover.  It was a treat to see so many of his paintings in this movie and my belief that Frazetta is a genius was only reinforced.  If you were ever impressed by Frazetta's art, this film is worth watching as you get to learn the story behind it.
Excellent Choreography & Cueing. I am a new step aerobics instructor and I have been studying different aerobics DVDs to prepare for my classes. This was my first DVD by Gin Miller and it will definitely not be my last. Her teaching style is very refined and the workout  is well designed. She maintains a high level of intensity while delivering an interesting choreography based on classic moves. This DVD is excellent for beginners or anyone wishing to revisit the fundamentals of step. It is also a great idea for new instructors who would like to observe refined techniques for teaching step aerobics
A beautiful and uplifting film. I am still crying from having just watched this. If you are moved by examples of people being kind and noble despite their own pain and loss, then I can't recommend this little gem highly enough.
Can't wait for the next 8 in 2007. Great set, great horror films, I cannot wait for the next 8 in 2007.  Keep making these and keep making them extreme
"I saw you in an orange grove...". James Mangold Identity is one hell of a movie. The twist is amazing, didn't see that coming. The ending will shock you to pieces. John Cusack and Amanda Peet are superb in their roles, he plays a former cop and she plays a hooker trying to get home to Flordia. Clea Duvall also appears in this film, Duvall was previously in Girl, Interrupted (another Mangold film). This film kept me interested for all its 90 minutes. Great direction, top-notch acting, and awesome plot. Identity is the best pyschological thriller of all-time, I highly recommend this engrossing little film
A real score for Beckett aficionados. Not to gush, but many of the versions in this set far surpass my expectations of film adaptations of theatre. For instance, "Endgame" is brilliantly realized, with finely nuanced acting. Top talent on both sides of the camera, often visually arresting works. Really great stuff for any Beckett or experimental theatre enthusiast. Pricey, but worth it
Well...it's "mood elavation" for ME... Everything the esteemed reviewer above said is so very true.  And more.  I didn't see it as, what, "a metaphor for NYC" (or something) but then, I never viewed ANY movie as being an "intellectual experience," as he. I'll just say that, sometime during the mid-seventies, I was somewhere in upstate NY, and I was the "assistant theater manager" for the local "cinema," - which meant that I sold the tix, and I threw out the noisemakers - and, um, "Ex #1" was the "manager," which meant SHE projected the movies.  OK, that said, she and I both went hysterical over "P123," and we even once sneakily invited a few choice...friends, NEW YORK CITY "choice friends" to a "private party" sort of "showing," and everybody...well, you would've thought we were projecting "Horse Feathers" or "Duck Soup" or something!  Walter Matthau is hilarious as the belabored "transit director," and (you ready for this?) Jerry Stiller as "the Chief of Police..." Plot, you ask?  Robert Shaw, Martin Balsam, and a couple of other guys kidnap an NYC subway transit train and hold it ransom for a million bucks.  Right now, however, one would probably hear every conceivable "ethnic stereotype" bellowing "RACIST" because of P123's "unforgiving-to-anyone's" characterizations.  Back then, though, we didn't get our "feelings hurt so easily," and we could laugh at ourselves.  And we did.  ENJOY "Taking Of Pelham One Two Three," and don't try to be "Siskel & Ropert" or Rex Reed or anything, just enjoy yourself.  And I won't "give it away," but the movie DOES have a "happy ending."  Hilarious, really..
Great, fun and entertaining, I'd give it a one hunderd out of 5!. This is a very great movie,  If only this thing would go that far! The Jones movie's are my favoite movies of all time!!!! Any body needs to see the movies, and it's awesome that they are selling them indivisual. There like page tuners, you can't but the book down. Well with these movies its the same, you Just can't stop watching them... everybody can enjoy the movie's. You probably wouldn't let your kids watch the jones for a while becuase of there violence and gore. But actually, I saw them when I was a 7 year old boy. And you know what, I loved them! Personaly my favorite is the last one.I can't stop watching them, one time i watched all of them... twice in one day! If you havn't seen them, your missing out on somthing huge!so let me give you guys some info on all of them.The first one is called indiana jones and the raiders of the lost ark:In this one doc. jones is on an epic crusade to try to find the lost ark, while trying to rescue his love intrest, and get out of this mess...alive!In the second instllment, indiana jones and the temple of doom: Indy has crashed into India, where a tribe is missing something very sacred to them! the tribe suggests that a tribe of evil has stolen it! So indy finds himself in bind, becuase the only way indy id getting back home is to find that rock! Watch as indy and his two companions try come out of all this mess, alive!In the last one, Idiana jones and the last cursade: Indy is trying to find the holy grail and his father! on the way he has an adventure that only he could expereince! Watch as indy struggles to: run away from nazis, try to save his fathers life, and find the holy grail and accomplish the three tasks that that lead him to it!The three movies are the best out there. So make some popcorn, turn of the lights, get cozy on the sofa, and press the play button.I promise you that the three movies are somthing that you'll never forget!OF coarse, this is the first, Which is my second fav. You guys should try getting all of them
More than crime. This is not only a thrilling story on the life of a group of African Americans but it also captures the reality of the streets of L.A. As you watch the movie you see the life surrounding this group of black friends. You truly become attached to the characters and begin to feel that they cant do anything to escape the struggle they have been in since they were born. Ice Cube the main character plays a gangbanger who is living the life of a criminal, from fights on the corner, to drive by shootings.This movie truly captures the struggle millions of African Americans go through. As we watch the kids grow up in the ghetto, to when they are old enough to get out, they still seem to be the same. Their customs dont change, simply because of their surrounding, guns, liquor, poverty, and crime. They have no other option than do join in.When dough boy's(Ice Cube) brother Ricky is offered a scholarship to play college football it looks like a way to get out of the ghetto. The whole family feels as this a way for them to escape it also, so everyone is supporting him. Until a tragedy is brought upon the family. This story truly proves nothings good until finally out of the hood for these boys.
A Troubled but Worthwhile New Start. The Ninth season of Stargate SG1 has some major casting changes and the show handles it about as well as it can be done considering all that has come to pass.Last season ended some major plot lines and new ones are needed. The principle new adversaries are the Orai, an offshoot of the Ancients who seek to force their worship upon everyone. This does not mean that the Goa'uld are completely beaten. They too have some surprises in store for the SG1 team.The team has a new commander and he gets off to a rocky start, both within the show and in his part but he soon seems to fit in. He is not as humerous as O'Neill but he is a worthy leader.The newly freed Jaffa are in tumult over their own leadership. Louis Gossett Jr. does a good job of playing a leader in opposition to Teal'c.It's a new world but it still has more than its share of problems.Episode Synopses follow:Avalon parts 1 and 2: SG1 has a new commander, LTC Cameron Mitchell, but he has a problem. All of the old SG1 team has transferred elsewhere and he has to put a new team together from scratch. He is not having much luck. Help comes from an unexpected source. A former Goa'uld host turned con artist shows up. In her scheming, Vala gets Daniel Jackson to try on a bracelet. He does and finds himself locked to her. They cannot be separated for more than a short while without them both falling ill. She did not expect this. She was conned by the person she stole the bracelets from. This gives the new colonel an excuse to get the old gang together to try and fix the problem. In an attempt to shed light on the mystery, they begin to work on Arthurian mythology and find an outpost of the Ancients in England. It was the Avalon of King Arthur. They find the place but it is protected by a series of riddles. Solving the riddles reveals that this outpost was built by a group of the Ancients who did not ascend.  Jackson and the con artist are still bound by the bracelets but they have a clue that might help them get free of them. To do so they will have to use an alien communications device and try to contact the Ancients.Origin: Jackson and Vala make it to another galaxy using the communication device but they find that only their minds have been transferred. Their bodies are still back on Earth while their minds are borrowing the bodies of a couple of locals. They find a medieval culture subject to a religious tyranny run by men called "priors". The priors, in turn serve the Orai. The Orai want worship and they are pleased to learn of a new galaxy in which they can send their priors. They also want to suppress any knowledge which will conflict with that aim. It seems that the Orai are an offshoot of the Ancients who took a very different path than non-involvement.The Tie that Binds: Jackson and Vala are still tied together by the bracelets and are getting desperate for a way to get them off. She finally agrees to seek guidance from the guy she stole the bracelets from. He agrees to help but only if she returns a piece of jewelry she stole from him. She has already unloaded it but agrees to try. This is difficult because the person she sold it to refuses to return it unless she first returns a power coil she traded it for. When the owner of the coil is tracked down, he refuses to return it until she gets back the trading ship she took from him. This involves stealing it back from the thieves she left it with, lots of danger and a few buffoons. Eventually, the tangled web is untangled. This is not one of the better episodes.The Powers that Be: The Orai are sending out priors to proselytize out galaxy. When the SG1 team learns of one attempt, they head off to try and prevent it. They expect to be aided by Vala who has a history with that particular planet. What she fails to tell them is that her connection is that she was the host for the Goa'uld who was there god. She played this up after the death of the parasite so that she could continue as a god. When she returns, she chides the locals for turning their backs on her. Things go poorly, though when they overhear her talking about being a false god. That puts the locals squarely in the camp of the Orai's priors as a battle for hearts and minds ensues.Beachhead: A prior establishes a beachhead on a Jaffa planet and the locals want nothing to do with more false gods. This hacks the prior off and he establishes a force field around the entire planet fending off all the Jaffa who attack him. Meanwhile, Stargate Command gets a message from a renegade Goa'uld who offers to help in the fight of the Orai. Samantha Carter shows up to help out in the fight. They take the Prometheus and a Naquadria enhanced nuke to blow up the gate. Things get more complicated when a free Jaffa fleet shows up to try and destroy the gate. When the superbomb goes off, it makes the expansion of the beachhead even faster. This does not make anyone happy except the renegade who turns out to have hidden motives. Help in staving off the big invasion comes from an unexpected source.Ex Deus Machina: When a Jaffa is found dead on Earth, it raises some questions as to why he is there. His death correlates with the disappearance of several industrialists. Gerak, the leader of the free Jaffa, claims to know nothing about it. The emphasis is on "claims". Gerak is trying to stir the Jaffa council into working against the Tok'ra. He is also trying to sow mistrust for Te'alc who he sees as competition. The plot thickens when it becomes apparent that Ba'al is alive and on Earth. He wants to go into "retirement" and be left alone to pursue his own aims. He claims to have a naquada bomb in the US he will set off if he is bothered. Everyone wants to capture Ba'al for political reasons. Ba'al is captured and executed but that doesn't help since there seems to be more of him around.Babylon: While visiting a new planet, the team comes under fire from some hostile Jaffa and LTC Mitchell is captured by them. The rest of the team manages to capture one of the Jaffa. This group has, according to legend, not been subject to the Goa'uld for thousands of years. Jackson finds signs of Ancient technology but no sign of the Jaffa or the missing colonel. The Jaffa holding the colonel have some technology from the Ancients but are disdainful of everyone, particularly the Jaffa who did not follow them into exile. When a prior of the Orai shows up, the colonel learns that he has made some inroads. He realizes that this group of Jaffa allied with the Orai will be a major threat.Prototype: As last season concluded it seemed as if all of the threats from the Goa'uld had pretty much been taken care of. Then, earlier this season, we learned that Ba'al is still around and actually on Earth, biding his time in "retirement". This episode, we learn that Anubis still poses a problem as well. As the team is investigating a problem with a Stargate, they find a person in suspended animation. He is brought back to SGC and he claims to have been enslaved. Everyone believes him until Jackson finds some notes in the lab where the stasis field was found. They have found Anubis' private lab and the person they revived is a clone, complete with Goa'uld DNA. He is just a few steps short of being able to ascend himself. SGC sees the threat as too dangerous and they want to solve the problem right then and there. A politician, however, has other ideas. He sees it as a great opportunity to recoup some of the enormous investment put into the program and is sure they can control him. They are WRONG. Anubis is just playing along letting SGC do the work and preparing to strike. When he does, nobody can stop him. He does not, however, count on a dirty trick by LTC Carter.The Fourth Horseman: The Orai are still sending out priors and they are setting their sights high. A prior is sent to Gerak, the powerful leader of the Jaffa sect in power. Strangely enough, Gerak seems to fall for it. At first, the acceptance is subtle but the priors demand more and more until it is revealed that they demand the absolute obedience of all Jaffa. By this time, Gerak is in too deep to see the danger. Earth has its problems as well. People start dropping from the same plague induced by the priors a few episodes back. The plague spreads quickly. The one ray of sunshine is the return of the ascended Ancient, Orlan, who fell in love with Sam a few seasons back. He has returned to help but has had to take human form. He took the form of a child because that would allow him to retain more of his knowledge although that does put a crimp in his romantic aspirations. He is helpful but then he too falls sick. Before he does so, he reveals some critical information about the Orai and their priors. As everyone suspected, they are lying and there is a reason the worship of mortals is sought. Sickest of all, though is Gerak. He is ordered to destroy Chulak, the home world of Te'alc in order to set an example for all Jaffa. Even he balks at this...until the Orai make an offer that he can't refuse.The Fourth Horseman Part 2: Gerak is now a prior with all of the power that entails. He is determined to force the force the conversion of all Jaffa. Earth is still in the midst of the prior's plague. It has become international and the world is going to soon die. There is a hope. The lab has come up with an experimental gizmo that is supposed to nullify the priors' powers. They intend to use it to return to Soudan, the planet of the Babylon episode to tray and capture the prior working there. They want some of his DNA to try and fight the plague. The people of Soudan are not fond of the SG1 team but, when they arrive, it seems that the Jaffa there are becoming disillusioned and are ready to fight. They just don't know how. SG1 is there to help. SG1 plans even more. They want to try and turn the prior against the Orai. They manage to capture the prior but the cure doesn't work. Neither does their plan to turn him. They do get help from a surprising source, however. The source manages to effect a cure for almost everyone but there is still the specter of how to deal with the Orai themselves. There is also the problem of Orlan. He gave his all and now he is helpless.Collateral Damage: SGC makes contact with a civilization which has made a major breakthrough in working with Goa'uld technology. They have perfected a device to let people share memories. That will mean that a pilot or engineer could transfer his experience in hours instead of years. These people want to trade and SGC is eager. Unfortunately, there are plots inside of plots. The scientist who developed the process objects to having it militarized. That means she is a liability to the local power structure and she is killed. LTC Mitchell is framed for the murder. The hope is that he will claim diplomatic immunity and whole thing can be swept under the rug but Mitchell is not about to take the easy way out. He has actual memories of killing the woman and demands an investigation. In doing so, he faces a possible death sentence.Ripple Effect: Things are a bit peculiar when the SG1 team returns to SGC a bit early. The general is puzzled when they reference people who are dead or events that transpired differently from the way he remembers. A little bit into the debriefing, words comes that the gate has been activated and it occurs right on schedule for when SG1 should have returned. The returning party turns out to be...SG1. Things get a bit more confusing when other SG1 teams begin to arrive. Some of them contain dead members or people who have dropped out of the series. They figure out that a wormhole problem has caused alternate realities to funnel their returning teams to OUR Earth. Each of the alternate worlds is a bit different and each faces dire threats. Some of these threats have been faced on our world before and others are fresh. In an effort to avoid becoming the Grand Central Station of the Multiverse, the general orders a halt to further traffic. Now they have to figure out how to fix the problem. A possible solution is found but that solution has the downside that it strands all of those who were misdirected here to our world permanently. Even so, SGC proceeds with the plan and the alternates mutiny. They have a plan of their own and this gives the "Real" Sam an idea to restore things to the way they are supposed to be.Stronghold: The Jaffa council is considering a proposal to dissolve itself and hold widespread elections. Teal'c and his faction support it and they expect the only female member of the council to support it as well. When she gets up to speak, however, she speaks against it. When a member is asked to speak with her, she "zaps" him with something and he changes his mind. When Teal'c sets off to investigate, he gets captured by Ba'al who seems to be having a rather active "retirement". It seems that Ba'al is worried about the Orai and is trying to press the Jaffa into his service. The Jaffa are worried about the Orai as well but some things are just beyond the pale.Ethon; A few seasons back, the SG1 team encountered a world in a terrible state of cold war. The presence of the team sent the locals over the brink and the war heated up with devastating consequences. Now, the Orai have taken an interest offering a superweapon to one side in exchange for worship. SGC finds itself in the position of having to interfere again but not before Daniel is taken hostage by the party with the superweapon. The weapon, by the way, is very capable of defending itself with catastrophic results. Now the survivors of the attack are now faced with the problem of taking out the superweapon with the technology available to the war torn world. The solution further tears apart the world.Off the Grid: SGC gets reports of food riots and learns that the riots are not over hunger but over shortages of the addictive corn. Fearing some sort of Orai plot, SG1 is sent to investigate. Things go badly and as the team is trying to make its getaway, the Stargate disappears. The local drug lords think that SG1 is responsible and that means trouble for the team. The bigger trouble is that Ba'al is the one getting frisky. Nerus and his appetites give SGC some information that is, of course, bogus but by their manipulation he leads them to Ba'al. What neither Ba'al nor SGC seems to understand is the wrath of thwarted drug lords.Scourge: The SG1 team is given the awful duty of babysitting some international politicians and bureaucrats on their first trip off world. They go to the Gamma site where research is conducted on things too strange or dangerous to bring back to earth. One of the scientists is studying a bug that has shown up only on planets where the priors have shown up. The bug is a voracious crop destroyer but there is no proof that they are connected to the priors. All this change when some hungry bugs in the lab get a taste of meatloaf. Then they undergo a metamorphosis and become voracious carnivores and overrun the place. The bugs don't seem to be too choosy. They will eat bureaucrats as well as Stargate team members and scientists. SG1 evacuates the lab with the simpletons (I mean politicos) in tow. They have to hold on until a ship can come to pick them up. The one defense the team has is that the bugs are very sensitive to sound. That means that the guns keep them away...until they run out of ammo.Arthur's Mantle: Sam is in the lab playing with a piece of offworld tech that has been puzzling her for a while. She finally gets a response from it and it zaps her and LTC Mitchell with some sort of ray. They seem none the worse for wear until they notice that nobody else can see or hear them. They also cannot grip or handle anything. They are "out of phase" and stuck in an alternate dimension. While they are trying to figure out how to communicate with someone, a garbled messages comes through the Stargate from the world of the Soudan Jaffar.  They are under attack. SG1, minus Mitchell and Carter, head out to investigate and find that almost all of them have been killed. They were attacked by the Jaffa captured by SG1 (The Fourth Horseman Episode). He has been infected by a prior and can absorb a lot of damage. Meanwhile, Jackson figures out that the device Carter was working on was the legendary "Mantle of Arthur". It was used by Merlin to hide some of his experiments. He was working on a weapon to use against the Orai. LTC Mitchell heads out to Soudan to try and help Teal'c. He is still hidden but is convinced that he will be able to do something. When Teal'c tries the cloaking device of the Ancients, he is able to see and hear Mitchell though physical touch is not possible. That makes Mitchell able to really help, although SGC finds a solution to his problem at a most inopportune time.Crusade: A few episodes back, Vala was lost as she helped to destroy a gigantic Stargate intended by the Orai to be a beachhead into our galaxy. Now she is back...sort of. Her minds has taken over Daniel Jackson's body using the same crystals that she and Jackson used to visit the Orai galaxy near the beginning of the season. She has some startling news. The Orai's vast Armada is almost ready for them to begin their crusade. Also, she has become pregnant and does not know how it happened. She has not had an opportunity to engage in the activities that usually result in that condition. During the course of her adventures, she makes contact with the local underground elements and helps in a plot to destroy the invasion fleet. To do this, she is going to have to betray the one person she has ever really loved. That the plot fails just makes things worse.Camelot: The SG1 team is still looking for Merlin's weapon designed for use against ascended beings. The clues lead them to Camelot; a medieval planet with a medieval culture. They still wait for Arthur's return and they fear the workshop of Merlin. That workshop is guarded by all the usual stuff like black knights, swords in stones and such. The search for the weapon turns out to be the search for the Holy Grail, although they have little time to thinks about such trivia. The Orai have managed to construct a huge Stargate in our galaxy and the combined ships of Earth, the Jaffa and even the Drug cartels are on station to try and stop the emerging fleet as they pour through the breach. The battle is going poorly as this end of season cliff hanger comes to a close.
Whiteout. Would anyone really want to live in a perfect world?  That momentous question and nothing less is the theme of Alexander Mackendrick's comedy, which despite it's high reputation is still, to my mind, one of the most underrated films in the world's cinema.  Mackendrick examines what the human race really means by perfection in this allegory about a semi-mad scientist who seems to invent a perpetually clean, tear-proof cloth.  There goes any need for variety in anybody's clothing, ever, and although the textile industry is the setting for the story it doesn't take much imagination to see the director's point in a larger context.  Mark Twain used to say that the Christian idea of heaven sounded like hell to him, and we see that same insight brought to visual life here.  An impeccable cast, headlined both by the great Alec Guinness and by Joan Greenwood, whose voice was almost as distinctive as Guinness'.  As a social comedy I rate it with Stanley Kubrick's &quot;Dr. Strangelove,&quot; and I can think of no higher praise
must have for broadway lovers. i saw this show on PBS and was so enthralled with it that i just had to order it.  the performances are priceless from folks who have passed on.  i don't know of any other way to be able to see Yul Brynner's commanding King and I performance.  Loved it
I'm hungry for more. Please, release a short called 'It's Hummer Time', about a cat who chases a hummingbird and keeps interrupting a bulldog every time. More importantly, give us more Arthur Davis' and Robert McKimsons' shorts
Soundtrack CD is available from Amazon.co.uk. Today I ordered the soundtrack CD for this movie from Amazon.co.uk, the United Kingdom link at the bottom of this page, at a price of 6.80 GBP [Great Britain Pounds aka Pounds Sterling] plus 3.08 GBP for airmail shipping, a total of 9.88 GBP.  They'll have access to your Amazon.com password, shipping address options and credit card info, and the equivalent dollar amount will be charged to your credit card.  Cheaper than from Medieval Baebes, and it's as easy as ordering from Amazon.com!
Cannibal Women is a B-movie that scores all A's with me. Cannibal Women in the Avocado Jungle ...It's a long cheesy title on a movie with an equally cheesy premise. That's what makes this movie so much fun to watch. I have a soft spot for B-movies. The strong effort by the actors often makes them superior to the "A" movies Hollywood produces.Cannibal Women Features Shannon Tweed as a professor of feminist studies enlisted by the government to go into the "Avocado Jungle" to deal with the Cannibal women so the United States can have a steady supply of Avocados. It seems the army has sent in soldiers and all was left of them were their dog tags. The women with tore the men into strips and ate them with guacamole dip! Accompanying the professor on this dangerous mission is valley girl Bunny and a sexist guide who can't read a map played by Bill Maher Before he became a talk show host on "Politically Incorrect". On their journey in the Avocado jungle the professor debates feminist theory with the sexist guide. These arguments are hilarious! In the jungle they run into some sensitive guys who Maher tries to "man up" with disastrous results. Afterward they're captured by the Cannibal women who have had their tribe taken over by a radical feminist. Adrienne Barbeau is a hoot as the Feminist professor who takes over the tribe and puts our group of explorers in peril. I won't give the rest away the climax of this movie is TOO good to be spoiled.The plot is ridiculous, and the actors know it. They play it straight anyway and their excellent performances make this movie so good. In the face of a cheesy script poor production values, a low budget and skimpy costumes they make it work. I highly recommend you get this movie and a bowl of popcorn on Saturday night. Cannibal Women is a B-movie that scores all A's with me.
OPPS! MIND GAMES. I don't particularly care for mind games but this had a sudtlety? that was easy to miss.Richard, as a moneyed playboy, and Justin who was just too brilliant were bored with life as they knew it.  Their dependence on each other to spice things up led me to wonder if the girlfriend was be a next victim.Hard-nosed Cassie was still having problems with her own past which surely colored her treatment of her male partners.  Even her seduction scene showed her twisted idea of how to handle a man.Her new partner, San [or Sam], let himself get seduced only once and then showed some backbone the next time.  But they showed professional respect for each other as they tracked down this random? murderer.Justin and Richard were great in their acting - they were just short of repulsive, in looks and attitudes.The backgrounds had plenty of color and I loved the opening scene in the high-cliff cottage.Not too bad - just a little bit on the dark side, mentally.
Suspenseful. Cajun. Slick. Deadly. This film is a drama in the classic sense of the word: it begins in order and ends in disorder. And it occurs against the backdrop of N'awlins - the Big Easy. You can almost hear the nightly raindrops spattering on the greasy sidewalks.Dennis Quaid is a good cop walking the fine line between integrity and corruption - playing at the edges. Too cute by half. His winning, seductive, boyish smile and easy charm make him a perfect foil for the career minded, straight-laced Assistant District Attorney (Ellen Barkin).But the truth is elusive in New orleans. Things aren't always what they seem and somewhere along the line, choices will be made. Big choices. In the Big Easy. Someone's likely to pay the price. A Big Price.The film starts out light and breezy but quickly turns dark and sinister when the plot thickens and danger strikes too close to home.The leads are engaging and winning. The plot is predictable but engaging. And the mood is dark, like New Orleans herself, at night, in the rain, spattering on the greasy sidewalk...
as sad and hopeless as you could get. the whole life was just a meaningless struggle and very difficult to interpretate it. a quite good movie but also a very sad and hopeless one. a very represenatative piece of the 'existentialism' and 'escapeism' so popular in the 60s to 70s'. then fully bloomed into the crazy era of the vietnam war. these kinda movies would affect your mood badly, drive you nuts and throw you into a dark alley. there's no way a man could run away from himself
Mike Binder's Best Movie yet. Mike Binder wrote, directed and is a suport actor in this fun movie about anger. It stars Joan Allen and Kevin Costner. The entire ensemble cast of this movie were great in making this movie flow.The movie follows the journey of a wife and mother whose husband unexpectedly disappears and leaves them alone. Now the family has to learn to deal with the anger of his not being there. The family has four daughters and they need to juggle their mom's romantic dilemmas and family dynamics that continually change. Kevin Costner plays a former baseball player, now radio DJ, who starts to fall for the family.The true story of the movie is about anger. How it can stop and change your life if you let it. And even though the female lead is angry, she is dealing with a tough time in her life. But most of all the movie shows that anger is a waste of time and that you should not make assumptions. Always check your facts first
Classic movie - TIME TO PUT IT ON DVD!!!. I bought this VHS tape last year and absolutely enjoyed it. It is even better in the fact that it so closely follows Ted Lawson's book of how that historic event really happened (a well-planned and well-executed counter strike during America's darkest days of the war with Japan). What a boost it was to U.S. morale.Only problem is...my VHS tape now starts wigging out during the best part of the movie (when they are launching from the Hornet all the way though the bombing of Japan) and does not go back to normal until where the Chinese were taking them to safety.I agree with the previous comment on how they can take last years flop and immediately put it on DVD but not this eternal classic of a movie.PUT IT ON DVD!!!
Best Christmas Movie EVER. I really can't say anything new that hasn't been said about this great movie, except read Jean Shepherd's novels...you will get a whole new appreciation for the movie and the characters that have become a part of so many of our lives.Thank you Darren McGavin for giving us the best Christmas Present ever
ha ha ha great movie!!! ha ha ha!!!. greatly funny!!!a must get!!!hillarious!!!wow and a ha ha!!!i recomend this movie to all who love rock and to all who love comedy...and those who love both to
"Can Anyone Play?". First off I agree with the warning to not watch the trailer first because it does give away the first set up in the movie.  When Denise Richards sees Matt Dillion and his student having a water fight os such and says something like, "Is this just a game for the boys, or can anyone play?" She looks so sweet and hot that it's hard to imagine her getting rough and tough just a while later.  However she pulls ift off pretty well.  In fact they all pulle their rolls off pretty well.  I couldn't understand why Kevin Bacon seemed a bit stiffer than usual, but that was actually pretty good acting....I can't really say much more about why without giving too much of a hint at one of the twists, but it's interesting when you step back and see what he was actually doing.I give it 5 stars because it's both fun and funny, and of course very hot at times.  Well worth a look...
Fan of old Horror Movies. If you can't appreciate a classic horror movie with simple effects, then this is not the movie for you. Otherwise, enjoy!
Light-Hearted British Comedy. The selling point for "The Naked Truth" is that it features a young Peter Sellers.  Truth be told this is more of an ensemble effort and not what you would call a break-out role for Sellers.  Sellers as a "Scottish" television personality is given the opportunity to employ a number of disguises and voice characterizations that are amusing but not fitfully so.  The film's central premise of a group of prominent Brits who conspire to dispatch a blackmailing tabloid publisher(Dennis Price of "Kind Hearts and Coronets") is played more for broad slapstick than for the macabre dark comedy of classic Ealing comedies.  These observations aside this is a highly enjoyable film with a good laugh quotient.  Solid cast also includes the irrepressible Terry-Thomas and Shirley Eaton("Goldfinger").
Fort Apache -- It exceeds "The Searchers". This is the gem of the Wayne/Ford Calvary trilogy, and I am delighted it's finally coming to DVD.But a question: Can anyone heal me of the following misjudgment?Try as I may, I cannot shake off my estimation of Fort Apache as a more complete and substantially higher overall cinematic accomplishment in comparison with The Searchers.Partly it may consist in the fact that The Searchers is a great movie to watch -- and watch again -- but Fort Apache somehow succeeds as a more nearly perfect, complete and wholly rounded experience. The Searchers shines due to its externals, but Apache proceeds and then later culminates in a richer, deeper and more satisfying way, and the whole movie experience resonates with you in a way that The Searchers does not quite achieve
Baseball Mysticism - Give us a choice. My all time favorite sports movie next to "PRIDE OF THE YANKEES" and "HOOSIERS". The only criticism I have is that they should have made TWO ENDINGS. The "upbeat one" used in the Hollywood release and the " gritty downer ending" as read from the final pages of the book. And let the viewer choose before watching the film. I'd still pick the one used by Hollywood but it would have been nice to have Malmed's literary ending also.
Lovin it!. This movie is a classic - Have watched it many times & I still love it
3 times through. After watching this one time through you will either think it was an awesome production of action and effects (geared towards those with a small attention span and thirst for raw action rather than a good story line) or that it is a complete mess. I admit that I enjoyed what I thought was mindless entertainment, but at the same time was left slightly disappointed with what I thought was a Hollywoodish Anime (not a good thing). However I was fortunate to see one OVA  at a time, therefore I watched the first OVA about three times, the second two times and at last all three together (these three are what make up the contents of this DVD). So by the time I finished this first half of the story I pretty much understood it.This DVD entails a complicated kaleidoscope of events that eventually jumble into a collage of a story.  Honestly this is a very good anime with a very good story once you are able to breath it all in. It appears as a mess because the director throws everything at you almost at once; however I believe that is what he intends. As the story goes on the knots that make up the story untwine (OVA to OVA). So expect the first OVA to be the most complicated and confusing. but if you Read the summary first the story will make more sense the first time you watch it.Finally, the animation and CG is second to none. It is an extremely beautiful anime.Sooo, I highly recommend reading the summery on the back of the box first
Ice Cold, Hot Wired!. Gone in 60 Seconds is a guilty pleasure - its vacuous and superficial, full of typical Hollywood produced "guy-movie" cues. Cars, guns, explosions, anti-heros, and Angelina Jolie abound, as well as comically evil villains, comically thin plot devices, and comically honourable car thieves. All that being said, though, the movie is great for what it is - a typical Bruckheimer celebration of over-the-top action. Its fun to get lost in the action, and director Dominic Sena imparts a great sense of pace (which he failed to carry over into 2001's Swordfish), keeping the tension level-high, the action front & centre, and the cars at full throttle. There's also some real funny moments too - the "Brick House" rendition at the police impound lot makes me laugh every time.Just a brief comment here: some movies, it just looks like everyone's having fun on the set. This is one of them. Regardless of how goofy or superficial the roles are, everyone on screen is far into them, and looks like they're enjoying every second of it. It makes for a great viewing experience - its always more fun to watch a movie where the actors are invested in the script, compared to one where the staff plods through and reads their lines in zombie mode. Jolie and Cage have good resonnance, and Ribisi is great as always - this movie makes we want to go out and get a copy of Boiler Room.Let me start by saying that the menus will give you a seizure if you're epileptic, so watch out. They're attempting to communicate "fast," I guess, but it comes across more as "spastic" and "illegible." Oh well.  The 5.1 mix is great - full of life, with well-deployed bass and great motion and spatial placement. These are important characteristics for this movie, as you'll be hearing plenty of cars zoom across the screen, helicopters hovering behind you, and so on. I'm a little surprised that there isn't a DTS track or anything really fancy on this disc though - given the Director's Cut nature of the release, I expected a top shelf audio treatment. While this is certainly good, its hard to imagine that its the best.Director's Cut: Apparently this version of the film includes "never before seen footage cut into the movie." Its not disclosed where this footage is in the film, however, or how much of it there is, so its hard to say if it has a material impact or not. I saw the original years ago, and didn't notice any major deviations between that version and this, so I'm not feeling a lot of excitement about this "feature."Jerry Bruckheimer Filmo- and Bio-graphy: One little known fact is that to judge by his picture as included on this disc, Jerry B. is in fact a very close relative of Chuck Norris, if not actually Chuck Norris himself. Other than that revelation, this feature is pretty uninspired - lots of ho-hum text to scroll through.Conversations with Jerry B.: This feature has much more substance than the prior one, even though its fundamentally unrelated to Gone in 60 Seconds. In his conversations, Bruckheimer explains the role of a producer, from conception, to funding, to staffing (finding a director, for instance), and so on. This is some interesting material, and Bruckheimer comes across as a really humble guy who knows how lucky he is to be working with top knotch talent.Action Overload: Here's some filler for you. A montage of action scenes from the movie, set to some nameless soundtrack piece. Underwhelming.The Big Chase: This is a series of several vignettes, dissecting the big finale chase in the film, with the Shelby Mustang vs. 500 cop cars. This is very, very good material - director Sena and various stunt crew explain piece by piece how the visual effects of the film were put together. Lots of great knowledge to absorb.Various Featurettes: 0 to 60: This is an "ok" featurette, which centers mainly on character development, writing, and casting. Worth watching, and nice and short. Wild Rides: Believe it or not, Nick Cage was his own stuntdriver for the movie. Nicely done! Stars on the Move: A series of featurettes about the key characters and their stories, narrated by Bruckheimer, writer Scott Rosenberg, and the actors.Notwithstanding the fact that I have no idea what's different about the "Director's Cut," this was a great release. There's some real quality extras in there, good audio and video, and, well, that all adds up to quality
Solid B-Grade horror pictures that are worth every penny. If you're reading reviews of this box set, it's highly likely that you're at least somewhat interested in buying it. So if you can afford coughing up $13, do yourself a favor and go for it. At this price, it's virtually impossible to feel ripped off, even if you end up hating all 50 movies, which itself seems virtually impossible (unless you hate these types of movies). But then why would you be reading this in the first place
Henry lives on. In my youth I read all of Henry Miller's books, finding much that was amazing, boring, sexy.  "Henry and June" does about the same.  Ward and Thurman as is the wife. No doubt Henry's life may have been less exciting than his imagination, I expected more sex than it showed which was Miller's preoccupation.  And he played around a lot more than the movie shows.But the atmosphere of his life and of Paris were there.  An ambiance prevades the story line which explains somewhat his reason for writing gritty life scenes.  Worth watching
The Incredible Beaver Cam!. This documentary is not only educational but at times very amusing and entertaining.  The sounds and the music are great and the underwater cinematography is just spectacular.If you love nature and documentaries, this is G-rated Beaver Cam the whole family can enjoy
One of the best Superhero movies. It's great. One of the few times super-heroes are done by a directorwho knows the comics.
It is generous.. of the "porridge giver" to heap on an extra helping of Amon amarth footage. It is of course a musical journey with creative camera work. It is not a musical visual accomplishment but the rersult of a documentary that's neccessary thing to rock: Ifyou can't be there, you must have this to enjoy: The musicianship is brilliant on the first concerT.The stage is also set as a flaming hall of VAlhalla for the living! A set so exciting and yet there's three shows at least. a documentary as well.They werE waiting for the right time to come out with this..
A Realistic Movie. One of the better movies of this type. Very exciting and very entertaining
Get "Happy". Happy, Texas is a smart, funny movie that kept me laughing from beginning until the end.  Starring William H. Macy (Fargo), Steve Zahn (Saving Silverman) and, Jeremy Northam(The Net), "Happy" is a classic mistaken identity comedy.  Northam and Zahn play escaped convicts who, while driving a stolen Winnebago, are pulled over by the sheriff of Happy, Macy. Mistaken for the gay couple hired by the town to coach beauty pageant contestants, and given the keys to the city, so to speak, Zahn and Northam set out to scam the town and rob the bank.  Happy features great performances by Ally Walker and Illeana Douglas and a suprising appearance by Ron Perlman. The characters in this movie are delightfully off-beat and the laughs don't stop.Great for movie night, highly recommended for a good time
A Movie So Bad It's Good. This movie breaks some story rules, including introduction/insertion of random new characters towards the end. Still, funny enoughfor a movie that seems to try so hard to be so good and comes out oh, so bad. *grin* Definitely worth watching
Should be required viewing!. I wish everyone on the face of the earth was required to see this movie.  It is so very, very powerful.  The 2004 Diamond Cinema for Peace Award Berlin Film Festival is well earned.I am not a big movie watcher, but this is one that well worth the time spent watching.  I dare anyone to watch it without sheding tears.The movie has been panned as being to simplistic, well... some of us who didn't understand what was going on in South Africa need things simplistic.Jackson and Binoche play very powerful roles, I just wish their roles had been written a little differently -- and I sooo don't have a problem with interracial relationships.  I just believe more could have been accomplished by portraying their relationship differently and is why I give it 4 rather than the 5 stars I so want to give it
Unexpected Gem. This turned out to have been written by the author who wrote The Graduate.  It is a funny movie and Colin Firth is great as always, Heather Graham was at times annoying and I kept thinking she's too young.  Minnie Driver was ok and in an unexpected comic turn.  However, Frank Collison and Mary Steenburgen absolutely  steal the movie - they are so funny and their comic timing is impeccable.  Even the man in my life laughed at some of the antics Firth & Graham got up to especially the driving scene.  It's clever and very witty
Good little movie... I'm old enough to have seen this movie first run back in the 60's. In fact, I'm pretty sure I saw it at a drive-in. *SIGH* Sure miss that movie-going experience!Anyway, I bought the DVD based on fond memories from childhood. After all these years, I don't think it's aged too well, but it's still quite well done.If nothing else, this is an excellent look at Ray Harryhausen's stop-motion animation technique. Considering the film was shot over 40 years ago, when CGI, ILM, WETA, and Pixar didn't exist, makes it more amazing.The DVD transfer is very good. I didn't detect any major issues with sound or picture. The picture is a little soft, but not enough to complain about.I think the best acting effort comes from Martha Hyer; she's quite good playing off the two male leads.My rating of 4 stars is solely due to the fact that the film is somewhat dated now
Oh my ... Some people are just so ignorant, narrow minded (and by the looks of things - illiterate) it is starting to hurt. All you need to do ist Google "Chomsky" and "Kyoto Prize" and you will find it. Nobody said anything about a Nobel Prize. It's frustratingly painfull to know I live in a world with people who are blind to the "real" truth.Broaden your horizon people and watch this movie. And not just this movie, but movies (and books) from the left AND the right. Then put your own pieces together. It's that simple !I can also recommend "Control Room", "Orwell Rolls In His Grave", "The Corporation", "Uncovered", "Outfoxed", "Bush's Brain" ... the list goes on and on !Take care and stay open minded :)
Budokon - The Next Big Thing!. Cameron Shayne's Budokon system is a simple yet energizing and easy to learn.  Anyone looking for a high-energy workout that also sharpens mental focus and brings a deeper feeling of purpose will find it on their own terms with Budokon.The word Bu-do-kon translates directly in Japanese as Warrior (Bu) Way (Do) Spirit (Kon) or "Way of the Spiritual Warrior."This DVD contains two (2) workouts: One short 28 min. and one long 38 min. Each one starts off with a 15-20 min. yoga workout,  then leads into the martial arts workout and then ends with meditation. In addition there is an extra segment describing all the yoga postures, leg-kicks, punches, etc.Budokon is an integration of the Yogic, Martial and Living Arts into one holistic mind-body-spirit. Learn the authentic Japanese and Korean combination of martial arts, yoga and meditation in this DVD. You will experience high intensity, low impact total body cardio plus trainingand yoga.  Cameron Shayne has created a workout that will change how you envision power.This is yoga & martial arts fusion at its best!I Highly recommended it.Osu & Namast
You don't have to be a child to love this movie. I just saw this today on pay-per-view.  It's an absolute treasure of a movie.  Why do the Brits do so much better at children's movies than we do?  This has atmosphere, beautiful scenery, a talented cast, and is lovingly photographed.  What a joy to see David Warner in this; he is probably the most under-rated actor of the 20th century.  He is always believable, always a delight to see.  I certainly intend to buy this movie, and watch it again and again.  You will be drawn into this movie's wonderful universe at once, and never want to leave.  These days, we all need a little magic, and this movie is a powerhouse in the magic and charm departments.  When you've really arrived, you don't have to shout about it.  This movie speaks softly and carries a big stick.  A very delightful and welcome addition to any film library.  The color is ravishing.  I think that is why the Brits do better than we do; they understand visual impressions, sounds, colors, and children
Rare glimpse at Kalachakra rites. This is a wonderful rare glimpse at the complex Kalachakra initiation rites, once performed only performed in Tibet.  One of the most complex rituals in the world, Kalachakra initiation involves ten days of teaching and empowerments for initiates, and elaborate preparations involving even more time before hand.For me, the emotional coda of the piece is when the Dalai Lama is forced to cancel the initiation due to illness. In response to a previous review posted on this site, the implication that the Dalai Lama is just too lazy or uncomfortable with his accommodations is insulting and absurd. Aside from the fact that the Dalai Lama has always performed this ritual in India or Tibet, his permanent residence is in India! The rituals are complex and mentally exhausting. Once the empowerments have started, it is extremely important to not stop for any reason. To prevent a broken ritual the Dalai Lama decided to postpone it to the next year. Furthermore, not a single person at the initiation would jeopardize the Dalai Lama's health for a ritual that could be performed at a later time
Buffett  at Wrigley. I have been begging for a high quality live concert DVD from Jimmy for some time and this truly doesn't dissapoint. Outstanding!!!!!!!!!
Excelente para un principiante. Le doy cinco estrellas porque cumplio mis expectativas.  Cuando compre el DVD nunca habia practicado el Tai Chi.  El instructor explica de una manera clara mientras realiza los movimientos y el ejercicio en si es bien relajante
A bloodsucking love story. Who would believe you can make a hero out of a killer vampire.Well Francis Ford Coppola made sure we did!, in this horrific love story you want Dracula to get away with murder and rape.One of the best movies ever made, a great story and the direction is supperb; the cast is full of stars that were then on the rise: Keanu Reeves, Gary Oldman, Winona Ryder (except for long time star Anthony Hopkins, who plays a sarcastic & intense Van Helsing).A must have for every Coppola lover
It's Just A Fun Flick To Watch. "White Water Summer" cannot be accused of being a great film.  It's got its silly moments, unbelievable moments, and downright psychotic moments.  My wife first introduced me to this film a few years ago and ever since that time, I've never been able to pass it up when it's on the satellite.  It's just fun to watch and reminds me of a cool time in my life (that being the 80's).It stars a young Kevin Bacon and an even younger Sean Astin.  Both are excellent in their roles.  Bacon must have been studying up for his future psychotic role in "The River Wild" with this film.  He plays Vic, a not-all-there, hopefully well-meaning but very unlikeable camp guide who takes Astin and three other city kids into the wild in order to teach them about themselves.  The supporting cast is headed up by Matt Adler ("Teen Wolf," among other 80's classics), K.C. Martel (best known as one of Kirk Cameron's buds on "Growing Pains," and Jonathan Ward ("Steel Magnolias" and "Charles In Charge").  Although all three of these guys are recognizable, they've almost always played supporting characters.The story, as stated previously, is about Vic taking four city boys on an adventure in the wilderness.  Astin narrates this tale about becoming a man over the summer.  Bacon's character is hard to place.  At first, he comes across as a "tough love" advocate, but then he becomes a wee bit crazy.  Almost immediately the other boys separate themselves from Astin, with Ward sometimes sticking up for him.  In the end, however, all of them have to come together in order to save Bacon's life.The film has a great 80's soundtrack featuring Journey, Cutting Crew, and other rockers from the decade of excess.Overall, not the greatest film around, but it does fit the bill as a nostalgic tale sure to bring back wonderful memories.  Parents should be warned that there is a lot of bad language in this flick.  Astin even drops an "F" bomb, so be sure to monitor any kids with you.  I'm sure this film would have gotten a PG-13 rating had it come out just a few years later.Recommended to fans of old 80's flicks who still remember watching some of these films when they were young.
Mixed bag of films, but still a treasure for Lugosi (and Karloff) fans. It's almost universally acknowledged that the best Lugosi/Karloff collaboration was the 1934 version of THE BLACK CAT.  Next to their signature roles as Dracula and Frankenstein, it's probably the best acting work either of them did for Universal.  Personally, I would have gladly paid this modest price just for THE BLACK CAT.I think the biggest letdown of this bunch was MURDERS IN THE RUE MORGUE.  The brand name of Bela Lugosi was still at an all-time high when he made this film, along with WHITE ZOMBIE (for an independent studio).  But the script is just dreadful.  In a way, I suppose MURDERS foretold the low-budget horror cycle of the early 40's, which often centered around apes (?). . .and which, of course, often featured Lugosi.Though he's a supporting player in 3 out of the 5 features here, Bela holds his own against Karloff in the odd sci-fi thriller THE INVISIBLE RAY.  If it lacks the sparkle and storytelling integrity of Universal's classic monster films, it still stands up well alongside the studio's horror output of the mid 30's ( e.g.,Werewolf of London, Dracula's Daughter)The remaining two films, THE RAVEN and BLACK FRIDAY, are low-budget programmers that succeed almost solely on the marquee value of their stars.  Karloff would make more competently-mounted "mad doctor" pictures for Columbia in the forties; Lugosi would slide into Hollywood's "poverty row" with cheap (though, in the minds of many fans, more entertaining) fare like THE DEVIL BAT, INVISIBLE GHOST and THE CORPSE VANISHES.Karloff or Lugosi fan--and there's no reason why a person can't be BOTH--there's plenty here to enjoy.  As with all Universal's classic films on DVD, the restoration is first-rate.  Most of the films have trailers, but that's it for extras.For the price, this collection is a must-have for fans of these types of films
Wayne's World.. party time.. excellent.. times two!!. Based on a brilliant Saturday Night Live sketch, Wayne's World and Wayne's World 2 are both equally enjoyable films and great additions to anyones DVD libraries.The Wayne's World movies both base around the lives of two  young men who do their own local cable access show in the town of Aurora, IL. Wayne Cambell (Mike Myers) is the smart, charming, witty leader of the duo who is into hot women and rock music. While his partner Garth (Dana Carvey) idolizes Wayne and makes for the perfect teammate . He is a little slow but is good with computers, machines and has a very innocent mind.The films follow the adventures that Wayne and Garth get into with their friends as they put on their TV show from Wayne's Parents basement, while they try to pick up chicks and attend rock concerts and eat their donuts at the local hang out.The first Wanye's World movie was very successful and for good reason, its a very wity and humor filled film that set the stage perfectly and carried on in the tradition of the SNL sketches that made them such well known house hold names. In the first movie Wayne and Garth get noticed by Benjamin Kayne (Rob Lowe) who works for a big company that wants to put Wayne and Garth's TV show onto regular TV along with a sponcer and all the perks of working for a regular TV studio. Along the way Wayne meets the love of his life, Cassandra Wong (Tia Carrere) who is an up and coming rock singer who takes an instant liking to him. Ben has more in store then just letting them have a taste of the big time. He seems to have the hots for Cassandra as well and will do any thing it takes to break up the two. And he does a good job of doing just that. Wayne loses his TV show, Cassandra and his best friend all due to Ben. Of course everything works out for Wayne when all is said and done, he gets a contract for his now girlfriend Cassandra, made the bad guy look like a fool and the great thing about a movie is if you don't like how a movie ends, you can always re do it.Most memorable moments in this film include a hillarious moment when Wayne, Garth and 3 friends are in a little car singing Queen's "Bohemian Rhapsody" while banging their heads as they drive along the road. Many laughs fill the movie like when the two stars would take the camera along with them for a private convo that only we the viewer were in on. Or talk about how they don't sell out to any sponcer while they are busy drinking Pepsi and wearing Reebok gear. It has a great ending that really ends things on an upbeat note. There isn't any slow parts the film. It starts at a humor filled beat and stays that way the whole way through never taking the world they are engulfed in seriously even realizing they are in a movie at times and letting us in on the jokes. Another great moment is when they get back stage passes to Alice Cooper's concert and Alice starts to tell them about the history of the name Milwaukee. Many great sight gags and cameos fill the film. It's short enough to watch many times and the jokes don't get stale as the fun ends at just the right time before it gets to be too much. This movie alone is reason enough to buy the set.The second film "Wayne's World 2" picks up a year after the first film, Wayne and Cassandra are still together and Wayne and Garth have moved into their own loft across town still doing their public access show. Cassandra now has a manager Bobby Cahn (Christopher Walken) who like Ben in the first film takes an instant liking to her and wants Wayne removed from the situation by getting her to move out of Aurora to Hollywood. If that wasn't all enough for Wayne to deal with, an almost naked indian approaches Wayne in a dream one night and when Wayne follows through the desert he meet up with Jim Morrison, the dead lead singer of the Doors. Jim tells Wayne that he has to put on a concert and book all the biggest bands. That will give him meaning to his life. Wayne decides that is exactly what he has to do and with the help of various people that Jim tells him about and friends in Aurora he puts together a potentialy huge concert he calls "Waynestock". Garth meanwhile has his first experiences with a girl Honey Hornee' (Kim Basinger) who seems to want more then just a relationship from him.The most memorable moments from this movie include Wayne meeting Cassandra's father and the two of them fight it out in a mock Kung Fu film situation, with dubbed english and all. One of the funniest uses of a Village People reference that I ever saw in a movie. And the film itself has many cameo's and big name stars like Chris Farley, Drew Barrymore, Rip Taylor (ok maybe not all are big stars) and Aerosmith. The film is almost a mirror image of the first as it carries a lot of the same jokes and gags but is different enough to come off as something totaly new and funny. Its a great follow up to a great movie and a worthy sequel. Sometimes sequels can lose something that the original had. This goes about things in the same exact way keeping a lot of the same themes we loved from the first intact and that's probably what people would want anyway as well it worked.You definitely won't be sorry adding this box set to your collection. Both movies are funny, witty and enjoyable for people of all ages and will be a great blast from the not too distant past that you and any family member or friend can watch on the fly.After awhile you  too will start to chant: "Wayne's World.. party time.. excellent!! WOO WOO WOO!!!
Decent Treatment, But Iffy Editing. The original DVD release of Crimson Tide occurred at a time before the trends of including cut scenes, commentary, and animated menus.  While it makes sense to re-release the film with what we now considered the standard features, missing from the original, I found the overall experience somewhat disappointing.For die-hard fans of Crimson Tide, this DVD is worth getting just to see the 7 minutes or so (Original release was 116 minutes, this version is supposed to be 123) of exra footage.  The title menu is much nicer than before, and the addition of the documentary is a great bonus.  But under deleted scenes, we're shown only three very short "scenes": an extra line of dialogue onboard the crew bus, a longer version of Radchenko's speech to the reporter, and a half-minute long nearly silent waiting scene before the panel at the end of the movie.  All three are shown as raw footage, without any cleaning, or explanation.All of the content in the deleted scenes is in the primary feature, in a cleaned-up and nearly seamless state.  None of the new footage is more than a few seconds in length, but it's clear that all of it consists of short pieces of dialogue removed either for time constraints or clarity.  What this means is that throughout the movie we're treated to bursts of extraneous dialogue that the editor had originally removed, usually for a reason.  It's interesting from the point of view of a film student, but as a consumer release I think it degrades from the experience ever so slightly.  Crimson Tide is all about suspense, and anything that distracts the focus of the audience is consequently lowering the quality of the movie.  None of it is very overt, but there's enough of it that it might harm the experience of a first-time viewer of the film.Overall, the extras contained in this release make it a must-have for previous fans, but for new buyers I would still recommend the original DVD cut
A Great DVD To Get The Young Ones Moving!!. I thought this was a wonderful DVD because of the following factors:*The goal of this Billy Blank's DVD is to get kids off their feet and exercising.  In this day and age of television, video games, and a joke of physical education in schools, it's up to parents to stress the importance of regular fitness activity.*The diversity is great.  The children on this DVD consist of both boys and girls, ages of about 5 to maybe 12 or 13 years old, all sizes from thin to slightly chubby, and different nationalities.*Billy Blanks is just a very good instructor and you can see why he's loved by young and old.  He motivates the kids and makes the moves entertaining for them, even throwing in a couple of old dance moves. :-)  Billy Blanks speaks from the heart and you can tell that he honestly wants everyone to be fit.As far as the fitness level, I could see kids doing this but it gets a little trickier when you get to the floor exercises if you haven't exercised in a while.  The good thing about this particular DVD is since it's geared towards kids, Billy places less emphasis on getting moves perfect, his main focus is to get the kids to realize that exercise is fun.Overall, I think this is a great DVD to add to your collection.  It's something you and your kids can enjoy doing together.
Interesting character study. I watched this recently on the Logo channel and was intrigued for two reasons. First the subject matter and second because it was written by Russell T.Davies who was responsible for reviving Doctor Who this year which I loved.Was this show successful? Pretty much. The chemistry between the two leads was good and I liked the writing. I also enjoyed the parents of Bob and Rose yet you really never are given definite answers what happens to them in the end. I'm glad it was only a limited series because I dont think it would have held up over a year or two. The problems I had with it were the character that was trying to break Bob and Rose up (I don't remember her name). She was a stock bad guy who you didn't feel any empathy for at all so when she redeems herself at the end, you wonder, why does everyone forgive her just like that. Why didn't she get what she deserves?The second problem I had with it was Bob, though not really changing his sexuality, but giving it up for a Woman. How fair is that to either party? I've read there was a lot of controversey about this when it first aired from gay men who belived that this was portraying Homosexuality as something that could be cured.It can not.In the end, I dont see that it explored that particular subject as well as it could but was enteretained never the less
A beautiful piece of cinematographic work. "From Hell" is meticulously produced and has some of the best cinematography I've ever seen in a horror movie.Although the story about who Jack the Ripper is is a little contrived at times, in general the plot is interesting. All the actors involved are excellent and the movie has the grisly moments you'd expect, considering the subject-matter. It keeps you interested and involved for the whole two hours, not to mention it looks beautiful.Heather Graham and gang as prostitutes put in a great and touching performance, showing the human side of the women that are unfortunate enough to have been in this profession in the Victorian era, and Johnny Depp is amazing, as usual, although (as others have pointed out) his English accent may be a little off, which I wouldn't know about since I'm American.This film is great entertainment and I would highly recommend buying the DVD (if you rent it you'll more than likely end up buying it anyway, it's that good). "From Hell" makes a great addition to any movie collection.
5 stars for 7 men from now. This is one of the best of the B westerns of its time.  The plot is tightly wound and is supported with dialogue that sizzles.  A great job by Randolph Scott as the lead in this movie.  Watch a very young Lee Marvin in a role that foreshadows a lot of his later work.  This is a film from Batjac Productions, better known for John Wayne pictures (since it was his company).  Drama and action abound in this taut thriller filmed in some beautiful country.
Very good!. This is my favorite SNL dvd of all! I like all of the commercials, they're really funny! I highly recommend this dvd
I Guess There's Something "Wrong" With Me. I guess there must be something profoundly wrong with me, because I rather liked "Maniac".  Sure, I'll concede that its definately not for everyone, but what is?  As the old cliche goes, one man's trash is another man's treasure.  So, what did I like about Maniac?1) While marketed as a slasher film, it utilized none of the stock slasher film cliches that were so prevalent at the time.  Namely, the "all the sluts die but the virgin gets away" faux morality of Friday the 13th and Halloween.2) The killer is not a super human killing machine like Jason or Freddy. Rather, this character is real.  Not in a literal sense, but its easy to believe that a killer like this could exist.  "Maniac" is as much a character study as it is a horror film.  Joe Spinnel gives an outstanding performance as "Frank", a schizophrenic serial killer.  He's a three dimensional character, and the film is told entirely by his point of view.  As you will see in the film, he's not pure evil.  He's clearly trying to stop, but he can't.  I actually felt pity for him.3) I was impressed by the more than competant direction and cinematography.  The film is shot in a very realistic, almost documentary style.  The performances are natural and believable. The musical score was excellent as well.  This film is a textbook example of what can be achieved on a low budget with some imagination and skill.4) I won't be a hypocrite.  I'll admit it.  I enjoyed this film on a visceral level.  While pretty tame by today's standards, the gore effects were expertly executed by the always brilliant Tom Savini.  If this makes me a "sick person", then I'm no more demented than the millions of fans who line up to see "Silence of the Lambs", "Scarface", and hundreds of other "visceral" films.  And I'm no more sick than the millions of people who spend hours a day playing "Grand Theft Auto".  The point is that its a MOVIE.  No one ever got hurt by watching a movie, or playing a video game, for that matter.  If watching "Maniac" is all it takes to send you over the edge, you were probably pretty screwed up to begin with.  Isn't there enough real horrors in the world to get upset about???So, to those who found the film so offensive that they would condemn everyone who doesn't share in their phony moral indignation, why did you bother to watch the film all the way to the end?  Weren't you sufficiently outraged halfway through the film?And, without giving away too much of the ending, it was not "stupid" as some have charged.  Frank was clearly hallucinating.  Since the film was told by his point of view, the audience could "see" his hallucinations.  His wounds were purely self-inflicted.  Once again, the director choose to be original rather than to fall back on the old textbook cliches, which in this case would have been a final showdown in which Caroline Munro kills him.Highly underratted, unfairly bashed and dismissed by critics, "Maniac" achieves what it aspires to be; a very original and very imaginative horror film with a great performance by Joe Spinnel.  For fans of "good" low budget horror films by the likes of George Romero and Wes Craven, this is essential viewing, which is why they play it fairly regularly on IFC.  I'll take this film over "Final Destination 1, 2, and 3", or similar formulatic crap masquerading as horror films any day of the week
Anyone can do this. I can only reach my knees when trying to touch my toes and I can manage to do everything on this DVD.  It feels good and she makes it easy and it's relaxing.  I hate the ones when the instructor winds herself up like a circus act and then says "if you can't do this yet just go as far as you can..."  Tamilee is not intimidating at all. I can't reach as far as her, but at least she looks realistic and gives me a goal I might reach someday. There are a few options to choose from too including stretching in a chair, on the floor or standing. I got 3 DVDs at the same time and I liked this one best.  When I get a little closer to my toes I'm going to get the next DVD with Tamilee
Seems so simple, doesn't it?. Either you get on the train or you don't... And as long as you continue to get on the train, you'll grasp the meaning of Christmas. The TRUE meaning of Christmas. But you have to be willing to get on.This movie was a great adaptation of the classic story. I must admit I was a tad bit wigged out by the animation. It was just oogey in some ways. Realistic at times and, at other times, so unbelievably fake...I couldn't decide if I liked the animation or not. Still can't. But the story itself is worth the struggle I had with the animation.Get on board! You'll be glad you did.
Don't cut yourself on the edge of your seat. Larry Darrell (Tyrone Power) is back from WWII with an insatiable desire to see the world, in search of himself and the meaning of life. Isabel Bradley (Gene Tierney) wants to marry, have children and build on the capitalistic advantages of post-war industry in the U.S. Like oil and water, the two ideas don't mix so Larry becomes an international "loafer" and to the delight of Isabel's self-absorbed uncle Elliot Templeton (Clifton Webb), she marries millionaire Gray Maturin (John Payne). It seems like a short and tidy story but this two-and-a-half hour epic had a 4-million dollar budget for 89 sets, 136 supporting actors and 16,000 extras.In the beginning Isabel is meek and compassionate. As time progresses she becomes firm and decisive. But watch out when her possessiveness sees the light of day. Dock your boats; lock up the booze; hide anything remotely dangerous. Gene Tierney is in the house!Some fault the performance of Tyrone Power. Like Glen Ford, James Stewart or Gregory Peck, Power is no character actor. What you see is the real him, even if it appears a bit melodramatic from his broadway background. The most dramatic role I've seen Power in is WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION. Though THE RAZOR'S EDGE requires less range of emotion, Power is quite similar.THE RAZOR'S EDGE delivers the requisite intrigue to earn an Academy Award Oscar for Best Actress in a supporting role, two Golden Globes, and several nominations. There are times when Larry Darrell's indifference is irritating but that's why Isabel thought she dumped him. Despite some slow spots THE RAZOR'S EDGE includes enough suspense to keep you on the edge of your seat.Movie quote: "The enjoyment of art is the only remaining ecstasy that's neither immoral nor illegal.
Words Can't Describe. If you enjoy the music of Death Cab For Cutie, then this is for you.  It's not about the band, it's about the music.  This is the way music videos were meant to be.  If you enjoyed the Plans album, this will bring new perspective to each of the songs.Very enjoyable experience for a very enjoyable price
Freedom is not free. A gutty reminder of the price of freedom, a historical tribute to the brave English character that shows the human side of their determination.  Very well portraid by excellent actors.  Thanks for the privilege of remembering.
Best Dramatic Jane Eyre. I loved this production primarily because it followed the book quite well.   There were a few embellishments such as the addition of the twins discussion.  I have seen other productions of Jane Eyre that covered the period when Jane was a child better; but considering that the book is many faceted,   this production is wonderful.  I think Toby Stephens and Ruth Wilson are well matched, and they created just the right amount of tension.   I have watched this many times and never tire of it.  I highly recommend it.I have one question,  though - why was Rochester fully clothed,  including those high boots - when his room was caught on fire?   Strange
The Next challenge workout is an excellent Challenge. This dvd is great it can be as hard as you want it to be- do this 3 times a week and you will get the result you are looking for. It is very easy to follow and not borin
Great Collection. A very well put together episodes of the most popular children shows.  I wish PBS would do this as well seeing as how Nick Jr. and PBS have the most popular children's shows on TV today.  Was very glad Sponge Bob was not included as it teaches children very nasty habits
A good if not perfect record of the play. Having seen this show in its original incarnation on Broadway, this production is an excellent reminder of how magically transformative live theater can be.  While the  production lacks some of the punch -- and a few of the details -- and has lost a bit of the scale of the original New York offering, it does capture the essential spirit of the play.I'd give it 3.5 stars (out of 5) if I could.  Since I can't I'll round it out to 4
Rod Serling was a genius. I don't have to wait for July 4th or New Year's Eve to see The Twilight Zone marathon on the Sci-Fi Channel. I can have my own marathons any time I choose. This collection includes many special features that are not shown on T.V. You won't be disappointed
Mrs. Miniver dvd review. Received the dvd in perfect condition and within the expected time indicated when purchased.  Very pleased.  Would purchase again
A movie they would never make today!. This is a great film. But, sadly, it would never be made today. I mean, try to imagine a film in which a 15 or 16 year of character has an abortion and it is taken as just another plot point. (Compare this to Crowe's Singles which brought back the oh so convienent miscarriage, like something out of a 1940's movie.) Also, imagine a film begin made today which invests so much time in developing its characters. Yep, you can't. So enjoy it for what it is, a window on a lost world.
Entertaining!!. `Josie and the Pussycats' is one of the funniest movies that I have ever seen. With a great cast, a well written script, and good songs included, you cannot help but love this movie!The movie starts off with the boy band DuJour (imitating BSB, who were famous during the time this movie released), who discover something awkward behind the music in their CD and are made victims of a plane crash when their manager Wyatt Frame decides to get rid of them before they find out anything more. In search of a new band, Wyatt notices Josie McCoy, Melody Valentine and Valerie Brown of the group `The Pussycats', and instantaneously makes them famous so that the company's secret mission behind the music continues. Josie and her gang promise each other that they would be friends first and a group second. However, once they become popular, Josie's attitude changes, but will she realize her mistakes and bring peace in the end?This movie was hilarious from start to end. Rachel Leigh Cook, Rosario Dawson, and especially Tara Reid acted out their part well as the Pussycats. But the credit has to go to Alan Cumming and Parker Posey for doing such a fantastic job on their roles, and providing so much humor through the movie. Even Missi Pyle (who played Alexandra Cabot) was funny with her expressions. The storyline, even though it is senseless at times, is totally unique and kept my attention. Director Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan (who also directed the comical `Cant Hardly Wait') balanced out the comedy and romance in this movie and did a first-class job. And last but not the least, the catchy upbeat songs were a great change to listen to, and I'm sure I will be purchasing the soundtrack of this album in sometime.Even the DVD has some behind the scenes features and an audio commentary for the movie, to entertain us for a while. All in all, `Josie and the Pussycats' will uplift your spirits if you are feeling down, and make you laugh at least once
Wonderful. My 3 year old daughter loves Dora. When we purchased this DVD,she watched it over & over. It entertained not only my 3 year but my son who is a little over a year old gets excited when he hears the music.A must get for infants and toddlers
Horror with twists. This series looks good--the music & art set the mood well. The stories aren't gross-out horror as Hollywood often goes for, but are quite horrific in their own way. In this volume, we get cannibalism & necrophilia, but wonderfully dealt with. I love the character development. In Volume 1, Momosuke is pretty much horrified at the actions of the trio, yet in Vol. 2, he is being sucked into their world with little-or-no protest(thanks to Ogin), even aiding them, seeing no more wrong about the situation than those the trio enact their vengeance upon find any wrong in their lives.
Love this movie!. I watch this movie over and over.  The actors put in stellar performances.  I think Glenn Close brought it all together when she said,"I believe we have two lives...
IMMIGRATION PROBLEMS. The second season of Ghost in the Shell gets off to a very slow start, filled with talking heads that inform us how the political situation has changed since the previous series ended. It couldn't be more topical to contemporary America. You see, the main conflict of the show is being caused by a refugee problem. After the last war lots of Asians immigrated to Japan in search of a better life since their countries were poor and Japan was relatively rich. They were welcomed at first as a cheap labor force but over the years the Japanese began to think twice about the situation and realized that the immigrants are a huge tax burden. A new Conservative government has been formed, promising to deal with the problem once and for all. But there are elements within and outside of the government who are not prepared to wait for legislation. So, in the first episode here, a group called the "Individual 11" takes the Chinese Embassy hostage to protest against the parasitic immigrant population. Section 9 is called in to rescue the hostages, and if no innocents are killed, they are promised full reinstatement by the new Prime Minister.  In the second episode, another human being/cyborg scarred by the war and its effects, fantasizes about mattering in a society that doesn't recognize the need for love in individuals. He constantly daydreams about killing all the people he despises and even falls for the Major, who he mistakes for a prostitute. In the third episode, "Cash Eye" is the name of a thief who is so good that she even tells her victims when she is going to rob them! It's up to Section 9 to stop her from robbing a multi-millionaire who will be busy giving a sex-doll soiree at the appointed time attended secretly by very high-up dignitaries. Lastly, in an episode reminescent of an early episode last season, an attack helicopter whose pilot has had a heart attack is taken over by its AI and suspiciously, is joined by other unmanned aircraft in the immigrant district of the city. Their purpose....unknown. Section 9 is called in by one of the government intelligence services who seem very aware of the situation. As though they knew about it before it happened?2nd Gig has a very different feel from the first season which seemed obsessed with Catcher in the Rye references and cyber crimes of sometimes Enron complexity. This first volume seemed firmly grounded in real-world problems. Namely, what do you do when the equivalent of a slave labor force begins to revolt against its masters and demand more rights? Some people believe they have the right to be here. Some that they should all be kicked out. When a population sees itself as threatened, they fight back, whether this population are the legal citizens or the immigrants. Of course, this show came out in Japan long before the current immigration issues that are now plaguing America. But it's just eerie seeing this. The situation in the US could very easily slip into the conflicts we see in Volume 1 of 2nd gig. Everything about this second season is top-rate....except maybe the writing. The second episode in particular is really slow, since Section 9 is hardly in it at all. While I liked the experiment they did by doing that, it's too early in the show to take the focus off the main characters. Yoko Kanno's music, while masterpieces, seemed to strain to make boring scenes dramatic, but most of her score improves the show, especially a homage to the first Ghost in the Shell movie when the Major falls backwards out of a high-rise, turning on her Predator-like camouflage as she descends after blowing a terrorist's head off. This show looks like it might be great, once it gets past the exposition.Extras: Interviews with the director and two designers who worked on the show.I would also recommend: The first season of Ghost in the Shell SAC. The two GITS feature films. The SECOND edition of the manga which features panels cut out of the original American release.The Matrix trilogy.
a 4 Star hotel. I have never smiled sooo much through a 'Mystery film'.This is a very cool movie.Many have labeled it as an "Artsy" movie, to my ARTSY usually means abstract or undefined. This movie is straight forward, a guy is dead in the begining of the movie and the detective is trying to find out  who killed him or if it was suicide. Very basic, but what is NOT basic is the suspects / witnesses.Each one is living in his own world, you have the mentaly challenged, the [...] artiest, the one who thinks he's the 5th beatle. So the enjoyment is seeing how the detective *who is just as strange as the other charecters* tries to get information out of them. So you get a little romance, and alot of smiles through this experiance.I personally enjoyed it, espcially with the fact that you hear Bono singing almost throught the whole movie :DWhy did I give it 4 & not 5 stars?I was not too happy with the extra features, they did not title anyone when they are speaking, so if you don't know the names of the actors, producers ect..then your out of luck. Also the audio in the extra features was a bit unstable, low to high depeding on who is being interviewed..AND I was VERY disapointed not to find at least ONE music video for the movie from Bono, there are songs in the movie that Bono had written FOR the movie, it would have helped if they actually Interviewed Bono, since he is a co-writter in the film to give us more insight on the inspiration for this project.Other than that, it is a very cool movie, with  a very believeable cast, I mean you actually believe this guys are NUTS, its fantastic. And for a murder/thriller, it actually dosen't have that much violence or blood in it...but alot of smiles
Candid & Accurate. This is unreal.  Of all the CEO types with which Michael Moore spoke to, not one of them answered his question - If companies are making record profits (some in the billions) then why are there so many layoffs?The man from NIKE said that he wouldn't open a shoe factory in the US because he doesn't think Americans would want to make shoes.You've got to see this to believe.  Michael Moore is a genius
Narrative Account of a Boy's Desire... The young boy Marcel spends every holiday with his family in their cottage in the hills of Provence.  However, every time they leave Marcel wishes to go back to the hills and he is always daydreaming of the hills.  As he daydreams he is picked to take the scholarship application test offered once a year by his school and this conflicts with his desires.  The teachers in his school, including his father, keep their eyes on Marcel and quiz him constantly.  However, due to the deteriorating health of his mother, his family must return to the hills frequently.  This means that they will have to walk six miles every time they want to go to their cottage.  One day on their way to the cottage, they meet an old student of Marcel's father.  The ex-student offers to take them on a shortcut and later offers them a key that takes them through the shortcut, but this is somewhat illegal and it is against his fathers principles.  After some consideration the father accepts and the dream of coming to the hills more often seems to be more solid.  My Mother's Castle is a narrative account where the audience gets to know Marcel and his family through their actions and their dreams.  As the audience follows the story, they are presented with numerous short stories in the family's life that are cleverly intertwined leaving the audience with a terrific cinematic experience
We sek him here... Different from what I expected, being a fan of the Anthony Andrews and Leslie Howard versions.  I liked it, but they made it seem like the Pimpernel didn't try to hide his identity at all
Excellent product. The movie is awesome, and although the DVD doesnt come with many extras, I didnt expect it to, so no problem there. One of Mr Willis' finest movies, in my opinion
The resisting disciple. I knew next to nothing about Dietrich Bonhoeffer's life except that he was executed for involvement in a plot against Hitler. This film will fill in many of the gaps about Bonhoeffer's life, friends and mission.Bonhoffer was one of a minority of German theologians who opposed Hitler's rise to power. Other churchmen retreated into conformity, cut their own deals with Hitler or were active in The Reich Church. There's nothing like a Christmas tree topped with a lighted swastika to drive home the reality of how far the Church would bend to accommodate the Nazis. This image, along with those of Hitler at rallies and posing with church leaders, are appalling but instructiveDirector Martin Doblmeier interviewed Bonhoeffer's students, friends and relatives to make this moving film. The film takes us from Germany to Harlem, New York, where Bonhoeffer was bowled over by the ecstatic worship of black Americans. He later tied their religious spirit, nurtured in oppression, with that of the Jews of Germany. The film also tries to depict Bonhoeffer's struggle with the use of violence in the cause of good. Whether he made the right choice under his circumstances is a question that each must answer for themselves.The film was shot on location in Germany, including the cell in which Bonhoeffer spent his final days. The extras include an interview with Doblmeier, who explains that his mission was not just to make a film, but to capture for posterity the memories of the living members of the Bonhoeffer circle.Deeply affecting and challenging, especially to strict pacifists and to those who equate the gospel with their brand of nationalism
The Easter Bunny and Travelin Tyke. i think this video is classic and timeless.  Remember all the stories about the Easter Bunny when you were little??  This is like all those stories wrapped into one.  It's absolutley wonderful!  ..
Gypsy. I have been in high school performances before and only 13 and this is probably the best performanaces we are going to do!!  This movie was one of the best I have ever seen.You have to see it.
excellent. i love this movie. its called menace II society because it shows how a lil boy can grow up to be a criminal. he was influenced to that life. look at the other characters look at his mom and dad
You don't have to surf to like this movie. I'm not a surfer. In fact, I don't think I've ever toughed a surfboard.But I do like the BEACH BOYS!! Anyway, the point is; you don't have to surf to enyjoy this film. I've always been interested in the sport but never got involved. Sort of an armchair surfer, I guess. This is a great film and very exciting to watch. Bruce Brown did an amazing job and the overall look of the film is great. Following the two young surfers around the world in search of the perfect wave is an interesting concept and was well executed. The scenery is great, the surfing scenes are great, and I really enjoyed this movie. So, if you are a surfer,or, like me, just a spectator, you will like ENDLESS SUMMER. I know, I'll put a TV in my bathroom, splash around in the tub and watch ENDLESS SUMMER II tonight
Ethel Merman, move over!. What can I say? Bette Midler is totally superb in the role of Mama Rose!She is fantastic!  Even though this was a television special, Ms Midler  out performed, and out sang Tyne Daly, had more passion that Ethel Merman,and came neck to neck with Angela Lansbury in acting and singing departments.  Great DVD!
Life in New York. This film is 3 short stories in one, all of them set in New York City and directed by M. Scorsese, F. Coppola and Woody Allen.The first stars Nick Nolte as an eccentric, egotistical painter, centering on his troubled and tired relationship with his beautiful, frustrated assistant, Rosanna Arquette, whose own artistic goals are eclipsed by her mentor. It may be predictable, but these two stars are worth watching in anything they do, especially Rosanna.The Woody Allen portion, Oedipus Wrecks, is very funny, almost slapstick about his relationship with an overbearing mother, who manages to haunt him, hilariously, even from the beyond.Life Without Zoe is an affectionate look at a young girl growing up privileged with wealth but deprived of attention and love by her inattentive parents. She lives in a posh hotel environment, interacting with other children of wealth. Her playful search for missing jewelry leads her eventually to a reconciliation with her parents.This film is a smorgasbord of situations that could conceivably be running their course simultaneously at any given time in the hectic cycle of life in New York City.
It's Nobody's Fault. When I review a movie, I look for issues that a family with traditional values can discuss from the picture. This is a rather obscure Canadian movie so it is pretty hard to find - maybe looking on Amazon.ca would be more productive - that looks at the matter of sickness and death from the point of view of a fifteen-year-old girl, Tamara. Her artist father moves them into a house where the teenage son of the owners had died of leukemia. Shortly after moving in, Tamara's mother is diagnosed with tuberculosis and has to leave the family for a sanitarium.So, Tamara and her younger brother and sister face a number of issues in this movie - moving to a new location, going to a new school, dealing with a serious illness, etc. It happens that the neighbors across the road from them are (supposedly) Baptists so Tamara soon is faced with the issue of religion. [Her mother is an avowed atheist, but wise enough to let Tamara decide for herself whether to go to church or not.] For Evangelical Christian families, this family presents some interesting issues. The kids swear like a military sailor. What kind of Christian testimony is that? When Tamara starts to pick up some of the language, her father in no uncertain terms let her know she is not to use that kind of language. Is it really by their fruits that one knows the Godly person, not their religious doctrines?There is one delightful scene where the three girls and two boys go skinny-dipping in the farm pond. (My father grew up skinny-dipping, my wife and I did as well, all our kids did and now my grandchildren are continuing the tradition, so, of course, I could relate.) This is not an erotic scene - for Tamara and her siblings, it is just the way they swam. For the Baptist brother and sister, I think there was a bit of rebellion involved. When the Baptist father discovered them, he "blew his stack." I have a feeling that if Tamara's father had discovered them, he would have joined the kids in cooling off!After watching hundreds of movies dealing with children, it is also refreshing to see one where the children have both parents. Not only that, they are both very loving parents. Of course, at her age, Tamara was really angry at her father - how well I know. (When my oldest daughter was fifteen, I was the worst dad any girl could have gotten stuck with; when she had her first baby and had to go back to work, I was the one she wanted to care for her precious bundle.) Still Tamara's dad was patient and understanding; and was willing to show his love by giving her a hug when she needed it.As I understand it, the director of this movie (the real-life mother of the actress who plays Tamara) is a professional photographer. This movie is a little rough around the edges, sometimes feeling disjointed, although the framing of the scenes are very good. Yet, both my wife and I could follow the story. The point of the movie is the question of the meaning illness and untimely death. Why do some people pray and get healed; others pray and still die? Why is it that, if God has anything to do with healing, the religious person's child dies while the nonbeliever recovers?This film will never be a classic. Nonetheless, it does make you think. If you want fast-paced action, look elsewhere. If you like real human interest stories, this is one film worth looking for. For issues dealing with illness and death, and general family relations, this is a five-star movie. The chopiness, due to the inexperience of the movie-maker, drops it to a four-star movie for me.
My absolute favourite movie @}->---. Other than The Breakfast Club, Sleepless in Seattle is my all time favourite movie.  I know it's older now, but to me I will always watch it over and over again.  I like to watch it a couple of times a year because I always enjoy it and never tire of it.As everyone probably knows, Tom Hanks and his son move from Chicago to Seattle after Tom's wife dies and they need a new start.  Hoping to find a new love for his father, Jonah calls a radio station to speak on a talk show to help his dad out.  Their radio call name is Sleepless in Seattle.  Listening to the conversation all the way in Washington DC is Meg Ryan who has just announced her engagement to Bill Pullman.  She seems to fall in love with Sam (Tom Hanks) instantly as she finishes his sentances and is hooked by his story.  Being a writer, she does a story on him and finds herself wanting to get in touch with him.  She makes the journey over to Seattle and manages to say Hello to him (before almost getting hit by cars on a busy road).  She backs off after thinking that he's in a relationship already and heads back home.  All the while through the movie, these events parallel the movie An Affair To Remember, so eventually there is an arranged meeting for Annie and Sam on top of the Empire State Building on Valentines Day (Sam hasn't arranged any of this; Jonah has done all the correspondance without his knowledge).  Long story short, you can gauge the rest of the story line.  It's fun and enjoyable and yes it's a chick flick but there is nothing wrong with that.There is some great acting in it by Jonah (Ross Malinger) and the chemistry between Hanks and Ryan is always great to watch (although they don't have many scenes together).  I really love this and I don't imagine there being another great love story like this one.  Nora Ephron did a great job with the screenplay and I will never get sick of watching this movie.  It really is fantastic
Peter Falk - The In-Laws. This is a great movie. Much of the humor is so subtle you may miss it on your first viewing. A Classi
Look whos talking. This is a very funny movie Starring Kirsty Alley & John Travolta . The story of how Kirsty Alley gets pregnant while having an affair with a married guy who has all kind of excuses of why they cant be together. She gives birth to Mikey (woman can relate to all the birthing parts of this movie :) ) and she hires a babysitter(John Travolta) who is great with Mikey. Kirsty tries to decide who would be a better father to Mikey and the rest is a very funny romantic story with a scarey but happy ending. Mikey talks thru the whole movie(or what we percieve that hes saying) and is an adorable charactor. This is the best in the sequel ofLook Whos Talking movies but I rate them all very highly
One of the best legal movies of all time. This movie stars Judd Nelson as Robin "Stormy" Weathers, an impatient but brillant young attorney looking to climb up the law firm ladder.  The movie follows the exploits of Stormy Weathers and has some of the most amusing legal wrangling of all time.  The screenplay was written by David E. Kelly of Ally McBeal fame so of course, it is set in Boston.  It is a nice balance of comedy and drama.
This film finally gets the red carpet treatment from MGM!!!. Finally "The Good,The Bad and The Ugly" finally gets the red carpet treatment it deserves from the guys at MGM Home Entertainment!!! This superlative 2-DVD set includes the extended version of the film in both English and Italian!!! Wow!!! It sports BOTH great picture and sound!!! It also contains a wealth of extras to enjoy!!! This great DVD set will keep you amuzed for hours!!! And to cap it off,it comes in a nice collector's case!!! A very well rounded package of a very superior western starring Clint Eastwood,Lee Van Cleef,and Eli Wallach!!! Sure, it costs "a few dollars more" than the standard single disc version but it's well worth the money!!! Two thumbs up!!! Five stars!!! A
Sophia Loren is the best. I think this movie is one the best movies that were ever made. I really loved it especially the third part. Sophia was really gorgeous, and I think she is the most beautiful and sexiest woman in the world. The story was really good. It has three different stories. Each one was enjoying to watch, and they were funny and entertaining. I think Sophia can make any movie she appears in very enjoyable. I really enjoyed watching the movie, and I recommend it to everybody to watch.
i remember this was a fun movie. i watched it once in the seventies when it was on tv and i thought it was funny, weird and quirky with a pretty cool twist ending. glad to see it on DVD, i think i'll buy it
excellent. THE BEST JOHNNY THUNDERS SHOW EVER..JOHNNY,JERRY,and ARTHUR..GREAT SETLIST..GREAT PERFORMANCE,,R.I.P. JOHNNY ,JERRY,and ARHTUR...a must hav
Fantastic!!. A must,one day a collectors DVD--i saw this on public t.v. some years ago  and   have been in search for a copy of that presentation..When i learned it was available from amazon on DVD i waiseted no time in ordering it Look at the great artists involoved  Highly recommended
Cool Stuff. I just started Pilates a few monts ago, and was looking for a video that added some new movements. This DVD definitely has them using the magic circle. The magic circle keeps my attention and I have to concentrate even more. Also, I feel the muscles in the "Powerhouse" area work intensely. I think this video is terrific for everyone. Yes, it moves fast, but the people show Pilates authentically. These guys don't mess around, which I like. And the workouts are seriously satisfying
Very good movie. This film was very good. Demeo, Dubin, and Addessi. Deserved the awards that they won. Thousands of independent movies are made each year. Especially mob films. And they go no where. Just on the shelf. Artisan picked up this movie for a reason. It's damn good. The movie is everywhere. And it deserves the recognition that it is getting. The film is hardcore. Very good acting. Filmed on the streets of Bklyn
A Good Movie.......yet... Pokemon: Jirachi Wish Maker, the 6 pokemon movie to date is also the first to not be showen in theater. The main reseon is the low ratings of the previos movie Pokemon: Heros and the decres of fans of pokemon. Anyway, I wont go into Summurising(sp) the movie becues most users all ready done that. insted I will tell you what to expect when you buy this Movie.Movie: (duh) Rating: 6/10 Cute, but the new pokemon are the only ones fighting. none of the Heros (exept for one scene)Special Features: 4.5/10 only two worth watshing the Mack A wish video and Gotta danceCard: Not that good 5/10Spichal poklet: Good 7/10Final Rating 6.5/10
Dan Hedaya's best work in years!. Dan Hedaya gives an Oscar worthy performance
Without the DVD video... the CD was mindblowing.. The seller "Bookarama" failed to include the DVD so I only had the CD to listen to; however, it was so great I consider it the favorite violin CD in my collection.  I saw him play in Salt Lake City when I was 12, and he played the Introduction and Rhondo Cappricioco (Saint Saens) that I shall never forget.  I went on to study violin and have never heard his better on any recording. He was "the best", still is.  Hope I get the DVD.P. Pyper, Santa Cruz C
Almost Too Funny. I saw this uncensored on Comedy Central over the weekend and it is the funniest stand up I have seen in a very long time.  Sean Rouse and Greg Giraldo were funny.  I'd never seen Dane Cook before but he was pretty funny too.  The highlight was definitely Dave Attell--I, very literally, laughed so hard I almost threw up.  I love Dave Attell in his other Comedy Central shows--but here he is no holds barred and it is AWESOME!!!  I am so thrilled to find this on DVD so that I can watch it again...I hope I don't yack
Jessica Lange's performance as Frances will haunt you. This is a welcome re-release of one of the very best movies of the 1980s.  The DVD itself is a visual and sonic delight, and it comes with extras that are actually worth watching.Jessica Lange's Oscar-nominated performance alone makes this an unforgettable film - it is clear that she studied Farmer's personality and mannerisms meticulously.  She is totally disarming in this role. Kim Stanley is also deserving of her Oscar nomination, and the chemistry between the two makes for some emotionally exhausting scenes.Frances Farmer was not mentally ill, not by any definition. Yes, she drank excessively at times, and used over-the-counter amphetamines, which contributed to key incidents of "erratic behavior." More than that, though, her brutally honest opinions, sarcastic wit, abrasive language, and her strong sense of self-determination aggravated those who wanted to use and control her.She inspired vengeance in the hearts of studio moguls at Paramount, right-wing vigilantes in Seattle, and even in her own mother, who still felt a need to control her as an adult, and to enjoy success vicariously through Frances.  All of this converged to create her tragedy.Several reviewers here have disputed details of this film. Names have been changed for some characters.  Farmer's first husband, pretty boy Dick/Duane Steele, represents character actor Leif Erickson, who was still living when this film was made. The doctors and judges in Farmer's story likewise have false names, presumably due to legal caution.Harry York, as an ongoing romantic interest, is indeed fictional, but thanks to the DVD featurette, we learn from the filmmakers that he is based on Stuart Jacobsen, a biographical resource who first met Frances while working for leftist Seattle congressman Marion Zioncheck - the Kaminski character. (Incidentally, the real-life Zioncheck also became a victim of mental health treatment. Not long after making a speech denouncing J. Edgar Hoover, he was briefly admitted to an institution in the Washington DC area for insulin shock treatments. A few weeks later, Zioncheck jumped to his death from a building in downtown Seattle.)Some recent reviewers have disputed whether Farmer had a lobotomy. Near the end of this film we see a recreation of her appearance on This Is Your Life, where Farmer tolerates some extremely condescending comments from host Ralph Edwards. As Jessica Lange observes in the DVD extra, Frances would have cut him with her wit had she still possessed her entire mind. Instead, she rather sheepishly denies that anything was ever "wrong" with her.One fact is certain - Dr Walter Freeman, the prime advocate of the procedure, performed lobotomies at Western State Hospital while Frances was there. There is no official record of Farmer receiving a lobotomy, but she was their most notorious inmate, not just for her acting fame, but for her incorrigible defiance in the face of every weapon in the mental health arsenal. In the 1940s, elements of the psychiatric profession were eager to prove that their expertise had value as a technocratic tool. The results of this were felt not only by dissidents in the Soviet Union, but in the US as well, for example, in the CIA's notorious MK-ULTRA mind control projects. No doubt, behavior modification specialists saw Frances as a special challenge.The story of Frances Farmer is the tale of an unusually bright, creative individual seeking to explore life on her own terms, and the brutality of the response from those who wished to deny her that right. Jessica Lange put her heart into this role, portraying Frances as a deep, caring, complex and unique human being.Her performance will haunt you.
Absolutely Beautiful!. I am a huge anime fan, and this is by far the best.  Lemme just say, God I can't even find the words to describe to you how wonderul this series is.  It inspires hope and takes the viewer on a journey into myth and fantasy.  The whole series is actually based on a true story in Japan.  A few hundred years ago, the entire population of wolves in Japan became extinct.  There are people there, even today that report wolf sightings occasionally :)If you're a fan of wolves, or looking for something a little different, CHECK THIS DVD OUT!The musics great, the drawing is perfect -- not just a random bunch of stills like most animes, but actual movement!  You get 4 episodes per DVD, each is a little over 20 minutes long.  This DVD includes:19. A dream of an oasis -- this episode takes place right after the incident at the keep.  Kiba finds a place where he is truly happy, and wonders if he has finally found paradise.20. CONSCIOUSLY -- this is by far my favorite episode in the entire series.  It has gorgeous music, and the scene by the lake will stay with you forever, just brilliant.21. Battle's Red Glare -- Orcom's men are fighting against an enemy, and the wolves are caught in the middle.  We see a lot of Blue in this episode (she's so cute as a puppy :) and Cher.22. Pieces of a shooting star -- The group decides to cross a sea of ice, but it turns out not to be such a good idea :(  Toboe goes crazzy and we finally getta see the runt kill some stuff.I can't say enough about this series -- unless you've seen the whole thing, you can't judge it.  It's made by the same people as "Cowboy Beebop" and this DVD is preparing us for the typical BONES conclusion ;)  The next DVD is way sad and very depressing; no matter how tough you are, you will be crying by the end
Good basic stretching. This is a basic stretch, but thorough.  Her guidance is great, and the combo of the workouts is nice.  I swim, and the chest stretches are great--I feel better after just doing the stretches once!I wish it had more advanced versions of the stretches, but I have room for improvement with the stretches as presented.  A great starter stretch workout
Small One At Last!. I wasn't interested in the Mickey Mouse set with MICKEY'S CHRISTMAS CAROL on it when it came out, but I wanted it on DVD as well as THE SMALL ONE, which I only had taped from its showing on the Disney Channel and it was dark and full of static and drop-outs. Last year I got the two different Region 2 DVDs these were on, but was disappointed because on MICKEY'S CHRISTMAS CAROL they cut off the titles with the beautiful Christmas song. So when I saw this set for quite a reasonable price I grabbed it. I do wish it was a bigger Christmas set, with "The Night Before Christmas" and "Santa's Toy Shop" from the 30s-40s and the Donald Duck/Chip'n'Dale Christmas cartoon, but to have a good, intact copy of Mickey's CAROL and SMALL ONE is good enough for me
Entertaining And Fun: Especially  For The Kids!. When I first viewed "Jurassic Park" in a theatre on Wilshire Blvd in Los Angeles, I actually walked out. It wasn't so much because of the film, but the speaker system in the theatre were so darn loud, I thought I was back on an Air Force flightline. I actually had to cover my ears it was so irritating. And I was not alone, many others got up to leave too. This film has been discussed to the point that I don't believe there is anything further I can add. However, I am not a big dinosaur film type person. [I really like archaelogy, and Paleantology, however, as one who is not a specialist, but through an interest in the past].However, when I viewed the film again, on DVD, I found the film pretty darn interesting and a very fun watch. It was exciting, and the dinosaurs were done very well. And more importantly, what I liked about the film is how the scientific community, [at lest one rich man in particular who is funding them], shows their disrespect and arrogance for nature, and the [natural selection] by interfering with what is best left alone. This was delved into in a very enlightening and interesting way in the film. I highly recommend the film, if you have young pre-teens, or teenagers [as I do] they will enjoy the film. It is action packed and a very suspenseful film. Especially the dinosaur scenes. Recommended.
Tried and True. Actually a really good movie, but trying hard to mimic Hitchcock and failing.  The reason for the failure is flipping back and forth between time periods and POVs as well as trying to have too many elements in one viewing; which was never a Hitchcock failing.  You have to watch this one more than once, then even watch the deleted scenes on the DVD, to get the full story, and there's a couple of elements I still find confusing or contradictory and gave up.  The problem is trying to tell too much story, the basic devise of using a period film setting (circa 1970) to have a young journalist investigate the partnership of a famous comedy duo of the 50s and why they broke up, or rather what happened the week before they broke up, which happens to be the same week she met the duo as a child when she was a guest on their annual telethon (you see where this is going?  but don't think too much of martin and lewis but rather how much the screenplay is already working real hard to establish relevance).  The night before said journalist (as a child) met the entertainment stars a young woman died, and this woman was later found in the stars' hotel suite.  No blame accorded; ruled a suicide.  All the journalistic Ws (who, what, when, where, why) basically swept under the rug.  Stylish though the presentation of all this is, the fact is the story of the duo itself is the real film, their relationship and career, and even the butler-assistant who works for one of them.  The dead girl, and the journalist, so much time is spent on them when they're not what holds the film together.  It's really about what happened to that team, and you'd like to see their rise to stardom: more about the ins and outs of the business, especially during a time when entertainers performed in clubs, and those clubs were controlled by mob bosses;, the rise of narcotic use and the acceptance and encouragement of alcohol abuse (peculiar to the 50s).  All of that is what's really interesting, and glimpsed, but unfortunately, the format and the pacing don't leave us much time to enjoy duo's background and the performances of tried-and-true Kevin Bacon and Colin Firth, both of whom age convincingly (about 15 years) but unfortunately they don't bring off the stage appeal and comedy talent/timing required though they try hard.  In fact, they try so hard the internal sweat is visible.  But the screenplay doesn't live up to the duo's legend, let's say.  In sum, a couple of sexy scenes, one for the lesbian lovers, another for providing the hint of a reason why the comedic duo remained unmarried yet broke up, despite all the skirt-chasing.  And the dead girl?  One of their shared beauties; a stunning actress who manages to steal the film in her scenes
Worth it for the commentary track but first buy the Divimax edition. After reading the reviews of the various editions carefully -- thank you to those who make that worthwhile -- I bought the Divimax edition first for superior image, sound and range of special features (and they are wonderful).  Then I came back and bought this the Criterion edition (used and at reduced price) just for the exclusive commentary track by director Terry Gilliam.  It was worth it.  If you are a real fan, I recommend owning both versions of this his great children's (nod nod wink wink) fantasy classic.I might add that this is the best Sean Connery has EVER looked -- he quickly and completely outshines all the more recent Greek hero personifications -- but that is just icing on the cake.The child in and above the world is the story's heart
an astounding vision. This is an incredibly conceived animation. I'm intirgued by how it has been dubbed into english, there are lots of blank spaces in the dialogue and stillness in the image that I'm guessing might come from a more involved Japanese original. The effect is that sometimes the pace looses dynamism, All in all though its an astounding vision and what really mkes it is the depth of the surround sound track, alongside some really great drawing of course
Fantastic Film!!!. I saw this little gem at the Miami Film Festival a couple of years ago and couldn't get it out of my mind.  It's about a young woman whose budding sexuality gets her in trouble (she sleeps with her mother's boyfriend) so she runs away from home to a resort commuinty high in the mountains somewhere in Austraila.  There she meets a young man she develops a fancy for, but he is dealing with issues of his own.  This was a magnificent film that deserved far more theatrical atttention than it got.  Film Festival crowds loved it!  I talked to programmers of film festivals who raved about it.  But, for some reason theatrical distributors gave it only nominal attention.  Now's your chance to see it.    You'll be amazed at how much of a Nicole Kidman look alike the young female lead is - a dead ringer!  Enjoy
good dvd. I was wating a long time for Clearing the Eye. I have been a Isis fan since the Celestial days. I was a fan Neurosis before and stumbled onto Isis via a Neurosis search one day online.  This dvd is good not great. I say that because there is always going to be room for improvement. Isis did a very good job on production of the inbetween graphics and menu details. Audio in it is good not great. The dvd is a lot better than what most bands put out in my opinoun. I really enjoyed the full set of Panopticon towards the end of the dvd. If you are a Isis fan then you should enjoy the shows that they have collected and put together. Solid music dvd, I hope this helped.
Not Slick,  but Sick. Four stars seem a little generous. The film is certainly memorable, and certainly different. There are a lot of odd things going on here. The oddest is why the central character, Mark Lewis, is so obviously a blond, blue-eyed German. Very strange, this. Is there some weird subterranean comment about the sickness of Hitler's Germany, and how we ought to feel sorry for the perpetrators of his crimes, because of their blighted childhoods? Much of the rest of the symbolism is very heavy-handed, however, as other reviewers have pointed out. It is consistently perverse. The director of the film within the film: "The Walls are Closing In", is played by an actor who was in point of fact virtually blind. He had a bit part in several James Bond films. Is there some message here? Peeping Tom's father, the heartless psychologist, was played by Powell himself. What is this telling us?  Is part of the message meant to be that the camera kills? It doesn't hang together somehow. What's the meaning of the model with half a hideous face? Why is the would-be girl-friend's alcoholic mother blind? Why is the only presence with real star quality, Moira Shearer, playing a stand-in? Much of the premise of the film seems promising, but it is clumsily written, and directed with a leaden hand. In fact, what many of the Powell-Pressburger films seem to lack is any real sense of pace or excitement. It's all a bit tired, and slow. There is nausea, but no shock or thrill. Loco, perhaps, but Psycho, it isn't.
Sexy drama. I really enjoyed this show. It's true there were some scenes where the acting and the writing could have been better, and it would have been nice to have more episodes in a season, but other than that I have no complaints.I loved the love triangle between the three male leads. There is some serious eye candy there.  The love scenes are really beautiful.The story so far is.........In 1840 Ambrosius Vallin is put under a curse by his vengeful ex-fiance.  When she catches him making love to another man, she imprisons him in the Dante's Cove Hotel celler.  Knowing how vain he was she cast a spell, turning him into an old man.  Only the kiss of a young man could set him free.Having years to hone his own witchcraft skills, while locked in the celler, Ambrosius cast his own spell on Kevin and lures him to Dante's Cove, where Kevin has decided to move in with his current lover, Toby, at the Hotel.  Ambrosius tricks Kevin into breaking the spell. But he has become obsessed with Kevin and decides he must have him for himself and takes steps to eliminate the competition....Tune in next season for the rest of the story
Outstanding Film making. Sophie Scholl, The Final Days tells the story of a 22 German girl who dared question the Nazi state in 1943.  It is a masterpiece of film making, and a beautifully executed film.  The acting is top-notch, and the story excellent.  If you have two hours to spare, you will not regret seeing Sophie Scholl, whose bravery will remain with you forever.
Stunningly beautiful and powerful. We just picked this up at the library as a family friendly movie.  We are ordering it ASAP.  I don't know how many times I cried during this movie.  The little girls in the movie were so genuine - especially the main character.  The whole package was just enchanting and magical.  No special affects.  Just a good old fashioned story of the strength of the imagination and the power of friendship.We ARE all princes and princesses!
Wes Craven's New Nightmare  (1994). Director:  Wes CravenCast:  Heather Langenkamp, Robert Englund, Miko Hughes, Wes Craven, John Saxon, Robert Shaye, Sara Risher, Marianne Maddalena, David Newsom, Gretchen Oehler, Jeff Davis.Running Time:  112 minutesRated R for violence, gore, and language."Wes Craven's New Nightmare" is a complete overhaul of the "Nightmare on Elm Street" formula, transferring it from the fictional Elm Street and into the real world. It would seem like a cheesy premise, Freddy is such a bad guy that he's even coming to life on the movie sets, but the idea makes it work.  Wes Craven has been having nightmares again, and since his nightmares tend to be where he gets his best ideas (much like many other horror writers, directors, etc, not the least of which is Stephen King), he decides that this must mean it's time to make another "Elm Street" movie. Heather Langenkamp, who played the terrorized Nancy Thompson in the original "Nightmare" and "Dream Warriors", takes on the role of herself. She's now 30 years old and has a child, but is gradually coming to realize that the strange things that have been happening and nightmares of Freddy that she has been having are way too similar to what happened in her movies, and she gradually comes to realize that it's all real. Some of the best moments are when she goes to talk to Wes Craven about it, to tell her what has been happening, and it is all stuff that he has already written into his new but unfinished script.Craven explains that the evil inside Freddy Kruger is actually an ancient evil that has merely been temporarily trapped inside the character of Freddy and the stories of the Nightmare on Elm Street movies, that as long as the story is kept active, the evil can be contained. Now that the movies have ended, he explains, the evil force within Freddy has been set free. There's a great scene where he tells Heather that the reason the story has died is because that's what happens when people water it down to make it an easier sell. This is a strikingly insightful comment to be made within a horror film, but it strikes me as strange since it's so obvious that he's referring to the load of bad sequels in the Nightmare on Elm Street series, only two of which he directed (the original and this one) but almost all of which he either produced or wrote. Freddy has managed to separate himself from both Robert Englund, the actor that played him in the movies, and the Nightmare movies as well, and have entered our world.   The movie takes place in an interesting parallel reality, it's not the reality in the movies and it's not the real world, but somewhere in between. All of the actors from the movies all play themselves and there is much talk of 'our world' and 'the real world,' but only the actors from previous movies play themselves, all the other people in the movie are characters played by actors, not the least of which is Heather's son, Dylan, who turns out to be the most powerful person in the movie. Dylan starts having nightmares and reacts as any kid his age would, not wanting to go to sleep and wanting mom to spend the night with him. Why she refuses for most of the movie is never really explains.Ultimately, Freddy is able to come through and kill people when Dylan sleeps, and it seems that Freddy capitalizes on this, using the kid both as leverage and as a means to get into his world. There is a scene where Dylan runs across a freeway at night during heavy traffic, and Freddy appears in the sky and lifts him up, helping him across the freeway unharmed. This leaves the question of whether Freddy did this to protect his path into this world or just to taunt his mother, Heather, who is following closely behind and ready to run into traffic herself to save her son.  Needless to say, there is a climactic scene in a horrific dungeon setting, with Heather and Dylan trying to escape and kill Freddy at the same time.  "New Nightmare" stands as one of the best of the entire series, along with the original film, and despite these weak shortcomings, it is a tremendously well-made horror movie. It's thought out where most horror films aren't, it has a premise that's fascinating in the same way that things like time travel are fascinating, and it will surely please Nightmare fans eager to get a look at the "Nightmare on Elm Street" sets as well as the cavernous mansion that Craven has managed to afford from being royalty in the horror movie production world.  A unique, innovative adventure in terror
Blood Work. I was impressed with this film. I have always been a great fan of Clint Eastwood. It is true that he is getting up there in years and it saddens me. This mystery thriller keeps you guessing till the end. I pegged the murderer right off but the twists and turns made me second guess myself constantly. In the end, Clint Eastwood proves that no one can outdo him
Rockin Berry. A fabulous 4 disc boxset that leaves no stone unturned. The quality of the film print is impeccable and the three discs of extras are truly wonderful.What a treat to see Chuck Berry,Little Richard,Bo Diddley, Jerry Lee Lewis on film .. As Hackford himself says it's a piece of history which is unrepeatable. If I could have given this set 10 stars I would have. Awesome
An Excellent Film: And A Very Unpredictable Ending!. There are countless reviews here, so I will make this one short. First, I am always amazed when I meet people who say they figured "The Usual Suspects" out by the middle of the movie. I for one was totally floored. I did not see it coming, and was very surprised [no spoilers]. The film has been analyzed, dissected, discussed, and with over 500 reviews, written about quite extensively. However, one of the things I don't understand is why someone would give the film one or two stars. There are many 'good' films that have really never appealed to me, however, I can see that although I might not like the film, it is a good film. Therefore, I would not think of giving such low marks to film for this reason; but would give my analysis of what I thought was weak about a film: Yet, I would still give the film its earned accolades. This film was great however.The film, "The Usual Suspects" is very good and has a very twisted and complicated plot. This only makes the film a better watch. I like these types of mysteries. Especially the ones you can't figure out. Specifically when they do not spell it out to the viewer what is happening; but suddenly you find yourself saying, "Wow, I never expected that!" These types of films with twists and turns appeal to me. If they appeal to you, then this is a film for you. And I would highly recommend you not only rent the film, but purchase it, as it belongs in your DVD collection. This is a smart, intelligently written, and wonderfully acted suspense thriller  that will take you on a roller coaster of a mystery, which will keep you riveted to your seat. Highly recommended.
Graphic , well paced , dramatization of the Jack The Ripper story. The Hughes Brothers created a nightmarish vision of Victorian London only matched by some of Dickens novels. Johnny Depp and Heather Graham are fabulous as the police inspector investigating the case and a prostitute who is a friend to the victims.The film is beautifully shot and the atmosphere of the grimy southside of London is captured incredibly well. The murder scenes are very graphic and this is definitely not for the squeemish or the very young. Depp plays a role similar to the one he played in Sleepy Hollow but this is a much more serious movie aimed at a different audience. My kids loved Sleepy Hollow but I wouldn't let them watch this. It would give them nightmares for a week.The plot is interesting and while fictional it has enough plausibilty to engage the viewer for it's entire length.Johnny Depp is an incredible talent. After seeing him in this,Pirates, Slepy Hollow and Edward Scissorhands I have to conclude that this guy is the best actor of his generation. He is always interesting to watch.
Great movie. I grew up with this movie and now I bought it for my son, I think is a great movie for all ages
A good introduction to French for toddlers. I'm pretty pleased with this title as my little one has managed to grasp a couple of french words. He is only 20 months (1yr 8mths), but he understands and can utter a few french words and can now count from 1-10 in french.We are from Malaysia, therefore English and Malay are our first two languages, (which my son already understands and converses in pretty well for his age). I wanted to expose him to other languages, so that is why I bought the French and Spanish Brainy Baby titles. I have yet to start him on the Spanish title though.It's a good introductory DVD, but I guess the only way you will get your children to be fluent in any language is to converse with them on a daily basis in the languages that you want them to be fluent in. So basically I would recommend this DVD to parents who would like to expose their little ones to French. I won't recommend it to parents who expect their little ones to be able to converse fluently in french by watching this dvd. For that they should hire a french tutor
Taking life as it comes - this is a film to enjoy. This is a rare film.  Nothing is trite or predictable; it's a very creative script that makes each character endearing.  There are no bad guys here, just people taking life as it comes.  Others have said that this could be any family, not specifically an Asian-American family and I think that is the point:  the laughter and the tears transcend heritage or skin color
A remarkable movie !!. I have seen this movie on the German TV yesterday with the title: "A summer at the sea" and I was deeply impressed.Despite that it was produced in 1990, the theme is more up-to-date than ever. Excellent actors of all ages performed very well indeed, a great story, some romantic spots and lovely music will make you thinking about the relationship of children to their parents, their pain and childish emotions which often get hurt.This story could happen today, next month or the following year, next door of you .. or at any other location or country. So you will get nothing NEW out of that movie but the sad reality of daily life in the eyes of children whose parents can't behave.I only can highly recommend this movie - buy the DVD and you will enjoy it definitively more than just one time.
See my full remarks for this release in VHS format: same title, but in VHS. I bought this video recording in VHS format of Mozart's famous singspiel, "Die Zauberflote" (The Magic Flute) in 1990, and it's the best all around production of Mozart's great opera I've seen.  I believe this is superior to the Levine/Met production from 1991, also on DG DVD.  This is a September 1983 live performance from the Bavarian State Opera, and features Francisco Araiza as Tamino;  Lucia Popp as Pamina;  Wolfgang Brendel as Papageno; Kurt Moll as Sarastro, among others.  I would call this a traditional production, rather like Ancient Egypt seen through the eyes of German intellectuals, unlike the Levine/Met production, which had more contemporary sets and yet had a more "Ancient" look to it than this Munich production.Conductor Wolfgang Sawallisch (b. 1923) sets sensible tempos in the style of Karl Bohm, although many of Sawallisch's tempos are faster than Bohm's studio recording from 1964 (DG CD).  He is more moderate and middle of the road than Levine, and appeals more to my way of thinking Mozart's great opera should sound. While there are a few imperfections in singing and ensemble, the overall musical thrust is so good, these are quickly cast aside.For more details, see my remarks about the VHS release of this title. I am glad and thankful DG is releasing this on DVD.
Alan Jackson Greatest Hits Discs 1 and 2. Bought discs 1 and 2 together (thankfully) as they are both a bit lacking in the amount of material, only 6 songs per disc which is a bit dissapointing. But still well worth adding to a dvd music collection. Though on saying that I would really like to see an Alan Jackson live dvd which would be great for all those fans who will never get the chance to see him perform on stage because we live at the wrong end of the world
A beautiful book. This sequel to A Story Like the Wind returns to the same romanticized Africa, but with less grace than the first.  The closer that Van der Post's characters come to the outside world, the more difficulties he has reconciling his artistic goals with his political message.  The constantly tense circumstances surrounding the characters as they attempt to escape death on a daily basis means that readers will miss the lighter moments that made the first book work so well
Great Transfers - All correct aspect ratio except Wolf. Vips, Sandpiper and the Comedians all were transfered with the true aspect ratio of the film which is great (no picture cropped out)!Who's Afraid of Virginia Wolf you will find the widescreen is cropped when compared to the fullscreen. This is unfortunate: no film should be cropped!All transferes are great, clean crisp and clear as a DVD should be!I too would have liked to have "Boom!" included in this set - but we cant have everything all the time?
Top-notch. In the early days of movies, the studios often had their specialties.  MGM did musicals.  Universal did monster movies.  And Warner Brothers did gangster movies.  With an emphasis on "common" people - those growing up in urban tenements or in working-class professions - Warner Brothers created its own special niche, and in the process, defined the gangster movie so well that the influence of these films are still seen today.In chronological order (with one exception, explained below), this set starts with Little Caesar, with Edward G. Robinson as the vicious gangster Rico, who goes from minor hoodlum to gang boss.  This film - made in the early sound era - is definitely dated but has its strengths, particularly Robinson, who is the center the movie.  In a way, this film is a prototype for the gangster genre, not fully formed but showing the shape of things to come.Next is the first of four James Cagney movies, The Public Enemy.  With this movie, the genre hits its stride with its tale of Tom Powers.  Beginning with this movie, we begin to see the reasons why these men turn to crime, especially poverty.  As Powers, Cagney is a brutal character who nonetheless values friendship and family, in particular his mother, a gentle but weak woman who turns a blind eye to her son's flaws and therefore can't stop him.Cagney returned in Angels in Dirty Faces, where he contends with Pat O'Brien, his childhood friend turned priest and Humphrey Bogart, as his craven but evil lawyer.  Here, Cagney is a generally likeable character who is the idol of the local street kids (the Dead End Kids).  He is also likeable in The Roaring Twenties as a WWI vet who is driven to crime after finding no opportunities in the "legitimate" world.  Finally, in White Heat, he is psychopathic Cody Jarrett, a gang leader with a big mother fixation; while far from a pleasant person, Cagney is still able to make Cody somewhat sympathetic.The exception in this set of movies is Petrified Forest, which, while very good, does not fully fit with the other films.  While the other movies all are distinctly urban, Petrified Forest takes place in an isolated desert caf.  In addition, while the other movies take place over the course of months or years, Petrified Forest takes place over a few hours.  Finally, Petrified Forest does not focus on the gangster, in this case Duke Mantee (played excellently by Bogart in a breakthrough role), but rather on a romance between Leslie Howard and Bette Davis).This top-notch set of classic gangster movies is a pleasure to watch from beginning to end.  In addition to the films themselves, there are some great commentary tracks that provide extra insight, mini-documentaries on each film and a "Warner Night at the Movies" feature that allows the viewer to watch an old-time trailer, newsreel, short subject and cartoon prior to the main feature.  Some boxed sets are hit-or-miss; this one is definitely a hit
Holo Mai Pele. This spectacular and powerful singing and dance performance (and the excellent commentaries)telling the story of the Fire Goddess, Pele, and her sister Hiiaka, gives deep insights into Hawaiian culture and religious belief and is wonderful to watch.  For me it helps keep alive memories of my own visit to Hawaii and the Volcanoes National Park.  Should be of interest to anyone who loves traditional dance and/or mythology.
Another superb entry from the Anderson production team. Joe 90 is tremendously underrated, and it builds on the advances in production design and puppetry from the earlier series of the Anderson production team.  I am constantly baffled by "professional" reviewers who ask about the "ethics" of this show: have they spent some time with young children?  ALL of the young people I've communicated with "get it," and the humor of this show is very clear in EVERY episode I've seen, where the presence of young Joe as a super agent is one of the punch lines to the villians.  As with other 60's Gerry and Sylvia Anderson productions, the material can be quite violent, but as I remember it quite well, this is one of the most exciting aspects of their shows to age-appropriate children, and made valid by the excellent character development, meticulous design, and consistently original and expressive visual storytelling.
"Why do you want to dance?" "Why do you want to live?". If you can hear this melodramatic dialogue exchange without smirking a tad, then you'll dig the whole movie and find no melodrama in it whatsoever. Even if you find it a tad overwrought, however, you'll encounter lots to enjoy, and you'll find yourself involved in the story of the ballerina torn between a personal life and love, and the demanding dictates of her profession and her boss.The twenty minute ballet in the middle of the film is very appealing, though it's supposed to be on a stage in front of a live audience and many of the things that take place in it could only happen in film. Still, it's captivating.The performances are excellent all around and (though R. Baker's rule of thumb that everything is 20% too long applies here) the story keeps your attention most of the time, all the way up to the suspenseful, heart-wrenching--and, to me--unexpected ending.
This is a great video. This is a great video for any age.It takes a look at a season and the  olympics with Michael Jordan.This video goes into the 1992 playoffs and the  NBA Finals I recommend any person to purchase this video     EN
The Privileged Planet. The Priviledged Planet DVD was excellent! It just confirmed my beleifs that all we see around us was designed by the creator. There are simply to many complex systems in place from the microscopic, to the vast and wonderful universe, for it to all have occured simply by chance
Great 80's comedy. Comming of age in the 80's is getting made fun of lately, but I thought it was a good time to grow up with the exception of the advent of AIDS. People were dieing so fast and I lost teachers to that.  It was not like today. This movie is really good and in the 1980's style.  It is a great comedy.  If you like the 80's and want to understand some of the refrences in the media where they keep saying Bueller repeated times see this movie.  You will also get to see where the guy who does the clear eyes comercials go his start in this movie.  Anyway perhaps you just might like the 80's if you do not already if you watch some of these good comming of age movies and listen to our music
Prompt Delivery - Product as stated. The movie came promptly and in good condition.Thank you
Still a great movie after all these years. This was one of my favorite movies from the 1990's.A great many things have happened since then to make anyone want to forget this movie, but one day I saw the DVD on Amazon listed for this ridiculously low price, so I got it.Ah, how things have changed! In 1996 when this movie was made, Meg Ryan was at the peak of her career - she'd been named Woman of the Year by the Harvard Hasty Pudding Society in 1994, and could have just as well been named "America's Sweetheart".   She had built up such a reservoir of goodwill for the sweet and lovable characters that she played. Then, in 2001, she turned 40, and had an affair with Russell Crowe while making "Proof of Life" (another movie that I loved at the time, but have since forgotten).  She then fell into a full-blown mid-life crisis and basically went nuts, wrecking her face, her public image, and her career. At age 45, she's too old now for the innocent sweetheart roles that made her career, and she hasn't been able to move on to the few wife/mother/divorcee/career woman roles that Hollywood offers to middle-aged actresses. And so she has almost disappeared from the big screen.At the time, playing the hard-nosed Captain Emma Walden in this movie, Meg Ryan was making a major departure from her usual roles, which only made the story of her character even more poignant.   Yes, Captain Walden screamed and cussed at her men and behaved like a "dyke" (that's a quote from a character in the movie, not my opinion, by the way), but we, the moviegoers, all knew that was still good old sweet Meg Ryan underneath that crusty exterior.Denzel Washington played the deeply conflicted Col. Serling, and this movie would be one of several in the 1990's that would establish him as an A-list superstar.Lou Diamond Phillips played the angry, callous, and tortured Sgt. Monfriez.  Wow! Was it in 1987 that he made "La Bamba"? He was great in that movie and in this movie!  And unfortunately those are the only two movies that he's made that I even recognize, as his career fell off into mostly B-movies and TV guest roles.Matt Damion!  I didn't even recognize him in this movie, playing the medic Ilario - he was so young and thin back then.  This was one of his first big roles, before he became a star with "Good Will Hunting" and "Saving Private Ryan".Ah, and of course, there was the background setting of what was known at the time as the Persian Gulf War, but now is usually referred to as the First Iraq War or Iraq War I, to distinguish it from the current quagmire, Iraq War Part Deux.So no wonder the price of this DVD has dropped like a rock!  Subject matter - Iraq War I - who wants to remember that one anymore?   Key star of the movie - Meg Ryan - wrecked her image and alienated her fanbase.  Time for a clearance sale!But, this is still a great movie, and it will bring a tear to your eyes.The story of "Courage Under Fire" is a fiction, but many elements came straight out of the news stories at the time about the real Iraq War I.I have always thought, for instance, that the idea for the character of Captain Emma Walden was based on the real-life Major Marie Rossi, a Chinook helicopter pilot who was killed in the war.  Right before the invasion began, the extremely photogenic Rossi had appeared on national TV in an interview with CNN, talking about flying into combat and facing the possibility of dying in the war. A few days after the interview was broadcast, she and her crew were killed when her helicopter hit the support wires of an unlit microwave tower and crashed.  I remember seeing her in the interview and then hearing of her death, and it was quite sad.Friendly fire was a major element of the news stories from Iraq War I, with the photos of  grieving soldiers who had discovered that their friends had died from friendly fire."Courage Under Fire" unfolds its tangled storyline in classic "Rashomon" fashion.  An ex-tank commander, anguished by his role in an episode of friendly fire that is being covered up by the Army brass, is re-assigned to a desk job to investigate pending medals, one of them being a Medal of Honor to be awarded to the first female soldier to be given such a medal for heroism in combat. His investigation turns up several versions of what happened before he discovers the truth, which turns out to be yet another variety of "friendly fire". And thus fortified, he is also able to address the truth of his own involvement in the friendly fire incident as well.The final scene of the movie is poignant, mysterious, and lingers in the mind. I still think about it today.   It is a replay of an earlier scene in the movie, with one new bit of detail.It is the morning after the tank battle, and Col. Serling is standing next to the burnt-out tank of his friend, who lies dead on top of the turret.  An Army Medevac helicopter that had landed to pick up the wounded takes off in front of him, and Col. Serling looks up, and we see, for the first time, that the pilot of this helicopter is none other than Capt. Walden. She seems to be smiling at him. Is this really how that moment in time transpired?  Was she on her way to the battle that would play out in the rest of this movie and go on to earn her the Medal of Honor? Or is this just a trick of Col. Serling's memory, and he is seeing Capt. Walden in his dreams, placing her at this awful moment in time, and she is smiling at him in approval because he has finally gained absolution for both of them by uncovering the truth?
One of the best. This movie is very entertaining, though perhaps dated. I loved Anne Baxter's performance. It's a 50's post-civil war western drama (based on no historical fact whatsoever). I suspect it was made to cash in on Heston's  popularity. I absolutely loved it
Art, trip, thoughts, tune of the times. I first saw this movie at its first appearance at the Red Vic in San Francisco. I found it trippy : the most innovative visuals I had seen in a movie for a long time, used for supporting an intellectual, however dreamy and poetic story. Wow, that was good.The Red Vic as other independent movie theaters just play a movie a couple of nights in a row. The next day I thought I could bring some friends to see it and have a good evening after together. The line was so huge the theater was filled before we could reach the door, as the next day...Yes, it is a good movie, if you like the poetry of being alive and sharing it, and you enjoy the good, the ugly, and the game of wondering about it
Made me think about what I appreciate and life's destiny for me. This movie was recommended by a friend. He said that it would help me appreciate the little things in my life and to make me realize how easily I can take people for granted. There is an excellent message about how believing with unshakable faith can be overlooked by the average person. Simon struggles with his small stature and is often patronized for his belief that he has a purpose.  I really enjoyed this movie and came away with a better sense of myself and that I am capable of much more. I particularly enjoyed the performances of Ashley Judd and Oliver Platt
Very touching portrait of the deaf-blind. Werner Herzog is famous for his movies about obssesive maniacs (Aguirre, Fitzcarraldo, etc.). However, it turns out that he has a great sensibility for documentary films. Although this movie is not for everyone -it has a very slow narrative- it is a very important testimony of those people who have lived in the land of darkness (blindness) and silence (deafness). It shows, amongst many other things, how these people live, how they "see" the world (notice how language falls apart here)and how they communicate. A word of advice: there is a shot of a poor child who was born deaf and blind and lived in isolation for several years (imagine a person who has not developed linguistic skills at all). That is one frightening and sordid scene that will give you nightmares.I have a weird obsession with documentaries and love this film; however, if you're not into this genre you may want to rent the dvd first.
Should not be missed. Saw this movie at a sneak preview as I could not wait for it to be released. Wonderful & awesome feel good movie. I bought the 2004 calendar and was anxious for the movie's release on DVD. Fabulous acting by all of the ladies. Get this movie & watch it with your mom !!Also Recommended: The Full Mont
great but disturbing in somse scenes. I have children in the performing arts - and I wanted them to to get a taste of the "reality" of a full-time school and the harshness of competition in such schools. The movie was great for that - but some of the R-rated scenes were even hard on me. I do not know if I will watch the movie again soon.  As a presentation of 'what it's like' to enter one of these firecely competitive schools, it was very good; and as a sober revealer of how much anger, disappointment and immorality there is in such a society, it was great. It was a much ROUGHER version of "STEP UP" (the movie).   For parents considering putting their kids into performing arts high schools - it's probably informative, and not too far off.  I would rate it PG-17 to R for language and sexual insinuations.
Great DVD's! A must have for any fan!. I love these DVD's. I am a huge Jessica Simpson fan, and have been before Newleyweds came out. This is a must have for any fan. The Variety Hour is funny, witty, and baiscally a huge laugh. I can't wait for the Christmas Variety hour to come out
I am elevated and elated !. After the intensity of Zoo TV and the seeking of Pop Mart, the Elevation Tour was a big hug and a kiss from the boys from Ireland. This is U2 at their spiritual, musical and interactive heights. From the loving interaction between the band members to the obvious delight of the fans this DVD captures a magical experience. Each tour from U2 is a gift and this DVD is an excellent way to remember! The tour is captured well -- great footage and sound. Thanks U2 for providing your fans with so much material to enjoy when you're not around.
Hepburn at her finest. This accomplished actress entertains and delights as a giddy, free-spirited young woman trying desperately to live in reality
Love makes you do crazy things, insane things. I was very skeptical when I started this film. I thought it was going to be another - boy meets girl, boy loses girl, boy mopes around for awhile before he gets girl back- film. I was sorely mistaken.Josh Hartnett plays Matthew who is on his way to Shanghai for business, when he spots who he thinks is the girl that left him high and dry two years before, Lisa, played by Diane Kruger (was Helen in 'Troy'). So lying to his new girlfriend he instead tries to track down Lisa. Following a trail of what, to him, could lead only to Lisa. He does a few things that make you question his sanity. When he finally reaches the end of the trail the girl he does find, Lisa/Alex, played by Rose Byrne. Obviously not his Lisa. But there is something sinister lurking behind the story of this girl and there are far too many coincidences connecting the two women.Hartnett is wonderfully tortured, lost, confused, but at the same time so determined to find the love of his life. His film roles are steadily getting better and better.Byrne demands sympathy from the viewer, bringing a whole new meaning to "I saw him first." Matthew Lillard is great as Hartnett's best friend, Luke, who is trying to support him but at the same time, knock some sense into him.This was a great film. By the end of it I wanted Hartnett to find his closure so bad that I found myself yelling " NO" every time a new obstacle was thrown in his way.The final scene is exquisite and touching. A perfect ending to a fantastic film
Great workout but it will kick your butt. I have used this DVD workout on and off for the past two years.  It contains two half-hour workouts and a bonus 10 minute stretch.  Even though both workouts are really challenging, I was able to work my way up to complete the first one.  Don't be frustrated if you can't get through all of the exercises for at least a week or more. It will eventually get easier.  Everytime I begin this workout after slacking off for a few months, I usually feel like I'm going to die after the first 10 minutes so when I finally get to the point where I can finish it, I know I've gotten stronger.The second is really tough and requires a ton of core strength to complete some of the moves.  I have to say that I definitely noticed a difference in my body after a few weeks of mainly completing the first set of exercises.Kristin is a great instructor and be prepared to hold plank positions for an exceptionally long time but it is worth it in the long run when you can fit into your clothes better!  :
An extremely underrated movie. Althoush critics and pretty much everyone else dismissed this movie as awful, I think it is great.  It is Denis Laery at his best both in acting and writing.  The dialouge between him and a young Sandra Bullock is  excellent.  You get to see his Boston/Irish side like in other in Monument  Ave but in a better plot with better actors. (Although his art theif  sidekicks do have some great one-liners)  Sandra Bullock is also an  excellent sidekick to Leary.  She made this movie before she was a star in  movies such a Speed, but plays a her &quot;wanting to get out of the  gutter&quot; character great.   This movie will not be loved by everyone,  but serious Leary fan or Bullock aficionado will appreciate its merit.    Finally, any Homicide fans will enjoy seeing &quot;G&quot; Yaphet Kotto in  a less dramatic law enforcement role
Food for brain...(do you have large appetite? ). I think this ultimate movie is definitely for collection. Instead of renting it again and again to unlock the mysteries just buy the lock and take your time solving the puzzles and save $$$ too. It's not a "theater movie". It's a home +couch+ solitary movie.These clues are helpful only if you have watched the whole movie :)In the beginning the movie zooms into a sleeping woman which means the coming up things are dream (dream of Diane (in dream her name is Betty) which she would only "dream" in real life):1.	The car accident of Rita (real life Camellia; girl friend of Diane) which was almost similar to that one night in real life of Diane when Camellia broke her heart breaking up with her and announcing her marriage with a movie director. It was no less than a worse accident for Diane, which she wanted Camellia to experience. So there is Rita only survivor of a bad car wreck.2.	In real life Camellia is a vamp so Diane dreams Rita/ Camellia with lost memory. That makes Rita very innocent and loyal to her the opposite of real life.3.	In real life Camellia is helping Diane getting movie roles but in the dream Betty (real life Diane) is helping Rita.4.	In dream Betty is full of life and acting talent but in reality Diane is just opposite.5.	In reality Diane had come from Canada to her Aunt place where she is living; so she dreams about going to her aunt house where she meets Rita.6.	The director in the dream is the one Camellia is going to marry and once in a party Diane overheard the director saying "I get the pool and you get the pool man", which she dreams later. She dreams lot bad for the poor director.7.	She also dreams that there has been lots of conflict going on between director's and producer's choice to cast the lead actress. This shows the competition between Diane and Camellia in real life. Camellia is the director choice.8.	The hit man is the one she hired to kill Camellia.9.	The cowboy is still a puzzle; he appears 3 times in the movie.10.	Betty and Rita discovering a body (of Diane???) is also puzzle.11.	The restaurant scene with the scary guy is still a puzzle to me.12.	The Silencio club part of the movie is a hint for the viewers and gives Betty the puzzle box for which she has the key.When Rita unlocks the blue box, the reality starts:1.	Diane is in horrible condition as she missed Camellia.2.	She knows that Camellia has been murdered because the hit man has returned her the blue key.3.	She is so paranoid that she kills herself.So basically Diane who lost her GF (Camellia) and had her murdered is dreaming a better world till the Silencio club part of the movie. When she wakes up she realizes her mistake and kills herself.
Sibling Lust Against the London Architectural Revival Dust. Close My Eyes is a mild and genteel examination of sibling incest amid the London yuppie set and against the backdrop of riverside redevelopment along the Thames. Natalie Gillespie (Saskia Reeves) is an unhappy woman of working class roots. We know this from a quick moving opening sequence of brief scenes that covers five years of her dissatisfied love relationships whining to her ambitious sexy brother, Richard, who she is distanced in age and personality. Richard Gillespie (Clive Owens), is a studly young architect, outgoing unlike his sullen sister, and able to successfully pursue his intellectual and creative pursuits. After a shared late night kiss, reality was quickly passed over as simply cuddling until Natalie rekindles her relationship with the long absent brother dearest.Again bored, and with a new husband, Sinclair Bryant (Alan Rickman), a financial wiz who is pompous, condescending of his wife, and wealthy from family money, Natalie and Richard cross the line of social taboos with a torrid sexual affair. Richard's distraction with his sister becomes obsession while she is simply using him for excitement against a vacuous social schedule with unsuspecting Sinclair. The danger of forbidden fruit and illegal sexual thrill drives the couple to meet under the nose of Natalie's cuckold husband. Inept Sinclair is faithful to his wife and his work routine. A chatterbox of politeness, Sinclair's privileged upbring, beautiful homes, and class distance him from Natalie's insecurities. To make up for her shortcomings, she manipulates the game through her little brother, whose confidence is eroding under the spell of his sister's vacillation and sexual control.Superior performances by Alan Rickman (Truly, Deeply, Madly; An Awfully Big Adventure) in easily one of his most sympathetic roles grounds the erotic performance of Clive Owen (Closer, Croupier), who is naked for extensive portions of the movie. They surround Saskia Reeve's performance with sufficient testosterone to overshadow the shortcomings of the secondary story line of Richard's boss who is dying of AIDS. Although meant to have social relevance, incest and AIDS seem an unlikely pairing.Perhaps it is the notion of the unspoken pariah status of its victims, or the rightness or wrongness of the sibling's actions that is never examined in depth which makes the film unsuccessful and somewhat dated. It is a weakness surrounding what motivates Natalie's disenchantment with her perfect situation, or why Richard is so drawn to his older sister that the audience is left to ponder. Unlike a Tennessee Williams story of forbidden excesses, Close My Eyes becomes an exercise in the boredom of river front living by a menage of shallow characters
Good  sequel Hal. 2010 is a good sequel to 2001. 2001 is better but the way the Russians Americans and Hal work together makes a good point. Visually 2010 is close at times but not breathtaking. 2010 has elements 2001 didnt have that make it an interesting watchable sequel
Surprisingly good. I had limited expectations for a Will Ferrell movie but STF was well done. Ferrell demonstrates that he can actually act in a (semi) serious role. Some say that the movie isn't funny but I would suggest that the humor is just a bit more sophisticated than the typical Will Ferrell low-brow comedy. The concept of the movie is quirky but they pulled it off reasonably well. As for the ending...Others have slammed the movie of the ending, and I understand why, but you can kind of see the reason behind it. On the one hand, is does seem contrived and clich but, on the other hand, I think that this choice of resolution does seem somewhat consistent with the larger theme of the movie. I do think the choice of ending was based on more than just cheap sentimentality.Overall, a recommended choice.
An actually intersting film. This is one of those Sonny Chiba films that I actually thought were intersting and not cheesy funny. It makes you think and it makes you question on what really happened to the prince. WATCH THIS FILM
Rock on. SERIOUSLY, One of my favorite movies of all time. Thank goodness for 1980's rewinds. Kate Hudson's character is ridiculous, in the absolute best sense of the word. Oh, and, Martha Plimpton never ages...she's a freak of nature. Now get off the computer and let's go party Risa Garcia style. F*** yeah
serious concert. A very high class, elegant, perfect mastered, very nice camera shots. Zucchero and his friends in a memorable show. Everyone is inspired to give the best... i recomend i
Good Times Third Season Guide -- AWESOME!!!. Disk One1. The Family Gun *****2. A Real Cool Job3. Operation Florida4. Florida's Rich Cousin5. The Politicians6. Love In The Ghetto7. The Weekend ****8. The BabyDisk Two9. Michael's Big Fall10. Willona's Dilemma11. Florida's Protest12. The Mural13. A Loss of Confidence14. Cousin Cleatus15. The Family Tree *****16. A Place To Die *****Disk Three17. J.J.'s Fiancee - Part 1 *****18. J.J.'s Fiancee - Part 2 *****19. Sweet Daddy Williams20. The Investigation21. J.J. In Trouble22. Florida The Woman ****23. The Break-up24. The Rent Party ****
He's wonderfull. Man, I bought this thinking I owe it to Gilad, he used to motivate me years ago on ESPN and now on Fit TV...Man he has not lost a step...he's even better now, go Gilad!
Great Movie for Horse Lovers. I saw this movie originally in the theatre when I when I was in my teens and it was great then and great now. Cheesy, yes, but the story is still interesting and worth it. I recommend it to anyone who loves horses. Espcially those in the pre-teen set
Beautiful suffering. There is something foreign, almost inhuman about this bresson film - the nearly complete lack of emotion exhibited by the characters, their hands and feet moving like autotrons. Bresson's communities are flat, colorless, barren and humorless. Still, the power this film has to generate such raw passion and deep sorrow is a mystery. You realize that you've been changed by the artistry of a master, but are at a loss to explain why or how. This film about the life and death of a donkey named Balthazar resonates deeply, and while it may very well be a Christian allegory it need not be - it does not approach you from the intellect. It may very well be a film about mans cruelty to those helpless creatures that have no free will, but then again it need not be. It is not a film that directly pulls on your heartstrings. "Au Hasard Balthazar" is a film that uses characters as both windows and mirrors. Through them we bear witness to man's cruelty, pride, indulgences - weaknesses. Through them our own emotions are pulled from the depths of our subconscious and then projected back at us with the force of moral clarity. Somehow we are cleansed and by watching this all too familiar human landscape of the lost, we somehow find ourselves. And so when the almost unbearable, yet strangely beautiful final scene plays out and the other worldly notes from a Schubert Sonata rain down upon us, through the suffering of this poor beast Balthazar, we are baptized
great family viewing. Being a horse rider myself I thoroughly enjoyed the movie it just shows that if you have the determination to do something you really love you will suceed. A great movie for all the family horse lovers or not
Completely Awesome!. The Golden Suns are here, finally! This is an amazing set, and better than I remembered it as a kid!  Compelling stories, good animation, great voice acting.  Tons of fun for any age.  Wish they made cartoons today as good as they did back in the "day".  The Temple of the Golden Suns completely got me hooked on Duck Tales as a kid, and got me into reading the Carl Barks/Don Rosa comic books.  I remembered it from, gosh, when I saw it in 87', so it must have made a big impression!  Go get it today - you won't be disappointed!  Because life IS like a hurricane
Poseidon is Still Afloat!. I'm not sure where "Songbird" in his or her 2000 review below is coming from as this is a NEW release, it's in stereo, and has a separate disk with 9 "making of" featurettes.  Nevertheless, his comments about the film itself are true.  This is a great classic film that has aged well.  The outstanding cast is led by ever reliable Gene Hackman as the unofficial leader of this small tribe trying to survive this upsidedown nightmare.  Hackman always excelled at these kinds of roles.  It's the kind of sure-footed overly-confident, and arrogant character that Tommy Lee Jones now plays (Fugitive, Volcano).  The effects are top-notch even by today's standards and John Williams' score is memorable.  The script, although faulty at times, does assist us in caring about these characters.  I recall seeing this upon it's release in single auditorium theater (remember those?) and the film really filled the screen if you know what I mean.  I love disaster films and this was one of the best of its genre
voices from the past. The end of the Civil War in 1865 freed about 4 million slaves in America, a significant number of whom lived into the 1940s. During the Depression, the Federal Writers Project hired people to interview and record first person narratives from these former slaves, the last first-hand resource that could document their experiences. Today the Library of Congress houses 2,000 such interviews, in their original "dialect" and broken English, in the simply-titled Slave Narratives. This film uses original still photographs, contemporary re-enactments, slave music, a running commentary by Whoopi Goldberg, and, most notably and thus the film's title, dramatic readings of those original slave narratives by contemporary African-American actors and actresses like Oprah Winfrey. In just over an hour you learn about the daily horrors of slave life from those who lived to tell of it--relentless work, horrendous housing and diet, the denial of education, sexual violence, and how the "masters" used Christianity to keep their slaves passive. This is a deeply moving film about our nation's very recent past. I recommend watching it in conjunction with the seven-part PBS documentary on the civil rights movement called Eyes on the Prize
Probably the best season. I think this is probably the show's best work.  So many classic episodes.  The actors were definitely comfortable with each other by now, but they were still fresh.  I tend to think people who buy TV series on DVD start at season one and buy each one, so don't stop at three.  If you don't buy in order (which isn't really necessary for Seinfeld because it has no plot), season four might be a good place to start.
Really, really good!. This is a totally cool addition to the Offspring collection. It's got all of their music videos (with the option of turning on commentary) and 11 really, really good live performances. It's also got some other cool special features like what happened to the guy in the Pretty Fly (For a White Guy) music video. I'd say that this DVD is worth every single penny of the $10 you have to spend on it, whether you're an old veteran fan or new to The Offspring. I highly recommend it
Mystery Man. Everybody loves Michael Powell, and I suppose they'd better start with COLONEL BLIMP as a touchstone of his cinema.  For all its virtues however, and even though I generally enjoy propaganda, I just didn't get it all, and some questions remain to haunt me.Is Barbara Wynne, Candy's nurse wife of the post WWI period, supposed to be correct when she wrinkles up her nose while visiting the prisoner of war camp, when she remarks how creepy it is that Germans can murder innocent children and then sit down and listen to Mendelsohn wearing the same satanic uniform?  If so, it doesn't seem as though she would care for Theo, and the screenplay makes sure that the two of them never meet.  I think the fact of their un-meeting, as you might call it, is the central problem of the movie.  What would have happened had they met up, a collision like nuclear fission that would have destroyed the house of cards Clive Candy has carefully constructed.The flashback structure of the film makes perfect sense if you think of it as the spotty recollections of an old colonel (or old nation) looking back at some highlights, mistaking lowlights for same, and generally putting a shine on a bleak present.  Don't you love the Technicolor that makes a jungle of parrots out of Barbara Wynne's country blouse and skirt outfit, she stands out like a macaw on a field of cut lawn.  In his memoirs Powell describes himself as completely besotted with Deborah Kerr and her red hair, well, he gives it a good workout in this film, she looks fantastic in each of her parts, if a bit too stagily hardbitten as the modern, liberated driver Angela "Folks call me Johnny" Cannon
Wiggly Safari dvd. The Wiggly Safari DVD is one of the best that we have seen. It is nice to have a copy with Steve Irwin so that we can always remember him and his love for animals. Steve and the Wiggles do a great job teaching children to love and care for their pets.
Blown Away. Though a die hard Maurice fan, I still had to grab this dvd and see how good it could be without the captain....they still take the house down.  The horns, Sheldon, Ralph, Verdine, and Philip are more than able to keep the high musical integrity of the band.  Listening to sheldon sing September and After The Love Is Gone, was different, but REALLY friggen cool!  This guy has a gem of a voice, so don't be led away from this dvd because Maurice isn't on it.  Listening to Ralph, Philip, and Sheldon share the vocals that Maurice did gives the audience a new way to appreciate the music, and is a purchase I'll never regret
Katie, CT. I love Gwyneth Paltrow in general, but especially when she blows us away with her perfect English accent.  The plot was interesting, with mystery, drama, suspense and of course romance.  I totally recommend this to anyone who enjoys a good love story
Energetic and Entertaining. I laughed a little bit when I first watched this video, but once I got into it, it became really fun!  I even got my boyfriend to imitate the artistic moves that the man in the video was doing.  We both had a lot of fun learning all of these night club dance moves, and we even got to try them out at my sister's wedding.  I think people were surprised at how much we knew!  It's definitely great for dancing at weddings
SAS, meet werewolves-werewolves, meet SAS... This film is frightening in a quiet sort of way...I enjoyed it immensely. It was an especially scary watch, considering I was living an hour away from my military base in the backwoods of the Thetford Forest, in the East of England, in the middle of the night across from a patch of said spooky forest. Delicious. The plot is solid, the special effects adequate to the story, the acting good. I like that it is so quiet, and brings a fairy-tale creature into the modern age so deftly, without the usual American Hollywood theatrics. What would a military unit do if met by a group of supernatural beasts? Hmn... this film offers a good answer. (I do so like werewolves! Check out Ginger Snaps Back -the prequel to the corny Ginger Snaps- it is also quiet. My inner 16-year-old liked it alot, as it is a bit on the young-female-empowerment side. Watch for the scene that shows just how gutsy Ginger is when faced with a jerk of a captain.
Great fun, Bond style. Tomorrow Never Dies, the second James Bond film to feature Pierce Brosnan as the super suave secret agent, is one of the more fun films in the long running series.  In this installment, Bond finds himself at odds with a media tycoon (Jonathan Pryce) who is attempting to jump start a world war all in the name of global domination.  It's a plot that doesn't seem too different from anything else offered in many of the previous Bond films, but the premise works thanks to some slam bang spectacular action scenes and the further development of Brosnan's interpretation of the character.  Also on board is Desperate Housewives' Teri Hatcher as one of Bond's former lovers, and Hong Kong action star Michelle Yeoh as a very letal secret agent who Bond teams up with.  Handled with exceptional flair by director Roger Spottiswoode (The 6th Day), Tomorrow Never Dies may not be the best Bond film, but it's still one of the most enjoyable
Funny funny funny. He is simply the funniest human on the planet at this time.  I have, literally, laughed so hard at times I thought I might have a heart attack.
Four Rooms DVD. This movie is a classic, especially for those who love Tim Roth
educational film. I remember seeing this on tv about 10 years ago. It was well written and Kellie Martin was perfect for the role of the people pleasing young girl.  It was based on a true story of a girl who marries young and winds up being physically and verbally abused by her spouse.  It is a very violent movie. I don't think anyone under 13 should watch it, but it is so realistic.  Abuse can happen to anyone, even a policeman's daughter.  The way to help prevent abuse is to realize that it can happen to anyone and to pay attention to the warning signs.  I think parents should watch this movie with their kids once they start dating. My thanks to Kellie Martin who is so passionate about doing movies that are able to impact lives for the better.  I am glad she is so wise and caring, she really has made a difference in my life.P.S. For Kellie Martin fans...I just found out that Life Goes On will be released on dvd in the summer of 2006!  It's about time!!!!!! I hope they will eventually release all four seasons of LGO, the most wonderful tv show ever.
Three Soviet Classic. It has been great masterwork. Dovzhenko and Pudovkin are creative director of montage, the musician of orchestrated light.
Sweet Little Love Story. A young cast supported by some big name stars (Olivier and Broderick Crawford) make for an entertaining little movie.  The French kid will make you smile all the way through.  The new DVD treatment is a great way to bring this gem of a movie back to light after languishing on VHS for many years.  Treat yourself to this fun little film.And a sidebar to some of these other reviewers:  there ought to be a rule that you have to be able to spell and punctuate if you write reviews on Amazon.com
Loved it!. I completely loved it. It's pretty much a fun dvd collection to watch. BTW, Wal-Mart is selling this for $20
Underrated And Unappreciated. Mel Gibson and Robert Downey Jr. both in vintage form doing what they both do best - combing action and adventure with just the right amount dark humor. If you are a fan of either there is more than enough to keep you busy and it is well worth adding to your collection.
Parlez-vous Francais - The Basics. This is the best language tape I've ever used!  It cuts a language down to the basics and uses an approach much like Sesame Street.  It makes any language fun to learn
One of My Favorite Movies Ever!. I am a Spike Lee fan for life and have enjoyed most of his films but this one is special for me.  It is a satirical work of art that exposes many attitudes in "corporate america".  A must have for any "true" DVD collection!
tha truest fan in tha world. i have not seen the dvd yet but i am gonna get it on pay day.i have supported anything that showed the real pac that fans didnt know and how smart he was.listen to the lyrics not the beat and you will hear how much he loved his people,&amp; friends.buy this dvd and you will see why he was doing what he was doing.support the tupac amaru shakur center for arts.R.I.P.PAC YOUR MEMORY LIVES ON
the last collaboration between Kurosawa and Mifune. This 1965 film is the story of a young doctor under the tutelage a compassionate but strict country doctor.  It was Kurosawa's last black & white film and also, sadly, the last film he did with Toshiro Mifune, who plays the title character, the man who runs a clinic for the poor.  Yasumoto, the arrogant and self-absorbed young doctor, resents being sent to this backward place, but as the action unfolds he learns more about the people wo need help and more about what it means to be a doctor.  Exactly halfway through the film Yatsumo dons the robes of a clinic doctor, having decided that Red Beard is a worthy mentor.  We also learn the stories of several patients in depth, and these are heartbreaking.Mifune is charismatic and subdued (though Kurosawa unleashes him in a fight scene at a brothel, which is a pleasure to behold), playing a quiet man with as much intensity as he plays his usual samurai roles..As expected, the direction and cinematography are beautiful, and your enjoyment of this will be enhanced by Stephen Prince's insightful commentary.  The film's trailer is also included.  Dialogue is Japanese with English subtitles.Highly recommended
SUPREME!!!!!!!!!!!!!. GOD HAS MADE WONDERS!! THIS MOVIE WILL TOUCH YOUR HEART TILL THE VERY END, NO WORDS......
Witty, funny movie gets the "special" treatment. It takes a loan shark leading the way to make Hollywood honest. "Get Shorty" returns in a new 2 disc "Collector's Edition" DVD just in time for the sequel "Too Cool" which will be premiering in theaters in March. Translating Elmore Leonard's novels to the screen can be a tricky business luckily both screenwriter Scott Frank and director Barry Sonnenfeld are both up to the task with an inventive dark comedic film. Chili Palmer (John Travolta) heads west to collect a debt from down-and-out B-movie producer Harry Zimm (Gene Hackman). When Harry can't pay, Chili opts to help him make a movie about, well, Chili Palmer. The catch is that Chili and Harry need a star to make their movie viable. Chili quickly finds that the film business shares a lot in common with the world of organized crime. Chili romances B-Movie queen Karen Flores (Rene Russo) an ex- of Harry's and persuades film star Martin Weir (Danny DeVito) to star in the film but not before running into a Cadillac of very funny mishaps along the way.  Featuring a great performances from Dennis Farina as the clueless Ray `Bones' Barboni, Travolta, Hackman, Russo, DeVito and a pre-Sopranos James Gandolfini, "Get Shorty" positively sparkles with wit and energy.Sporting a new high definition transfer "Get Shorty" looks simply marvelous. With a sharp looking transfer showing a minimum of digital artifacts and no analog flaws, "Get Shorty" deserves the deluxe treatment. The image has amazing depth and an image sharper than Chili's aim. The colors practically leap out from the screen brighter than Harry Zimm's blindingly white teeth from the moment the pink and blue titles pop up on the screen until the moment we hear "cut" at the end. With blacks richer and darker than Chili's stolen coat, MGM has done a superb job of translating this modern classic to DVD. The crystal clear sound comes across with more presence than B-Movie queen Karen Flores' screams.Extras are exceptionally good in this "Special Edition". It's like having seconds of a terrific desert; while no one really needs it, it's great to have just the same. We get a number of notable extras as part of this rich meal. The second disc has three featurettes on different aspects of the film, the deleted "Graveyard Scene", outtakes, the "Get Shorty" party reel, a documentary from Bravo Channel on the making of the movie and a sneak peak at "Be Cool". "Get Shorty: Look at Me" opens the book on how Elmore Leonard came up with the plot for "Get Shorty" and developed the idea. DeVito, Travolta, Hackman, Russo, Sonnenfeld and other key cast and crew participate in this featurette on the production of the film. Full of clips from the movie to illustrate the points made throughout the featurette, it's a great summation of the greatness of this film. It's a 30 minute love fest reminding fans why they love this movie so much. The 20 minute "Get Shorty: Wise Guys and Dolls" focuses on the fun, complex characters of the movie. "The Graveyard Scene" featurette allows Sonnenfeld to comment on the single deleted scene of the movie included the hilarious, well, graveyard scene. Featuring a funny cameo with Ben Stiller, Sonnenfeld clearly regretted cutting the scene but Sonnenfeld couldn't find a place for sequence where it fit. The behind-the-scenes stuff and interviews last longer than the actual scene itself. "Going Again" features footage from outtakes and a discussion from Sonnenfeld about the technique of using long takes, pulling out the best bits and putting it together to make magic. The sneak peak for "Be Cool" promises that the sequel to "Get Shorty" promises to be as funny as the first film. Set in the music business, it may not be more than a promo piece for the film but it gives viewers enough of a taste to rope `em in.Bravo's "Page to Screen" documentary featuring Peter Gallagher features plenty of interviews with critics, other writers and focuses as much on how Elmore Leonard comes up with the material in his books, writes them and, once again, takes us behind-the-scenes of the production of the movie. The real treat is hearing from the real Chili Palmer discussing the "reel" Chili Palmer and Leonard's character. The "Party Reel" mainly consists of bits and piece of cut footage and behind-the-scenes stuff nothing earth shattering or all that funny. In addition to the "Get Shorty" theatrical trailer and we get two promos one for "Fargo" and one for "The Good, The Bad and The Ugly". My only complaint is the MGM "promo" opener that they put on ALL of their DVDs. It's annoying and, unfortunately, there's no way to pass it by. It's a pretty minor issue but the fact that it's on all of their DVDs makes it a real pain.A dry, witty commentary by Barry Sonnenfeld highlights this disc. The only drawback is the lack of participation of Travolta, Hackman, Russo and DeVito. I realize they have busy schedules but it would have been a real highlight and perfect addition to this DVD.A hip, funny comedy that continues to deliver in spades, "Get Shorty" looks terrific, sounds great and has some terrific special features. This is an example of a re-release that's worth upgrading. Definitely worth owing on DVD and purchasing a second time if you love the movie. This IS the version to own.
Finally, a DVD version!. I am so glad that someone finally has put Julius Caesar on a DVD.  I am an English teacher and in the spring I teach Julius Caesar at least four or five times a day, and have done so for the past eleven years.  I've had two or three copies of the movie because the video wore out with all the rewinding, etc... from when we watched the scenes after reading them.  Now with a DVD I don't have to worry about the tape wearing out, and I can enjoy the movie for years to come!  Thank you
Neo Vampires. Okay so the other reviews here have rehased the whole of the events of this mini series, so I won't do that. But I will say if you are a vampire or sci fi fan this is well worth checking out. This is not just a vampire bites beautiful woman then he gets killed by girls lover. No this is really quite a fresh take on the whole genre. IT kinda makes you think that the writers had HIV in mind when they were writing. That kind of struggle through it all even though we know we won't be alive to see the victory ordeal. The end kind of leaves you wanting more, but as the director said he didn't want to drag the series beyond it's time
Amazing!. This movie is about the amazing life of penguins in the Antartic. It portrays the faithful, determined male penguins who march 70 long, rugged miles every year back to their homeland to breed. When each  finds their partner and has their "honeymoon" the female entrusts her egg to the male to keep it warm and alive for 4 long months.Every second is precious- if they are not quick enough in trading off the egg from the female to the male, the egg could freeze in just a moment!Then the female returns to the sea to stock up on food to bring back to her baby-if it survives.The father is very cautious and considerate to balance it on it's toes like the mother did, and keep it warm from the blowing harsh weather of -80! It is so amazing the patience and determination they both have to keep their egg alive.As the harsh,unbearable weather drags on the males flock together to keep warm anxiously awaiting their partners return-if they do return. There is always the possibility that she could not make the journey, or was another creatures meal. Then the male would have no choice if she did not return, but to leave the baby and go to the sea to feed...But their is more, I won't ruin it for you!This is a must see. This is about the best documentary movie I have ever seen. It is informative, makes you cry and laugh,and the filming was excellent
The Ultimate Gulity Pleasure. I found this little gem while searching on HBO at 3 in the morning. It was between SNL:The best of Jon Lovits or this. I chose the latter. And boy did I chose right. I surprised myself and was in the plot in about 5 seconds. Everything is superb and genuious about this movie. Not one second went by when I regretted not watching the "that's the ticket" guy. I mean the first scene is so nerve racking when that guy with the sandwitch baggie strangles that other guy with it. Then I just jumped in with a plot with contains: taxi drivers, water that makes you thirsty, and jennifer love hewitt playing some girl who likes old guys and is named mel of smell of something. Believe me there was some parts where I was afraid to watch andI applaud anyone who can watch the whole thing in one sitting. And by the way the chan man has never been so irrestistible! I like when he says "sounds like fun" and jumps on cars and wrestles with bears. Plus you got some outstanding makeup effects, like how they make the chan man look like an asian man but in real life he's just an old, wrinkly guy. Wow i can't go on. RENT IT BUY IT LOVE IT!!! This is one that really got robbed at the emmys
A good Idea how Heaven  looks Like !. But i don't beleave in re-encarnation..
A Disney 'Almost' Classic. When a cuddly baby raccoon snuggles his way into the life of a lonely boy named Sterling North (Billy Mumy), things go riotously awry as the ringtail's mischievous nature gets more and more out of control. Everyone in the small town gets to know Rascal, whether they want to or not - the bandit-masked mammal is especially fond of the eggs in the neighbor's chicken coops. Eventually, it's decided that Rascal will have to be returned to the wild. But Rascal doesn't want to go!Based upon the memoir by Sterling North, the movie suffers from sluggish editing... but that little raccoon is just too cute!Staci Layne WilsonAuthor of Staci's Guide to Animal Movies
Leslie Sansone Workouts. This is the best workout I have ever tried.  The instructions were very easy to follow and Leslie makes the exercise fun with her humor.
homicide profiling by psychologist. An excellent series if a little gruesome in the crime pictures. After that, it is an interesting interplay between the regular British police and the 'absent minded professor' type role of the psychologist. Well acted and excellent scenery set mostly in the North of England
wonderful series. I love Stargate and the spin off Atlantis-they were both fun and new.  This series was especially good, with great characters (I love Rodney) and good scripts.  The dvd set has all the episodes and the pilot so you don't need to buy that one seperately.  The transfer is really good, too, clear and sharp.
GOOD !! Meg and Matt a prefect match !. Surprise me that they look like a pretty pair.LOL
Yuen Biao Is Incredible!. Another Sammo Hung, Yuen Biao gem.  This one has it all: good story, good comedy(maybe too much, but still good), and some of the most ridiculously awesome fight and training scenes I've ever seen.  Yuen Biao gets the leading role and performs amazingly.  A brief paraphrase of the story is two brothers, Little John(Yuen Biao) and Big John(Leung Kar Yan), are con men.  They run across a man who they try to set up and it backfires on them.  Eventually, this man becomes their master and trains them.  Then comes the twist in the polt(I won't say what it is).  Yuen Biao ends up teaming up with Sammo to take on his master, and what a fight it is.  It is probably 10 minutes long and could be the best two on one fight I've ever seen.  Just to give you a piece, part of the fight Sammo and Yuen both perform monkey style against the master who does a type of snake style with a pipe.  I was in awe.That is just the cherry on top.  Once you get through the first half hour, which is relatively slow(it does have some fighting), the movie is non stop action that just gets better and better as it builds to the final confrontation.  There is a lot of comedy in the first half of the film and it is very exaggerated.  Some of it is really funny though.  For those of you who don't care for the humor, don't worry, it soon goes away and the whoopin's begin and they never stop.  Also, there are as many or even more acrobatic moves and manuevers done by Yuen Biao than in any Jackie Chan film.  Not stunts so much, more flips and flying around while fighting.  It's great.As for the DVD itself, it has dolby 5.1 sound and the picture is a great restoration and transfer in an anamorphic widescreen format.  You can choose subtitles or english dubbed audio.  The voice of Yuen Biao is really a good one.  There are also four trailers for other movies and two trailers for this one in the special features.I was so impressed with this movie, aside from some over the top comedy, that it instantly has become one of my favorite kung fu flicks of the era.  Another great film that is right there with this one, even a little higher, is Magnificent Butcher starring Sammo Hung.  I highly reccommend both of these movies to any kung fu collection.  You won't be disappointed.
Disturbing and very much original. Session 9 is a contemporary tale of terror set in an abandoned insane asylum. The residents on Danvers, Massachusetts steer well clear of the place. But Danvers State Mental Hospital, closed down for 15 years, is about to receive five new visitors. This is a brilliant example of horror filmaking on a shoe string budget.The basic storyline involves a hazardous waste disposal crew cleaning up a mental hospital which has been closed for 15 years.There are rumors of patient abuse. One of the crew members discovers a series of haunting session recordings that draws him (as well as the viewer) into the depths of a young girl's torment. The acting is good,especially David Caruso's performance, understated, multi dimensioned and believable. The interior shots, where most of the movie takes place is shot in gritty gray/green tones the color of every old hospital, or institution.The corridors are long and claustraphobic. The strands of each characters life begin to clash and emesh, moving at times in a slow moody crawal till at the end of the movie revelations flash by at breakneck speed. I found myself holding my breath as the tension grew to an almost unbearable level. The conclusion was a complete suprise to me. I highly recommend this film for the horror fan who appreciates the gradually growing dread of the works of Alfred Hitchcock and H. P. Lovecraft. This is my third viewing and it gets better each time I watch it.
Magnificent Soap Opera. I love this film.  Gregory Peck is marvelous in his "everyman" role, and is well supported by the rest of the fine cast.  Very good script, photography, and an atypically subdued score from Bernard Herrmann.  This picture makes a fine companion to the earlier THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES.  Whereas that picture dealt with servicemen returning home immediately after WWII and their problems adjusting to peacetime, THE MAN IN THE GRAY FLANNEL SUIT deals with one such individual a decade later.A very good 2.35:1 anamorphic transfer and excellent sound.  If you like your soaps with a beginning, a middle, and an end, get this
Wonderful--You'll watch it over and over. This is a great story, entertaining, fun, with laughter and pathos mixed in, much like life itself. You'll find yourself watching it over and over again; it is a "feel-good" movie that will leave you smiling. Kline and Weaver give outstanding performances
FUN FOR THE WHOLE FAMILY... You can't get much more wholesome than this. This film definitely has the Disney stamp all over it. The Swiss Family Robinson are on their way to New Guinea. Chased by pirates on the high seas, their ship runs up against a reef, and they find themselves shipwrecked by a deserted tropical island. They manage to get themselves and all their belongings and animals ashore, intact and none the worse for wear.The mother, played by the lovely Dorothy McGuire, is always clean, perfectly groomed and coiffed. The father, played by the wonderful English actor, John Mills, is positively cheerful the entire film. Talk about optimism. His three sons, played by the hunky James MacArthur, the adorable Tommy Kirk, and the cute-as-a-button Kevin Corcoran, work tirelessly to make their new home into an island paradise.In record time, they build a multi-level house to die for, high up in the trees. Somehow, they manage to get a pipe organ off the wrecked ship, ashore, and up into their multi-level tree house, so that they can sing Christmas Carols at the appropriate time. Kevin Corcoran even has a baby elephant for a pet, and they parade around their sculpted lawn which is surrounded by what appears to be a manicured, English country garden.After a while, two of the boys set out on a home made sail boat to check the terrain around the island. They discover yet another casualty of the pirates' onslaught, delightfully played by Janet Munro. The two older boys are sweet on her, which causes a little fun loving tension. All is well, until the pirates come a-calling on the island, and all you know what breaks loose. Never fear. Rescue is on the way.Who in their right mind, however, would ever want to be rescued from this magical island, where nothing can possibly go wrong, and everyone loves each other? Pure Disney fantasy, this film is a lot of fun to watch and, better yet, can be enjoyed by the whole family
A simple plot with some great slapstick action and pure comedy. I first saw Help! when I was in middle school, rifling through my parents' VHS collection.  My friends and I were won over by this silly comedy and the Fab Four, and I have treasured the movie ever since.  It is unfortunate that the US DVD release is out of print (I had to buy an imported version), and I hope they bring it back soon, so more people can share in the pure joy of this brilliant comedy.The plot is pure genius in its simplicity:  a gaudy red ring gets stuck on Ringo's finger.  A sacrificial cult chases him around the world, trying to paint him red in preparation for his sacrifice.  A mad scientist is determined that he could--dare I say it?--rule the world, if he could only get the ring off Ringo's finger.  The Beatles are absolutely clueless.  So they run around the world, dodging crazy people at every turn, singing songs, and generally being hilarious.The DVD I bought had options to watch the movie dubbed in French.  So once you've seen Help! enough times to know every line by heart, try it out in a foreign language, and laugh even harder at The Beatles speaking in French.Go... to... THE WINDOW... GO... TO... the window..
What more can I say... It is the ultima of CGI video game movies. I must buy for Final Fantasy addicts.
Can't tell you how many times I've seen these episodes... I know I'm a nerd.  But what can I say...this show is Sex in the City Fast forward 20 years and set in Miami instead of NYC.  It was way ahead of its time
As blue as the sky. If you like "blue" comedy then this one is for you.  You'll laugh like you've never laughed before
Compares Favorably with "Blade Runner". There are two essential film views of the future: life is 'good' and life is ugly. It is the extraordinary SF (Earth based) film that can handle the extremes of a future period and yet stay synched with human reality.This film is a masterpiece because it connects with so many of the hopes and fears related to the future of society. It would be interesting to find out what films the 'one star' critics find worth watching.The use of the "squid" technology to save and transfer experiences from one human to others is a tremendous 'invention' within the context of an SF film, but it is the way that Cameron and company used it to amplify the razor's edge of technological innovation vis a vis human society (and individuals.)In 1968 I read "The Yngling" by John Dalmas which also had a device which could empathically broadcast experiences from one human to others, and Dalmas used this brilliantly within his novel. What Dalmas did in 1968 is what "Strange Days" did in the film medium. Could not have been a more robust exploration of one specific piece of new technology within a future society.A standing ovation for all involved in the production of "Strange Days.
Hayworth seems a bit too "grand" for Astaire's self-effacing style... Released shortly before America's entry into the war, Columbia's "You'll Never Get Rich" is one of Fred Astaire's better films during the relatively dry period that extended from his last RKO film with Ginger Rogers to his first films at MGM...Since leaving RKO and Ginger Rogers, Astaire had danced with Eleanor Powell in "Broadway Melody of 1940" and with Paulette Goddard in "Second Chorus."In "You'll Never Get Rich," he had a new partner in Rita Hayworth: a lushly beautiful redheaded actress who was being prepared for stardom in mostly low-budget films... She was a talented dancer who had worked with her family for many years in a vaudeville act called the Dancing Casinos..."You'll Never Get Rich" cast Astaire as Robert Curtis, a Broadway dance director who is drafted into the army... He becomes involved in an on-again, off-again romance with Sheila Winthrop (Hayworth), a beautiful chorus girl whose fianc is a captain in the army... The not-very-interesting plot is often interrupted for musical interludes... Astaire and Hayworth dance together twice--to the sensuous Latin beat of "So Near and Yet So Far," and in "The Wedding Cake Walk," a military finale which has a chorus of war brides and soldiers, plus the two stars, dancing atop a huge tank...Astaire and Hayworth make an attractive dance team, although Hayworth seems a bit too formidable, too "grand" for Astaire's self-effacing style.... Astaire also has several numbers without Hayworth: most notably, a dance in a guardhouse to the song "Since I Kissed My Baby Goodbye," in which he combines several kinds of dazzling footwork..."You'll Never Get Rich" is lightweight but amiable entertainment, and it kept Astaire dancing...
an excellent movie. Very entertaining movie. The characters are all great, the plot and the suspense are terrific
Get the Trilogy Set Instead. I enjoy all three of the the Jurassic Park movies, though I think &quot;The Lost World&quot; is a bit weak.  While I think that anyone who enjoys action movies, monster movies, or horror movies should own all three, I find it difficult to recommend this set because there is a set that contains not only the three movies, but a fourth DVD containing substantial background information on the making of the movies.  I give this collection four stars only because the larger, more comprehensive collection is available and if you liked the first two, you will definitely like the third movie
Family Movie. Don't you love Family Movie night? These kind of movies make it even better
Waiting For God. A funny show with lots of insights into elderly care and issues
im sure this is it. my sisters and i have watched these kinds of movies ever since we were very little from one of those 99* cent stores and we remember the doll house but wasnt sure about the name --all *I* can remember is at the end i guess maybe a doll looking out a dirty window as people run away?? if anyone can clear this up for me that would be great!!! im trying to find all the old movies i used to rent all the time:D my e-mail is: kat_amira@yahoo.com thanks bunches!
spring gardening is most excellent. this dvd had everything i had hoped, can't wait to get mor
Incredible. Wow.What a series.It tackles all types of uncannily real situations and people.This is a real human show and left me feeling the entire gamma of feelings:crying,laughing,anger,etc.I love the family represented in six feet under and find myself talking about them and their situations with my girlfriend as if they were real people.This show reflects life so well.If you haven't watched this yet you are in for a treat.I'm saving up for the complete series.I found that we had to ration ourselves to 2 episodes a night so it would last.I love the Fishers and Keith...and Brenda...6fu is the best series of them all and I'm an owner and big fan of Deadwood,24,The Sopranos,Curb your Enthusiasm
I could watch this over and over again!. Whether you're Greek - or whatever - just about anyone can relate to Toula's life. After having deemed herself hopeless for thirty-odd years, then finally meeting the man of her dreams, Toula's real obstacle is surving her family! While his parents are quiet and typical Americans, Toula's clan embraces their roots -- telling strangers the intimate details of their medical histories, roasting a lamb in the front yard, Gramma in the old-country babushka. You'll laugh til you cry, 'cause chances are, you know someone exactly like each of Toula's relatives..
solid movie. all  i can say is this is probably 1 of the best Asian Extreme movies from Tartan...this movie was really good, and kept my attentio
A generational classic. I didn't want to start my review this way but, once in a while there comes along a movie of extraordinary vision and independence that it must be set apart from others as a paradigm to follow. Pan's Labyrinth is just such a movie. By far the best work in the fantasy genre to come out I'd say since Legend. This movie is not a copy and paste version of a novel about little men, nor is it a poorly adapted screenplay of a novel written by a 15 year old. This movie delves deep into the nature of fantasy itself. What is more fantastic than what is within the human mind? The possibilities, both wonderful and horrific, are endless. Poor little Ofelia is our guide through the human psyche as we revel in her wonderful fantasies and are revolted by the viscious clarity of her reality. Elements of all the classic fairytales are interspersed within, carefully woven together to form a new unique tale. Some will say that this is a movie about the brutality of war, and a child's imagination as escapist fancy. I disagree. Though the movie is set in a time of revolution and there are a few, stress that few, graphically violent scenes, the movie does this as sharp contrasts to the hazy, beautiful fantasy scenes. The focus is more on emotion and the unimaginative reality of life. Ofelia encounters many monsters, both real and mythical, the worst being the captain, her stepfather. This serves to strengthen the fact that some people's lives can be worse than anything we imagine. As far as cinematography goes, the movie was shot perfectly. Reality is dark and gritty, dirty yet vividly clear. Ofelia's fantasy world has moments of clarity, but overall is hazy, like a memory of a sunny summer day long, long ago. The mood is captured perfectly and really brings the viewer into the picture. The soundtrack is subtle, enabling the viewer to be visually astounded, yet powerful enough that it will startle you out of your dream when you least expect it. One of my favorite things about the movie was the narration. The narrator's voice is melodic and deep. When the narration starts, it just fits so perfectly that you couldn't imagine the movie without it. Watching this movie in Spanish is a real treat, even if you don't speak the language. So much feeling and context can be gained by watching it in the natural language that it completely negates any bad things about subtitles. Overall, a huge recommendation to anyone who is tired of the boring, unimaginative and complacent productions of Hollywood. This will stimulate the mind and leave you sad but at the same time happy
Great Adventure!. I absolutely loved this movie. It's fast paced, funny, exciting, and really revived my interest in history. Parents should definitely watch this with their kids and move forward with any interest in history that their children show afterwards. They should come up with something like this for math and science as well.
Overlooked funny scenes. Much is written in reviewing this movie of Goldie Hawn and Chevy Chase and their chemistry that does so much to make the movie come alive.However there are three additional characters who's parts I feel are overlooked.The first is Billy Barty as the biblesalesman.  I don't know how to best describe Mr. Barty in this era of political correctness, but he is a dwarf who over a long, long career injected many different types of emotion into the different scenes he played in so many movies.  In Foul Play with the set up developed before he's ever seen on screen, his arrival is positively brilliant and his out of the window down the hills of San Francisco in a rubbish barrel are some of the funniest moments on screen.  Some will say the role he plays can be viewed as insulting to those suffering from dwarfism, however I'm sure Mr. Barty would not have taken the role were he not able to wring out of control laughter from several different scenes.  He passed away in 2000, sadly, but in this movie his role was very large in size.  I'm sure he was proud of his work, as well he should have been.The second character of note is the "cowboy" who's clearly just arrived in the big city and can be viewed as a bit of a hayseed.  When Chevy Chase's character commandeers the cowboy's camper/truck, the wide-eyed "oh-my-gosh-they-don't-do-this-sort-of-stuff-where-I-come-from" characterization lets us see what city life can drive us to.....And finally, in what I consider one of the funniest scenes ever shot in any movie, are the elderly Chinese tourist couple, who have just arrived in San Francisco, armed with their suitcases and two small American flags.  Again as Chevy Chase's character seized the limo they are in and charges through San Francisco to get to the Opera House to prevent "the Hit" this couple lets us sit back in uncontrolled hysterical laughter as you can only imagine what the two visitors must be thinking.Some may recall that in the ultimate of ironies, Foul Play was scheduled to air on TV the very night of the assassination attempt on the late Pope John Paul II.  Mercifully it was pulled before air time, yet whatever did in fact play out in "reality", and as terrible as the attempt on the Pope's life was, this movie has to go down as one of the best light comedy/thrillers in recent memory.  It is successful in the end as it manages to poke fun fairly harmlessly, I believe, at some of the institutions we hold so dear
Like watching a Car Crash!. The camera work, the direction, the casting, the acting...everything.  Utterly fantastic.Very dark humour, extreme, touching.  Breathtaking.  This is cinema at its best.Bravo
The best love story of 2006!!!. I'm not going into the plot of The Lake House.  Other reviewers have already done a much better job on that than I can.  What I will say is that I've watched this movie on DVD at least eight times since I bought it, and the story line and acting still hold up magnificently for me.  What shifts this film from being a good love story to a great love story is the ending.  I didn't see it coming, though friends of mine said that they did.  The first time that I saw the ending, it hit me with a powerful emotional punch that left me breathless and my eyes full of tears.  That made this movie a winner in my opinion.  Like many of the other reviewers, I feel that Keanu Reeves and Sandra Bullock have the right chemistry with each other, and it was wonderful seeing them together again.  I would highly recommned this film to any individual who enjoyed The Notebook, Message In a Bottle, The Horse Whisperer, and The Bridges of Madison County.  Though the writers of the film used a two-year span of time between the main characters and their relationship with each other, it's still a movie about finding that one person you can love with all of your heart.  Good stuff!!!
empathy for the enemy. What war is really like from the perspective of young German soldiers on a German submarine in World War II
Smarmy Believability. Campbell Scott, the true Cary Grant of the Indy Film, has out done himself as the glib, womanizing Manhattan lounge lizard.  A film smoothie is always interesting for the viewing sexes because he portrays our fantasy, our comedy of manners, to a satisfying or mythological conclusion -- mutually satisfying urban hookup.  Having offered the lady a drink, he amuses her with entertaining banter with ever increasing innuendo.  Body language of the female kind primps above and below the restaurant table.  If all the stylish buttons are pushed - success, and it's off to those prestigious Manhattan jobs in the morning. "And so the cycle of life begins anew," says Marlin Perkins.Campbell's sixteen-year old, screen nephew from Ohio shows up to learn about women from the legend.  Uncle obliges, but his one significant other, Isabella Rossellini, his penthouse-advertising boss, has just dumped the disbelieving charmer.  His bitterness is taken out on the worshiping nephew in a series of women chasing vignettes.  Bad uncle takes the boy to a bordello and it all goes very wrong.The script is a work of art and Campbell delivers his lines with smarmy believability.  This one is a must for couples.
Great Little Film. This is a great little documentary about an important part of WW II, the Italian campaign, that is too often over looked. Some of the footage is a bit out of focus but other sections have some great footage. The 57 FS "The First in the Blue" documented in the film was the first US air group engaged in the war fighting all the way from Palestine and across North Africa. I can't imagine there are many better $5 deals out there
Rarities Provides a Mixed Bag. While Disney is famous for his animated movies and series starring such staples as Mickey Mouse or Donald Duck, he also produced a lot of one-time cartoons over the years.  This set in the Disney Treasures series collects many of them.Disc one actually opens with the shorts I most wanted to see from the set, the Alice shorts.  These were Disney's first series of cartoons, produced in the twenties.  They starred a real life girl who had all kinds of adventures in a cartoon world.  While he did this more famously in Mary Poppins, these first attempts at the mixing live action and animation are quite fun and Disney fans will love getting to see them for the historical value.  The effects are decent for the time, but obviously laughable by today's standards.  We only get seven of the Alice shorts here, but they are enough to give us a feel for the series.  The early ones feature Alice in the real world and Cartoonland, while the later ones begin to focus more and more on the cartoons, leaving the real world (and at times Alice) out of the picture.Disc one then proceeds to give us eleven more shorts, taking us to 1953.  Highlights include Oscar winner "Ferdinand the Bull" about the bull who doesn't want to fight in the arena, "Chicken Little," a World War II retelling of the fable that starts off funny but ends with a serious lesson about listening to gossip, we watch "The Brave Engineer" do everything he can to keep his train on schedule, and football practices of years gone by are compared to contemporary strategies in "Football Now and Then." Closing out this disc is "Ben and Me," Disney's retelling of Robert Lawson's fun tale on the real wisdom behind Benjamin Franklin's success, his mouse Amos.Disc two picks up in 1954 and contains thirteen shorts that take us all the way to 1962.  It opens with the hilarious "Pigs is Pigs" that shows what can happen when bureaucracy gets out of hand.   Ranger J. Audubon Woodlore and Humphrey the Bear are featured in "Hooked Bear" and "In the Bag," a couple shorts about life in a national park that remind me of Yogi Bear (one of his creators worked on these characters). Cars are put on trial for lousy driving in "The Story of Anyburg, USA."  And some of these shorts begin to get experimental.  "Noah's Ark" features stop motion animation and animals made out of everyday objects to retell the Bible story.  "A Symposium on Popular Songs" features stop motion animation of various styles to accompany the collection of song styles from the century.And fans of children's picture book author Bill Peet - take note.  During his years working for Disney, Mr. Peet often turned his story ideas into shorts.  Three of them are collected here, "Morris, the Midget Moose" tells the story of Morris as he tries to overcome his ant size to fit in with the heard.  "Lambert the Sheepish Lion" is about a lion that is accidentally left with a bunch of sheep by the stork.  Finally, "Goliath II" is about a 5-inch tall elephant trying to live up to his father's expectations.  Any fan of Bill Peet's books will recognize the themes used for these shorts.  They are entertaining for all, but especially for those familiar with his books.The problem with the set comes with some of the more musical shorts.  To be brief, they aren't entertaining.  Disc one includes two Adventures in Music.  "Melody" and "Toot, Whisle, Plunk and Boom" are ok, but certainly not worth watching more then once.  Even "The Truth About Mother Goose," which explains the stories behind such nursery rhymes as "Little Jack Horner" and "London Bridge is Falling Down" isn't especially entertaining.  They are more teaching then entertainment, and come across as such.  My other complaint is milder.  The shorts range from seven or either minutes to over twenty minutes each.  With that wide a range, it's hard to plan how many you can watch if you just want to sit down for a few minutes.The bonus features are interesting as always.  Leonard Maltin gets the fun job of introducing each disc.  Unlike other collections, he doesn't pop up to give the PC spin on any of the shorts here.  He does get to interview Virginia Davis, however.  It was fascinating hearing the original Alice talk about her time working for Disney and how she almost got the job of Snow White.  Disc two features art galleries and an audio commentary on "Symposium of Popular Songs" by Richard Sherman, one of the composers.  The commentary really helped put the short in context and helped me appreciate it more.While all the shorts don't live up to their potential, there are still plenty of entertaining shorts here to make it a worthwhile purchase for Disney fans
My family & I LOVE this movie!!!. I read over some of the other people's opinions regarding this movie and cannot agree with them about it.  My kids ages 6 & 2 loved this movie from start to finish.  The music, the characters, and the story were great for the entire family.  I definitely recommend this movie for your family's movie collection
Looney Tunes Golden Collection Volume Four. Well first off, I bought mine yesterday at Best Buy and when I got it home and opened it, I got upset that they packaged only THREE DVD's instead of FOUR.  So knowing that the Best Buy in my area closes at 10p.m CST, I only had 30 minutes to correct my purchase of this awesome classic that I bought.  So I ran back up there and got it exchanged.  I do want to say that if any of you had this happen to you, you want to make sure you got FOUR DVD's and NOT three.  The Looney Tune cartoons have always been my favorite since I was a kid and I have all four sets.  Seeing Bugs, Daffy, Sylvester, Foghorn Leghorn, Yosemite Sam, Elmer Fudd, Speedy Gonzales, Tweety, Granny, the Chicken Hawk, the dog, and the Martian on the collection on DVD is absolutely priceless.  But, you may never see anything like this again.  Watching these cartoons on television, you never would've thought that they would ever produce them to DVD and be able to own them.  I remember a long time ago in a department store, they had one of those old cartoon machines that you had to put .50 in to watch a cartoon and it would randomly pick from it's stored menu a cartoon and you'd watch it.  The machine would be on a monthly basis emptied and the films would be changed out and you could watch a new cartoon.  The one I saw was a Woody Woodpecker machine.  And at one time I think Warner Bros. made one for Bugs Bunny.  But anyway, that was the only way you could pay to watch an animated cartoon.  Now the franchise of DVD's come around, and you can now buy them and play them in your home.  I am glad that Warner Bros. have outdid themselves in bringing this to DVD for the fourth time and hopefully there'll be more!!! Where it stops, nobody knows.  I use to keep track of all the Looney Tunes cartoons and their episodes but there are so many, I lost track.  Bugs Bunny and Daffy are my most favorite characters with their "Duck season, wabbit season" routine with Elmer Fudd.  And the "Shoot him now or wait till you get home"  Well hope everyone enjoys this great collection! On a personal note: I am glad that Warner Bros. came out with these collections cause it seems that it will be the only way to watch them again and again.  The IDIOTS at Cartoon Network are such buttheads cause they refuse to show any Looney Tunes cartoons and Tom & Jerry as well and Boomerang (Cartoon Networks brother station) is getting to be that way too.  Long live Bugs Bunny.....the hell with Ed, Edd, and Eddy, Spongebob, Two Stupid Dogs and Pokemon.
A movie that shows us there is hope for humanity. We are not perfect, but if we decide to do better than what has been the norm for humanity, we can. Gandhi chose to be a better man than he was and through his will power, guided but not blinded by his convictions, he embarked on a life that led him to challenge accepted notions on many aspects of our lives. He was creative, asking questions others did not ask and inventing answers others did not offer, with respect to problems we still face. And then he lived by what he discovered. He did not let his fears control him, but rather experimented with his own life to try out those answers. He sought the "truth" and tried to live by it. Above all, he tried to be honest with himself and with others. He tried not to inflict suffering, while also not allowing it to be accepted.He was not a supreme, magical being. He was not a saint. He was one more human being. He just slowly, sequentially, and then decidedly chose to find and follow whatever the truth may be, within a path of love and acceptance for fellow human beings.Most of us focus on the negative side of human nature. Most have no real faith in humanity. Here, though, is proof that we can do better.There is hope for us. But hope exists only if there is willingness to steadfastly, stubbornly, but DEFINITELY NOT CLOSED-MINDEDLY work for it.I recommend this movie for teenagers and young adults, after an introduction to the history that led to the conditions in Ganghi's India, and the ideas permeating Western politics and ethics in that era.To anyone wishing to understand his psyche more fully, I'd recommend his autobiography:THE STORY OF MY EXPERIMENTS WITH TRUT
Could very well be Brad Pitts Best work!!!!. As much As I would love to give Brad Pitt all the credit for his outstanding performance in this movie, I just can't. He was Perfect, He can almost make a horrible storyline seem interesting with his skill. But you see this story.... This Story + Brad Pitt made one incredible movie. Well done....... Good enough to make a grown man cry. It needs to be watched
Still Scary. This series was the best of its kind. Shown in original black and white, the stories were great morality tales of the times, as many of the stories dealt with Cold War fears. The music is still as creepy and scary as ever. A major motion picture should have been made of this series, as was done with The Twilight Zone
Time flies when you're having fun. I find this video to be fun, moving at a nice pace, and I like that the instructions include ways to focus on my inner qualities as well as outer beauty. I like that the voiceover tells us the benefits of each exercise, it helps motivate me. My personal yoga teacher doesn't recommend Breath of Fire for me, so I don't use that technique, so my experience feels a little incongruent with the tape at times, which is why I gave it 4 stars instead of 5
One of Mickery Rouke's best performances!. This movie is profound in it's ability to show how background and circumstances can come back to haunt someone and how difficult it is to change even when given all the best options in the world.  Every actor in the movie is good and Rourke is exceptional
Gerard Butler Rocks. I am not ordinarily a big fan of Wes Craven, but his casting of Gerard Butler as Dracula was pure genius.  Gerry was in turns sexy, charming, terrifing, seductive, and was always pure alpha male!  (Face it, the guy could sell cat food and I'd buy it!)  The story is a new twist to an old tale which I felt was believable and well written.  It was also lovely to see the New Orleans that was, and will hopefully be again.  I felt that the early scenes were very slow, but once the film got going I loved it.  It's time the old Dracula story got a fresh update and this was very well done indeed
Fun Disney Movie. Its a good one to add to the DVD collection.  Full of fun and magic for the whole family
Fish, Weather, Wild Animals, and ELMO!!. This is another in the series of three short vignettes, and they are wonderful tools to teach the young ones about various topics.  Like all the others, it is very consistent, and Elmo is consistent in his approach to learning.  The Wild Animals were a little "in your face" in the beginning, and the really young ones might be taken back, as well as "The Weather" portion where the Wind comes into Elmo's house and almost blows him away, but it's a generally cute video for those Elmo-tykes like my twin daughters, and...Elmo still makes me laugh!!!Highly recommended!!
One Of My Favorite Films, And I don't Even Like Westerns. I have never been a huge fan of westerns. Occasionally, a film like "Unforgiven", for example, will earn a lot of respect and critical praise, prompting me to watch. But these rare occasions are also tempered by terrible wastes of time like "Wyatt Earp". Because I am a huge fan of Burt Lancaster's, I watched "The Professionals", the 1966 film by director Richard Brooks, many years ago and the impression has been indelible. Easily one of my favorite films, I think I enjoy it so much because it transcends the genre.Recently, Ebert and Roeper did a piece on their show about a number of Lee Marvin films making their debut on DVD. Not a huge fan of Lee Marvin either, but I watched a few of these films and was struck by how good they were. Reviews will be forthcoming.Both of these factors contributed to my recent revisit of "The Professionals". A local theater which frequently runs repertory films on Saturday and Sunday morning ran a series of Westerns including "The Professionals". I happily paid $10 to watch a bad print of the film at 11 am on a Sunday. And boy, it was fun. The audience was really into it as well, enjoying the great screenplay by Richard Brooks.A new DVD transfer has been recently released and the print is simply beautiful.Oil tycoon Joe Grant (Ralph Bellamy) hires a rag tag group of mercenaries to rescue his kidnapped wife, Maria (Claudia Cardinale), from the hands of Raza (Jack Palance), a Mexican mercenary. Grant asks Henry `Rico' Fardan (Lee Marvin) to lead the crusade. Fardan used to be a mercenary working with Raza, but now demonstrates munitions for potential buyers. Grant has also assembled Ehrengard (Robert Ryan, "Odds Against Tomorrow"), a horse expert and Jake Sharp (Woody Strode), a bounty hunter who is also an expert tracker. Fardan is reluctant to lead the group into the desert, after a man he knows and who is adept at living in the harsh environment. Grant offers them each $10,000 to rescue his wife, instead of paying Raza the $100,000 ransom. Fardan reluctantly accepts on the condition that they include Dolworth (Burt Lancaster), his former co-hort and an explosives expert, currently in prison. After Grant pays his bail, they head off.From the opening credits, in which each character is introduced doing what they do best, you know you are in for a slightly different take on the traditional Western. Marvin, Ryan and Strode are all introduced first, demonstrating their skills in their current work environment. Then Lancaster is introduced doing what Dolworth does best, romancing women. A man bursts into the room of Dolworth's latest "romance" and he rushes out wearing only his long johns. Even though there is a serious tone throughout the film, occasional bursts of humor help to lighten the mood and make it all the more enjoyable.One of the major reasons the film transcends the genre is the screenplay. Brooks has crafted the story with care and given each character some of the best dialogue ever. At one point, Dolworth (Lancaster) says to Fardan (Marvin): My word to Grant isn't worth a thing. Fardan responds: Yes, but you didn't give your word to him, you gave it to me. At which point, Dolworth considers this, shrugs and gets back to the task at hand. This line of dialogue is well-written but it also helps to establish the relationship between the two characters. Another great line, which could serve as a bit of foreshadowing; "In this desert, nothing's harmless unless it's dead." At the end of the film, Grant calls Fardan a bastard. Fardan responds: "In my case, an accident of birth. In your case, you've worked at it."In addition to the great dialogue, Brooks takes great pain to build the characters and their relationships. Ehrengard, the horse handler, is introduced beating up a wrangler who savagely tries to break a horse. During their ride into the desert, the hired mercenaries come across horses which may have been with Raza at one point. Dolworth insists that they should be put down or they will return to Raza and alert him of their whereabouts. Ehrengard makes the case that they will search for the nearest water. Fardan agrees to release them. Later, when the horses return with Raza's men, Ehrengard realizes he was wrong and that the horses should be put down, but he'll do it. Dolworth, as played by Lancaster, has a similar trait in that he loves women, all women. In a climatic scene, he has a standoff with one of Raza's mercenaries, a woman named Chiquita, whom he had an affair with when he worked with Raza. It is a strange, multifaceted scene that strengthens our feelings towards Dolworth's character. At one point, he says "I think I just realized what makes a woman worth $100,000." Great stuff.Even Marvin, whom I am growing more appreciative of, does great work here. As Fardan, he is quite and intense, much like he is in most of his work, but Marvin brings intelligence to the role aiding the character a great deal. Granted, much of this can be contributed to the screenplay, but his portrayal effectively brings Fardan to life.There are a couple of problems with the film, looking back at a project made in 1966 from the year 2005. First and foremost, the performance by Woody Strode is good and quite possibly accurate for the time in which the film was set, but it still makes you cringe when he refers to everyone as "Mr. Fardan" and "Mr. Dolworth", when they refer to him as simply, Jake. Brooks does quietly and effectively introduce the issue of race very early on. As Grant brings them together, he asks Fardan "You don't have a problem working with Negroes I trust?" Fardan simply ignores the question, because it is beneath him to even consider the race of a man who is qualified to do the job. If the film were remade today (God, what a thought! The horror!), the role would have to be more of an equal. The role would, in all likelihood, be cast for comic relief.The other problem is that both of the Mexican lead characters are played by non-Mexicans. In the case of Jack Palance, the character still works. In the case of Claudia Cardinale, the role doesn't. Her accent is atrocious, laughable and dumb. She is very voluptuous, but you don't ever believe she is a Mexican. During the 60s, the studios seemed to realize that their films had to appeal to international audiences to make money. Television was robbing them of many ticket buyers and they were searching for revenue from every corner of the globe. One of their solutions was to cast people like Cardinale in roles in American films. Sometimes it worked ("The Pink Panther"), others it didn't. Lancaster even made a number of films oversees; perhaps the most famous are "The Leopard" and "1900". Watching "The Leopard" is a truly bizarre experience. If you watch it in Italian with English subtitles, Lancaster is actually speaking his lines. If you watch a dubbed version, you see Lancaster's mouth moving, and you hear him speaking English, but the two don't mesh.One of the nicest touches about "The Professionals" is that it is set in the early twentieth century; I'm going to guess between 1915 and 1919. Cars are around, and make an appearance, but many parts of the country are still most easily accessible by train or horse. Because the story is set in this period, there is a feeling that these characters are taking the job for a "last hurrah" before modern times take over, before they have to settle down and take that job demonstrating new munitions full time. This adds to the devil may care attitude they exhibit throughout."The Professionals" is a great film buoyed by great writing, performances and directing. Even if you don't like "Westerns", you will probably enjoy this film. Give it a try. You won't be disappointed.
The tragic abyss between the utopist dreams and the real world!. The first accords of "I put a spell on you" by Credence Clearwater revival works out as smart introduction for this peculiar chamber work.An irreverent exponent of the beatnik generation, who was born in Scotland and came to USA in the early seventies, searching for a dream. He lives in the East coast, trying to reproduce his birthplace. According smart ellipsis, we realize he belonged to the hippie generation, intending to harmonize the environmental equilibrium and preserving  the best he can, to isolate from the madding crowd; he does not have TV and he refuses to establish further relations with the outer world. On the other hand his emotional life has bee a total failure. His wife left them a long time ago; so under this sorrowful perspectives, he lives with her daughter intending to mold her according his idiosyncratic life's style. He dislikes the homogeneity of the urban architecture and specially in that island and is a well convinced the world goes to the final disintegration, due is in absolute decadence.He has a mistress who lives out of town; so when he begs his lover to live with them, this woman - who has two teenagers - agrees but, very soon the unthinkable consequences of this terrible decision will reach a boiling point of unpredictable situations.Rebecca Miller's pulsating and minimalist direction reminded me to Lars von Triers in "Breaking the waves". Additionally, the presence of this  extraordinary actor  - Daniel Day Lewis - as well as a well supporting cast have conformed one of the most intense, mature and haunting films of this decade.A poignant film that demands all your attention.
PERFECT. There are few movies which warrant a 5 star rating from me. If I could give Trainspotting 10 stars I would.For me, a movie has to stay with you long after the credits roll. It has to make you think and feel. It has to subject you to a roller coaster ride of emotions. Trainspotting delivers the goods.So many have described the movie and what it's about, I am not going to do that. Suffice it to say that the movie will make you cry, piss-your-pants laugh, think, cheer wildly and discuss it with your friends years after you first saw it. I remember having the nagging feeling that I needed to take a shower after seeing it. THAT, my friends, is the sign of a GREAT movie.Another great feature of Trainspotting is the soundtrack. It features many of my favorites, Iggy Pop, Lou Reed, etc. The soundtrack is perfect for this movie. Everytime I hear Lust For Life by Iggy Pop now, I automatically think of Trainspotting. THAT is another sign of a great movie.If only it would get a Criterion release...
Listen carefully I will say this only once.  This is funky British commedy. The second season of the series expands on the first by introducing one of the funniest characters of the series - the British spy with a French gendarme's alter ego - Crabtree.The second season continues to make fun of the Germans, French, and British.  Watching 30 minutes of this show is an absolute treat.  (It takes you out from a dark mood in 20 minutes or less.)The humor is distinctly British, absurd yet campy, situational yet cerebral.  It is not a mish-mash, it is a wonderfully exciting mixture of different strands of humor.  This makes this series a one-stop shop for anyone who needs to satisfy divergent preferences for good comedy for the members of a household.  Also, if you have preference only for one type of comedy, but do not know what to buy, this is the perfect series to buy.Another nice feature of the series is that all episodes tie into the previous episodes.  Moreover there is a short review given by Rene, the main protagonist, at the beginning of each show.  You do not have to own the first season to understand what happens in the following seasons.Set during World War II, 'Allo 'Allo tells the story of Ren? Artois, a French caf? owner in the village of Nouvion. The village has been occupied by the Germans, who have stolen all of its valuable artifacts. These include the first cuckoo clock ever made and a painting of The Fallen Madonna (known to those who have seen it as The Fallen Madonna with the Big Boobies) by Van Klomp. The commandant of the town has decided to keep them for himself after the war and gets Ren? to hide the painting in his caf?. The Gestapo also want the painting and send Herr Otto Flick to find it.At the same time the caf? is being used as a safe house for two brave but clueless downed British airmen. Ren? is forced to work with the Resistance, who would otherwise shoot him for serving Germans in his caf?. The far-fetched plans of the Resistance to get the airmen back to England, which always fail, are one of the main running gags of the series.Ren? is also trying to keep his affairs with his two waitresses secret from his wife; in addition, the Communist women-only Resistance members are also plotting against Ren? for serving Germans and working with the Gaullist Resistance. The only reason that they do not shoot Ren? is that their leader is in love with him, a fact he has to hide from both his wife and his waitresses. Furthermore, the seemingly gay German Lieutenant Gruber is also continually flirting with Ren?.In the meantime, Ren?'s wife is getting proposals from Monsieur Alphonse, the village undertaker, who is torn between his love for her and his admiration for Ren? as a true hero of France.The companion books are decent.I have pretty much seen the entire series, even those seasons that are not on DVD yet.
The sequel is just as good as the original`. I saw the original Short Circuit when it first came out and recently bought it on DVD.  I enjoyed it just as much and found that age had not dimmed the humour.  I had no idea a sequel had been made until Amazon emailed me to let me know (that is a great service by the way).  Normally sequels are a letdown so I was in two minds whether to order it or not but thought, why not as the price was right.  I am pleased that I did as again I thoroughly enjoyed it and can honestly say that the sequel is just as good as the original.  Without giving away the storyline, there are some sad moments where I was amazed to find myself empathising with a robot!!This is one of those movies that while lightweight, do make you feel good after watching them and I do believe that we need a dash of this every now and again
this movie is a classic. i saw this movie for the first time when i was 14 back in 1988and i have loved it ever sense. it's about a boy named richard(christopher atkins)and a girl named emmeline(brooke shields)whoare sailing to san francisco with richard's father but then theship catches fire and every one has to escape, the kids escapewith a man named paddy. they come to an island where they livewith paddy until he dies and they have to live there alone and they wait for the day when they are rescued, they grow up together on this island and as they grow and change they begin to have feelings for each other that they don't understand(likeevery teenager does) and they learn about love and sex and thenemmeline gets pregnant and then they have to learn about parent-hood. it's a wonderful love story for young adults to watch (butnot for any one younger than 14.)some people thought that this movie was pornography and maybe for that time it was for some people but it's actually a beauti-ful story about growing up and falling in love. the people whothought it was pornography only saw that it was a 14 year old girl running around an island naked but what they didn't know was that most of the time it wasn't brooke it was an 30 year oldbody double. this movie is a wonderful movie, i learned so muchfrom this movie when i was 14, i learned about love and yes ilearned about sex but watching this movie did not make me want to run out and have sex it made me want to fall in love. i hadsuch a crush on christopher atkins after seeing him in this movie, i thought he was such a hotty ( i still do) and brooke was ok too.i think every one would love this movie but of course they wouldhave to see beyond the nakedness and look at the story to reallylove it
Fast deliviery, great price, just one flaw. Great product, but I dont recall seeing anything about region on the product details, might just be me, but I couldnt play the movie on my Region 2 DVD player. Thank god i had a computer which i could use to watch it
the heat. This movie was great,it shows how it really is in new orleans,furthermore how it is in real ghetto neighborhorhoods!it also showed how crooked cops really are, and how some people have to do the negative, to get a positive lifE!!!
Love it!  Love it!  Love it!. This DVD is great for the expectant mother who wants a little more cardio in her workout.  Plus there are sections that focus on muscle strengthing which I love.  I also have Prenatal Yoga and Fit Momma, but this is my favorite
NOT FOR THOSE WHO DEMAND HISTORICAL ACCURACY. The intent of the director was to capture the ATMOSPHERE or "flavor" of the Elizabethan court. Intrigue, alliances, deceit, ambitions, trechery and emotions. In addition he means to show us that Elizabeth was a human being thrust into power, and all that power demands. On those points he got it right ALTHOUGH people were not quite as clean and good looking then. Times were brutal. A toothache could kill you. Lice were everywhere.Those who criticize on historical accuracy complaints miss the point. An historically accurate film would span very very many hours or even more.The movie probably could have been a little longer as it is. Worthy of multiple viewings
THE BEST!. I've been a fan of Neil Young for over 35 years and have many of his CDs and DVDs but this is by far the best. Demme's directing and Young's performing are a superb winning combination. Ol' Neil even gets a wardrobe for this one! This is a must have for even a peripheral fan of Neil Young
Good for advanced guitar players. This dvd is good! "If" your a patient advanced guitar player. But don't expect to learn Dream Theater or any songs. It's based on technique and hand exercise. Don't get me wrong though it's shows you some very good things and you will improve dramatically. So if you want to advance in your playing or want some great warm ups this is a perfect dvd plus john is goofy but he makes you understand his point. Not like other instructors who get so complex that you dont understand what there saying.
Not exactly what i expected but definetly a must buy.... this video was pretty damn good........ i was expecting more basketball highlights but in the end it really didn't matter cause the movie was an interesting look at what its like to grow up being a ghetto celebrity...... i would really like to know what boogers up to know but he's probaly just roamin the streets dealin or somethin.......this movie was also funny as hell with boogers coach/kinda dad  who would go off on the refs and other teams droppin like a hundred f bombs in a minute.... to anyone who wants an interesting look at life and basketball from the perspective the streets should cop this video.....
Great content, mediocre context. If you are willing to overlook the fact that the video is at times poor and the sound often uneven (otherwise, I'd have given it 4 stars), then you are in for a great treat.  The sheer energy and enthusiasm of both the cast and audience is unmatched, and the mis en scene is of a unique time forever gone, New York City at the end the 70's about to shift into the 80's.Kline is terrific & Routledge is great: these two make the show (watch for Routledge's dramatics at the end of Act 1; Kline's brilliant in his "Pirate King" song, and his antics in Act II during the "Paradox" to "Away, away" scene are classic).  Rose IS the Major General.  Ronstadt is commendable (any pop singer who tries their hand at operattic singing has my respect - well, maybe not Michael Bolton...). Even Smith is bearable (a bit cheesy, but what are you gonna do - at least he doesn't seem to take himself all that seriously either).Although some liked the movie version better, at least this production is in its entirety (the movie stupidly leaves out a the end of the Act 1 finale after "Oh Happy Day", and the second versus of "A Policeman's Lot" and "Sighing Softly").  It also resurrects the "Major General" reprieve lyrics at the end of Act II originally used by Gilbert for the New York premiere, which typically don't get included, but actually tie up the show perfectly.  And an added bonus is the use of the "Matter Patter" Song from Ruddigore with slightly changed lyrics (Kline does the last verse in one breath!).So, take it for what it is: a great performance intermittently marred by sub-standard video/audio production..
Very interesting. The whole film (both Heifetz and Piatigorsky) was acted.  I've seen fragments of the movie Heifetz made.  Contrary to the Amazon reviewer, this was not an "impromptu" performance at a college.  It was a movie with actors.  Likewise the Piatigorsky, it was scripted and acted.  And I thought it was very entertaining, interesting.  The few moments of Heifetz' fingers in slow motion was interesting too, though not long enough.  I didn't care for much that Heifetz played (particularly his standards, the Debussy and Prokofiev), but I loved hearing and watching him play anyway.  Both Heifetz and Piatigorsky were wonderful.  Their playing was little jewels set in the stories.  They're good actors too.  It was easy to see from these glimpses of them out from behind their instruments that both men were gentle and kind.  It showed through warmly.  I like to think well of my heroes.
Great Movie!!. The acting, writing, and complete look of the film are completely fantastic. Everything is fantastic, but Jim Carrey steals the scenes, in a very good way. Every time he is on the screen, he is pure Jim. The character he plays on the movie is as if it was written just for him, he fits is role perfectly.The scenery in the movie is very dark and gloomy, which sets the perfect tone for the film. The costumes; suits and dresses, all look great and the entire things comes together very nicely. Overall, this is a must see for fans of Jim Carrey. If you love a good movie, you will love this. Like I said, this role was made for JC!!
Murder Case Turned Eerily Kafkaesque. If the words above could be used to describe another Lynch movie - the much applauded "Lost Highway" (1997) whose plot is inspired in part by Kafka's "Die Verwandlung" and the well-known O.J. Simpson-case - they are as much descriptive of his earlier and less critically acclaimed film "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me" (1992).After two fascinating intermezzos (namely "Industrial Symphony No. 1" [1990] and "Wild at Heart" [1991]) David Lynch returns to the ever more surreal and absurd mystery of "Twin Peaks" (1990-1991) together with writer Robert Engels. While the Tv-series opened to rave reviews and much acclaim, audience interest dwindled and critics grew tired during the much debated second season. Leaving no finite answers as to mystery of Laura Palmer's murder-case, the series went as far as to finish with a question, in fact a strangely diabolical one: "How's Annie...?"There are perhaps no definite answers either in the prequel "Fire Walk With Me", however the subjective story of Laura's Persephony-like descent into Hades remains as tantalizing and surreal as ever. To be true, the story of Laura's dire straits resembles much that Fred Madison in aforementioned "Lost Highway". And there will never be an ending quite as persuasive, though explicitely violent and misogonitic, as when Laura in the red room is underscored by the classical masterpiece "Requiem in C Minor".Two scenes in particular deserve mentioning as two of Lynch's most explicitely and vividly subjective (some would argue 'surreal' or perhaps 'impressionistic') sequences ever:(1) an almost (and obviously intentionally so) unintelligible scene in a filthy bar near the American-Canadian border where Jacques Renault apparently (though never audible to 'us') gives hints as to the murder of Teresa Banks.and,(2)an excessively loud, noisy scene where Laura and Leland, both seated in Leland's car, are held back in traffic by a timber truck and an old handicapped couple. The eerie tone slowly turns deafening before erupting in a violent (almost abusive) musique concrte - mirroring the abuse of Laura and the (beautiful?) absurdity of life in an almost Epsteinian fashion.The film has so often "fallen victim" to misreadings and critical devaluation, but in its uncanny and eerily surreal stimmung it should, instead, be recognised as the very essence of Lynchian. Demanding as it may seem, "Fire Walk With Me" is meant to be experienced and felt, as much as it is meant to be intellectually understood.
thunder road. it was the same movie i saw a long time ago. the music was what i remember best
Belly, Butt and Thighs. I really like this video. Some work out videos that I've tried are confusing. This one is very easy to learn the first time doing it. You can do one workout a day, two or all three.
To be and to Have DVD Review. Amazing and heartwarming documentary about a man living a truly meaningful and rewarding life
Best of the series, so far. This is by far my favorite Harry Potter film. We all know Alfonso Cuarn is an awesome director, and here he shows it.First, I will comment on some of the other reviews. It seems that the puritan fans of the series (the books), don't appreciate the fact that Cuarn took some liberties with his adaptation. I strongly disagree. First, given the fact that films and literature are very different forms of art and communication, in order to make a story interesting and fun, you just can't narrate them in the same way. Talking about subplots being trimmed, that is just out of pure necessity, but I'm convinced they made very good choices.Plus, it's exactly this liberties, exploited to the best, that makes this film so enjoyable. To this, the time line is adapted quite freely, and the way time regression is handled is just splendid (I dare say, more interesting than in the book).All characters are getting more complex (they were fairly two dimensional in Philosopher's Stone), the cinematography is simpli beautiful, and Gary Oldman as Sirius Black fits perfectly.Funny thing, being this chapter my favorite, and the only one where Voldemort doesn't make an appearance.One last thing. I you haven't read the book, and you plan to, this is a very rare case where it may be advisable to watch the film first, since the surprises are, in my opinion, more shocking here, but that may be to each taste (bad thing, once you do one, you ruin a little the other)
FUNNY!!!. This is THE movie for anyone who has been burned by "love".  French Stewart has some great lines.  Not recommended for children, but wonderfully funny for adults
A Lost life or a life lost?. I waited months to view this film. Being a big fan of Texas based music and musicians I have heard for years what an inspiration Townes was on various Texas songwriters. After veiwing this film I did not know if I should give it 5 stars or 0 stars. This film is a horror story of a life that was unfilled. It is a story of a musical genius that not only lost his way, but may in fact never knew were he was going. His musical legacy and talent will forever be know to "true" musicians but in all never by the mainstream public.His talent while undeniable was undiscovered because way down deep, he would not allow himself to be discovered. Townes surounded himself with people who protected him, but more sadily by people who encouraged, supported and promoted his self-demise. In interviews with 3 wives and multiple children at no time did one of them say stop, at no time did any of his so-called friends discuss the selfdestructive path he was on. The title of this film should not have said "Be here to love me", but rather "Be here to use me."A tragic, jaw dropping film of a life lost, a talent unrecognized and demonstrates the true life of a musical genius, hopefully the next musician with "Townes" talent will suround himself with better friends
Romantic comedy of innocent daft (recommended). Though she hasn't quite figured out what comes next, Gladys Glover (Judy Holliday) wants everyone to know her name. After meeting an infatuated photographer named Pete Sheppard (Jack Lemon in debut performance) while walking through Central Park, Gladys discovers a prominent billboard for rent. With her life savings, she has it plastered with "GLADYS GLOVER" to the chagrin of soap advertiser Evan Adams III (Peter Lawford). Failed negotiations for her prominent location lead to an offer of many more billboards in exchange for the one. The exposure is followed by television appearances, fame and fortune. Playboy Adams sees quite a different future for Glover -- one that interferes with Sheppard's courtship plans. Glover must then decide between fame and love.More than half a century later I am discovering the charming antics of Judy Holliday in what is now my third DVD purchase. With considerable Broadway play performances in her career, Judy is quite comfortable on screen projecting innocent daft.Movie quote: "I haven't changed. I'm the same as I was before - only in a different way.
a must-own for fans pf gothic horror. Image's lavish 2-disc set does justice to Lon Chaney's riveting performance as the "Phantom of the Opera." This has long been one of my favorite films, but felt as if I had only seen it for the first time after watching the 1929 edition included in this set. The print is beautiful, and the commentary by Scott MacQueen is insightful. The technicolor has been added to the "Bal Masque" scene, and there is a gorgeous scene of a red-cloaked Erik poised against an anotherwise blue-tinted background. Plus there are loads of stills, promotional materials, alternate music and soundtracks, as well as the 1925 cut of the film. Absolutely essential for fans of gothic horror
A Near Perfect Human Being. Tiger Woods interviewed by the late Ed Bradley of 60 minutes shows the life of Tiger Woods, how he was raised and shows his candidness and frankness. I have always admired this young man since the first time I saw him. His smile alone says it all. Every child should see and hear Tiger's words on life along with their parents at least five times and some parents should watch it 10 times. Tiger Woods has turned the game of Golf upside down in style. It is impressive to see what Tiger has given back to his community and though it cost millions to Tiger, it is free to all the kids to enroll.Tiger Woods has joined the group of great people and his story and name will live on for many, many years
realistic depiction of problematic relationships. among adolescents these are not simple or easy relationships. Social stigmas and taboos are aptly represented in this touching movie with tragic outcome
Connery at his best. Russia House is British playwright Tom Stoppard's effort to bring John LeCarre's book to the screen. Sean Connery owed Stoppard a favor and agreed to act in the lead role of an out-at-elbows publisher whose plays jazz clarinet and is equally talented on the whisky bottle. LeCarre likes to confront mildly despondent middle-aged men of middling talent with a challenge that might allow them to be small heroes. LeCarre's mini-supermen were interesting in his first dozen novels but American readers have grown heartily sick of the theme and many left Russia house collecting dust in the annual pile of unwanted Christmas gifts. Imagine the surprise of discovering that a movie based on an unreadable book turns out to be a masterpiece.Director Fred Schepisi filmed Russia House in Moscow and Leningrad in the midst of Glasnot. The movie begins at a Russian book fair where a Moscow book agent Katia (played by Michelle Pfeiffer) comes to deliver a secret manuscript to "Boozy" Barley Blair (Sean Connery). His book stand is empty, he is absent. The manuscript makes its way into the hands of British Intelligence and turns out to be a technical treatise showing that the Soviet Union cannot "make solid (rocket) fuel worth s**t," its rockets "suck instead of blow," and they "could not hit Nevada on a clear day." Through a series a virtuoso flashbacks, fast-forwards and voice overs we learn that Blair loves Russia and Russians and that during one of his drunken rants at a retreat for Soviet writers he has inspired Russia's top rocket scientist to betray his country because as Blair has expounded in his cups "if we are to survive we must all betray our countries."The plot of Russia House is too complex to describe in a few lines but the theme is simple. A country's system can be bad, but its people good. America and the Soviet Union are in the grips of weapons makers and generals who amplify their power by blowing up the threat each country poses the other. To tear down the lie that the cold war is the only peace possible between Soviets and Americans, Blair and his rocket scientist must disobey their superiors and turn coat, much as soldiers of the First World War did when they crossed no-man's land to shake hands. Stoppard somehow manages to get the message of Russia House across without stunning us with platitudes about geopolitics and even manages to squeeze in a love story that comes across as mature and moving.This movie is to Sean Connery what Glenn Gary Glenn Ross was to Alec Baldwin. The script of Glenn Gary put an epic speech into Baldwin's mouth as the hectoring slave driver of pathetic real estate agents and showed the world that Baldwin could act. Connery has never been better than in Russia House nor has he worked with such an expert cast. Roy Scheider, Ken Russel, Michelle Pfeiffer, James Fox, Klaus Maria Brandauer, as well as the regular batch of talented British no-names give this movie the sort of punch that has not been seen since 12 Angry Men and Inherit the Wind.Russia House is not for everyone. You will see no shootouts, no exposed breasts, no chases down busy streets. If you want a glimpse of the Soviet Union before its fall, brought to life by a crack troupe of actors at the top of their game then you need to see this movie. Again, and again.
GREAT CLASSIC HORROR MOVIE SPACEK IS PERFECT. This is such a strange movie as you wouldn't know it was a horror film until very late in the movie. When it gets there it will scare the you know what out of you! Most have seen this film,but for those of you who haven't, I don't want to tell too much. Truly a classic and one of Kings stories get a grade A movie treatment. Spacek should get a lot of credit as it is her at the prom in a trance like state that takes this movie to another level, she is magnificent. The DVD has a great transfer with some excellent bonus features
Great Cowboy Movie!!  I loved it!. I really like this movie.  Every bull rider at heart is a cowboy,  Bo Derek announces as she hosts this intimate, and often heart-warming, inside look at a truly rare breed of men.  They are both athletes and cowboys, competing in one of the most extreme and brutal of all sports, professional bull riding.  From the rookies struggling to make it through the challenger ranks, all the way to some of the biggest stars of the sport competing on the PBR Cup Tour, Adrenaline Cowboys is an in-depth look into the heart's and mind's of men who have the courage to chase their dreams no matter what the cost.  Featuring personal stories and behind-the-scenes footage along with some of the most bone-crushing extreme ride entertainment ever - guaranteed to take you into the arena and straight to the heart of the action.
Mr. Incredible. Great movie!Delivery of the order came in good time.This 2-Disc Collector's Edition comes with some interesting extras.I found the offtakes/blubbers to be in bad taste, but the rest of the extras were worth seeing.Personnally I would avoid watching the extras that describe the making of the movie.  Although it is interesting to watch, especially for those wanting to go into the movie making business, I find that it then takes away from the enjoyment of watching the movie itself.  Just my personal preference.  No doubt others will have different opinions
Great movie. I bought this for my almost three year old son based on hype of the movie and the Fisher Price characters.  He likes the movie and so do I.  It's entertaining, exciting, and positive.  We don't have any character toys yet, but maybe for his b-day or xmas.  I'd recommend it
The Future is Wild review. Good story, nice animation and effects. Interesting speculation on evolution in the far future
Peter Sellers final bow?. I had always been under the impression that this was Peter Sellers final movie, recently I had heard that his "Fu Manchu" movie was technically his last film because it was released after "Being There" - I guess in the big scheme of things it really doesn't matter unless you need a correct answer for a $100,000.00 Jeopardy question.  If this wasn't his last movie, it should have been - before you curse me, allow me to explain what I mean - this certainly was one of his best performances, and it was a role that he seemed destined to play, it was almost like it was written for him.  He had a long, successful career with quite a mixture of movies - as with any actor, he had more than his share of less than memorable movies, BUT amongst them, he also left us with some really brilliant and classic performances - the "collection" of characters he did in "Dr Strangelove", Inspector Clouseau (although near the end of that run his character had degraded into a cartoonish version of itself - the last "Panther" movie, released after his death, didn't even use Seller's actual voice, relying instead on a "voice actor" that cheapened it even more)- just to name a few.  With "Being There" being such a superb performance, it would have been most fitting, and almost a poetic way to remember the man.  You've seen all the other reviews, with all the other descriptions, but this movie is a little tricky to describe - what comes to my mind is that it is a movie full of illusions, it takes on everything - life and death, world politics, power, relationships, and everything in between.  The movie is also about perspective - how we view everything around us, and how we are viewed by others.  The movie makes a very effective point about how things are rarely what they seem to be - we tend to see and believe what we think we should be seeing and believing, as if we are all creating our own realities.  The movie is also what you make it, it works on many levels - it can be as simple, or as complex as your imagination can make it.  It is definetly one of those films that can be viewed more than once - and each time you might notice something different, or learn more.  What can I say?  It's a great film full of great performances - the author, Jerzy Kozinski, is a world class writer, and if you are not familiar with his work, I would also urge you to read one of his creations - but be forewarned, some of his stuff is pretty dark and disturbing (The Painted Bird, for instance)BUT, it is also a great book - it just tells the story of a young boy trying to survive in Europe during WWII (based on Kozinsky's actual life, I believe).  But - "Being There" - if you don't buy it, you should at least view it once - if you are a serious collector, you'll just want to add it anyway.  Thanks for your time
a lot of fun to watch. I don't own this one as a DVD but I caught it on digital cable on demand, and I will say William Castle is a damn good director.  I would loved to see this one in the theater.  The young kid in the film was great and so was the older sister. If I saw this movie if I was younger, I think I would be doing much more with writing ghost stories than I do right now.  Coming from an author who writes ghost stories either as a fictional medium or a true medium,  one can really appreciate the master of gimmicks.I saw the remake of this movie too when I was staying at my now apartment, during a party trying to fall asleep (waiting for medicine to kick in at the time since I had a bad case of bronchitis and the flu at the party in 2005.)  Though William Castle's been dead for 30 years now it is amazing what the guy was able to do with the genre.
Great impact from knife-wielding start to bloody end. From the very first scene, when a large knife screeches against a sharpening stone, and its intended victim chicken races to escape, the viewer knows he's found something special. As a Brazilian film, it's in Portugese with English subtitles, but that detracts in no way from its impact.  The young narrator tells the story of the City of God, a barrio set up by the Brazilian government outside Rio de Janiero.  There the economy and the law are driven by gangs of youthful hoodlums.  At first we meet the Tender Trio, who seem pretty much out-of-control as they crash into a local cantina, but their story pales in comparison to the mayhem wrought by Lil' Z, a protg who proves to be much more ruthless.  His rise and fall are by turns shocking and ironic.  An amazing cast of young Brazilian actors, some recruited from the real City of God, make you forget just how young they are.  The director employs a number of cinematic techiques, particularly with time, that enhance the story--although a repeat watching will help keep it all straight.
Brilliant movie. Worth signing upto amazon to get this, its a great movie. Anyone who thinks they remember watching it when they were younger it's just as funny now and you should all give this one a look again
Funny car legond. Jim Dunn is one of the legonds of drag racing.  This film offers an amazing glimpse into 'how it was' before all the huge sponsorships, hospitality tents, multi-car crews, etc. The day when a group of guys can get together and build a car more out of love, dedication, and hard work than money - long gone!
Not to be Missed!!. I never write reviews so you can imagine how much I enjoyed this movie since I am actually taking the time to write a review.I don't remember exactly how I got hooked on this movie. I think I must have caught pieces of it on television but I do remember borrowing it from a friend and I loved it. Why do I love this movie so much?It's heart warming, it's romantic but not mushy. It's a different twist to Cinderella. For starters Cinderella is an intelligent and well read young woman, there's a nice step sister as well as a mean one and Anjelica Huston is amazing. She is a wonderful actress; her facial expressions are hilarious.  All three women will appeal to different viewers.There's over 800 reviews telling you how good this movie is; it is definitely worth the money and it deserves to be in your collection. I bought my copy the moment I had some cash available. I never regretted it and you won't either. And I guarantee you'll watch it more than once!  Happy viewing.
not edited. these shows are complete!! whoever is saying that these episodes have been edited down - they're not! i have watched all 24 episodes in this box.. took me 3 days. they are perfect.
Simon and Garfunkel Old Friends. This concert is their best one on dvd in my opinion.  The quality of sound and picture is good along with the fact that they stick to the original style of the song without changing it too much for the stage.  It's a mellow and enjoyable concert to kick back and watch with some old friends
Been there... What is it with middle aged professors anyway?[8-D] I have had the same kind of thoughts and reactions as this professor, but they remained fantasies. It took me one day of teaching, and I discovered how vulnerable these young women are. (My race didnt matter either), they just feel so indebted (guilt for something?) to us and our passion for teaching them. For me its a natural thing to do, for them it is a gift to them. Definitely a such thing as a mid-life trauma or crisis. I would have wanted this girl in the movie too, because a real crisis like this often breaks outside of the social contructs; hence the trauma or crisis. Americans truely have been spoiled by their myopic view of what men want and what is beauty, and that it matters in this particular situation. I must admit that I was struggling with some of my own inadequacies also, which are heightened at this age. Funny how even achieving ones' dreams cannot fully engage total personhood. We must be careful not to get sideswiped by what we think "success" is. Achieving ones goal is not the time to see that as "success" (its the journey not the destination-remember that saying?)and then let your guard down. Suggestion: Have human effort but not without humility through a spiritual connection that you see as greater than yourself! It has to become a practice-not a magic trick, but it helps me balance things. PS. Men often avoid the "attractive" ones because they hide their insecurities, but a young girl who needs someone to think she is attractive... an older male tells her she is... well, it happens.... a lot.
The story of a great man on the field as well as off the field!. This review is for the DVD released by MGM in 2002.The Pride of the Yankees is the story of baseball Hall of Famer Lou Gehrig.  His nickname was the "Iron Horse" which he earned for playing 2,130 consecutive games for the New York Yankees from the mid 1920's to the late 1930's.  That was a major league record for many years until Cal Ripken Jr. broke it 1995.  Of course Lou Gehrig will also be remembered as a courageous man who died from Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis, sometimes also referred to as "Lou Gehrig's Disease".The movie stars Gary Cooper as Lou Gehrig.  The movie is a gem and has essentially four facets to it.  One area of lengthy coverage was his relationship with his domineering German mother (played by Elsa Janssen).  A second subplot is courting and marrying his wife (played by Teresa Wright).   The third subject of lengthy coverage was his great baseball career and the final facet of the film was Gehrig facing his mortality at a relatively early age.  Of course these four areas overlap into each other throughout the movie.  From a personal viewpoint, I would have liked to have seen a lot more about his baseball career and less of his love life.  (I'm sure this was done intentionally to get women to into the theaters.)   The movie is sugarcoated and squeaky clean and very corny at times, but personally I'd rather watch a movie like this than films like the Babe Ruth or Ty Cobb movies that were made in the 1990's where they exposed all of the dirty laundry in their private lives.Pride of the Yankees is a classic, especially with the unforgettable "I consider myself the luckiest guy on the face of the earth" speech at Yankee Stadium.  Another wonderful treat is to see Babe Ruth play himself in the movie and there are also a few brief scenes with another Yankee great: Bill Dickey.  Another nice feature were the shots of the various American League ball barks Gehrig played in.  It was also great to see some shots of the old grandstands of Yankee Stadium before it was renovated in the mid-`70s.  Overall, this a movie the whole family, from 6 to 96, can enjoy.The DVD picture quality is outstanding.  The black and white transfer is impeccable.  I don't recall seeing the slightest flaw throughout the entire movie and the sharpness is excellent.  The sound is fine too.  The DVD lacked bonus features which is a shame for a movie that has been so highly acclaimed for so many generations.  There was a lot of about his baseball career that wasn't covered in the movie, but could have been covered in a documentary by sportswriters and sports historians.  The movie itself had some interesting stories regarding how it was filmed.  I had once read an article regarding how they filmed Cooper playing Gehrig.  Since Cooper was right handed and Gehrig was left handed, they would film Cooper running to third base from home instead of from home to first after getting a hit and then reverse the negative.Movie: ADVD Quality: A
Review--Meditation for Beginners. I am very pleased with the information I got from this DVD.  I was starting out "from box one", not knowing a thing about meditation, and found everything I wanted to get started!  Thanks very much
A cult classic!. George Newman ( Weird Al Yankovic) is a daydreaming loser who just recently lost his job at Burger World, luckily his uncle Harvey ( Stanley Brock) wins a local TV station at a poker game before it's bankrupted. Uncle Harvey puts his trust in George to take care of the station and help keep the station from going down the drain, he creates popular new bizare shows like "Conan The Librarian", " Wheel of Fish" etc, making it the new highest rated station in the city but as a greedy rival network owner ( Kevin McCarthy)is getting quite jealous and wants to run the UHF station down, but it's up to George's friends to help battle against the tycoon.Entertaining and flat out funny satire on the media that was originally a box-office bomb turned into a cult fave on video and TV showings. It co-stars Billy Barty, Fran Drescher, Geedee Wantanabe ( "Sixteen Candles", "E.R.", "Mulan"), and Seinfeld's Michael Richards, the movie is in my opinion a successful breakthrough for Weird Al Yankovic into movies as he also co-wrote the script. There's plenty of good laughs including that funny yet cool animated dream sequence "Beverly Hillbillies"/"Money for Nothing".This DVD has good picture and sound quality even some cool extras like easter eggs, a hilarious audio commentary by Weird Al, Victoria Jackson, director Jay Levey, Michael Richards, and Emo Philips. A Music video, promotional materials, deleted scenes, widescreen and fullscreen presentations and production stills.A most recommended comedy for anyone who loves Weird Al, comedy and parody movies.Also recommended: "The Kentucky Fried Movie", "Amazon Women on the Moon", " Spaceballs", "Young Frankenstein", "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes", "Return of the Killer Tomatoes", " Freaked", " The Naked Gun", and "Hot Shots!"
Angel Season 5. This was a great season.  But it is the last season of Angel.  You see Cordy one last time and it was great season.  I just don't want to give to much away and spoil it for you.  If you like Buffy and Charmed Shows you will love Angel
chew on the dog!. Classic Tim Burton, Micheal Keaton at his best, and the movie that introduced me to Winona Ryder. I love it.  I wish I knew what the impetus was for this twisted take on the afterlife.  It was hilarious when I was 10 and 17 years later I still thoroughly enjoy it.
Very poor quality film, but dancing makes up for it. This 1992 live Kirov film of The Sleeping Beauty suffers from very poor film quality. It is too darkly lit and some of the ballet, particularly during the second act, are practically in pitch darkness, with the Prince and Lilac Fairy merely fuzzy shadows. They look like figures in "night camera" footage. Disappointing, especially for a relatively recent film.On the other hand, the lead roles feature among the finest dancing I've ever seen in a ballet performance. Husband and wife team of Altynai Asylmuratova and Konstantin Zaklinsky star as Aurora and Prince Florimund.If there's a ballerina more lovable than Altynai, I havent seen her. She has the most radiant smile, the most enchanting stage presence. She's not a perfect Aurora. For one, despite her obviously disciplined classical Vaganova training, she doesnt have the toes of steel to really make the Rose Adagio a bravura moment. Margot Fonteyn was famous for wowing the audiences with seemingly endless balances, and you can see this in the film she made. Asylmuratova's balances in the Rose Adagio are well-held and steady, but not exceptional. Asylmuratova is also not a fast turner -- her turns in the Act 3 pas de deux seem a bit slow and labored. On the other hand, Asylmuratova's extensions are breathtakingly beautiful. In the Rose Adagio she swoops down in six-o-clock penchee arabesques that very effectively accompany the sweeping string chords. It's one of her charms that the penchee arabesques are not quite 180 degrees, but are carefully placed at around 175 degress (5:55, I'd say) and thus give her profile a softer, more feminine look. Altynai also has wonderfully soft, fluid arms, and most of all, an unpretentious, down-to-earth stage persona that makes her Aurora genuinely adorable and not just a classical showpiece role. This is important, as Aurora lacks the natural pathos of Giselle or Nikya, the majesty of Odette/Odile, and the spunk of Swanilda. I particularly love the way Altynai smiles not to the headlights but with her head slightly lowered. She looks both flirtatious and shy.Konstantin Zaklinsky, blond and handsome, is a wonderful turner, an exciting leaper, and a sensitive partner. He has the noble bearing of a prince. His *one* weakness is a tendency to bend his leg slightly during his grand jetes. He complements his wife well - while she's Oriental looking he's very Slavic in apperance. While she's wonderful at extensions and positions he's more of a classical dancer and athlete. While she's innocent and adorable he's majestic and regal.The Lilac Fairy is Zhanna Ayupova, who is saddled with a hideous powdered wig, but has the kind of slim, wispy figure and graceful style that's perfect for this role. Despite some questionable costumes, I really enjoyed the Kirov production. Their corps are excellent as usual, but the conductor deserves a lot of credit. He doesnt barnstorm through Tchaikovsky's revered score, but he conducts with great energy and flair. The whole production has unexpected energy, even for this very long and occasionally static ballet (sometimes I wonder if the divertissements will *ever* end). One definite negative about the choreography is that in the third act pas de deux there are practically no fishdives, which are prominently featured in the Royal Ballet productions. So, if you want to see your Aurora leaping into the Prince's arms in a fishdive, you wont see them here.I hope this performance gets released on dvd very soon as it's certainly one Sleeping Beauty to treasure
Puts new zip in my exercise!. I have been exercising for years but needed a push to do better.The videos were recommend on TV and I'm glad I decided to purchasethem
Chomsky Views on Current Events. This documentary shows bits and pieces of a big speaking engagement of Chomsky and two talks he is giving to activist groups. The only thing was, the documentary was kind of short - like 1 hour and 10 minutes. But it was good. Here are some highlights:- When the Russians invaded Afghanistan, the U.S. press gave sharp criticism to the Russians. However, since the U.S. press has a U.S. audience why doesn't the press tell Americans what is happening with their tax dollars and what they can do to fix their mistakes. An example at this time was U.S. funding for death squads in El Salvador and Indonesian funding for the massacre of Timorese. It is cowardly for our criticisms of Russians, when we as Americans have no control over them, but we do have control over what we do and ourselves.- The media was most free during the mid nineteenth century, this was before media started getting advertising in it. Once advertising started to happen, media could not say certain things the advertisers did not like.- Run up budget deficits by giving massive tax cuts that benefit the wealthy, then cut social programs.  Then eventually get rid of Social Security and public education.  Getting rid of public education and Social Security just eliminates solidarity and sympathy with others.- If your pension is tied up in stocks - stocks go up when people lose their jobs, that is against your own interests and all worker's interests.This Chomsky documentary was more entertaining than the previous made ones. If a person does not pay attention to foreign policy, they can still grasp the concepts and ideas that are presented in this documentary. This documentary provides plenty of ammo to help people think and get active. Watch it and have house parties or let a bunch of politically passive friends watch it.
Very well done... This is a pretty close account of how our technology (of today) started.  I too watched this movie when it came out on cable (TNT) and enjoyed it.  I would say this movie is about 85-90% accurate at the time when Microsoft and Apple came about.  Very good acting from all actors.  If you are interested in how the two giants started, this is the movie to start with.  This movie is a keeper
tombstone. I love this epic western. The acting from all the cast is enormous and I would invite any western lover to purchase and enjoy
NYPD Blue The Season 4 Review. The continuing story of NYPD Blue. If you are already a fan, you'll love it, if not, well, you will probably become one of this greatest police show ever put on TV. (prior to the Shield).
Dodgeball has the Patches O'Houlihan seal of approval. What is there to say about Dodgeball - A True Underdog Movie other than it's a no-brainer of a hilarious movie that doesn't aspire to lofty heights. What it does do is come out firing with some of the funniest physical comedy and one-liners since The Farrelly Brothers' Something About Mary. First time director Rawson Marshall Thurber does a good enough job to keep the laughs coming one right after the another to keep Dodgeball from becoming too repetitive.The movie is a riff from the stock underdog sports genre with a Peter La Fleur (played by Vince Vaughn with his usual sardonic wit) having to find a way to save his Average Joe's Gym from being foreclosed by his bank and turned by a rival hi-tech gym next door into a parking lot. Who else would be the perfect foil for Vince Vaughn's Peter La Fleur but none other than Ben Stiller as the former-fatty turned workout fitness Nazi, White Goodman. Goodman's Globo Gym is a state-of-the art, sterile and BALCO-like gym where insults and making its members feel ugly, fat and useless is the way to clean health and the perfect bod.Already, within the first fifteen minutes, we know who to root for and who to boo. In one corner we have the Average Joe's guys played with comedic timing by Justin Long, Stephen Root, Chris Williams, Alan Tudyk and Joel Moore. Stiller's Goodman and his consigliere Me'Shell (Jamal Duff channelling Barry White) with a hand-picked ringer of a dodgeball team he calls the Purple Cobras. With the two sides set the dodgeball carnage begins as Average Joe's must win the Las Vegas Dodgeball Invitational to earn the $50,000 needed to save the gym. To round out the Average Joe's team will be the bank accountant who ends up sympathizing with the Joe's, Kate Veatch (played by Stiller's real-life wife, Christine Taylor) and Patches O'Houlihan (Rip Torn in a scene-stealing role).Rip Torn is hilarious as the acerbic and insane former Dodgeball great Patches O'Houlihan. He pretty much gets all the best one-liners in the movie the moment he appears on the screen. He coaches the Average Joe's team by browbeating them, insulting them and, failing that, throwing wrenches at them to help them in learning the 5 D's of dodgeball: Dodge, duck, dip, dive, dodge. In fact, I would say that if it wasn't for Rip Torn's character dominating the middle part of the movie, I think Dodgeball's constant ball to the groin shots would've gotten old. Instead Patches O'Houlihan constantly gave people watching a reason to laugh out loud.Dodgeball - A True Underdog Story is a movie that the Academy voters will not think twice about showering with praises and awards, but I'm sure most of them will be watching it and laughing out loud like the rest of the movie-going public. Dodgeball is one hilarious, one-liner after one-liner ball to the nuts funny and it doesn't aspire to be anything else but that. This movie will never get old with each viewing and will continue to make people laugh out loud
Still going strong after 16 years!!!. There is nothing I can add to the synopsis of this movie other than to praise it to the skies! After 16 years of wearing out 2 VHS copies I am thrilled that a DVD copy is out with so many extras.I love this movie so much that I still hyperventilate with excitement everytime I watch the movie or listen to both volumes of the sound track. The sheer power of Andrew Strong's vocals elate me and move me to tears at the same time, the music definately creates an experince in sensation that should not be missed!A true classic, please don't let this one pass you by
Best Ab Workout I Have Ever Had!. I have done my share of Ab videos and most of them are fun and challenging but show no results. After the very first time I used Billy Blanks' Ab Bootcamp, my obliques were sore and were very hard my abs began to show and I was totally encouraged. I would recommend this video to anyone. I think beginners could easily follow along although it may be a little challenging. And it is still extremely challenging for even the most dedicated exercisers. I love this video and I plan to buy many more of Billy Blanks' products
For its time, actually pretty accurate. Like most war movies created in the early 40s, their one main purpose was to inspire Americans to buy more war bonds.  Therefore, stories of valor, likable characters (many of whom get killed), fluff dialogue, and innaccurate retelling of battles were the mainstay of the films.  "Guadalcanal Diary," however, was different than most.  Rather than the glorification of battle and the 'good guys always winning with no problem,' there is a good deal of hardship here.  Impressively, the movie portrays some of the angst and helplessness of the nighttime navel shelling that both sides participated in.Also, there is a part early on that tells the true story of one detachment's fate on the far side of the island when they run into a Japanese force.  Only one soldier survived to tell the tale.  His account is very accurately portrayed.  Of course, perhaps the US War Department was more interested in showing the grittier side of the war in order to promote those war bonds.  Guadalcanal certainly provided enough true life grit for several movies.It is definitely a condensed version of the events that took place on that island, but overall it is a well-acted and fascinating movie.  For historical accuracy, it stands fairly well the test of time, although it is not as concerned with facts as with emotions.  Still, there is great acting and good special effects (again, for the time) and fans of the era and of World War II history should enjoy this period piece regardless of the subtle marketing throughout.
A Great Film With Extra Bonus Features as Part of This DVD. THE FOUR HUNDRED BLOWS is French director Francois Truffaut's first full length film and his first film of the cinematic movement known as the New Wave. It's a far more complex film than its simple plot would suggest which is why the film has such a powerful impact. Twelve year old Antoine seems to be a typical of a boy his age, but finds himself getting into trouble. We assume it will be mischief, but learn he has no real anchors to keep the mischief from getting more serious. His home life is unstable though from the outside it would appear he has doting and dedicated parents. There are also his teachers who seem to notice his infractions but none seem to get close enough to reach him. It is only later in the film where we realize the effects of the negligence and hurt on Antoine. Though the film concludes, we do not feel that the story is over. We want to know what happens to Antoine. Fortunately there are four other films with the character of Antoine Doinel all performed by Jean-Pierre Leaud so the viewer can once again become immersed in the ups and downs of Antoine's life.The film was critically acclaimed when it was shown at Cannes and Truffaut won awards for his direction and an award for best Catholic film (though the film is not based on a religious theme nor doe sit have specific Catholic references). We get a sense that something new is happening in this film, and we see the genius that will later be associated with Truffaut. The film is set in Paris and throughout we get a glimpse of typical Parisian life. The background music is somewhat basic with a 1950's Jazz like feel, but it is used effectively. Its' remorseful when the situation calls for it, but it is light and airy when Antoine is experiencing the adventures of childhood. The acting is superb, particularly Jean Pierre Leaud as Antoine and Patrick Aufay as his friend Rene. Other members of the cast include Albert Remy and Claire Maurier as Antoine's patents and Guy Ducomble as one of film's most uninspired teachers.Film buffs will love the addition features of the release as part of "The Criterion Collection." It includes interviews with Truffaut soon after returning from the American premiere (the two most common questions American interviewers asked: What do you think of Brigitte Bardot? and What do you think of Charles De Galle?). It also has an interview with a fourteen year old Leaud as well as the auditions of Leaud, Aufay, and Richard Kanayan, another child in the film. Truffaut lets us know why he made certain choices in the film which makes it an interest bit of film history.
Get out of the water!. Where would we be without the venerable Roger Corman? Lovers of B-movie madness would likely have a lot more time on their hands to read books, interact with family, or take part in generally otherwise fulfilling life experiences had old Rog chosen a different career path. Fortunately, or unfortunately as the case may be, Corman sat out in Hollywood for three or four decades making low budget exploitation films. He also tried to cash in on every movie fad in modern cinema. And I do mean EVERY fad. You see, Roger had a dream to take an idea and make a profitable picture out of it that would entertain the masses. The problem was that someone else invariably had the idea first. Thus Lucas's "Star Wars" allowed Corman to unleash "Battle Beyond the Stars" on an unsuspecting public. Car chase movies saw Roger replying with "Grand Theft Auto" and "Eat My Dust." I could go on and on. There wasn't anything Corman couldn't do with someone else's idea. Perhaps the best example is "Piranha," a 1978 ripoff of Spielberg's "Jaws." This film made our man a lot of money, which allowed him to make even more spectacular ripoffs for years to come.The flick starts with a couple of kids breaking into some sort of rundown fish hatchery for an evening swim. Something in the water kills them. End of movie. Seriously, something rather nasty does do away with the two idiots. We then see an insurance investigator by the name of Maggie McKeown (Heather Menzies on loan from Julie Andrews) heading out to discover what happened to these two dolts. She rather quickly hooks up with an embittered alcoholic with a penchant for flannel named Paul Grogan (Bradford Dillman channeling Grizzly Adams) who lives in a cabin down by the river. Somehow or other Maggie convinces Paul to head over to the fish hatchery with her. Sure enough they discover that something sinister has been going on there under the aegis of Dr. Robert Hoak (Kevin McCarthy). How do we know this? Because there's lots of nasty looking scientific stuff lying around all over the place. Anyway, Hoak eventually lets our two heroes in on a little secret: the government paid him a bunch of money to create a breed of piranha as part of some weapons program. Personally, I'm for anything that keeps communists out of our swimming pools, lakes, and rivers.While all this nonsense goes on we know the piranha have escaped from the hatchery (thanks Maggie and Paul!) and are preparing a full-scale assault on the human race. A few locals fall prey first, but the real threat is the summer camp and an aquatic park downriver. Just to ratchet up the emotional element of the film a bit, we also learn that Paul's daughter is currently attending the camp. Oh dear! It's a race against time as Paul and Maggie set out with the twitchy Dr. Hoak in tow to stop the madness. As for the folks at the camp and the park, they haven't a clue as to what's about to happen. The only concern at the camp is the fascistic machinations of Mr. Dumont (Paul Bartel), a guy who takes great joy in ordering kids into the water and snooping on the foxy female counselors. At the water park, the owner plans on making a bundle on opening day and couldn't care less if a battleship full of exposed nuclear waste sailed into harbor. You can pretty much guess what happens in the last part of the film. Screaming, blood in the water, and a lot of out of shape Americans in unflattering bathing suits thrashing around on the beach in agonies. Fun!I don't know whether to laugh or cry with this one, folks. Lots of people adore this film, and I probably would to if I'd seen it as a wee lad. I didn't, and I'm not that impressed. The swarms of piranha zipping through the water look so like the pieces of plastic they are that it's tough not to snicker. It's even worse when we see them up close chattering away on an exposed leg or belly. We're definitely looking at cheesefest central on a buck and a half budget here. At the same time, I did find a lot to like about the film. Seeing veteran horror babe Barbara Steele popping up from time to time as a government scientist named Dr. Mengers was a nice surprise, although she's largely wasted in the role. Kevin McCarthy plays frazzled well, and the script requires him to morph into a sniveling wimp for most of his screen time. Heck, we even see Richard Deacon (Mel from "The Dick Van Dyke Show") in a small role as Maggie's boss. Can't beat that. The talent behind the camera is moderately impressive too considering the budget. Joe Dante directed this flick, and John Sayles wrote the script. Both men went on to greater success, Dante with "Gremlins" and Sayles with "Eight Men Out," "The Howling," and several other mainstream movies.Extras on the disc include a commentary track, extra footage, bloopers, and a few other odds and ends. Corman apparently took this film, or at least a similar concept, to television in the mid-1990s. If so, I haven't seen that version and thus cannot make a comparison. If the remake, or retread, or whatever it is looks and sounds like this movie, more laughs await us. Corman continues to churn out pap at an alarming rate, and has even recently inked a deal with Disney that will release his entire catalogue on DVD and keep it in circulation until the sun burns out. I've dogged on Corman quite a bit, but I do appreciate his films. If nothing else they are entertaining, and this one definitely works most of the time.
Toast of the Town. Even though this is not the musical in which Gene Kelly dances with Jerry the mouse, the 1949 film ON THE TOWN still has much that is cartoonish about it--and that's not a bad thing.  It is cheerfully outlandish, in the way all the best animated cartoons of the era were.  It's one unlikely or downright absurd event after the other, and like a good Bugs Bunny short, the audience knows that suspension of disbelief goes without saying.  We delight in the absurdity.The story of three sailors on 24-hour leave and the NYC gals they pick up during their various misadventures should logically be fast-paced, which the film certainly is, or even a little frenzied, which it is not.  Despite the crawling time-line, which should theoretically make the viewer feel as though time's a-wastin', the action almost seems suspended in time, rather than weighted down by it.  It's the old romantic notion of one day lasting forever.  And in such a magical setting, who needs to sleep?  And there can't possibly be truly serious consequences for a lady cab driver failing to turn in her car for the next shift or for that matter for destroying a dinosaur at the Museum of Natural History.All that absurdity opens up a world of anarchic fun--just as in the best cartoons--and even the most staid of audiences can briefly escape into this loony world of antics with no consequences and true love found at the drop of a sailor's cap.And it's all done to a great Comden-Green and Bernstein score (much taken from the Broadway play of the same name on which it is based) and handled with aplomb by its talented cast.  The casting is near perfect, with Kelly and Frank Sinatra heading an able cast of singers, dancers and comic actors.  Ann Miller and Vera-Ellen shine in their dance numbers, and Betty Garrett and Alice Pearce are remarkable for their comic--as well as their musical--timing.  Probably the only disputable casting would  be that of Sinatra as a somewhat nerdy, control freak.  But it's nice to see him out of the "ring a ding ding" mode for once.ON THE TOWN's great entertainment--and like so much of the entertainment of the era expresses a joy and optimism that now seems (sadly) naive to us today.A previous reviewer noted, in fact, that the film was emblematic of the post-WW II optimism that dominated American culture in the late 40s and early 50s.  That's for sure.  This is a world in which sailors can get in a bit of trouble (on leave) but are not about to get blown up (on duty).  And it's also a world, in which invoking military honor and sacrifice can get excuse a bit of nautical mischief.Probably the sole bit of sobering realism is the fact that when the gobs and the gals say goodbye at the dock the next morn, they don't promise to stay in touch.  Not even Gene and Vera, who have declared true love.The audience members can draw their own conclusions.  But with all this free floating optimism how can they conclude anything other than a romatic reunion--for all three couples?We can suspend our disbelief on that point too.
"Into every generation, a slayer is born": Reinvention, Reality, and Redemption. A girl named Buffy who slays vampires.Seemingly, the premise of a campy, forgettable, girls-fights-monsters horror series.Look closer, however, and what you'll find is something that is so much more: a complex, compelling, and intriguing tail of love, loss, life, redemption, and growing up.Buffy Summers begins as a 16-year-old high school cheerleader: a perky, blonde, `popular girl'. But there is much more to Buffy's story than her new classmates first learn. After her parents divorce, Buffy was booted from her old L.A high school, and is now forced to move to the small town of Sunnydale with her mother, Joyce.What else don't they know? Buffy is the chosen one - the only girl in the entire world who has the strength and skill to fight against the vampires, and the forces of darkness.This is where the first season picks up, as Buffy struggles to start a new life, while keeping her calling as the slayer a secret from those around her. As her new life begins, Buffy believes she can put her slaying days behind her and move on to be a normal teenager.But Buffy cannot escape her destiny, and is soon pulled back into the world of `slayage'. After being ditched by the Sunnydale High in-crowd, Buffy falls in with the loners. Eventually, her new friends Willow and Xander - along with her Watcher, Giles - become sidekicks in Buffy's battle against evil.Over the years, Buffy became a widely praised critical favorite, gaining both Emmy and Golden Globe nominations. The cast was always stellar (especially Sarah Michelle Gellar, as Buffy), and the writers were beyond phenomenal. Creator Joss Whedon had launched a show that would come to redefine what series television should be.With each progressing season the momentum built, and each year the show reinvented itself. As Buffy graduated from High School, to University, to working-class, to adulthood, fans got something they could never have imaged - a world where characters and stories were meaningful, complex, real, and relatable.Buffy was a smash.Season 1: Buffy must readjusts to life as the slayer, while also trying to cope with an extremely unsatisfying home life, and the many trials of High School. As the Master - an especially nefarious vampire - begins his plan of ascendance from hell, Buffy and the gang must questions their own relationships, standings, and for Buffy... her own mortality.Standout episodes: "Angel" & "Prophecy GirlSeason 2: As the forbidden love story of Buffy and Angel (Slayer and vampire) begins to unfold, the series begins to hit its stride. Characters are finding love, getting into relationships, and breaking old bonds. But as Buffy and Angel consummate their love, the consequences effect all of Buffy loved ones... especially her watcher...Standout episodes: "Passion" & "Beginning - Pt. 1&2"Season 3: After running away at the end of last season, Buffy returns to Sunnydale for one of the shows strongest years. Willow and Xander can no longer hide their affection for one another, especially from Cordelia and Oz, and Buffy is determined to make things right with a newly returned Angel. But the season's best aspect is that of the new slayer, Faith (long story). Eliza Dushku takes the character through a rollcoster of ups and downs, ultimately leading to an alliance with the corrupt Mayor of Sunnydale, who has a deadly plan for Buffy's graduation...Standout episodes: "Bad Girls" & "Earshot"Season 4: As Buffy, Willow, and Oz begin University life, Xander chooses to join the work force in a barrage short-lived minimum-wage jobs, forcing him to question what exactly he is going to do with his life. But Xander isn't the only one questioning himself in this season of major change; Buffy struggles in her relationship with Riley, and as Oz departs, Willow realizes she has found what she's always been looking for - in a classmate, named Tara. As the group grows apart, and Giles becomes a less-seen presence in their lives, Spike unites with a dangerous military group that has deadly plans for Buffy and Riley...Standout episodes: "Hush" & "Restless"Season 5: When doctors discover a tumor in Joyce's brain, and Buffy discovers the existence of a never-before-seen sister, the stage is set for one of the most dramatic and exciting seasons yet. Willow and Tara become closer, as do Xander and Anya, and Buffy drifts away from the group when responsibilities with her mother and sister leave Riley out in the cold. The season's highlight is a somber, and devastating episode entitled "The Body" in which Buffy discovers the lifeless body of her mother.Standout episodes: "The Body" & "The Gift"Season 6: After being pulled out of heaven by her friends, Buffy feels as though she's been brought into hell. As Xander and Anya near their wedding date, both neglect to mention their fears and doubts. Tara leaves Willow just as her addiction worsens, and Giles heads back to England. It's a gloomy, depressing, and very emotional season, tackling subjects such as addiction, murder, rape, neglect, and theft. Buffy herself is nearly raped, after ending a violent and explicit affair with Spike. But by the end of the season, after all is said and done, and nearly every character has been demolished, it's the death of a close friend that sends Willow over the deep end, and - in the words of Xander - "Apocalyptically crazy"...Standout episodes: "Once more, with feeling" & "Seeing Red"Season 7: Buffy begins work as a counselor to students at the newly rebuilt Sunnydale High - just as Dawn begins her stay there. Willow undergoes rehab in England, and eventually returns to Buffy's house, just as Anya and Xander try to mend their broken relationship. But the end is near, and the first evil makes its way to Sunnydale, with roots just beneath the school. Potential slayers around the world are being killed off, and Giles soon gathers the rest to Sunnydale to be trained by Buffy. Characters both new and old gather with the core group and band together to take one last stand, and go back to where it all began - The Hellmouth...Standout episodes: "Conversations With Dead People" & "Lies My Parents Told Me""Buffy The Vampire Slayer" will without a doubt go down in the books as one of - if not THE - most inventive, hilarious, heart wrenching and kick ass shows in television history.Long live the slayers
Best Disaster FIlm Ever?. The newly released double disc edition of "The Towering Inferno", with its enhanced picture and sound, not to mention the additional poignancy of its parallels to 9/11, cements its place in Hollywood history as perhaps the greatest fictional disaster film ever
Sister Shirley gave 'em her all. Shirley Chisholm ran for President of The United States in my favorite year, 1972. This fine documentary shows what a lot of guts and determination, along with real, concrete convictions, the lady had, and we can now fully appreciate what she set out to do. A real progressive candidate is such a breath of fresh air any time, and Ms. Chisholm was certainly ahead of hers. It's fun to see the vintage 1972 footage for all the wonderful fashions and hairstyles as well. I dig Shirley's suits, which matched right down to her blouse. Now that's style
Great for the classroom. I love this movie for how simple, entertaining and close to the original story it is.  I am a 6th grade teacher, and for the past two years my class has read the story and watched this movie version.  Last year, my kids said that it was much better than the gory Tim Burton one.  I am so excited to be able to buy a copy since my taped-from-TV copy is getting worn from use
Stallone? Comedy?. Yes! It's a wonderful movie and a great comedy for every age. I highly recommend it and I am still surprised by how good Sylvester Stallone is in a comedy movie! It gave me a new appreciation for him, the "gangster" films from way back and of course comedy, comedy, comedy
Exactly what I wanted. This was well worth it. Three well-planned workouts that are intense but simple enough to do. They lead you through the moves so that anyone can do it. And the variety keeps you from getting bored
GREAT MOVIE: THE TRUTH ABOUT CUBA. LOVED THIS BEAUTIFUL MOVIE! THE ACTING IS SUPERB AND THERE IS A POIGNANT BITTER-SWEET SENSE OF HUMOR BEHING THE REALITY OF IT ALL. GREAT MUSIC TOO
Really recommend. I have a closet full of exercise dvds and as I grow older I wanted something more functional in its approach.  I really like this dvd.  I am only in phase one of three but that automatically gives me a goal.  I like the fact that the exercises are not the same old same old.  I highly recommend this dvd to anyone wanting to regain a taut strong core and hates traditional floor work.
Dora Zombie. My 2 year old daughter LOVES Dora.  She watches this DVD every day, several times a day.  If you have a Dora Addict at home, he/she will love this one.  I hear my daughter say, Mommie Dora, i say "Oh Man!" LOL.  Great disc
Great portayal of the Indian and the Officer who chased him. This is a great movie... very true and sympathetic to the indians...It was a little slow at times, and I didn't like the melodramtic ending, but such are most made for television movies.  However, when there are action sequences, they are top-notch and keep you on the edge of your seat.  I think the Saloon scene near the end, with the bounty hunters where Robert Duvall gets killed is one of the best bar room shootouts in ANY movie... and that's a bold statment to make especially with the scenes in The Shootist, Lonesome Dove, Young Guns, Bad Girls, Open Range, Silverado, and others
Excellent Ab Challenge. this video challenges your abs in whole different arena than traditional ab workouts. i've got a book and another video with some similar routines, but found them hard to incorporate because i couldn't really follow what the writer/fitness expert was trying to say. this video clearly describes what you should be doing and how you should be doing it as well what you should feel. i love to train my abs and this video is definitely a keeper because it ads a lot of non-traditional ab-work that keeps a workout interesting. if sitting on the floor doing crunches is not your cup of tea, then you should without a doubt try this video
Just know that these are her previous two DVDs repackaged. As much as I enjoy these practices, I had no idea that they were two of her other DVDs.  It's very disappointing to waste money like that; it's not indicated anywhere that these were previously released.  The title is slightly different as well.  I just wanted to post this here so others wouldn't make the same mistake I did
It is about time!. This is a GREAT movie!  I would encourage EVERYONE to see this one... even if you have never even known someone with this condition, you should buy this movie.  There are not enough movies like this one out there.  We need to support this type of film making.  I don't want to give the plot of the movie away, so I won't go into great detail.  Watching this movie gives me hope.  Hope for so many people out there with this illness.  Hope that they or someone close to them will watch this and will give this diet a try.  Don't give up hope.  Thank you to whomever made this film possible.
What can I say... I loved it. I really did, although some scenes made me cringe.  All in all, an enjoyable movie
Well worth the money. I bought this set a couple of weeks ago and just finished getting through it. It is well worth the money. You won't be sorry you bought it. Funny as it gets
Funniest couple. This comedy is a classic. It is not only the plot which is based on a play by Neil Simon but the cast makes this film a comedy that you will have a hard time to stop laughing.The plot is well known- a divorced man moves in with his bachelor friend and they became roomates from hell.As I said you will laugh and laugh a lot.  Jack Lemon and Walter Matthau make a perfect duet and complement each other. Buy it
Great Movie Better Characterization. This is a great movie to watch, and the extra footage helps a lot to develop more character relationships, although the action is pretty much the same (I didn't notice any difference in the action secuencies from the original release).  The extra features are a real jewel, they let you into the world of Ancient Rome and the world of the movie.  It's a great addition to any collection.  Highest possible recommendation
Perfect Halloween movie...especially on video.... I first saw this movie in the theater,and I came out shaking.It's that creepy.For a movie that is only PG-13&lacks the usual slasher&bloody gore,this is a movie that gets inside your head.(From what I've heard,the original Japanese version is even scarier)Naomi Watts (who is also excellent in the even creepier "Mulholland Drive")plays a single mother who discovers a deadly video.At first,she thinks it's an urban legend,but she digs deeper--and finds bodies.The story depicted on the video takes her through time.She explores it with her boyfriend&her son.This movie is unusual--and even creepy--in its combination of the past&present.The evil girl,Samara,seems to be from the 19th century;her parents dress as if they were Mennonites or Amish,yet they are in the 20th century and take their daughter to a modern-day insane asylum.At first,Samara seems to be an innocent victim,yet she has terrifying effects on everyone around her---and,scariest of all,she never sleeps.Naomi Watts is an excellent actress,turning what could've been a chessy horror flick into a haunting psychological thriller that will stay with you long after you've stopped watching
BTVS  and  uber  friends. As  the   smallest  person  on  the  crew  continues  to  kick  butt  on  the  meanest  &  baddest  creatures  on  this  planet ,   assisted  by  uber  friends  .  .  .   we  other  little  people  cheer   &  hope  to  emulate  them  .  .  .   go  buffy,   go  buffy ,  go  buffy .This  series  has  the  unusual  combination  of  serious  butt  kicking  and  periodic  humor  that  has  often  had  me  falling  out  of  the  chair  laughing .After  only  a  few  viewings ,   manyyyy   older  professionals  mysteriously   start  buying  the  entire  series!Must  be  some  kind  of  nefarious  plot
Fantastic!. Admittedly, I am a sucker for an underdog who achieves excellence.  For example, though I don't care for sports, I love those baseball, basketball, football, soccer movie/true stories that abound these days.  Chris Gardner surmounted unbelievable odds in order to maintain custody  of and provide for his young son. He became a stock market phenomenon. Everytime he was knocked down, he got right back up.  Will Smith was amazing!  *SPOILERS*  The two scenes that touched me the most were when he is holding his sleeping son on the floor of a public restroom where they spent the night, and when he is given the news that he has been chosen from a group of 20 applicants who have worked and studied (for six months without pay) for Dean Witter Investment company. Once again the resiliencey of the human spirit amazes me
A classic if I ever saw one!. I've been biting at the heels to write a review of this brilliant film but, as I was when debating my Godfather review, I was hesitant for I know I could never do the movie justice.  First off, major props go to Scorsese for his brilliant direction.  It still ticks me off he hasn't won an Oscar yet.  Anyways, the film also sports brilliant acting on the parts of De Niro, Pesci and Stone, Stone standing out and nabbing the Oscar nom (and should have been win!)The film (based off true-crime novel 'Casino: Love and Honor in Las Vegas' by Nicholas Pileggi) follows friends Sam and Nicky as they work the Las Vegas gambling scene.  De Niro plays Sam 'Ace' Rothstien (based on real life gangster Frank "Lefty" Rosenthal) a man assigned by the mafia to run a casino in Las Vegas.  The first hour of the film plays like a documentary, run over with voice over explaining the mafia's involvement with gambling in the casinos.  Sam meets and falls for the sassy Ginger (Stone) who marries him mostly for money.  Sam, kind hearted as he is, actually trusts her, and this proves to be his end in many ways.  Pesci plays Nicky Santoro, Sam's backstabbing pistol of a friend, short, round and confident.  Pesci always plays the short tempered "I can't believe a guy his size would pick that battle" type character...and he always pulls it off.Over the course of the three-hour epic you watch as not only Sam's marriage and status but also the mafia's control of the gambling scene is jeopardized by events involving Sam, Nicky and Ginger.  This is a brilliant film that to me rises above 'Goodfellas' for it's as serious as it is intriguing and it never once begins to bore
see it if you haven't seen dead man walking. OK, I haven't seen dead man walking, so I'm not as mad as most people who think this is a rip-off of that movie. The movie isn't lame, it isn't very powerfull either, but it still makes a sad compelling movie. Rick chooses his first case, that of Cindy, who was convicted of a double murder. After she, not having close relatives but a brother whose also locked up, isn't intersted of being saved, he thru showing her compassion and caring, she finally realizes that there's so many things for her to do, she didn't want to die, but she didn't want to be locked up in there forever, but after that, she just doesn't want to die. So, I liked the movie, I was surprised by the ending, because it seemed that rick had done so much, but really, it just seemed that way since you get so involved in seeing how he tries so hard to save her. It shows you how some people can really change, and the dilema of having less than 30 days to save someone you've gotten so involved with
"You made me!!". A little time has passed and Miskatonic University has returned to a semblance of normalcy.  Somehow or other Doctors Herbert West (Jeffrey Combs) and Dan Cain (Bruce Abbott) are back practicing medicine and mayhem in the halls of the college hospital.  Megan Halsey, Cain's love from the first re-animator file lies dying and Cain is desperate to save her life - in a normal fashion.  West, of course, has no such compunctions.  He's down in their basement lab working on a whole new approach for gluing bits together (if you watch carefully, this film is rife with Frankenstein references).The initial phases of the film are predictable, and every bit as hokey as the first, classic film.  West scavenges parts where he may and glues them together in strange combinations.  Lt. Chapham (Claude Jones) stalks the two medicos, determined to expose them for the fiends that drove his wife insane.  And Dr. Graves (Mel Stewart) the coroner manages to revitalize Dr. Carl Hill's (David Gale) head and fix it up so that it can fly like a bat.  In the midst of all this madness, Francesca Danelli (Fabiana Udenio) struts about being beautiful and partially undressed.  Just like old times.But suddenly the film takes a deeper turn during the frantic final sequences.  Megan's head is used to complete Dr. Hill's eerie bride, and all the comedy replays the same serious questions that Mary Shelley's story raised a long time before.  Is challenging the divine power of creation within man's capacity?  What does the creator owe to one brought into existence.  West refers to his creations as useless bits of tissue, but it is clear that they are not.  The mixture of ethics and frantic humor is surprisingly engaging, and this film is almost as good as Re-animator.  Take a look if you're in the mood for something strange
Stott Essential Reformer. You cannot go wrong with any pilates video from Stott. The cueing is perfect, it is easy to follow and a very good instructional dvd for the reformer.
Dionysus. This video delivers clear cut audio and visuals that don't just show you, but draw you in and ask you to sit down. You'll accidentally learn everything you need, making the follow through as easy going as the days of the month.  When you finish watching, you'll really know how to.
better understanding of the new BSG. It is fun to see the similarities and differences between the two versions.  I recommend it highly
"Rosalia, are you sick or something?". I've never even heard of this movie before, I only rented it cause I'm on a noble quest (just like a knight!) to see every Criterion DVD.  And I'm glad I did cause this movie is hilarious!  I loved it.  I'd even buy a copy if I wasn't flat broke.Aristocrat Fefe cannot stand his wife.  Loud, annoying, crazy facial hair she grates on his nerves all day then wants to cuddle, etc all night.  Yuck!  Lucky for him though there is a 16-year-old hottie next door that is in love with him.  Yes!Now all he has to do is get rid of his wife, but since divorce is illegal he's just gonna have to kill her, but that means prison unless!  Unless he catches her in the arms of another man then he'll get less than 3 years!  But who would ever want to be with his wife?Flawlessly directed with an almost psychotic intensity I think I grinned like an idiot the entire movie.  And the performance!  Everybody was great, but Marcello Mastroianni was absolutely brilliant.  I'd laugh even when he was just standing around thinking.Double feature this with THE SEVEN YEAR ITCH.D: Pietro Germi (MY FRIENDS, SEDUCED AND ABANDONED)W: Ennio De Concini (SALON KITTY, BLACK SUNDAY)Ferdinando Cefalu - Marcello Mastroianni (LA DOLCE VITA, 8 1/2)Rosalina Cefalu - Daniela Rocca (THE SUCKER, BEHOLD A PALE HORSE)Angela - Stefania Sandrelli (1900, THE CONFORMIST)
Laugh Meter Off the Charts. I saw this ages ago, and I still remember being in pain the next day, from laughing so hard! My ribs literally ached, but it didn't stop me from gathering half a dozen friends and watching it again. Everything about it is a delight!  Ironic, farcical, satirical comedy in the hands of masters.  Everything is a joke: there are sight-gags, musical jokes, genre jests, and the movie mocks even itself, as well as the movie it's spoofing (The Prisoner of Zenda). Superbly acted, masterfully directed, by the best who could be picked for the job. Wish they'd release it again, or at least distribute it on dvd!
A underated classic. I first saw this movie when it was out on VHS.  Yes, it is that old of a movie.  From the start, I thought this movie was a classic.  Jack Dundee (played by Robin Williams) is living in a state of agony because of a dropped pass in a highschool football game.  Reno Hightower (played by Kurt Russel) was the quaterback, the only good quaterback the town ever had, who threw him that pass.  The town in the movie is a typical small town where highschool football is big.  Unfortunately for Robin Williams, that was the one chance the town had for a championship season.  Robin Williams gets the idea to replay the game with the same players on both sides. Without giving away the plot, this is one movie that is worth getting.  It will keep you amused and rooting for Williams throughout the whole movie
Mountains of Florida. A fun lighthearted movie with a nice supporting cast. The songs are ok by Elvis but a few not worthy of his time and talent. The background which shows mountains in the state of Florida is funny. A movie flick that the family can enjoy
Love the workout, DVD quality is poor!. I really love most of The Firm workouts, and this is no exception.  I usually alternate lower and upper on different days.  The lower body has lots of squats and lunges with no floor work, so I usually throw in the Hips, Thighs and Abs too.  I have really noticed a difference in just 1 month.  HOWEVER, the DVD quality is really poor, and I have noticed lots of postings complaining about the quality.  Amazon offered to either refund my money if I return them, or give me 20% of the purchase price.  I am just going to keep them and live through the defects (totally frustrating), but I wonder when they will do something about it.  I got the same poor quality with the Hips, Thighs and Abs, so I assume it is a vendor issue
The Great Adventures of Superman. The Sound of the first movie was remastered great, but the other three was not remastered.  They need to remaster the sound in to digital of the last three movie
A Good Christmas Movie That Is Based On A Book!. I love Christmas Movies and I also love to read romance books and this movie is based on a Christmas themed romance book called A Christmas Love by Kathleen Creighton though the title of the movie was changed to A Holiday to Remember. I have the book this movie was based on but haven't read it yet but I did peek at a couple of pages in the book and it looks like Carolyn and Clay didn't know each other in the book until they were adults but they changed it in this movie that they had known each other in their past and were getting married after they had finished high school but she jilted him and left him standing at the alter. Though I didn't read the book except to peek at a couple of pages and I can't really compare them I can say that the movie was good and the acting was very good especially from Connie Sellecca, Randy Travis and Rue McClannahan. The movie is about a recently divorced woman named Carolyn played by Connie Sellecca who takes her teenage daughter and moves from California back to the small Southern town she grew up in, the town she hasn't been back to since she jilted her fiance Clay at the alter and when she gets there she runs into Clay played by Randy Travis and his aunt Leona played by Rue McClannahan, a character unlike the character Blanche she played on The Golden Girls but more like a combination of Rose, Sophia and Dorothy, a down homey type like Rose but feisty like Sophia and wise like Dorothy but the only resemblance between Leona and Blanche is the southern accents. This is good movie!
Very Good Western. While this may not be among the top westerns available on DVD, it is a very entertaining film to watch.  Ann Baxter was never more sensual and attractive, and Gregory Peck was young, handsome and exhibited the qualities that would later make him one of the best leading men in Hollywood
The ultimate Truck adventure for young ones. The famous Dave of Real Wheels makes another appearance, this time as a truck diver.  This DVD is loaded with all sorts of trucks and great images of many different types.  My youngest was enthralled by the comparison of his backyard toy trucks to the real things in this entertaining video.  Great coverage of trucks towing the U.S. space shuttle, which is some very impressive footage.  Covering everything from fires trucks to garbage trucks your little ones (3-8) will not be disappointed
MARATHON MAN. The movie is still as exciting as when it was first released 30 years ago.  And yes, the tooth drilling is still there.  I had fun this time reading the technical errors on   www.indb.com  and looking for them.  Great movie
A Worthy Sequel, With Pluses and Minuses Compared To The Original. When you have a formula or gimmick movie, sequels make it hard for themselves to live up to the original and maintain creativity.  When the movie is based on characters and their development, it is easier to have a successful series.  Star Wars is one example of this; James Bond also avoided a set pattern.  The X-Men series is another example.As in the rest of the series, the theme is dealing with prejudice.  This movie has the most chilling human villain Col. William Stryker (Brian Cox), who creates a crisis for the purpose of achieving his ultimate goal:  ridding the earth of all mutants.  The good guy mutants and the bad guy mutants unite to save the mutants, but Magneto is just as ready to destroy all humans as Stryker is to destroy all mutants.  It is up to the X-Men to save the day.This movie gives fleeting glimpses of several of the characters, giving Pyro more of a role, while giving a brief scene with Kitty passing through walls.  It also gives a short introduction to Cyclops and Banshee.  The main new character is one of my two favorites, Nightcrawler (Alan Cumming, doing a wonderful job).  (My other favorite, The Beast, has to wait to Part 3.)I found this movie more exciting than the first.  However, it had a few scenes I found unnecessary, including a couple of PG-13 rated sex scenes.   I'm also uncomfortable with men fighting women, which happened in both scenes, including a lengthy battle between Jackman's Wolverine and a woman.  As a result, I would not recommend this movie as highly as the first and the third.  But that is personal preference.I am hesitant to give much details, but I found some similarity between this movie and Star Trek 2:  The Wrath Of Khan.
ELF - I Love Buddy. I like this film about Buddy a little baby that crawls into Santa's sack and is raised by the elves. But he is too big and he can't make the toys properly. He goes to look for his real daddy who is on the naughty list, but is daddy doesn't want him. Buddy is funny. He eats spaghetti with maple syrup. My mummy and daddy even laugh.I like singing the karaoke songs on the disc too and playing the games, unfortunately not all the games work on our DVD
East of Eden. What a great film! Tragic story and tragic real life - so many future great actors who met a tragic end.The extra features were very interesting and well done.
THIS IS THE DVD THAT TRAVIS FANS WERE WAITING FOR!!!!!!!. This dvd is a very faithful portrait of the energy and charismathat the band performs on stage. The image is much better than their previous dvd and the sound is a great 5.1 surround. That being said, i highly recommend that DVD for anybody who is already a Travis fan and also if you're not cause it is the best way to discover the band! You also get to go behind the scenes with the band with an interesting "shot by the band" documentary. Its a great music dvd to own!
[Really three-and-a-half out of Four] A showcase performance for the late Rodney Dangerfield!. Superb supporting cast includes SallyKellerman, Burt Young, Robert DowneyJr., Kurt Vonegut, Jr, M. Emmett Walsh,Ned Beatty (as 'Dean Martin') and thelate Sam Kineson. Older-than-middle-age-man, with shy, unsure son goes toCollege. Rodney plays Big and Tall Man'sstore magnate who enrolls at his son'sHaughty School and loosens the place uplike only he can. 'Environmentallysensitive' humour - recycled one linersabound, but if you like Rodney, and I do,you'll love the delivery. Main target isstuffy upper crust Brit. Econ. Prof., whois ALSO dating Kellerman, in one of herbest roles. Don't miss the scenes with:Sam Kineson, the late comic once marriedto Jesica Hawn, the screamer, who asksRodney why we didn't win Korea and theother is near the end; the'Triple Lindy'dive! Best we got from Rodney, thoughCaddy Shack (the first!) and Meet WallySparks also very good!
Babylon 5 - The Complete Second Season. This is the best SCI-FI series ever,with incredible SFX,a great cast,and a riveting story line.
New Villains!  29 (not 28) episodes! Batgirl!. This is a hard decision, but I have to say that this volume is better than the other two. Barbara Gordon gets introduced as Batgirl for the first time, and we meet new villains! Ra's Al Ghul, Baby-Doll, Scarface, Bane, Lock Up, are Maxie Zeus and introduced in these 29 great episodes. Mr. Freeze, The Riddler, The Penguin, Poison Ivy, Two-Face, The Mad Hatter, Harley Quinn, Killer Croc, The Clock King, and Red Claw return! This is clearly a better volume than the previous because it concludes "Batman: The Animated Series," and has cool extras. Some people, however, think that the extras (special features) are bad because they're mainly commentary. Well, I hope you buy this totally awesome 4-disc set.....packed with 609 minutes of action!!! Some episodes descriptions to get you interested are the following: Ra's Al Ghul needs Batman's help to find his daughter Talia, Batman's villains hold a trial against him, Scarface frames Catwoman, the Joker steals an atomic bomb, Red Claw plans to fire misils at London, a Batman Robot made by H.A.R.D.A.C. causes troble, Two-Face is kidnapped on his day of surgery, and Poson Ivy is blamed for the poisoning of many rich and single men. Buy this volume! If you loved THIS Batman series when you were younger (1992-1997 on Kids WB), this is the 4 disc-set to relive your childhood with a show for all ages! Buy this! You won't regret it! Buy it! Buy it!Here are the episodes the DVDs include. In parenthesis are the villains who appear in the episodes. However, just because a certain villain appears in a certain episode - that doesn't mean that he or she is the one that causes trouble in that episode and that he or she is the one that Batman ends up fighting!DISC 1:* Shadow of a Bat: Part I (Two-Face)* Shadow of a Bat: Part II (Two-Face)* Blind as a Bat (The Penguin)* The Demon's Quest: Part I (Ra's Al Ghul)* The Demon's Quest: part II (Ra's Al Ghul)* His Silicon Soul (Batman Robot)* Fire from Olympus (Maxie Zeus)DISC 2:* Read My Lips (Scarface)* The Worry Men (The Mad Hatter)* Sideshow (Killer Croc)* A Bullet for Bullock (Mysterious Person Who's After Bullock)* Trial (The Joker, Harley Quinn, Two-Face, Scarecrow, Poison Ivy, The Mad Hatter, Scarface, etc.)* Avatar (Ra's Al Ghul)* House and Garden (Poison Ivy)DICS 3:* The Terrible Trio (Three Troublesome Men)* Harlequinade (The Joker & Harley Quinn)* Time Out of Joint (The Clock King)* Catwalk (Catwoman & Scarface)* Bane (Rupert Thorne & Bane)* Baby-Doll (Baby-Doll)* The Lion and the Unicorn (Red Claw)DISC 4:* Showdown (Ra's Al Ghul)* Riddler's Reform (The Riddler)* Second Chance (Two-Face & ???)* Harley's Holiday (Harley Quinn ONLY)* Lock-Up (Lock-Up)* Make 'Em Laugh (The Joker ONLY)* Deep Freeze (Mr. Freeze)* Batgirl Returns (Catwoman)SPECIAL FEATURES:* "Gotham's New Knight" -- Show creators talk about Batgirl.* Audio commentary on "Read My Lips."* Video commentary on "House and Garden."* Audio commentary on "Harlequinade."* Trailers/Previous.* Spoken Languages: English, French, Spanish.* Subtitles: English, French, Spanish
Motivation at its best...... Andy Andrews was able to bring  to me the words I needed to hear to remotivate myself.  THE SEVEN DECISIONS is now a part of my daily life.  Thank you Andy for a renewing of my spirit.
Better than the original. I'm glad I waited for the 4 disc set. It's the best eve
The Buddhist Way. Must say that I've been waiting for a film like this for a long time. Nothing fancy, just beautiful, elegant, and detailed. Most of the time I was not aware that I was watching a film. It was that real. The film may have a simple look, but the philosophy/attitude that helps the family to come through the crisis is not. The Buddhist ideas revealed in the film are not some new age bull but sincere and inspiring. And I find the ending extremely powerful yet soothing. This is a great film made by a filmmaker who knows the medium really, really well
The man from Taos. In the 1970, NBC had a Sunday mystery movie wheel. Columbo, McCloud, McMillian and Wife were the staples. After its successful openning it spawn Quincy and later Hec Ramsey (a Western mystery series which was the last series Richard Boone did for TV and not available yet on DVD!). This also spawned a Wednesday mystery wheel which didnt fare as good.McCloud took his cue from Clint Eastwood's Coogan Bluff (1968).Eastwood was offered to play Coogan for the future NBC Mystery Movie Wheel , but turn down doing another TV  series.Universal revamp Coogan to the talents of Dennis Weaver. And McCloud was born. This fish outta water detective who spoke country wisdom, using his country ways and laid-back approach to nab the bad guys and never gave up. The show was a hit for both Weaver and NBC. McCloud stayed with Columbo and Millian to the end of the series in 1977.McCoud was assigned to the detective bureau headed by Chief Peter B. Clifford. One of the highlight of the show was McCloud was a foil to his chief, played richly by the late  J.D. Cannon.I am glad this show made in to DVD. However put more McCloud out soon. I want the John Denver episode from season five. Where most of Denver's dialog is the word "Far out!"The addition of a McMillian and wife episode is NICE, but why use one that is on the McMillian DVD set? They should have released a show from third or fourth season. And there isnt a Dennis Weaver interview or audio commentary on this collectionSo CHIEF, adios and lets Universal DVD fill the McCloud  well back up soonBennet Pomerantz, AUDIOWORLD
Loads of Fun. This movie is loads of fun! It is truly a "little engine that could"! It is easy to point finger and knock down points for a film because it is low budget and stuff, but there really isn't much room to do so with this one. Sideline Secrets takes a few seeds and manages to plant an entire orchard. What I am saying is the fact that this film does best with what it has and in the end it comes out as a true winner. The actors are great. I think we will be seeing some of them in bigger projects in the near future as they clearly have a passion and comfort for what they do. The story is very dark. It touches upon a lot of controversial subject matter involving molestation, rape, physical abuse, alcoholism, and more. But, dont get too frightened, although much of the subject matter is serious, the movie knows how to tie it all into a somewhat complicated yet very entertaining story. The romantic story at the core in nice to see. I am glad to see movies like this climbing the charts. It has reached the #2 bestseller spot on another popular online retail store. For me it is no wonder why. Sideline Secrets truly is a gem to be found for many.
2nd time around love. if at first you don't succeed, catch love the 2nd time around. connie seleca and randy travis make for a great christmas movie
Teen Struggle & Love. For Keeps where shall I start.  For Keeps is one of those 80's movies that would fit perfect on The Lifetime Network.  Molly Ringwald stars as Darci Elliot and Randall Batinkoff stars as Stan Bobrutz (intentional hard to spell and pronoucne name, it is the butt of several jokes in the film).  The two high school sweethearts are sent fast forward into adult hood when Darci becomes pregnant.  They struggle to stay together.  I think this film is great because it shows young people just how hard things can be when you introduce a baby into the picture.  It is not one of those happily ever after stories, Stan and Darci go through some real hard times.  The movie itself takes a real awkward turn towards the end with Darci pushing Stan to pursue his dreams without his knowledge, but the movie will entertain those in 6th grade and up.  Its a bit pricey but it is good for educational use and for the 80's fan building their collection
Peter Falk - The In-Laws. This is a great movie. Much of the humor is so subtle you may miss it on your first viewing. A Classi
A Car Crash, Canines and Consequences Examined in Irritu's Viscerally Powerful Feature Film Debut. If like me, you were dazzled by this year's "Babel", you will likely be as curious as I was to check out the first film in director Alejandro Gonzalez Irritu's trilogy about death. Similar in narrative structure to "Babel", this viscerally shattering 2000 movie carries three overlapping stories tied together by a defining car accident. Written with dramatic precision by Guillermo Arriaga (who later wrote the other two films in the trilogy, "21 Grams" and "Babel"), all three take place within the different social strata of Mexico City, and as the title implies (English translation: "Love's a Bitch"), dogs are intriguingly pivotal to each story. Also like "Babel", the various interconnections among the stories do not come across as contrived but rather as emotional resonant in a gradually revelatory manner. Even though the movie runs an epic length of 153 minutes, it consistently holds your attention.The first plotline, "Octavio and Susana", is about a love triangle that occurs between young Octavio, his abusive older brother Ramiro and Ramiro's wife Susana. Dog fighting is common sport in their downscale neighborhood, and the brothers own a rottweiler that's a natural aggressor in the fight pit. Octavio sees the dog as his meal ticket to steal Susana away from Ramiro and escape to Juarez. The second story, "Daniel and Valeria", focuses on Daniel, a married, guilt-ridden TV producer who buys a fancy new condo for him to live with his tempestuous supermodel girlfriend Valeria. Their relationship unravels in light of the car accident, and further complications occur when her little dog is trapped underneath the floorboards. The third story, "El Chivo and Maru", is about former political revolutionary El Chivo who has years ago left his family and became a hit man for hire. Living in squalor with a herd of homeless dogs, he is recruited by a businessman to kill his partner, both of whom turns out to be brothers. The integration of these stories is handled with supple dexterity in a non-linear fashion that allows the viewer to peel off the layers of the characters in order to understand their common dilemmas.Unbelievably, this powderkeg of a film represents Irritu's feature film debut as a director, and his confidence and audacity are felt throughout although the third episode seems too deliberate a pastiche of "Pulp Fiction". He has assembled a superb cast with Emilio Echevarra the standout as the grizzled El Chivo, a scarifying vagrant who reveals himself to be a troubled soul who is the only one who successfully escapes his trying existence. In his first major role, Gael Garca Bernal portrays Octavio with escalating emotional fervor; and as Susana and Ramiro, Vanessa Bauche and Marco Prez provide powerful support. Together, they generate a palpable sense of imminent violence throughout their episode. Goya Toledo makes a vivid impression as Valeria, fully capturing her spoiled character's misplaced sense of entitlement, while Alvaro Guerrero affectingly humanizes the put-upon Daniel's increasing regret. Just as he would prove later with "The Motorcycle Diaries", "Brokeback Mountain" and "Babel", Rodrigo Prieto showcases superbly evocative cinematography that is in keeping with the emotional shadings of the story.The 2001 DVD provides a surprising number of extras beginning with an informative, often meticulous commentary track by Irritu and Arriaga (spoken in Spanish and subtitled in English). There are three quick featurettes. The first is a six-minute short that shows how the numerous dogs used in the film were trained and protected during the production. Considering how realistically violent the dog fighting scenes are, I find this short helpfully reassuring. The second is the standard, making-of featurette, about fifteen minutes long. Even though Irritu seems to be promoting the film as well as explaining the genesis of it, there is good behind-the-scenes footage, including some interesting table readings from the cast. This leads to one quick short about the staging of the car accident itself. Also included are about a dozen deleted scenes, totaling about fifteen minutes, which actually help provide context in understanding some of the characters' motivations. There are also three music videos from the movie's soundtrack, which is a dramatically effective mix of Mexican and Spanish rock-rap tracks
Walken, Talkin'. Great Comedy, decent drama, flawed crime thriller...Though the above is true, we throw into the fold one Mr. Christopher Walken and low and behold we get greatness... You put him in a film and it seem every other character on screen is humbled by him. And here is no exception, I mean even though he spends most of the film tied to a chair, there isn't one moment when he doesnt seem dangerous.Denis Leary also excels, though he's hardly playing against type, as the Angry, Ranting, Irish American. The young cast are also pretty solid, Jay Mohr and Johnny Galecki in particular...The DVD is great, for such a small movie they've done a really good Job... there's nice little video introductions by O'Fallon to most of the Special Features (The Alternate endings are particularly interesting) a decent Commentary, and a couple of other little novelty extras.You then Take into account that it's less than $10 and you got yourself a solid DVD
Intriguing & Captivating. The characters, the scenery and the storyline briefly swept me away to another place
Classic Cronenberg. David Cronenberg's "Scanners" was the first film I saw by this imaginative director. Cronenberg's film may lack the big budget of a Hollywood production but what it lacks in money it makes up for in an imaginative well executed story. This tackles the same story (essentially although it should be noted that Cronenberg had the idea well before "The Fury" release)as Brian DePalma' "The Fury" and while it lacks true star presence in the lead role the supporting cast more than makes up for it. It's not a perfect film (some of the performances by the actors come across very flat)and it lacks the sure hand that guided "The Fly", "Dead Ringers" and "Videodrome" but the fire and intelligence is there.Cameron Vale (Stephen Lack)believed to be schizoidphrenic because he constantly hears other voices in his head is recruited by Paul Ruth (Patrick McGoohan) to help track down a man named Darryl Revok(Michael Ironside. Revok like Vale is a scanner--someone who can read other people's other thoughts but it seems that a scanner like Revok can also be used as a weapon. Revok has other plans--he doesn't just want to be the weapon but use his skills to rule. Vale allies himself with Kim Obrist the only person he finds he can trust in this war between Ruth's company Consec and Revok.Stephen Lack (as noted elsewhere)has a complete LACK of presence in the role. Luckily McGoohan and Ironside more than make up for his weak performance with strong, eccentric and memorable performances. O'Neill is only slightly better and appears to be in this film only so it could get U.S. distribution after the success of "The Summer of '42". Regardless of the film's deficits Cronenberg's thoughtful visual and gory film (hey a head explodes)demonstrates his flowering ability as a director.The transfer looks pretty good in this transfer to DVD while there aren't any extras beyond the movie trailer, the film itself comes unedited. A commentary track from Cronenberg would have been nice but given that this was released in 2001 on DVD and this probably isn't a huge seller (more a cult film now)I'm not surprised that it comes so bare bones. Still the price is right.
A pretty good mystery. Okay, we understand that a Scooby-Doo mystery is not going to be in the same league as a Citizen Kane mystery. But Scooby has good movies and bad movies just like any other Mega-Star. I'm pleased to say that Where's My Mummy is in the former category.Velma is assisting an archaeological dig in Egypt (on the Sphinx no less) when she finds a mysterious necklace which could be the key to Cleopatra's lost treasure. I've never heard of such treasure, but for the sake of the movie, we'll pretend it exists. The rest of the Mystery Inc. gang turn up to visit her but the site is promptly taken over by Amelia von Butch (Christine Baranski), a gun-ho Lara Croft-type and her band of cohorts.Despite warnings of ancient curses she forces the Mystery Inc. gang and an obnoxious reality-TV host (Jeremy Piven) to enter the tomb with her to solve it's secrets and find the treasure. Immediately setting-off traps, Shaggy and Scooby are separated from the rest of the gang (not on purpose for a change) and get involved in their own mystery of a deranged Hotep (Ron Pearlman) and his followers who worship a strange God known as Scoobis and his servant Shagman.Both stories are kept lively and entertaining until they merge into one. There's not a moment of boredom and, as usual, a couple of cool original songs too. But sadly, no new version of Scooby-Doo, Where Are You at all. To compare it with similar films like Indiana Jones, Tomb Raider or even The Goonies would be pointless. Yes, we've seen this kind of thing before but animation is a medium that present more opportunities than live-action and there's loads of inventive set-pieces and imaginative locations that have become the standard of modern Scooby-Doo outings.And what do you know? It even manages to provide a rather surprising twist at the end. We know it's far-fetched and unbelievable as always, but it ties together pretty well, thus making the film a little bit better a little bit more.As long as their is imagination behind this franchise, Scooby-Doo could go on forever. He may deliver a few duds from time to time (Monster of Mexico was extremely crap after all) but he still a very important character in modern animation and will always come out on top if we believe in him.Or am I taking this too seriously?The movie was storyboarded and framed at 1.78:1 but the DVD is unfortunately full frame. The Dolby 5.1 sound design is quite lively though. And the extras are minimal and aimed at the kids
Television classic. Thats right,A CLASSIC!I just loved the Strangers with Candy tv show and I own both season 1 and 2 on DVD.All that's left to say is,BRING ON SEASON THREE ON DVD!!!!!
One of Altman's Finest Films. Barely released in 1984, director Robert Altman's "Secret Honor" is an unheralded masterpiece -- and this Criterion Collection DVD has been long overdue. Fueled by Philip Baker Hall's bravura performance as Richard Nixon, Altman's cinematic translation of the Donald Freed and Arnold M. Stone play remains among his finest films. Ironically, this fictional portrait of Tricky Dick is more revealing and authentic than director Oliver Stone's overwrought "Nixon."  Highly recommended.
TWICE THE BILL, TWICE THE KILL. I sometimes joke that, to me, Kill Bill, Volume 1 is the second-greatest movie of all time and that Kill Bill, Volume 2 is the greatest movie ever. On a serious note, both volumes are excellent releases and do not disappoint, especially for Tarantino fans who were hoping for intense elements of Pulp Fiction.Kill Bill, Volume 2 picks up with Black Mamba's rampage for redemption and revenge for the murder of her fiance and those closest to him. From start to finish is action in sync with brilliant dialogue that is mixed in with occasional flashes of humor.Beatrix Kiddo, aka Black Mamba, as played by Uma Thurman, is a woman on a mission, a kind of mission where no one in this sequel can truly assist her. Besides her weapons, there is no support or assistance that she will be receiving in order to possess the physical and psychological edges that will be needed in order to overcome what were her nemeses.Some very scary situations and predicaments are myriad throughout, but much inspiration can be drawn from witnessing the outcomes resulting from Beatrix Kiddo's firm resolve to not be overcome by fear and panic in the worst of situations, perilous or not.Great music accompanies the fighting sequences that Kiddo must endure and the haphazardous journey travels that have to be undertaken. Charlie Feathers' Can't Hardly Stand It and three Ennio Morricone classics from movies past, namely Il Tramonto, L'Arena, and A Silhouette of Doom are aptly mixed in, along with other great musical arrangements and reproductions that unanimously make both Kill Bill Volumes not only among the greatest in motion pictures but also in movie soundtracks.Again, great action, great dialogue, and great music combine along with a great cast that only Quentin Tarantino could amalgamate for this awesome, winning formula
A Classic. Still awesome after what, 100 plus times viewing?  This film was panned by virtually all of the critics and has yet remained a classic for nearly 25 years!  Pacino is simply brilliant, the casting is superb and even the tawdry photography and music (at times) is delicious.  The critics never could quite get over the controversial chainsaw scene and the 160 some odd uses of the "F word" and therefore slammed the movie as a whole.  But in doing so, they missed what millions of others haven't: a great film with great acting and pacing.  If you haven't already, see for yourself whether the violence and language is obscene and over-the-top, or whether it fits the movie nearly perfectly in its context.  Oh, and Michelle Pfeiffer is hot.
W-H-I-P-L-A-S-H. Folks, this movie is alright, it's not THAT BAD.  Probably the best-worded review I've read for "Ken Park" so far is on IMDB.COM.  I think someone named "peedur" wrote it or something.  Not that I agree with him 100%, but the good that can be taken out of this film is well expressed in his critique.Look, FCC and MPAA, you don't want me to see something, then for Chrissake don't ban it.  That just makes me want to watch it even more.  In all honesty, I don't know if this film should be banned here in America.  "Kids" and "Bully" made it through okay, even into theaters.  When it comes to teens and sexuality, "Ken Park" might be Clark's most truthful presentation of it.  Now I know that's gonna send many parents tearing their hair out, and screaming, "What can I do?  How can I save them from this?"  Well... you can't.If you don't want to believe that any of what happens in "Ken Park" is real, then you'd better just not watch it altogether.  Parents, the heartbreaking truth is that almost all of what happens in here has happened several times and will continue to happen unabated.  I've never lived in Visalia, CA, but have spent ample time there.  However, I was born and spent the first 19 years of my life in Fresno (the two are remarkably similar and close geographically).  Same stagnant lifestyle, same tendency to listen to punk and hip-hop, same heat, etc.I appreciate Clark's effort to humanize these kids this time; none of them are what I would call "bad."  "Kids" made kids look bad.  "Ken Park" makes kids look bored, which is what they really are.  Don't scream to the heavens, asking why they would think to do such things, that's nonsense.  Why do they smoke dope, drink ad nauseum, jerk off and have frivolous sex...?  Because there - is - nothing - else - to - do - there.  Gotta alleviate the boredom somehow.  For instance, when the devout Father scorns his daughter with the Bible... referring to her as a beast and a whore...  nope, she just a teenager.  All teenagers are beasts and whores because YOU can't think of any other label for it.Did I personally have sex with supple young teenage Filipino girls in their parents' Catholicism-adorned house?  Actually, right in the parents' bed.  I was only 17 at the time.  I've challenged my father to a fight, I've gotten impatient with grandparents for taking too long a turn playing a game, I've sat around that living room watching MTV while hitting the bong and bitching about how I couldn't wait to leave the wretched town.  I've done it; it happens.Never jerked off to womens' tennis while asphyxiating myself with a robe belt, but...It's areas like these that Clark starts to lose me.  There is much more male nudity in "Ken Park" than female, so don't be expecting some wild teenaged orgy.  There is not even that much actual sex in the movie.  In fact, if the main characters in this film were but... 4 years older... I guarantee you this would not be banned here in America.Visalia has - NEVER - looked as good as it does in "Ken Park" and never will again.  It is photographed and directed by two ace DPs after all, so the screen composition, lighting and shading are all luminous and... for lack of a better adjective: warm.  As in hospitable.  The film looks more expensive than it is.My favorite scenes are actually the opening scene and the VERY final scene.  Without these strong bookends, I'd easily knock off another half-star.  I personally detest Harmony Korine (the kid is just a pretentious skater prick that thinks he's Tarantino to the 12th power), however I do like this script... because it's ripped right out of the headlines.Parents, this is not every teenager.  It's really not.  But it is a lot of them.  "Ken Park" does not seek to illuminate the teenaged psyche en masse, but to offer examples of what we think is tragic and squalid... to be rather mundane existence.  With the rather few exceptions of "shock for shock's sake" scenes, it deserves more credit than it's been given.  Clark's best film is still "Bully", but "Ken Park" has its merits.Only for those with less discriminating tastes, obviously.  Tread lightly, but if you like your cinema to ignore boundaries (a la Miike Takashi) this one'll send you past the envelope.3.5 stars, but I'll round up for audacity
FINALLY ON DVD-YEAH!!. After hiring the movie'Perfect' so many times, after the film I would always see this trailer for the movie 'Secret Admirer'. So for many years I always wanted to see it until finally a couple of years ago I got my wish, it got played on TV. Since then it's been played a couple more times and I must say, I dig this film. Sure it's not the absolute best film you will ever see, but there's something about it that charms me to love it. C.Thomas Howell, Lori Loughlin and Kelly Preston are good in their roles. It ones of those movies that will always be in my collection of favourite films. Plus I love watching the traile
People Will Talk. Very nice movie, no flaws. The delivery was perfect, as it was a Valentine gift and it arrived that morning. Thanks Amazon
This movie was great. I love Tom Green, and I think he is a brilliant man. The movie actually makes a lot more sense if you watch the commentary, which is a whole form of entertainment in itself. Apparently a lot of the scenes in the movie were based on real life events. This is one of my faves
Moment of Truth. *** This comment may contain spoilers ***"Manhunter" (1986) directed by Michael Mann - is a masterpiece, pure and simple. It took me five times but I finally realized it. I see it as the best adaptation of the favorite book written on the subject of serial killers and investigation of their crimes. I also discovered William Blake and his fascinating art, including the painting which gave the book its title, "Red Dragon", thanks to Mr. Harris. Michael Mann certainly read the book "Red Dragon" before he started to work on the movie and he was able to get inside of it as well as the book's main character, Will Graham was able to get inside a murderer's mind. The scene where Will Graham (William Peterson) finds out who the killer is makes me shiver every time I watch the movie. I can not recall another "moment of truth" as powerful and convincing as this one. It is more powerful that the similar scene in "The Sound Of The Lambs" where Clarise Starling figures out who and where the "Buffalo Bill" can be. Michael Mann took his time understanding how important the scene was and it received a royal treatment in the movie. I used to be disappointed that Mann cut the book's very impressive ending but after many viewings I think I understand why he did it. For me, the whole movie was a build up for the "moment of truth" scene and after Graham figured who the murderer was making us the participants of the process, it did not really matter (at least for me) how they were going to catch Francis "Red Dragon" Dolarhyde.
Up close and personal with Sarah McLachlan. If you are a hard-core fan or a casual listener of Sarah McLachlan's work you will not be disappointed with this DVD. The sound quality is very good and you get the feel of a intimate night club rather than a concert for thousands. Sarah's voice is as always, lyrical, seductive and passionate. A special suprise is Paula Cole showing up for a duet singing "Elsewhere". Also, an accustic version of "Possession" is particularly haunting and beautiful.
Unforgettable Imagery, Sights and Sounds. William Holden may be the star of the film but Alec Guinness leaves an indelible image as the inimitable British Colonel Nicholson and Sessue Hayakawa as the powerfully weak Colonel Saito. William Holden's character and predicament almost seem secondary to the central plot. The true substance of the story lies in the conflict and irony between Alec Guinness and Sessue Hayakawa and the morality of British soldiers building a bridge for the enemy to the best of their abilities. The bridge is central to the plot and it takes on symbolic meaning as both a monument to British ingenuity and the inept weakness of their Japanese captors. Malcolm Arnold's score is most memorable for his use of Kenneth Alford's "Colonel Bogey March." This full is full of indelible sights and sounds. The unique look of the bridge structure over the River Kwai, the "Colonel Bogey March" and the scene where Alec Guinness falls on the plunger of the detonator box rigged to blow up the bridge have lived with me ever since I saw this film as a kid. That was a longtime ago, a time well remembered that only exists in my memory now. Adapted from Pierre Boulle's novel the screenplay (credited to Boulle) was written by the blacklisted Carl Foreman and Michael Wilson, who received their Academy Awards, posthumously, in 1985
Delightful Romantic Comedy. Trick is one of the better gay romantic comedies that's come out in the past few years. Christian Campbell and J P Pitok are both good as the shy, aspiring composer and the hunky go go boy. I got this movie because I saw a clip on the web of Pitok dancing and thought I'd watch the whole movie and am very glad I did. Clinton Leung is a riot as a vengeful drag queen and Tori Spelling almost steals every scene she's in as a wonderfully bad singer/actress who is selfish and overbearing and doesn't really realize it. I don't remember his name, but the guy who plays Campbell's writing teacher is hilarious when he sings "Te me gusta mi pinga" at a piano bar, then has a heartfelt reunion with his ex-lover, thwarting the new lover's tryst at his apartment. The two guys have a very hard time finding a place to get together during the night, and the whole adventure ends with a lovely moment on a street corner in the morning light with a touching goodbye and a promise that they'll get together in the future. I'm still waiting for the second date with the two. Campbell is an accomplished stage actor and pretty good singer, as evidenced by his star turn in Reefer Madness and Pitok showed his range as a sleazy boyfriend of Claire's on Six Feet Under a season or two ago. All in all, this is a delightful movie with a few slow spots here and there, but they're easily overlooked
4.9/5. A 4.9/5... Looky there! Almost a perfect score, but not quite as good as Cowboy Bebop. A bit of an odd way to start a review of, huh? Yeah, I know. Heh heh. Anyway, off to the review. Wolf's Rain is about a pack of Wolves searching for the flower maiden to lead them to Paradise/Rakuen/Heaven, and along their dramatic adventures, they run into a lot of stuff they definitely wish they hadn't. If you've read the Bible, you'll see something in here taken from the Bible, and that is: when the moon turns red, the earth and all of it's life shall soon perish. Now, wait a second... I should tell you all of the Wolves names, shouldn't I? Kiba, who is the leader; Hige, the follower; Tsume, the aggressive, hard-headed, and seemingly cold one (yet, he is a good hearted wolf/person under all of that); Toboe, the pup; Cheza, the flower maiden, who will take them to Paradise; Blue, a hunter's half wolf/half dog. I also assume I should introduce the other lead characters. Well, who is left? Cher & Hubb, the divorced husband and wife; Quent, the middle aged wolf hunter, as well as Blue's owner, who thinks wolves are evil, because his family was killed by a pack of wolves; Darcia, the evil wolf. Those are really all of the main characters of the story. They are a pack of really interesting and excellent characters. This is about all I can really tell you, and you'll have to find out of the rest for yourself by watching it. All 30 Episodes of Action, Adventure, and Drama easily make this one the greatest Animes, or as I've said before, one of the greatest things, period. If you like Witch Hunter Robin's dark and moody settings, and a kind of Cowboy Bebop & Trigun feel, then I suggest you at least give this Series a try. I'd say give it a try, anyway, but, you may not listen to me, thus, the reason why I told you of what it is a feel like. And when I said "like Witch Hunter Robin's dark and moody settings," I don't mean it's like Witch Hunter Robin, just has the same dark and moody styling. Just telling you that because some people out there will be saying: "EW! I don't like Witch Hunter Robin at all, so I'm not trying this Anime." I said it's like Bebop and Trigun, and if you don't like them, and don't wish to give anything else like these Animes a try, then I must say, your loss. As for my age rating for the Series, here it is: 17+/NC-17 (Graphic Violence, Gore, Profanity, and Adult Complex Themes). A word of warning: prepare for major sadness near the end, and at the end of the Series. Thanks for reading my review(s). I'll probably be writing some more reviews soon. God bless
Is it a crime to have bad taste?. After reading the DVD cover, I was prepared for another "Veda" in MILDRED PIERCE. However, the grown-up Laurel Dallas (Anne Shirley) was quite the opposite -- compassionate and self-sacrificing. In fact, there was a competition for virtues between mother and daughter.Stella Martin Dallas (Barbara Stanwyck) grew up in an underprivileged neighborhood. Her vehicle for rising above her social status is admired factory executive Stephen Dallas (John Boles). In one of the few nice garments she's ever seen in, she wins his affection and they wed. They have a daughter and Stephen suffers a financial reversal. A long marital separation follows.In speech and demeanor, Stella never really transcends her humble beginnings. Though raising Laurel alone, she sews beautiful clothes for her daughter and throws parties to please her. Nevertheless, personal grooming and choice of friends leaves something to be desired. People begin to ostracize her and her daughter -- leading to some lonely parties.As Laurel grows up, she visits her father, who by now is seeing a widow who has inherited a fortune. There is a stark contrast between the palatial estate there and the small apartment back home. During Daddy excursions, Laurel is exposed to well-bred friends and fun activities.It becomes apparent to Stella that, she herself is an obstacle to Laurel's future happiness and success. Despite mutual devotion, Stella makes the ultimate sacrifice to give her daughter the best life.Stanwyck demonstrates remarkable versatility in her role as STELLA DALLAS. She not only melds genuine affection and crass, but despite her beauty must appear to age poorly -- gaining weight and wearing garish clothing. At times you don't know whether to laugh or feel sorry for her. Shirley conveys a surreal devotion lacking from any child with which I grew up. Cloth hankerchief recommended
Classic!!! Movie: 5/5 - DVD: 4/5. This is one of those movies with high replay value (pretty rare nowadays); you can watch it over and over again and still enjoy and laugh at the same scenes! I already owned this movie on VHS, but a movie like this is worth having in your DVD collection. Of course, the quality on DVD is better than VHS, but it's even better because it's "anamorphic" -- excellent quality than some ordinary, standard widescreen movie (because of that, this movie looks recently made than a 1995 movie). Moreover it has superb audio Dolby Digital 5.1 surround sound! If you have 5.1 speakers, the scene with Dionne (Cher's best friend) accidently getting on the freeway is where the surround sound truly enhances the experience: you can hear all the cars and bikes driving by just as if you were in the car with Dionne, Cher, and Murray. (Speaking of which, that's one of my favorite scenes! It really did an excellent job capturing the fear of getting on the freeway. I mean, it's not too far-fetched; it could really happen with all the crazy drivers in LA! The truck, the bikers, the old lady giving the middle finger... hilarious. Anyhow...)I'm glad they gave this DVD a makeover instead of leaving with some instant VHS-DVD transfer with only a movie trailer. On this new edition, they have really enjoyable special features too.-----------------------------------------------------"The Class of '95 - A look at the cast, then and now" (about 18 minutes long):- It's really cool being able to see how the cast looks like now! Christian (the gay guy) seemed like he gained some weight. Josh looked like he aged; he looked different, maybe because of the lighting or makeup off the set. Oh, in the DVD, it mentioned Dionne was 28 (that old?!) at the time when she did the movie! To me, she still looked young in the interviews. What was truly disappointing, though, was how Alicia, the main star of the movie, was not in the present interview! However, there is footage of her getting interviewed back in '95. I was also disappointed how there was absolutely no commentary! Having commentary for a DVD, especially if they say interesting things in it, is actually something I enjoy having. Those two reasons are pretty much why I'm giving this DVD a 4 star. Also, the main menu has a video background, which is nice, but the chapter selection are just plain stills. Anyway, continuing on with the other special features..."Creative Writing" (about 10 minutes long)- how the movie got started."Fashion 101" (about 11 minutes long)- shows the fashion in the movie. It's so funny how this movie made fun of the baggy pants (which pretty much died now)."Language Arts" (about 8 minutes long)- explains the vocabulary used on Clueless (eg: "betty" meant an attractive female.)"Suck 'N Blow: A Tutorial" (about 3 minutes long)- pretty much shows how difficult that game was because the card was too heavy to suck for the actors."Driver's Ed" (about 4 minutes long)- talks about the Dionne freeway scene."We're History"(about 9 minutes long)- pretty much the final thoughts from the cast.Teaser Trailer (about 2 minutes long)Theatrical Trailer(about 3 minutes long)-----------------------------------------------------They couldn't have found a better cast; Alicia as Cher was perfect and the rest are really likable too (well, except for Elton -- the movie did a good job making me hate him. And Brittany Murphy was also my second least favorite character (she really got the bitchy attitude down calling Cher "A virgin who can't drive.")There's no dull moment in the movie at all. It's smooth transition throughout the movie. So many funny scenes (eg: Cher taking her driving test). The mood, cinematography, the soundtrack is all great. Believe it or not, I am a guy (straight) and I'm not ashamed to say "Clueless" is one of my favorite movies. Alicia really made the "blonde girl" look good!If you enjoyed this movie, I would also recommend "Never Been Kissed" starring Drew Barrymore. Apparently, the costume designer for "Never Been Kissed" was the same from this movie
Last 5 WrestleMania's Have Alot Of Hit & Misses. Review:Basically, WrestleMania's 16 through 20 have had alot more hits & misses than the previous WrestleMania's.16 - "Quanity over quality" was the mentallity for this WrestleMania as they had a bunch of wrestlers & matches that would only qualify for Sunday Night Heat or RAW...but had no business being at WrestleMania like Godfather & D'Lo vs. BossMan & Bull, T&A vs. Snow & Blackman, Kat vs. Terri.  Besides, the Terri & Kat match...were wasn't one single one on one match.  The memorable matches from here are the WWF title Fatal Four Way, Intercontinental & European triple threat match, and the Tag Team title ladder match.17 - The apex of the WWF Attitude era as they WWF hasn't produced a car or event like this to date.  The only bad matches were the Chyna vs. Ivory squash match & the European title match.  And the memorable matches from here were Angle vs. Benoit, Austin vs. Rock, McMahon family street fight, and the TLC match.18 - Again, not a bad match here but they all a step under the previous years WrestleMania.  Hogan vs. Rock was the real standout here & overshadowed every other match on the card (including the so-called main event between HHH & Jericho) but my second favorite had to be Undertaker vs. Flair with a special appearence by "The Enforcer" Arn Anderson doing the classic spinebuster on Taker.19 - Again, another WrestleMania full of standard average matches and the only thing garbage here was the Miller Lite catfight girls segment that bumped Kane & RVD off the card.  The memorable matches here McMahon vs. Hogan (just for the history behind it), Brock vs. Angle, HBK vs. Jericho and the final Rock vs. Austin match.20 - The final installment & has three memorable matches here as Guerrero vs. Angle, Benoit finally winning the World Title, the Rock & Sock reunion vs. Evolution (the interaction between Flair & Rock is priceless).  Cena vs. Big Show, Christian vs. Jericho, and the Womens title match were average. Other matches were basically just time fillers (Crusierweight open, both Tag Team title matches, evening gown match), didn't live up to all the hype (Undertaker's return against Kane was basically a squash match), and matches there were just horrible (Brock vs. Goldberg...not even Austin could save this one).Overall, a good collection for those who didn't get into WWE until the Attitude era but if you've been around longer that than...this isn't the best section of WrestleMania's to look at.Responding To Some Questions:"Why release WrestleMaina's that are already on dvd?"They released WrestleMania's already on DVD because all the WrestleMania's before 19 are now out of print due to the lawsuit from the World Wildlife Federation.  WWE can't use the logo they used during the attitude era & sell any new material featuring the logo.  And it's pointless to release the old WrestleMania's individually with the new logo scratched out & everything since nobody will be rushing out to get an old WrestleMania with most of it being edited."hey guys i was wondering ive been trying to get answers all day but can somebody tell me if anybodys music is edited in 2000-2004 or themes does it come its in orginal case does it have its disc art i was wondering before i buy it today im buying vol .4 cause i loved these years so somebody tell me thank u so much guys"After watching them all, I'll tell you that...1) YES, some of the themes have been editied & replaced.16 = Steve Blackman & Al Snow; T&A; The Kat17 = The PPV theme song was Limp Bizkit's "My Way"...that's replaced with another song; Undertaker (he had Limp Bizkit at the time); some wrestlers for the gimmick battle royal18 = Undertaker (Limp Bizkit); Edge (he had Rob Zombie at the time); nWo; Trish Stratus (they replaced her old theme with her current one)19 = Victoria; Stacy Keibler; Hulk Hogan ("Voodoo Child" replaced with "Real American")20 = Garrison & Cade; Stacy Keibler; Dudley Boyz; Jesse Ventura (if you even remember his theme); Victoria.  They also edited out the entrances of Bobby Heenan & Ultimo Dragon since they slipped on the stage.2) These all come together in the type of casing they used for the Ric Flair, Wrestlers Of The 80's, and Bret Hart DVD's but the disc have no cover art since they're double sided.  Hope this helps
Unique plot. This a film where two men meet on the train and one suggests that they exchange murders.  As I do not want to spoil it for those who have not seen it yet I will not elaborate.  I will say this though- this film is a masterpiece with a very unique plot and masterly directed by Alfred Hitchcock.  The actors give a excellent perfomance, especially the antihero Bruno. Do not miss it
Need more Rockford - NOW!. What is the hold up in getting Season Three released?  Who do I need to bribe at Universal to move this up the list!  It's a tragedy that we had to wait 6 months between Seasons 1 and 2, why have we not even seen a preorder for Season 3 yet?!  In the meantime, I'm stuck Tivo-ing the butchered versions off WGN..
A Study in Charactor Developement. Episodes 11-15. Unfortunately, these episodes wane a bit from the first 10, yet I can't feel that these episodes are the final set-up for the second half of the first season. First, you are going to get blown away when you meet &quot;the human form&quot; of Blue (previously the dog of the wolf hunter, now running with the pack). The next three episodes barely concentrate on the main charactors, Kiba, Tsume, Hige and Tolboy, and more concentrate on the lives of Cheir (the female scientist in search of Cheza), and her ex-husband, Hub (the detective). Also included is some of the background of the wolf hunter. I won't give it away, but the final episode winds up with the most important event of the series. Like I say, the bulk of these episodes concentrates on the developement of the side charactors; therefore, this string of episodes will be important to understanding the rest of the series. Thoug not as involved or entertaining as the rest of the series, &quot;Loss&quot; is well worth the price, and is a must own in one of the best anime series ever created. Do not begin with this disk. Buy &quot;Leader of the Pack&quot;, and &quot;Blood and Flowers&quot; first. I may sound a little down on this disk, but overall, &quot;Wolf's Rain&quot;, in terms of story line, animation, sound track and everything else is absolutely one of the best series ever made, animated or live action
Just Say Ow!!!. My two year old just loves &quot;Big House&quot; as he calls it, and likes this one better than any of the others we own, including Blues Clues and Elmo, which is saying a lot!! He actually ASKS to go to the doctor's office after watching it. If I need to do any housework, I just put the show in, and don't have to worry about him getting bored. It is awesome!
Follow That Dream. This is a delightful musical comedy depicting that truth and honesty is a virtue that can win out over greed and corruption. A great film for the whole famiily which will leave you humming its beautiful musi
MEET THE MAN THROUGH HIS WORK. In "Dreams," some of Kurosawa's most fundamental beliefs are presented to us in eight artistic and visually stunning vignettes.The first dream, "Sunshine Through the Rain" is about a young boy who is warned by his mother not to go into the woods and look upon the wedding of the foxes.  The boy disobeys his mother and when the foxes discover that he has seen them they send a message to his mother that he must commit suicide for his transgression.Kurosawa's pro-environmental stance is beautifully illustrated in the dream segment "The Peach Orchard."  After being laid waste by human hands nature allows an innocent boy to enjoy the beautiful sight of a peach orchard returning to full bloom once more, after which the orchard returns to its devastated state."The Blizzard" is a story of human endurance stretched to its limits as one by one climbers caught in a blizzard on a mountain succumb to the storm and die.  Although it is a bleak story, the "snow fairy," (probably death), appears to the last survivor and helps to guide him into the land of the dead without his feeling overwhelmed by the futility and desperation of his final moments.An officer, the sole survivor of his unit, journeys home grief stricken after the war in "The Tunnel."  As he approaches a tunnel a "snarling centennial," (dog), comes out of the tunnel towards him.  Afraid, but driven to continue on his journey, the solider enters the darkness of the tunnel.  As he exits he hears the sound of marching approaching him from inside the tunnel he has just left and is confronted by his dead comrades.  They are not aware that they are dead and the conversations between the living and the dead are heart wrenching.In "Crows," a visitor to an art museum enters the Vincent Van Gogh, (played by Martin Scorsese), painting "Wheat Field with Crows."  In an almost humorous scene, Van Gogh tells the visitor that, "Yesterday I was trying to do a self-portrait, but the ear kept getting in the way."   Soon Van Gogh is off traipsing through the landscape with the visitor trying to keep up with the elusive artist.  The colors and landscape we encounter in this dream are breathtaking!"Mount Fuji in Red" tells of the horror and devastation surrounding the people of Tokyo as nuclear plants explode releasing their deadly mother lode and there is no place to go to escape the situation, except into the sea.  Horrified citizens are in a state of shock and disbelief that their government had lied to them, having reassured them that "Nuclear plants were safe."In "The Weeping Demon" man succumbs to the insanity of nuclear war.  The earth, as we know it, has been destroyed.  As a result of the high levels of radiation, the earth and its remaining inhabitants have mutated into what can only be described as a "hellish" nightmare.And finally, in "The Village of the Watermills" a young man stumbles across a picturesque village and an old man sitting by watermills.  Technology has skirted around the village and the young man is in awe of the clean air and clean water.  The villagers' balanced lifestyle and their living harmoniously within the bounds of nature affords them long and healthy lives.  There is a funeral going on at the time of the young man's visit and the villagers are celebrating and joyful.I loved this movie.  It is beautiful to look at and eloquently espouses some of the beliefs of one of the truly gifted directors of all time.  He was a man who deeply believed in tradition and honor, who took humankind's role as steward of the earth seriously; who believed that technology for technology's sake is not necessarily a good thing, and who believed war to be an abomination.
Delivers the thrills and chills!. Flightplan is a smart thriller starring Jodie Foster (The Silence of the Lambs) as an architect, who's just become a widow, named Kyle Pratt who boards a two story jumbo jet from Germany back to the States with her 6-year old daughter Julia and a coffin containing the body of her husband (who mysteriously fell from their apartment).She falls asleep and wakes up to find that Julia is missing. Nobody recalls seeing Kyle boarding the plane with a little girl, and there's no record of Julia anywhere. Kyle finds herself in a frustrated ordeal where she is watched over by the flight attendents and an inflight marshal Carson, played brilliantly by Peter Sarsgaard, and will come to realize that she's either crazy or there's a plot against her.I didn't expect much from Flightplan, but the movie succeeds in delivering the thrills and chills, more like an episode of the Twilight Zone, better than most movies of its genre do.RecommendedB
More mature and in great form!. Three new songs along with favorites from previous albums.  I've been waiting for a live cd for years and was thrilled that it was released as DVD as well.  Not quite as good as being in the audience personally, but a real treat for die-hard fans as well as those who haven't listened to Ricky since Livin'la Vida Loca or She Bangs
'70s Noir. This is a relatively unknown film noir from the mid '70s, starring Gene Hackman as a former football player turned private eye who is obsessed by a chess game from the '20s, where one of the players missed a forced mate, and lost instead. He's hired by a wealthy former hollywood starlet to track down her daughter, which takes him to some of the seedier parts of the Florida Keys you'll ever see on film.As is common in other noirs, just about everyone in this film is corrupt, even including Hackman's character himself, to a certain point. As noted by another reviewer, this movie will remind many of 'Chinatown'. In the end, just about everyone loses.I have a copy of this on VHS, and I bought the DVD for the widescreen. I was impressed by the image quality of the DVD -- it's a little grainy, but overall, quite high quality. I don't think anyone's going to be very disappointed by the transfer, considering it's a mid '70s film. The only extras are some trailers, and a sort of short documentary on the director.Hackman is terrific in this, as he is in most of his other films. He can play genial one moment, and a moment later play cynical and tough. It's too bad he didn't get another opportunity at another role like this. Unfortunately, they don't really make films like this anymore
Relevant if transsexualisms affects you or someone you know in any way. In such a short space of time, the movie really captures the essence of what it means to a regular family when one of the spouses is trannsexual
Darth Vader is born. If you wanted to see Darth Vader in this one, don't plan on more than a few minutes. The real hero is Obi-Wan. This is a great movie, better than Episode I and II. Still the acting is not the best. However the storyline is strong and definitely someting that the die-hard Star Wars fan wants to see.Stephen John Becciaauthor of The Treelander
AWAKENING. Wow!I MEAN THIS IS PROBABLY THE ONLY FILM WHERE ROBIN WILLIAMS GETS AWAY WITH THE "HI I'M MR SERIOUS AND I'M A KNOW-IT-ALL DOCTOR WELCOME THE HOSPITAL". TO ME IT JUST OPENED MY EYES TO THE MENTAL ILLNESSES THAT ARE OUT THERE AND THAT DAY-TO-DAY INNOCENT PEOPLE ARE PUTTING UP WITH IT.ROBERT DE NIRO GOT AWAY WITHOUT BEING A TOUGH GUY OR A ITALIAN GANGSTER.THIS MOVIE HONESTLY BOUGHT ME TO TEARS.ThAnKx!:
11 YEARS LATER ALL THIS SEEMS LIKE A VIDEO OF AN OLD SUPERBOWL - - - - BUT !!!. WHAT IS THE WAR ROOM?What we have here is a glimpse of the behind-the-scenes activities of the Clinton for President election team effort during the 1992 presidential race, centering around "The War Room" [the campaign headquarters]. This documentary begins at the New Hampshire primary and ends with Clinton's victory.WHAT IS IT ALL ABOUT?We are shown the difficulties the Clinton campaign had in dealing with an avalanche of negative press. How they essentially continued effectively implementing their strategic election plan while simultaneously minimizing the damage to Clinton's credibility caused by his emerging image as a draft-dodger and an adulterer is simply amazing to see.This small epic is quite interesting but knowing how it all ends takes away some of the much deserved suspense and awe. Sure there are scandals for Mr. Clinton and we have the accuser admitting that it was the Republican party that put her up to it. We also have a candidate in Clinton that seemed to have no chance to get the support of his party, let alone win the election. Maybe when the film came out 11 years ago it had more weight. After all this was all one great big surprise and these were current events. However, today my attention went to James Carville who seemed the most genuine and able participant within the war room. We also got a good look at George Stephanopoulos whose presence gave a nice contrast to Carville. I found myself wishing that Carville and Stephanopoulos had been the candidates as they both seemed more sincere and public service oriented than the actual candidates. Naturally it does not work that way, but that is how the film affected me 5 years after the end of the Clinton presidency.HISTORY AS IT HAPPENED!This is a true documentary and appears to be fairly objective in depicting how the people who made up the winning political machine in 1992 functioned. This team functioned quite well in overcoming seemingly impossible hurdles which we can now witness as they were happening. In effect, we get to see a rather significant slice of political history as it happened.SOME FINAL THOUGHTS:This delightful film is not like "JFK" or some of Michael Moore's films in that it is not fictionalized to entertain and convince at the expense of truth. Charismatic Hollywood actors are never used in place of the real people to foster credibility and empathy. Simply stated, "The War Room" is closer to reality than many of us are use to seeing in film. While it does not have the polish of a "JFK" or the raw emotional impact of a "Fahrenheit 9/11", "The War Room" is much closer to objective truth and therefore extremely worthwhile
Nixon. Having lived through the Checkers speech, the 1960 election, the Viet Nam War and Watergate, this movie is more real than my own life
History spread over three DVDs. For those of who weren't born when Elvis struck America, here's the undiluted wonder. You get all three complete Ed Sullivan shows from his early days. You even get the ads for Mercury cars. Besides Elvis, you get to see the rest of Ed's cast of characters. Even that Senor guy who speaks to his hand. What's amazing is that there are so few ad breaks.The only bummer is that this is each disc only has 1 show. This could have been a 2 DVD set.A perfect gift for the Elvis lover. Or just someone who wants to watch Ed Sullivan in a non-highlights format
Great Show. I can't believe that the gentleman above me wrote that this show was so disappointing after seeing it as a child.  I saw it too and seeing it again made me like it even more!!  I thought the acting was wonderful.  It is a very simple play.  I loved the music.  I am a romantisist at heart and just loved it
The Nightmare Collection - Good but missing certain niceties. I recently purchased the Nightmare on Elm Street Collection, and I love having not only the original movies but the final installment "New Nightmare," the perfect swan song to the series.However, I was a bit disappointed that the DVD collection is missing 2 very important things: the original theatrical trailers for the movies (if they're there I can't find them), and the "Freddy's Nightmares" short-lived television program. It only lasted for a few episodes, but I was really hoping to be able to see them again someday on DVD. One would think that a collection as thorough as this one would contain "Freddy's Nightmares" but sadly it doesn't.All in all, I would say this is a great buy for lovers of the "Nightmare" series!
Beautifully filmed, emotionally moving. What an incredibly moving film - I am an adoptee that searched for her mom, only to find that she had died many years ago. This film is right on in the representations of adoptees and mothers searching - the acting is so true to life and the images have stayed with me.  This is one of my absolute favorite films ever - I was moved to tears many times. Incredible film -
Watch this for the fighting. If you like watching martial arts, this is a fun show. Tremendous fight choreography and lots of it. Simplistic but fun plot. A good on to pop in the DVD player when you want to see some good action without having to think too much
A great Psychological Thriller - Southern Style. I Love this movie, and the music / soundtrack!Joe (Billy Bob Thornton) returns home after 20 years in jail for recklessly crashing his car during a police chase - resulting in the death of his 2 year old son, and the permanent physical / mental injury of his wife Chrystal (Lisa Blount).Billy Bob Thorton's character never gets over the pain of losing his life in jail for 20 years, the death of his son, or the loss of time with his wife.  Never being an evil person, Joe returns home with the hope that he can rekindle his life with his wife.Unfortunately - agony and injury have been unkind to Chrystal, and she seems to have lost "feelings" of any kind as demonstrated by her uncaring means to survive through prostitution with the "locals".  Chrystal still maintains a latent beauty, however, she is emtionally bankrupt.Even worse, both Joe and Chrystal agonize over the loss of their son - who was never found at the car crash site, and each claim to have seen images of him throughout the last 20 years.Can one survive after such a horrible sequence of events?  Billy Bob Thorton and Lisa Blunt do a great job in demonstrating the agony of trying to recover....Favorite Quote of the movie is "We Got Us a Redneck FightClub" yelled out when Billy Bob Thorton gets in a fight.
Filmed in glorious B/W and in "ILLUSION-O. Some folks may consider this movie over the top, over the hill or just lame but I---who saw 13 Ghosts in real time (1960)---considered it the best of the spooky matinee fare of its day. It had a fantastic built up to the climax of the story. All the actors and actresses were top notch. But the true power of this movie was that it filmed in glorious B/W and in "ILLUSION-O." You can't beat that combination! And those who are critical of this movie ought to take a time out from their self-imposed and sanctimonious attitude and appreciate it; directed and produced by William Castle himself. They don't get any better
Warm and glowing-a must-see. This is the kind of movie that leaves a smile on your face and a glow around you for the rest of the day. Marty, a young pioneer woman, is widowed on the trail soon after she and her husband set out to find themselves a new home. Left poor, alone, and despertely grieving, she accepts the proposal of a near-stranger that she marry him and care for his motherless daughter in return for a roof over her head and passage back to the East when the wagon trains came again. At first, confronted with a rebellious and bitterly resentful girl and crippled by her own terrible grief, Marty can barely funtion. But gradually she settles into this newlife, and just as gradually she, the little girl Missy, and the widower Clark Davis grow to accept each other. This is a worthy adaptation of Janette Oak's bestselling Christian fiction books, and is guaranteed to be loved by any period movie lover. The religious themes add depth to the story but are handled with enough delicacy and restraint that they don't overwhelm or smother it. The love story is really beautiful in itself, and Dale Midkiff, the widower, projects such warmth and feeling into his scenes, particularly the amazing last scene, that it lights up the whole movie. He's an amazing talent. Good performances all around, a well-developed plot, and the story's warmth and purity make this a movie to remember. A must for any lover of romance
EXCELLANT -- PRODUCT- DELIVERY. MY GRAND DAUGHTERS ENYJOY PLAYING IT IN TH CAR DVD--IT'S THEIR FAVORITE !I ENJOY THE QUALITY VOICES OF THIS MOVIE
Money very well spent. My daughter was adopted at 13-months old and did not know any English.  So in hope of bridging the communication gap, we bought this video.  She didn't seem to be learning anything the first week of watching it every day, but by the 2nd week, she slowly started to do a couple signs.  And then more and more as the days went on.The video is very engaging.  My daughter watched it everyday for 6 weeks and it still held her attention even after she learned most of the signs.  We stopped showing it to her for 2 months and have reintroduced it to her, and she still enjoys watching it.The video has good production value.  There is a good variety of examples for each of the words presented and the video and still images are of good quality, with good lighting, color and composition.The video is good for teaching new words and concepts.  Unlike videos like Signing Time that assumes your child already knows the word, this video teaches what the word is.  It shows a lot of simple imagery for the word.The video has good music.  My daughter seems to enjoy the classical music and it's even enjoyable for me unlike other childrens' songs that stick in my head long after the video is done.But the best part is that my daughter learned to communicate with us through signing with the help of this video.  It lessened her frustration and she finds a sense of accomplishment in being able to tell us things through signing
Learn the best from the best!. Finally! A "how-to" dance dvd that you can actually LEARN from! After purchasing several other Hip Hop videos I was discouraged by the "performance" value rather than the "instruction" part. On this DVD Gregg Russell is a great dancer as well as an inspiring teacher. He really breaks down all the moves (from the back-thank you) so it's much easier to follow. I also liked the fact that is a one hour tape and not ANY time is wasted on excess chit chat-it's all pure instruction and dance moves. You get a short warm-up, alot of break dance moves, and a really cool dance routine. The dance is long, so I'm learning it in small sections at my own pace. Plus, Russell really is a cool guy and very funny! I was totally entertained and enlightened by this DVD. 5 star
I love Little Britain. I was really upset when I saw that disc two on this set wasn't another disc of episodes but there was an ottakes or deleted scenes bit that well, lasted long enough to be that second disc of episodes. SO i'm all better now
Awkward, but charming, political comedy. A manic, mile-a-minute screwball comedy starring Jean Arthur as a sassy, loveable every-gal who has to hide her ne'er-do-well boyfriend (Cary Grant) from the law after he escapes from jail to escape the death penalty (or lynching) for a crime he didn't commit.  Seems he's some kind of free-thinker (anarchist, really) who asked too many questions about his capitalist boss, and wound up framed for the murder of his foreman, and the burning of the factory he worked in.  As if THAT weren't complicated and far-fetched enough, add in Ronald Coleman, as a prospective Supreme Court judge who just HAPPENS to be the new tenant at Jean's villa, the week that Grant holes up in the attic.  The comedy hinges on Arthur's Lucy-like attempts to hide the fugitive without Coleman catching on; the movie itself is meant to hinge on the Capra-esque, leftie-populist plot.  Doesn't quite gel, but it is a weird and interesting time capsule, sort of a leftover from the 'Thirties, when socially-conscious films like this were more common (and less out of place; WWII really changed the face of Hollywood, and this seems like something that got left on the shelf a little too long.)  Not Arthur's best performance, but Grant has some choice moments sparring intellectually with Coleman's idealistic barrister
hilariour comedy. People thinking that this film is just another Road Trip movie would be SOOOO wrong. Although this film got poor reviews from critics, when I saw it at the cinema, I found it to be one of the most hilarious movies for teenages.All I can say is that no nation's reputation remains un-soiled in this film. English, German, Russian, American: no-one is safe!Oh, and look out for the scene in the train...
One of the bonus features is worth the price alone. My first viewing of this film was a great disappointment.  I expected another Jeanette MacDonald and Nelson Eddy film, with Chevalier substituting for Eddy.  And I emphatically did not like the film.  Then I viewed the film a second time, this time with the play-by-play voice-over analysis by Miles Kreuger, which comes as a extra bonus on this DVD.  Suddenly I was seeing the film in a completely different light, and absolutely loving this film.  This DVD is an absolute gem, and one of the best things about it is the intelligent and articulate insights provided by Miles Kreuger, not confined to this film alone but applying to the cinema world at large in the early 30s.  It is as if a film critic from the 1930s had come back to life, as if he had actually been on the sets during the filming (because he's talked to those who were).  Kreuger's commentary alone is worth the price of this DVD.  After seeing this film for the first time, you must go back and see it again through Miles Kreuger's eyes.
STEPHEN KING'S IT. EXCELLENT PRODUCT And VERY RELIABLE SALESMAN, SINCE IT GIVES IN TIME And IT FORM
Jack Attack!. I was thrilled to find this movie on DVD.  My husband and I special ordered it on VHS from Blockbuster about 10 years ago, because it was hard to find. Jack is at his best, especially when he gets cussed by a bike messenger, the look on his face is priceless! Martin Landau is really maniacal and Donald Pleasance is actually quite funny as the totally out of touch and stoned out of his mind, psychiatrist. The "Bleeder" is a nice twist even though he looks alot like my ex brother-in-law!  I would recommend this to any horror fans or people who love thrillers, as well.
Decent Treatment, But Iffy Editing. The original DVD release of Crimson Tide occurred at a time before the trends of including cut scenes, commentary, and animated menus.  While it makes sense to re-release the film with what we now considered the standard features, missing from the original, I found the overall experience somewhat disappointing.For die-hard fans of Crimson Tide, this DVD is worth getting just to see the 7 minutes or so (Original release was 116 minutes, this version is supposed to be 123) of exra footage.  The title menu is much nicer than before, and the addition of the documentary is a great bonus.  But under deleted scenes, we're shown only three very short "scenes": an extra line of dialogue onboard the crew bus, a longer version of Radchenko's speech to the reporter, and a half-minute long nearly silent waiting scene before the panel at the end of the movie.  All three are shown as raw footage, without any cleaning, or explanation.All of the content in the deleted scenes is in the primary feature, in a cleaned-up and nearly seamless state.  None of the new footage is more than a few seconds in length, but it's clear that all of it consists of short pieces of dialogue removed either for time constraints or clarity.  What this means is that throughout the movie we're treated to bursts of extraneous dialogue that the editor had originally removed, usually for a reason.  It's interesting from the point of view of a film student, but as a consumer release I think it degrades from the experience ever so slightly.  Crimson Tide is all about suspense, and anything that distracts the focus of the audience is consequently lowering the quality of the movie.  None of it is very overt, but there's enough of it that it might harm the experience of a first-time viewer of the film.Overall, the extras contained in this release make it a must-have for previous fans, but for new buyers I would still recommend the original DVD cut
Harrison Ford makes history come to life. This is the first in a series of fun to watch action packed movies based on what an archeologist should be.  Being a first you will not notice the pattern of the film unless you are used to Saturday matinees.We hit the deck running on this one as we see Indiana Jones making a John Wayne type of entrance.  So much that you do not notice the dubious looking character next to him Statipo (Alfred Molina). Until he says "Give me the Idle and I will give you the whip."Now settled down, after his near miss with the natives, Harrison Ford is a professor (Indiana Jones) teaching the fact that archeology is a search for facts not some thrill ride.That very afternoon he is confronted by some government agents. It seems that his old professor Abner Ravenwood has disappeared. They picked up some radio transmissions that contained the name of Abner and a city Tannis. Immediately Indiana Jones knows that the Nazis (natural bad buys) are looking for the Ark of the Covenant (which can be used as a weapon of unspeakable power) and somehow he must bet them to it for the sake of the world.He is helped by an old love interest Marion (Karen Allen) and rivaled by an old nemesis Dr. Rene Belloq (Paul Freeman).Does it really exist?How can he beat them to it?Why is he on the outs with Abner?Hold on for a thrill a minute and don't eat any bad dates.
An oldie but a goodie. I remember seeing this movie when i was around 7 or 8 thinking "This movie is weird" then i went to school the next day drawing Fritz on my binder and any paper that was around.Then when i got  older and bought the tape when it came out the movie wasn't so weird any more it was a lot funnier and some parts were a little...scary but its a realy good movie and i bought the dvd right when it came out out.But Fritz The Cat is a dvd that i'll be gettin' the scratches out of like every month so for any one who has never seen Fritz The Cat before it's a great movie...trust me
A Sweet and Playful Life. Heaven Can Wait is a sweet story about a mischievous man (Don Ameche) whose death prompts him to arrive at the gates of hell. Although the man is enthusiastic about his admittance and his supposedly doomed life, the receptionist is not so sure. Thus ensues the tale of his life. It begins with plenty of trouble, but basically good deeds done on his part and ends in happiness with his beautiful wife (Gene Tierney).This story is simple but highly enjoyable. The acting is subtle but effective and the actors are all likable, even the imperfect characters. This is a perfect example of a quality family film of yesteryear filled with humor and feeling.There is an extra feature included on this disk of Ernst Lubitsch playing piano set to a series of photographs. It really is not very entertaining
Mutual respect between partners - very refreshing!. I found commentary in these DVDs so encouraging in my search to bring heightened and prolonged delight to my wife as we make love. [...].  A really unique aspect of what I found in this Duet Set is a sense of mutual respect between partners, and genuine interest in erotic pleasure as a spiritual, uplifting process. The way the man and the woman interact reflect a level of consideration to one another that I find refreshing.I look forward to learning more from these DVDs. I can't put into words how uplifting it is to find information out there like this. It is brilliant.
An Important American Film... ...but buyers should be forwarned that the print from which this DVD is made was a poor one, and Alpha Video, the distributors of this classic Capra movie, made no attempt to clean it up.Here we have an example of a key artwork about America's psychological and political framework during emergence from the economic depression of the 1930s, crying out for careful restration to the condition it so  deserves
Facing Truth. I love Ferzan Ozpetek. He is gorgeous and very sensetive. I really want to meet him. Because I loved all movies of him and get some parts of his feelings like mine. Hamam was great and le fate ignorante was marvelous too. In this movie, all of cast show us very high performance. Giovanna, Raoul and the others. Also it has very beuatiful views.
Extremely Funny. All I got to say is this guy is hilarious! His ability to imitate people, music, and other sounds is what really makes him funny in my opinion. If you like laughing, then buy this dvd.
Keep the faith Baby. This is a great piece of history I love this movie
Love Triangle and Anti-Nazi Sea Action. Oliver Cromwell Jones, the black cook, is given a lot of screen time and the screen play treats him as an integral part of the mission.  He is played by Ben Carter, one of the actors profiled in Donald Bogle's recent book BRIGHT BOULEVARDS, BOLD DREAMS; he was the agent for black Los Angeles actors who got in trouble with his clients because he often took the best parts and played them himself!  This is definitely one of those cases, for he has a scene with James Gleason for which he should have been nominated for an Oscar, he's so good in the part--and it isn't one of Hollywood's wretched racially stereotypical parts, but one with real human feeling, dignity, comedy all mixed together.  Gleason is super too.However the picture really belongs to its headlining trio of stars, and they all rise to the occasion.  Anne Baxter is not photographed very well.  One of the characters picks up her photograph and looks at it saying, "She's so beautiful," but in truth she looks awful and her face is round as a beach ball.  But she's perky, soulful, repressed in turns.  I love the part where she teaching a squadron of schoolgirls how to shoot an arrow into a line of targets.  The girls are dressed in incredibly tight school uniforms (archery outfits I guess) and all move like robots or the dancers in a Robert Palmer video, all releasing their arrows at exactly the same time.  The odd thing is that they're supposed to be nervous and giggly about the sudden appearance of Tyrone Power, so all of them miss the target.  Baxter is just terrible playing the part--did she ever get good, no not really, but they wrote better parts for her later on.  However except for her face she looks wonderful and the designers have some great 40s clothes for her, including several pairs of red gloves which they must have thought would be a big trendsetter in 1943.  Dana Andrews is very trim and not as creepy as usual.  Acting (and good looks) honors belong to Tyrone Power, who has one of those scenes where his dotty grandma (Dame May Whitty) opens up a childhood scrapbook and points out to his girl (Baxter) a photo of her grandson as a baby boy, naked, bare ass hanging in the air.  He's all embarrassed and slams the book down on Grandma's hands.  They have a funny relationship.  She calls him "Stinky," and he greets her fondly as "Butch."  Dame May Whitty could play a hard, cold aristocrat; but here she's the loveable kind, sort of like Marie Dressler used to play.The Technicolor transfer on the DVD is superb.  I wonder when people went to the movies in the 1940s if they zeroed in on Technicolor pictures and felt disappointed when a movie was in black and white.  The blues, reds, and purples of CRASH DIVE are so rich and lustrous you feel as though it had been melted down from velvet.
A Wonderful Christmas Movie. I have been looking for this movie since I saw it a few years ago.  I absolutely love this movie.  This movie is a must have, I searched everywhere for this movie and I was so excited when I found it I didn't care how much I was paying for it.  I just recieved it today 12-6-06.And I can't wait to cuddle up on my couch with some hot coco and watch the BEST movie ever.
Rare Laserdiscs - dvds Movies Collector. The Last American Virgin IS my Favorite Romantic Movie,I love this movie much Thats why I bought two dvd Copies heh I Can't get this Movie Outta my mind,'tis BitterSweet,Humorous AND Insightful,,DO NOT MISS IT,Go Get DA DVD AT Amazon :P
BEYOND INSPIRATION. Being from New England, it is easy to say that this to me was one of the greatest things that ever happened, ever, the amazing 2001 season from the N.E. Patriots. Even if you ain't that into sports, maybe just inspirational films that put a huge sh** eating grin on your face... this is a DVD to own (at least to check out..)I of course was issued a copy of this after the Superbowl win in 2002, being from New England, but only dug it out recently to view it. Besides telling the story in detail about the season, game for game, it is also produced very well, by using the real NFL film footage, that is much more in depth than what we all saw on TV back when it happened. Right on the sidelines with the players, you get to watch (half the time you can see that they are almost as amazed with themselves as we were)I guess I should spare the story, because it is written in every other review here, and really its much better shown on the DVD, but to remember the state of the team at that point...  Last place underdogs the WHOLE season. Even as the team barrel rolled and got bigger and better, game for game, no one believed they would do it (maybe us New Englanders did, but we were still crossing our fingers pretty damned hard).. but everytime the stakes got higher, the team got hotter (not to mention a few divine miracles, like the enormous hurricane during the Raiders game)You just gotta watch this thing, and see how crazy the team really got, spectacular moves all over. This is one of those sports stories that should grace the big screen... a story you couldn't make up.Rock on PATS!P.S. Regarding the tribute to 9/11, god bless to all....but I REALLY hate U2
Best How to. This DVD is the BESt DVD by far for how to dj. Awesome interviews and 2nd disc does excellent job of showing you all you need to know about how to dj. Do not waste money on other cheap and cheesy Dj dvds like I did, spend the extra few bucks and I knwo you will be happy with this purchase
It Begins... This DVD kick starts the longest running animated prime-time show ever. The first season was an experiement to the show. There are many solid episodes in this 13 episode season like Bart the General, Call of the Simpsons, Krusty Gets Busted and Some Enchanted Evening.I'll review each episode and give it a rating.Simpsons Roasting On An Open Fire: Homer becomes a Santa at the mall to earn money for christmas.Rating 8.7/10Bart the Genius: Bart cheats on his amplitude test at school and is sent to a genius school.Rating: 8.9/10Homer's Odyessy: Homer is fired from the power plant and becomes a crusader for citizen safety in Springfeld.Rating: 8.6/10There's No Disgrace Like Home: Homer tries to get his family more civilized.Rating: 8.8/10Bart the General: Bart tries to get back on Nelson Muntz, the school bulley.Rating: 9.0/10Moaning Lisa: Lisa is depressed and meets Bleeding Gums Murphy. Homer tries to get better at beating Bart in video games.Rating: 8.0/10The Call of the Simpsons: The Simpsons are stuck in the jungle after their RV falls off a cliff.Rating: 9.1/10The Telltale Head: Bart saws off the head of Jebediah Springfeld to impress Jimbo Jones and his friends.Rating: 8.5/10Life on the Fast Lane: Marge takes bowling lessons and falls in love with Jaques, the bowling instructer.Rating: 8.3/10Homer's Night Out: Marge is mad at Homer made after Bart takes a picture of Homer dancing with belly dancer.Rating: 8.4/10The Crepes of Wrath: Bart is sent to Paris as part of a foreign exhange program.Rating: 8.6/10Krusty Gets Busted: Krusty is framed by Sideshow Bob.Rating: 9.2/10Some Enchanted Evening: Homer and Marge go out for the night. Bart, Lisa, and Maggie are left with the Babysitter Bandit.Rating: 9.1/10All in all, the Simpsons first season was an O.K. season. Very crude animation, and not normal voices compared to later seasons. Hey they were an experiment so it wasn't that bad.Rating: 8.6/1
The Ideal of What Hollywood & the Legal System can Do. I stubbornly resisted this movie because its topic about homosexuality, and will admit I was baiased against it for only that reason.  When I finally watched it (from a purely paralegal point of view) I was amazed at the sensitivity given the issue at hand: not necessarily homosexuality, but having AIDS, and the bias our society still has for such issues, even in 2005. (And sorry that I allowed my predujiced feelings to get in the way.)  It is a case like this - real or imagined - that validates the legal system.  A great wrong was comitted against Mr. Beckett, and he fought back, and WON.  The relationship between Andy & Miguel was handled tastefully and tactfully, and wasn't offensive to me at all.  I was especially grateful to see how supportive Andy's family was for him during this horrible time in his life.  I very highly recommend this movie for the "historical" value that is has: not only putting a "face" to AIDS and homosexuality, but for bringing awareness to the subject.
Almost as good as it was on stage. Live on stage, Trevor Nunn's production was extroardinary, one of the best theatre performances I have ever seen.  The video doesn't totally capture that power; it may have been wise, for a television director, to de-emphasize the stage set (a black magic circle outlined on a wood floor, surrounded by wooden crates), and such brilliant theatrical images as the invading thanes, surrounding Macbeth in a circle, as he slumps on the crate throne of his ramshackle bunker; but those features are part of what made the stage version unforgettable.  However, the video does preserve the wonderful performances.  I must dissent from some of the reviews below: Dench is a superb Lady Macbeth and the late Bob Peck's understated Macduff works beautifully; both deliver their big scenes as well as any production you will ever see.  And for McKellen, this was a signature role of his career.  The video also conveys the low-key intensity and furious pace of this MACBETH; it's a rare opportunity to see one of the great Shakespearean productions of the century, preserved
Great DVD for aspiring cheerleaders. I am a former cheerleader and cheerleading coach and really enjoy this DVD.  I bought it for my young daughter and loaned it out to some of my cheerleaders when coaching.It teaches the basics:  the motions and what they're called, some cheers and chants, and one really fun dance routine.  It also goes a little bit into what it means to be a cheerleader for your school and what will be expected of you and the code of conduct that you'll be expected to follow.It does NOT go into jumps or stunting at all.  The stunting is definitely something cheerleaders don't want to learn from a DVD, but I was disappointed that they didn't teach any jumps.Another reviewer somewhere else, a former cheerleader, gave this DVD low marks because she expected to get a good workout from it and relive the good-old-days.  Let me just point out to everyone, this is an instructional DVD for beginners.  It's not a workout DVD and it's not for cheerleaders that already have a lot of cheer experience.Also, the organization that put this DVD together is the UCA, one of the biggest cheer-instruction organizations out there.  They've been conducting cheer clinics all over the country for many years.  Other cheer organizations do some motions differently or have different names for them.  There is no right or wrong way, but aspiring cheerleaders should know this in case they make it on a squad coached by someone trained by one of the other groups.  Always follow your coach's instructions and don't challenge him or her with these differences.One more word of advice for aspiring cheerleaders:  unless you live in a very rural, small town with a small student population and are sure there won't be much competition at try-outs, TAKE GYMNASTIC CLASSES.  Cheerleading has become very athletic and competitive.  To increase your chances in the more populated areas, you will need tumbling skills.  Dance classes - especially hip-hop - wouldn't hurt either.  Yoga - to increase balance and flexability - would help a lot, too.Good luck
Some of the best comedies ever made. I remember watching some of the old "Ma & Pa Kettle" movies on Saturday afternoon TV.  Finding these classics together in a set was a real treat.  The movies have very good continuity.  We are introuduced to the Kettle clan in "The Egg and I".  The events in one movie are used in the following movie.  At the same time, each movie stands on its own.  The movie writers of yesteryear knew they could be funny without resorting to "potty humor", bad language, or inappropriate conduct
Great video!. The best video concerning any gospel that I have ever seen. Stays strictly with what the gospel says and no personal interpretations.
Solid thriller, well written. All the Colors of the Dark is an above average giallo from Sergio Martino, rich with cinematography, music and other familiar trademarks from the giallo mold.  The story is intersting, somewhat weird, and original and it always keeps you guessing until the climatic finale.  That's one thing these Italians do better than Americans; They don't feel the need to explain everything in such details so that even a 5 year old couldn't get confused.It's not very bloody at all but it has decent suspense and some great surreal moments.  The ending comes as a bit of a surprise and overall this is a well written story.  Edwige Fenech is always a joy to watch and George Hilton is reliable as always.One weird thing though; The audio can be either Italian or English and in some instances in the movie there's quite a bit of difference between what characters say in either the English version or the Italian
America - Freedom to Fascism. Facts that will astound you!  This film is one I recommend to everyone interested in learning the truth of how our government works and how it really should work and the Income Tax...   A great movie!  The federal reserve not so Federal
charmed season five. charmed is the best series going right now. it has passed buffy up which was the best till 2 yeears ago. charmed is great and i never miss a show
The Life of Mammals!. Just as in his earlier work "The Life of Birds", this series focuses on one main group of animals, the mammals. David Attenborough is, as some people say, "onscreen", a lot more than he is in his other programs. That never really bothered me, as the animals still acted naturally and the scenes were still informative and very interesting anyway.The footage in this program is some of the best wildlife documentary footage I've ever seen. He is always able to show you  firsts, new behavior and discoveries, sometimes even new animals. The program goes into such depth about all the different intricacies of the mammals lives and how they coexist with each other and humans.If you liked this program, you will no doubt enjoy; "Life On Earth", "The Living Planet", "Trials of Life", "The Secret Life of Plants", "Life in the Freezer", "The Life of Birds", "Life In the Undergrowth", and a new series that is called "Planet Earth" which he narrates. Coming out in 2008 or 09' is his last major documentary, "Life In Cold Blood" a program about reptiles and amphibians. The Life of Mammals is another amazing achievement from David Attenborough and the BBC's outstanding cameramen
Best DVD on the market. This is the most spectacular DVD i've seen so far, not to mention that is the most complete, a 2 DVD package with the best of the best artist out there. He managed to make the best concert you could ever see and also you get all the videos from all the songs he played in that concert which are like 20, plus interviews and other amazing stuffs. You buy this DVD and you'll need a lot of time to see it all. Seriusly the best DVD ever with all and i mean it ALL the greatest songs of the great Phill
Excellent!. Having lived through the coverage of the slaughtered Israeli athletes during the 1972 Olympics, I felt like I was experiencing the actual events as they were occurring over again.  Speilberg did an excellent job using stock news footage from the tragedy and overlaying actors into recreated scenes.  Though these events are actually shown piecemeal throughout the film, the actual story is about what transpired afterwards.  The Israeli government hired a hit squad to track down and eliminate 11 individuals that participated in the planning of the terrorist action at the Olympics.This is based on an actual operation that the Mossaud carried out but obviously is Speilberg's fictionalized version of how it was done.Eric Bana is a German/Jewish Israeli Mossaud operative who is chosen to lead the group of 5 mercenaries as they hunt down the perpetrators throughout Europe.  It is interesting how this Australian actor is able to change his accent at will to fit the roles that he is playing.Bana is torn to do the mission because his wife is expecting the birth of their first child and the secret mission means that he must risk his life and possibly not see his wife till the mission is complete which could take years.As the movie goes along Bana's personality starts to change from a gung-ho good government employee to someone who questions what he is doing and is constantly looking under his bed and phone for hidden bombs.The movie moves along at a fast pace and you keep thinking you are seeing real events as they happen.  Sometimes it is a little complicated to understand what is going on (that is the value of having the DVD to be able to understand what you may have missed the first time).Look for the actor who plays the new Bond in the main supporting role.  There is also an interesting sequence shot on the Queens side of New York City (supposedly taking place in 1973) where I was looking to see buildings that did not exist at the time and you do see the World Trade Center (I am assuming the scene was shot after 2001).
Very funny and very sweet. I'm a big fan of romantic comedies and this is one of my favorite. I received this movie as a graduation gift and I really like it. Hugh Grants George character was such a pain in the butt to Sandra Bullock's Lucy character but he grew on her.Lucy was always an overachieving, take charge, and want to make a difference person while George was guy who never really needed to work hard just represent his company.
Beauty, and other charms of waking life. The beauty in "Henry and June" is full-throttle. There's the bike race through a sunlit forest; there's a colorful bohemian festival with tribal dress and sexual opportunity; there's a series of postcards, accidentally discovered, that picture erotic delights. In the most sublime scene, Nin, in a red dress, dances to sensual, rhythmic music, and her face is given a fantastic close-up. All of the film's beauty, all of its detail and technical mastery, create a luscious idyll.The film balances between dreams and waking life. Its rhythms vary, and are a vital part of its narrative. There are many moments in it when time slows, focusing our attention on a mood or an object, inviting our reverie. The narrative depends as much on music, color, and editing as it does on dialogue. Each scene is thoughtfully made; each part of each scene has been considered.Watching it, we experience an intelligent world full of strong, interesting personae. Nin and Miller, fearless and imaginative, have high goals, and appetites possibly insatiable. Miller is emotional, articulate, and experimental. He appreciates the sensuousness of life. He begs and at least once steals; he struggles to write and to think for himself. Nin is his equal, tenacious and curious, sometimes cruel, trying to understand her desires and trying to bring them to fruition. Watching two dancers with her cousin, she says, "Oh, look at them, Eduardo. They're so exquisite. If I were a man, I'd be swept away." At one point, she writes in her diary, "I feel restless... spirited... adventurous. To be absolutely truthful, I hope secretly to meet someone else. I have erotic imaginings. I want pleasure."Beauty and strong characters give the film an essential lyricism and lightness. For instance, when June returns, the extended scenes are nightmarish, appropriately raw and claustrophobic. But these scenes conclude in the fog. The fog shifts the mood of the film from the sense of heat and the fire in the claustrophobic rooms to one of regenerative possibilities, a drowsy, dreamy, shadow-heavy world returned. Daylight follows, and the sense of renewal suggested by the fog is made explicit, and further elaborated, by ensuing character development.The beauty is constant and illuminating; the characters seek their satisfactions from life. Stunningly accomplished, director Philip Kaufman's fluid filmmaking is ultimately about delight.
"Every time I wake up, there's someone new at the end of my bed.". In the BBC 3-part mini-series, "Almost Strangers" the Symon family holds a large reunion in a posh London hotel. The reunion is a highly organized, three-day event, funded by the eldest and richest family member, Ernest (Peter Howell). The idea is that members of the family will attend and mingle with those they've never met--or haven't seen in decades.Black sheep Raymond (Michael Gambon) is the head of the relatively lowly Hillingdon branch of the Symon family. Raymond severed all ties with the rest of the Symons years ago, and after running his office furniture shop according to his father's ideals, he's now a bankrupt. His only son, surveyor Daniel (Matthew MacFayden) and Raymond's wife Esther (Jill Baker) are curious about their estranged relatives and persuade Raymond to go to the reunion. He sourly and reluctantly agrees.The reunion is efficiently organized by perfectionist Poppy (Kelly Hunter)--a woman who stresses over every napkin placement. Family archivist, Stephen (Anton Lester)--a man who obsesses about Symon family history conducts mini-seminars on researching a family tree. While Raymond mostly grumps about rubbing elbows with his obviously much more successful relatives, his wife dives into the subject of genealogy, and Daniel makes fast friends with his new-found cousins, an oddly adrift brother and sister--Rebecca (Claire Skinner) and Charles (Toby Stephens).Over the course of the long weekend, major and minor disasters occur, and both Raymond and Daniel become obsessed with childhood photographs. Raymond's photograph--which he's kept framed and cherished in his living room--depicts Raymond pointing and laughing. Archivist Stephen reveals that in the photograph Raymond was actually laughing at his father who was hamming it up in a Tyrolean hat and striking various poses. Raymond tries to remember the incident, and while he only possesses the vaguest shreds of memory of the event, something about the photo haunts him. Similarly, Daniel is shown a picture of himself as a small boy dressed in a fancy dress costume and peeking out from the elaborate ironwork of a circular staircase. Daniel has no memory of this--but more importantly--neither do his parents. Questions remains--who took the photograph of Daniel, and where was it taken?Emphasizing the idea that family members share more traits than they care to admit, director Stephen Poliakoff brilliantly weaves together various stories of several members of the Symon family. Archivist Stephen states that every family hides several amazing stories, and these hidden stories emerge throughout the course of the reunion, and also in the subsequent party held at a splendid former Symon country property. The Symon family includes a diverse bunch of characters--there's elegant, calm Alice (Lindsay Duncan) who brought up Rebecca and Charles, pushy entrepreneur Irving (Timothy Spall) and three elderly sisters whose biscuit hoarding can be perfectly explained. Approximately 4 hours long, "Almost Strangers" is great entertainment, and cleverly conveys the trepidation and excitement the imposing reunion represents to Raymond--a troubled character who decides to face his failures in front of a room full of strangers. Gambon is an amazing actor, and the role of Raymond allows him a full range of emotions and behaviour. The film's slightly trite ending can be forgiven--especially with the solid acting from the entire cast--4 1/2 stars--displacedhuman
Favorite Movie!. I absolutely love this movie! The infinifilm version is great too! There are interviews with the actual George Jung and a ton more! Some people don't like it because of the end but I think overall it's an awesome movie especially because it's based on a true story
waiting for the more deluxe blu-ray version. that way i can buy the movie only three times instead of four
THE most inspirational movie I've seen this year!!!. When the football team from from Shiloh Christian Academy goes on the field to face the unbeatable Giants (the opposing team) the FIRST football player that confronts the Giants is named "Joshua."I love it. In Exodus, Joshua was Moses' successor and the one who eventually led their people into the Promised Land, despite the very scary reports of all those giants.There's another scene where a character is driving away in a shiny red truck and the license plate on the truck says, "Jay Austin Motors" which was the name of the used car lot in "Flywheel."It is details such as this - the little things - that make this movie such a treasure. And it's also the realism. Like "Flywheel," the actors and actresses are real; they look real and sound real and their dialogue is also deliciously real. There are no words to express how delighted I am to see these Christian films getting their due. They're low-budget, but well produced and interesting. They're quiet (nothing explodes and there are no grisly murder scenes), yet they're completely engaging. And their message is compelling and memorable.And perhaps best of all, it shows men and women down on their knees, praying to God and giving their lives wholly to Her (or Him, depending on your perspective). Throughout the movie, I was touched - really and truly touched - by the portrayal of our deep human need and longing to feel God's presence in our life and give ourselves wholly to Her.And - on a more secular note - it's interesting to note that this movie was made on a $100,000 budget. Perhaps the heyday of Hollywood is drawing to a close. We can hope.
The man who made his bicycle fly to France. In my view this is one of the best docco-dramas and in lesser hands than such actors like Michael Gambon and Jeremy Irons, Longitude could have been utterly boring.Longitude is actually two stories set about 200 years apart; the first is set in the 18th. Century when John Harrison (Michael Gambon), a carpenter wants the 20,000 award stipulated in the Act of Queen Anne for a practical device to tell longitude at sea. Harrison's idea was to produce a clock whose accuracy was not destroyed by extremes in temperature or the motion of a ship at sea. At the risk of showing myself up;  The clock would be set on Greenwich Mean Time. The crew would determine noon each day aboard ship with a sextant. The earth turns through 1 every 3 minutes 54 seconds so every 3'54" unit of time = 1 of Longitude. The total of the units gave the degrees Longitude from Greenwich; the Prime Meridian.But, I'll leave the finer points of than one to the mathematicians among you.Harrison produced the world's first marine chronometer, but he was opposed by the astromomers, dominating the Board of Longitude. These resistent board members personified by the obese Dr. Bliss (Ian McNeice) and rodent like Rev. Nevil Maskelyne (Samuel West) undermined Harrison's progress on his clocks for decades. These "lunatics" as Harrison derisively called them insisted that lunar observations, properly charted, would solve the problem of Longitude even though the moon could not be seen for 12 days in every month.The second story is about the trials and tribulations of Cdr. Rupert Gould (Jeremy Irons).Gould has set himself the task of finding and restoring Harrisons 4 clocks whilst "on leave" from the Royal Navy. In World War I, before people had any understanding of Post-traumatic Stress disorder, Gould had "disgraced" himself with the "conduct un-becoming" of having a nervous breakdown whilst on active duty at sea. He had the additional scandal of his seperation from his wife Muriel (Anna Chancellor) who found the financial strain, both from and with, Gould's "obsession" with the clocks unbearable.The stories come together at the Greenwich Obseratory where Harrison's four clocks and Gould's journals are on joint display. Harrison was given his 20,000 at the age of 80 by special act of Parliament and had 2 years to enjoy his wealth before his death on March 24, 1776. Gould was given a gold medal in 1946 and often appeared on the "The Brain's Trust" until his death 5 October 1948.One small point:"In the excellent film "Longitude" Rupert Gould is shown as being on the TV version of "The Brains Trust" however it's first transmission was 4 September 1955, 7 years after his death. The radio version of "The Brains' Trust" had it's first transmission on 1 January 1941."Still both Harrison and Gould stuck to their guns and won out in the end and that makes it more than just a docco to me.
A charming, family-friendly film... Long before Californians elected him as the Governator, former elite bodybuilder Arnold Schwarzenegger took Hollywood by storm as The Terminator. An overpowering figure with amazing charisma on and off the screen, Schwarzenegger did his best to secure roles outside of the typecast blood and destruction movies for which he seemed destined. Instead, Arnold showcased his diversity by branching out into differing genres with such flicks as Twins, Junior, and Kindergarten Cop... Arnold's success is apparent in this light-hearted romantic comedy which utilizes his likeability as well as his macho man image. A delightful bit of entertainment, Kindergarten Cop is classic Arnold, spawning another of his usual famous one-liners, "It's not a tumor"!When Detective John Kimble (Arnold Schwarzenegger) and his partner, Phoebe O'Hara (Pamela Reed), get a hot tip that a drug dealer, Cullen Crisp (Richard Tyson), who they've long pursued is searching for his ex-wife because of some money she embezzled from his operation, the two detectives go undercover to find the woman before he does. With Crisp's wife, Rachel, being the only one alive capable of testifying against Crisp and putting him jail, Kimble is intent on hunting her down. But all he and O'Hara know is the name of the Oregon school the woman's son attends. A former teacher herself, O'Hara agrees to go undercover as a kindergarten teacher in order to weed out the identity of the boy and his mother.The plan goes awry however, when O'Hara becomes horribly ill, forcing Kimble to become the undercover kindergarten cop. The principal is reluctant, but agrees to give Kimble a try. A horrible disciplinarian with no idea of how to control a group of five-year-olds, Kimble's kindergarten class runs rings around him. A nearby first grade teacher, Joyce Palmieri (Penelope Ann Miller), provides him with advice and pointers - leading to a budding romance between the two. With her son Dominic in the class, Kimble suspects that she may be Crisp's ex-wife, but discounts the possibility once she tells him that her ex-husband is dead.Rallying the class behind his new teaching methods, Kimble becomes one of the top teachers in the school. But his failure to hunt down Crisp's ex-wife provides the drug-dealer with the necessary time to hunt down his wife. Upon Crisp's arrival in town, Kimble and O'Hara learn that his true intention is not the money his ex-wife supposedly stole, but the snatching of his son. Together, they must take on Crisp and his belligerent mother before they kidnap the young boy...A funny and heart-warming comedy, Kindergarten Cop's success rests solely on the shoulders of Arnold Schwarzenegger and his unique onscreen personality. With memorable one-liners and cute kids, the film is fun for the entire family. Although it has a modicum of action, Kindergarten Cop is not to be confused with an action thriller. So if you're looking for that type of film, it's not this one. But overall, Kindergarten Cop is an entertaining way to spend an evening, and for that reason, it's a definite must-see film...The DVD Repor
Best fat blaster!. Tamilee Webb's 2 DVD set is the best!  She has you working hard without a steep learning curve.  If you have read my other reviews, then you know that I hate videos with complicated steps or poor instructions.  Tamilee knows her stuff and she shares that knowlege with you.  You learn how to do each move the right way every time.  The Weight Loss DVD is my favorite, but you should note it requires a step.  The first few times I tried it, my legs felt like jelly afterwards.  When I was able to get through the whole workout, there was a tremendous feeling of accomplishment.  The lower body workout is strenuous without being exhausting.  When I've complete the video, I feel energized rather than depleted.  Tamilee's cueing is efficient and her timing is excellent.  There are only a few minor negative points; the music is a little bland and the two women who are exercising with Tamilee are too perfect to seem real.  I really appreciate it when workout videos show normal looking people.  That being said, these videos are two of my favorites.  I never seem to tire of them.
POSSIBLY THE BEST FILM OF THE 1990s. This film is hard to describe, but I'll do my best; the interaction between the characters was enjoyable, the beautiful relationships between the people, i.e.: Crag Shaffer (spelling?) and his minister father, as well as Craig Shaeffer's would-be/soon(?)-to-be-wife, and his brother, played by Brad Pitt.  This is a warm-hearted film, yet it's melancholly, 'cause like towards the end of the film the narrator says, beautiful things don't last forever.  Nothing specific really points to this direction (the sad ending), its just this kinda subliminal feeling the film has, like all the good stuff happening is too good to be true or something.  None of the material in this film is boring (unless you want an action film...) nor hokey or sappy or anything.  It's a mature blend of everything sweet and beautiful...and melancholly.  The very last scene where the narrator reflects on the current state of his life left shivers on my spine.  I LOVE this movie!!
Hysterically Funny. I ordered this movie on Pay Per View cable tv. because of the fact that James Purefoy was in it...never expecting it to be so well done and...Funny! It was one of ny first experiences with British comedy and I was extremely pleased not only with Mr. Purefoy's performance but also the entire cast. if you are looking for an off the wall comedy..this is it
Great musician, guitarist. I just received the Robben Ford DVD yesterday. I've been a fan of Robben's for over twenty years. He's done stints as a guitarist with Jimmy Witherspoon, Charlie Musselwhite, Joni Mitchell, the Yellowjackets and the great Miles Davis, to name a few. As a guitarist myself,  I am awed by his talent and musicality. He is often labeled as a fusion guitarist, which is somewhat of a misnomer. While quite fluent in the jazz medium he is at heart a bluesman. Once again this DVD is taken from the Ohne Filter German Televison show. The mixing and sound quality is great. Robben uses his band The Blue Line here. It is a trio consisting of Roscoe Beck on bass and Tom Brecchtlein on drums. Both are superb musicians. The show is from 93.Robbens playing is incredible and incedniary. His voice while not quite on a par with his playing is pleasant and easy to listen to. My only complaint is It's a bit short, just eight songs but still well worth the price of the DVD. If you are a fan of postmodern urban blues, this DVD is a must have
THE REAL ECW!. This dvd is worth buying, and if you have never seen ECW you MUST BUY this. And for every one going "Yeah well I saw ECW on the SCI-FI channel and it sucked" yes it did SUCK.........you know why? It wasn't the real ECW it was the WWE-ECW. This dvd has captured some of the BEST macthes ever in wrestling, sure there ARE that should be on here that arnt but hey VOl 2 will be comming along soon. IN other words the dvd is ECW that we have 100% been addicted to for sooooooooo many years, this IS 100% ECW. Buy this NOW
bad ass. good good anime series. top notch directing, story, characters buy them all! but be sure to watch subtitled version
Drawn into the Mystic. Mystic River is a triumph for Clint Eastwood. Truly a moving film, Mystic River never lets your eyes wander from the screen as you're completely focused on this very disturbing story. A film capturing the adult lives of once childhood friends, played by Sean Penn, Tim Robbins and Kevin Bacon, you watch as they come together once again after what appears to be many years of brief and intermittent run-ins with each other.Sean Penn plays somewhat of a wise, yet immature loose cannon of a man, Kevin Bacon as a MPD (Massachusetts) detective and Tim Robbins as the man whose life was forever altered because of a shocking childhood trauma, these three play off of each other very well. I wanted to reach out to each of them. There are moments where some may see Kevin Bacon's character as a bit flushed out, but it appears that this is more effective than not. We jump from age 10 to probably late 30's, early 40's of these three men and we learn little about them that helps to explain so much.After Penn's daughter is brutally murdered, Bacon and Laurence Fishburne (a fine choice to partner with Bacon) take on the case to find her killer. The three friends are all shaken up (obviously Penn is destroyed over hiss loss) and the mystery seems to unfold quite rapidly. This is definitely one of the most intriguing mystery films I've seen in a long time.Fans of those earlier mentioned should really enjoy this film. There are also some excellent and shocking performances by Laura Linney and Marcia Gay Harden. I highly recommend this film. Its disturbing and almost heart-wrenching (perhaps even angering) subject will attract any looking for a solid dramatic mystery with some very memorable characters. This is one to add to your collection
Great portrayal of Jesus. I loved that this film version of Matthew was taken word for word from the text of scripture.  I also loved that Jesus looked like he could be Jewish, and that he didn't act like the lobotomized robotic Jesus that I have seen in other some other films... Hey, we take what we can get.  The reason I gave this version 4 stars was that the camera sometimes focuses on that which seems totally unrelated to what Jesus is saying.  Overall, however, I give this film two thumbs up and have recommended it to many others
Gets Creepy. I don't know if I'd say this is a VERY creepy film like "The Ring" and almost scary, but it certainly is strange, starting with the plot:Annie Wilson {Cate Blanchett} is a psychic who's "gift" is to see the future, and/or what has recently happened in a certain place, and she reads cards to the local people. When someone she knows  mysteriously  disappears, no one can find her. Sooner or later {after she is found dead}, the ghost of this woman haunts Annie and this "gift" is like something to protect Annie and her family, but in the process, the following situations become somewhat disturbing as the movie goes on because the acting and the cast are very well done. The characters make you have opinions about them. This movie is just so weird it's pretty tough to explain every detail...but then I'd be spoiling it, wouldn't I
One of the best movies about Vietnam. Based on a true story; Location; Vietnam in The valley of the death. Lt. Colonel Moore leading 400 American troopers is surrounded by 4000 North Vietnamese soldiers.Amazing combat scenes, costumes and weapons with perfect graphic authenticity, making this movie stands apart from all the Vietnam movies ever filmed before.The casting, the dialogue and colors are amazing as well; not to forget the perfect acting of Mel Gibson and Sam Elliott.I have seen all the war movies about Vietnam. In my opinion, `We were soldiers' is one of the best that came so far. From all the aspect described above including the historical side, this movie is a must own to all collectors of this genre.
An enjoyable western and love story. Kevin Costner combined traditional western elements -- the 1880's, the cattle drive, the conflict with ruthlessness that leads to a shoot-out -- he combined those elements with a love story, and the result for me was a very good movie.  The fine cast is anchored by Robert Duvall.  Costner must have had Duvall in mind from the beginning to play Boss Spearman.  I agree with Costner when, as Charlie Waite, he said they "broke the mold" after Duvall.  Annette Benning was also very good as the town nurse who cared for Boss and Charlie's wounded friends.Costner, as director, and James Muro, as director of photography, took full advantage of the lush, green Calgary landscape.  And those mountains were incredible, providing a picturesque setting for the small town of Harmonville.  This was a beautiful film to watch and to listen to, with that wonderful musical score.  This is a movie that Costner and all involved can definitely be proud of.
Roughnecks-The Starshop Troopers Chronicles series. I watched the whole series on tv and on dvd and I liked all of it.  However the dvd series is missing some vital episodes that was shown on tv that is not in the dvd series. One of them is a  segment of episodes that they are stranded on an astreoid, Zander is sick from a strange virus, the firefryes on the asteroid, and realizing that the asteroid is in reality a bug in a dorment statious.  Not to mention an episode that they look for the queen that is on a transport but on it's way to Terran that is supposed to be last episode in the Klendathue Campain. You see there are some episodes that are not on dvd that are suposed to be with the series that are not with it.  I would also like to know when the grand fanally of the series is going to come up in who is going to win the war between the bugs and the Roughnecks. now that is a fanally I want to see
The best animated T.V show ever made by warner bros. Batman is the greatest animated show still running out there with other great classics like batman beyond or batman and robin. You can relive the gotham scene and atmosphere of a great saga of gothams finest Dark Knight. This DVD edition is great to your collection of other titles that have made it big like batman. Great episodes, great storylines and great charecters, what more to say. 10/10
I Loved it. To clarify I haven't seen the film but my friend Josh really liked it. And Josh watches a lot of movies so it's got to be good
More intense walking workout. I just saw on Good Morning America this morning that interval training gets the best results.  This is a great interval workout and if you only have 30 minutes to exercise, you can't beat this one!  This is more challenging than Leslie's other routines.  You can definitely work up a sweat
Great version of the Z film; excellent bonus stuff:). I highly recommend this flawed by very well done (like that oxymoron? grin) dvd about the Zapruder film. Of particular note is the sprocket hole information depicting JFK's Secret Service agents. Get this!Vince Palamara-JFK/ Secret Service expert (History Channel, author of two books, in over 30 other author's books, etc.)Pittsburgh, PABEST JFK ASSASSINATION BOOK: ULTIMATE SACRIFICEBEST JFK SECRET SERVICE BOOK: SURVIVOR'S GUILT BY YOURS TRULY :)
This spectacular romp is supercharged! .Who is the guy who robs Bruce early on?. Very lively, very visual, everybody does things that no other movie has the ground strength for them to do it in.  The best soundtrack...whether it is being rhythmic, emotional, or grand.  THis is one film that has to be seen to be believed.  Once you get to know it after more than one screening, you get to love it, especially since it's heart (Lelu) is so genuine, along with being gorgeous.  But my favorite little scene in this spectacle is the maxed out gonzo who tries to rob Bruce Willis at his little mod-port apartment....he's a complete wreck....speeding out of his mind, and unable to keep it together...turning the moment into great comic effect. Whoever you are, you're one of the best things in this movie...and talk about not skimping, don't forget the asian guy who floats his junk-styled ship over to Bruces window to sell him noodles and then floats aways into the fantastic skyway...just a little something to add to the great charms and fantastic touches of this one of a kind film!  anybody finds out who that robber guy was, lemme know!  andre thedre@value.ne
An Afternoon Delight. Whether it's watching network news or playin' "Pull My Finger," it doesn't take much to make me laugh.  More importantly, hit me between the eyes with ribald, sophomoric humor--humor as meaningful as a clown reading Shakespeare--and I'm good to go.  Don't give me Woody Allen; give me Cheech & Chong and a box of pizza rolls.Which is why SAVING SILVERMAN floats my boat.  This flick has a stupid story (a triumvirate of buds torn apart by the girlfriend from Hades, and the steps taken by the two friends on the outside looking in to bust up the romance), over-the-top antics, goofy shtick, and a healthy dose of cornball.  But it's darn funny, and as unpretentious as a mongrel using a fire hydrant.  This movie reminds me of the best way to ride a rollercoaster:  just let go and have fun.Jason Biggs is okay as the nerdy and whipped friend who must be "saved" (probably not much of an acting stretch for him), yet Steve Zahn and Jack Black are superb as the two mentally-challenged buds doing the saving.  These guys make a great comedic team; they ought to hook up again in another movie.  But as good as Zahn and Black are, Amanda Peet steals the show as the straight-faced, ball-busting girlfriend who won't give up her man under any circumstances (and some circumstances in this film are considerable).  As mentioned above, SAVING SILVERMAN doesn't garner any blueblood points, but it serves up blue collar humor in spades.--D. Mikels, Author, WALK-O
I don't know what to say. I was not going in bathrooms looking for dudes when I was younger. But I certainly was in the same predictment. I'm a 20 year old gay male, and I still have problems talking to my parents about it. I will say this movie is an accurate depiction of my own life. I was not exactly a geek, but I was not very popular in high school. People knew about my sexuality and pushed me around. I found my first love in one of the most hottest, handsome guy in school. And he told me that he too was gay and it went on from there.I really enjoyed this movie. The acting was beautiful and so was the storyline. It is just what I love in a movie. I also recommend Beautiful Thing for others.. those brits really produce great coming out movies...
Score!. Nick Wells (Robert DeNiro) is an aging thief that is looking to retire. He has enough money, owns a nice jazz club in Toronto and just wants to settle back. His occasional girlfriend, a flight attendant, (Angela Bassett), is thrilled to hear the news and offers to get her route transferred to Toronto. Nick's longtime fence, Max (Marlon Brando), comes to him with a proposition. There is an item in Toronto's Custom House that a customer will pay very handsomely for. Nick is initially reluctant. He never does a job in his hometown. It is too risky. But Brian (Edward Norton) has an inside connection."The Score", directed by Frank Oz, is the type of summer film that adults crave, yearn and salivate for. An intelligent film, with good to great performances, an involving story and great technical work. If you were brought up on MTV-style editing, forget about it. 'The Score' unfolds at a very deliberate pace, which some people have already commented is too slow. I disagree. The story unfolds slowly, in the first act, to incorporate a way of life that Nick is used to. As things gear up, so does the action. Oz has crafted a film that looks great, but doesn't push the style envelope too much.DeNiro is, as usual, great. Nick Wells is tired and desperate to retire, but he wants to live a certain lifestyle and the lure of a sizable score brings him back into the fold. His character's relationship with Bassett's character is also good, but Bassett's character has about 15 minutes of screen time, if that. I found it interesting and fascinating to watch this character work and to get to know his life, likes and habits.Norton creates a very unique and interesting character. To reveal too much about the character would reveal secrets about the film. Secrets that, unfortunately, the trailers and commercials reveal. Jackie is an interesting character, a novice thief who seems to bristle at the direction of the more experienced Nick. Norton is a great actor and he more than holds his own against DeNiro and Brando.Brando is also very good. After a series of bizarre roles, he has toned down the theatrics quite a bit. Max Baron is a man afraid of losing his lifestyle as well. Since his lifestyle largely hinges on the work of Nick, he is hesitant to let Nick give up the work. Brando plays the role fairly simply. Occasionally, he does a bit of theatrical business but thankfully, no more wine buckets on his head.I love caper and heist films. I love trying to figure out what is going to happen and to find out how the people carry the heist off. 'The Score' leads to a climatic robbery which is plotted extremely well. We follow Nick as he prepares for the heist, never revealing all of the plan, so that when the heist actually happens, there are still some surprises. This reminded me of a French film, from the 50s, called 'Riffifi'. Both films spend a lot of time detailing the preparations for the heist. Both films are very good and worth watching."The Score" is a handsome film, filled with interesting performances and an engaging story. Go see it. Go. Stop sitting at your computer reading web postings.
Classic. This movie is the typical 1970's Blacksploitation movie with great music and bad acting.  Hovever, it's a classic and I love it.  As soon as I was able to find it on DVD I knew I had to get it
It's Humans VS. Bad Aliens... Who will win?  You will have to watch and see.  Really though, this is a great movie.  The plot is there, the cast is strong, and it is really interesting.  Parts of it make you wonder if there really was an alien spacecraft recovered by the government.  It is very cool throughout, and "in your face".  There is never a dull moment.  I love Will Smith, Brent Spiner, Jeff Goldblum, and Harry Connick Jr., and they were ALL in this movie!  Honestly folks, this is one of the best Sci-Fi action movies ever made.  VERY entertaining
i love gallo!. This movie got me into gallo flicks.The story blows anything hitchcock did out of the water and the special effects are awesome.Goblin music is probably my favorite soundtrack for a horror movie.DARIO ARGENTO IS GOD
Kevin Blatch is a Genius. To all who read this.  Canadian born actor "Kevin Blatch" played a great role in this episode!  I've been following him and watching his career closely.  You can also check him out in Dudley Do-Rite, Third Man Out & my Fav White Chicks as the fabulous Aubrey Allure
Highly recommended - beautiful, deep practice. Highly highly highly recommended for those looking for a deep and deeply nurturing practice that really spans many features of the body-mind path, including Taoist / Chinese medicine teachings, Buddhist teachings, of course yoga, and just everyday life. She is a lovely and skilled guide. Very rich tool and treat
Two great laughs. ---"Encino Man"---A brilliant what-if movieAfter watching "Caveman" ASIN: 6302658489, to see what life was really like way back then, it is time to speculate on what-if a cave dweller was thawed out in our time. We can not just choose anyone to portray a cave man in today's environment. So we pick an expert that already thinks this way, Brendan Fraser. To balance this we must also find someone to portray the serious scholar that observes and guides him through the intricacies of today's environment from driving to the Seven-Eleven; that person can only be Pauly Shore. Every serious scholar must have a protagonist to anchor the story, hence Sean Astin later to play "Kurt Vonnegut's Harrison Bergeron" (1995) ASIN: 6303801919Will the displaced caveman adapt? Will he survive? Is the cheese old and moldy? And more to the point will you survive with out laughing to death?-----------------------------------------"Son-In-Law"---Love in the countryA rural girl (Carla Gugino), the farmer's daughter, is sent to a big city school. There she meats and embraces the outside world. Evidently it is true that you can't keep them down on the farm. To escape a fate worse than death (marriage to a local yokel) she contrives and cajoles a fellow student Crawl (Pauly Shore) to be a pretend fianc and potential Son-in-law.Now the clandestine meeting. The family slightly dysfunctional believes they found a weird dude to tinker with his mind. Sot of reminds you of a rural "My Man Godfrey". Crawl brings out the best in people and corrects the dysfunction.The real question remains will he really be the "Son-in-law?"
Great Video Quality - Okay Sound. I have finally managed to acquire the complete "LFN" series, which I consider to be Canada's finest export product.  The 4th season is certainly no exception.  Perhaps one day the series will even be brought out in High Def.  My home theater system includes 7.1 channel sound, and, as is the case with all the LFN seasons, the DVD's incorporate only PCM or stereo sound (my only significant criticism of this and other season collections)
Unexpected Enjoyment. I haven't bought anime in years, but this came up in my gold box and it sounded cute and like a cross between Slayers and Tenchi (my two favorite animes) so I picked it up.Man, am I ever glad I did. I was laughing out loud as some of the hijinx in this cartoon and it's rare I ever laugh at loud at anything.Excellent voice acting, and the animation is very much in the vein of "Record of Lodoss War." A lot of the episodes are two parters, and there is just the right mix of drama and insane comedy. It was so enjoyable I ende dup tracking down the first 4 volumes of the manga.Complete impulse purchase and I'm very glad I did. For the cost, you can't go wrong, especially when most anime DVD's are $20+  per DISC in this day and ag
A Western Grimms Fairy tale!. In the US Clint Eastwood does not have the legendary reputation of artistic merit as he does in Europe.  If you watch this film closely, you see greatness not just in Clint but for Sergio Leone, the director, whose film-making transformed the Western film genre.Or just enjoy this now classic film on its own merit as a timeless great--yet grim--Western.
Good but not great. This was a good movie not a great movieIf you are a die hard De Niro fan or Pesci then you should get this to add to your collectionMost of the movie stays great but some tends to lag on and seems like the movie has some extra scenes that where not neededas far as dramatic scenes go there arre a few and they are the best parts of the movieI would recomend The Goodfellas before this but if your a DE Niro fan like me get this movi
Wagon Train-John McIntire. Very good, although I expected th have series fearuring Ward Bond but maybe that was my fault
absolutely fantastic.  well worth the money. I'll make this short and to the point.  This release is a MUST for any Rush fan, ESPECIALLY if you own a 5.1 or DTS surround sound system in your home.  Each one of these concerts is worth the $30 price tag, but to bundle all three and then throw in a live CD of the Grace Under Pressure is just awesome.  I've had Exit...Stage Left on VHS, and to own it on DVD in DTS is very cool.
An Interesting, Entertaining Film For A Rainy Sat. Afternoon. This is a good film to watch when you can't go outside, when you've got the time for some popcorn and an entertaining, otherwise meaningless action flick.  Most interesting is the manner in which this small military unit fell apart, after getting lost in a Louisiana swamp and riling some of the local backwoodsmen.  The sergeant in charge kept spouting training-manual platitudes ("lay down suppressing fire" etc), while every subordinate squad member developed his own ideas for surviving.  Suspend your disbelief, and just watch it only for fun.  (P.S. I've met some of the indigent folks portrayed in this film, and there's no way in real life they could ever be so functional or sober.
Swept by the Currents. I myself have been a little oversensitive to movies, and I admit every time I see this movie, it is like the first time, with the way the action is presented and picks up with the score.Julianne Moore gives a great performance. You may like Freedomland if you agree. She does an excellent job in that as well. She "holds" the character's emotions in every job and carries it through every change and turn.I thought Philip Seymour Hoffman's character, the nurse, in all of the character's unpreparedness for the job, and displaced imagery an insult to people in the field, but an honest one and I suppose the kind of portrayal of people Paul wanted to convey to anyone. It's this character that we tend not to identify with, but he sure is a part of us right now.The most alarming perspective given here in some instances is of Claudia Wilson. The emotions in this film are deeply portrayed and prepared in the most knowledgable way, with understanding of what these people are going through. Tom Cruise's character is a little extreme but necessary to what Paul wanted to show people, with an offense to morals to our defense of morals. It should be our understanding always to accept people in any admiration, and it is necessary to admire these people when watching this. The actors all had their place in this film; none could have been better portrayed. I say this much knowing that the film gets good reviews here, and it is really a good experience with the score by Jon Brion, which is also available.I'm quite superficial where I live, and I know this movie helped bridge that to feeling that people are much more meaningful than our everyday lives grant us to see at the times we need to. Thus, this is a film of good faith in people. I'd just like to see movies like this filmed abroad and not just in the city of angels and New York or Chicago. There is so much more to the world. In fact, movies like this and several others inspired me to write a novel intended to be a movie as well, and it is finished but hasn't been published yet. It's really a long wait to get published with as many people as there are who write.I have a certain ideal for movies that haven't been made yet, and it is closer to reality but relevant throughout, in the way of lifting our emotions at certain scenes as Six Feet Under has done so well. And Magnolia is done intensely and in an exaggerated way but still bringing you to feel for these people. They seem real enough to me that they are people and not characters. We are trying to portray real situations and not shy from it. The most important thing I find in movies that stay with me is that they help us to care more about people and not be ignorant to what they feel or how they behave. We have to know these things in order to be more than just a friend to the people we love and who love us. Sometimes our days aren't so good, and we find that we are far from people, or their days aren't so good, and we find we can do nothing for them. We are repressed, and it's movies like Magnolia to wake us up and bring people worldwide to the next page of what society needs. If you are one to this movement, you will appreciate much of what Magnolia is. Some people I know don't give mind to these things, and it makes me uneasy that people aren't more like me. We are hard to find. Then again, we may all have a mind to these things, I can't tell - we are so repressed
Wes Craven: Man of Mystery and Movies. Wes Craven, the man who has written, directed, produced, or edited more than 30 television and feature films such as &quot;Last House on the Left&quot;, &quot;Swamp Thing&quot;, &quot;A Nightmare on Elm Street&quot;, and the recent &quot;Scream&quot; trilogy, is finally revealed here in the popular &quot;The Directors&quot; series. Wes speaks highly and thoroughly about the making of his films, but keeps quiet about his personal life which he has always done and I respect. Though, it is very informative about his feature films, this DVD neglects to mention almost none of his television work like the new &quot;Twilight Zone&quot; of the 80's and his short lived &quot;Nightmare Cafe&quot; series. Any fans of &quot;The People Under the Stairs&quot; will be sorley disappointed as they pretty much mention the title then move onto &quot;Wes Craven's New Nightmare.&quot; What can you expect, they had to squeeze 15 films into one hour. Other than that the DVD is great. Wes Craven fans should check it out
HUFF. Somebody kept using the past tense in their review. Huff IS still on the air, though was almost cancelled (I think) but it is going to start sooner than expected, and got a grant of more episodes then they asked for, as far as I know.Now, I am a person who, as a whole HATES psychiatrists, so I was reluctant to watch this, but I did, and I think this show is one of the greatest on TV. They chose a great cast, and the plots are superb. The episode, left me, like it did many viewers, on the edge of my seat (it shocked me quite a bit). It premieres in four days (Wedensday, August 24th), in case somebody needs to know
Topper's RETURNED!. And he's got a carload of women! Actually, not a carload ,just two... One of whom happens to be a ghost! She drags topper to an old creepy house to find out who killed her. The house happens to be full of all sorts of secret passages, and WEIRD personalities.And of course, Mrs. Topper suspects that the young lady who got Cosmo over here is 'the other woman'. This movie is truly funny, and it's backed up by Eddie, or Rochester, Jack Benny's Valet. A Must-See
Why McQueen Was A Star. Nevada Smith was made at the heights of McQueen's short, but terrific career. This film, along with Love With The Proper Stranger, The Thomas Crown Affair, The Cincinnati Kid and Bullitt, proves just why McQueen was a star.Although the film is your average revenge-story, McQueen's performance along with Karl Malden, Martin Landau, Brian Keith and Susanne Pleshette, make it worth watching. McQueen stars as a young man (the script mentions that he's a boy and half-Indian, but so what?)who witnesess his parents' murder at the hands of Karl Malden's blood-thirsty gang. From there he goes on a year's long quest to hunt down each and every one of the killers, until his parents' death is avenged. He even goes so far as to land himself in a Louisianan chain gang to get one of them. What makes this movie stand out from other films in this genre, is McQueen's maturation during this process. He goes from young boy, to seasoned, cool killer by the time he reaches Karl Malden. McQueen, known for extensively underplaying a scene, gives away all kinds of subtlelties that most people missed (indeed this is why some in Hollywood didn't consider him a good actor), but that upon closer inspection one would see that he's "in character" every step of the way. The scene when he's in the swamp with one of his parents' killers and Susann Pleshette is chilling, because you see all of his rage at finally finding this man and exacting his revenge. What is more poignant is when he, at long last, has Karl Malden, and instead of killing him, leaves him there to die. You see in McQueen's eyes all of the pain, and sorrow, at his parents' loss, but you also see the pity that he has for this weak, pathetic man who is nothing without a gun on his belt. McQueen simply looks at the man, shrugs and walks away. In the hands of another actor this scene would've been overplayed to the point of melodrama, but McQueen said everything that needed to be said in a few simple gestures. That's what makes a star
I LOVE this movie!. There isn't much to say about it except that it is all around great.  Kiefer Sutherland plays a hard cop who has to begin to believe in the paranormal in order to solve a mystery.  The acting is cheesey, as are the special effects, but for some reason this is one of my favorite movies.  Anyone who likes any of the following should check it out:  ghost stories, the x-files/the outer limits, psychic stories, kiefer sutherland
Great Family Fun. Delightful sequel to Cheaper By The Dozen, Belles on Their Toes, follows the adventures of the Gilbreth family following the death of father Frank (Clifton Webb).  Struggling to keep the family together, mother Lillian (Myrna Loy) continues the pioneering work in industrial engineering she started with her husband.  Eldest daughter Ann (Jeanne Crain) has struggles of her own.  Does she go off to college and pursue a life of her own, or stay home to help her mother with domestic matters, no small task since Ann is one of twelve children!  The cast is very appealing and although they seem too good to be true at times, it's hard not to be drawn into this heartwarming comedy.  Most of the cast from Cheaper repeats their roles in Belles, with the addition of a young Jeffrey Hunter and veteran character actor Edward Arnold.  Also in the cast, a young Debra Paget (as third daugher Martha), and an unbilled Martin Milner as an "unsuitable" boyfriend for Ernestine (Barbara Bates).  The Technicolor print for this film is superior to Cheaper By The Dozen, which is a plus.  The color looks new and vibrant and it will add to the overall positive experience of viewing this film.  As sequels go, Belles is pleasant and enjoyable family entertainment
Grand Canyon. This film was recommended to me by a friend.  I was hesitant after reading reviews of the film, as it had received marginal ratings.  I don't agree with those who have rated this film poorly.  I enjoyed the deep emotion displayed in this film by the cast, who I might add, were excellent in their roles.  This story takes place in Los Angeles and has many similarities to "Crash", as it deals with issues of race and prejudices.  I believe this film was fairly innovative in 1991, which might be the reason it was not well received. The story does have weeknesses in the fact that I was constantly expecting something bad to happen and then all worked out at the last minute before impending disaster.  In Crash, the bad things happen which gives that story more depth and tears at your emotions.  This film deals with issues that most of us can relate to.  That being, we don't always take the time to really explore our feelings and emotions. We don't always take time to explore how our actions affect those people we love or care for.  I liked those aspects of the film.  My husband was not as affected this way and would probably agree with those who rated this film with low to medium ratings.I truly enjoyed this film.  It may not be for everybody, but I would recommend it and I would enjoy watching it again.
A classic worth checking out. Disney is not known for innovative science fiction movies. It seems there is a reason why Disney is not known for Sci-Fi. With not much to show for in the genre other than Escape from Witch Mountain and The Cat from Outer Space, Disney didn't put much focus in the genre back then. The Black Hole is probably their most ambitious attempt at serious science fiction they have done. It succeeds on some areas and doesn't on others. I guess it will really depend on the kind of stuff you are looking for.The greatest success of The Black Hole is the model work. When you get to see the main spacship, the Cygnus, close up and the camera pans around it slowly it's a sight to behold. Other models like the survey ship Palomino look good as well. Not too much detail, but just enough to make it both believable and neat. The interior sets, while not top notch, are also impressive and give you a decent representation of the scale of the Cygnus as you see long hallways, large botanical gardens and a massive command bridge. Another VERY neat thing about this movie is the robot design. Every single robot is cool from the intelligent and witty V.I.N.C.E.N.T. to the intimidating and tough looking Maximillian. The robots and ships alone are worth the price of admission.The story itself is actually good, but it suffers from some odd twists here and there. This is especially true in the final scenes, which start to absolutely makes no sense whatsoever. You will wonder what they bozos were thinking by the time you get to the end. Another weak point in the movie is the action scenes. While some do the movie justice most seem to be put there just to try and add more excitement while not lending itself to the story whatsoever. Still both these shortcomings, as boneheaded as they seem, are fewer than the well executed stuff. Acting is good for its time and considering the production company, with Ernest Borgnine and Maximilian Schell giving the more dynamic performances.Special effects are comparatively weak even for the late 70's with exception to the model spaceship work. Lasers and stuff like look tacked on. You can see the wires on the actors on zero gravity scenes. Stuff like that. The soundtrack is great though. You get a nice full orchestral piece that has both a grand and eerie sound to it. Hats off to composer John Barry. Conventional effects and lighting are mixed bag with some very cool stuff and some either over the top or half-baked stuff sprinkled throughout the movie.There are various versons of this movie out on DVD. The ONLY one you should be looking for is the one that includes the "Through The Black Hole" featurette. These days it costs about the same as the other versions and you get a documentary that gives more detail than I expected (including an explanation regarding the horrible final scenes). You also get the cleanest transfer of all, digital surround sound, French and Spanish language tracks and the movie trailer. Considering all you get is the movie from other versions this is like striking gold for any fan.All in all if you like focusing on the story or are really into robots and neat ships then The Black Hole will do you good. If you have to have intense and believable action then maybe this movie isn't for you. Keep in mind that this movie is by no means perfect. It goes off on some weird tangents that not even Stanley Kubrick would have come up with. However it's another one of those footnotes in the annals of the science fiction genre and is worth a look.
Nice flic to watch on a rainy afternoon. Nice movie to watch on a rainy afternoon, good musical score.  Even a 15 year old can enjoy it
Archie Bunker is me!. They stole this character from my real life and there are millions of us!We lay in the brush waiting to tell the PC crowd where to stick it! Like ole Archie, we get the "bull by the corns, and give him the ole heave-ho
Great collection of justice league unlimited episodes. Great collection the justice league unlimited collection excellent show
Even My Husband likes the show. I absolutly think this show is one of the best teenie bopper shows out.  My 33yr old husband enjoys this show.  Every episode keeps you hanging in suspense. I never can wait till the next one. The season finale is the major cliff hanger at the end of the third season. When everything seems to start going the way you want another wrench gets thrown into the mix. Waiting all summer for the next season to start is horrible.
Perfect. This item is perfect no only the contents but the status and shipping time
Terrific Story Line. My 3 teenage sons (17, 15 & 13 yrs.) watched this movie (more than once) and they really enjoyed it (by the way, these guys are real harsh movie critics).  It has a very cool story line, quite a bit of action with a few comical scenes.  However, what was most striking about the movie was to see four brothers of different races really interacting with each other as if they were real blood brothers.  Kudos must definitely go to the actors and the movie's casting team.
I disagree. After reading the reviews above I decided to chime in with my two cents.  Although I agree Joe Public may find this movie a bit dry and at times unrealistic I must say that this is an unfair assesment and that the film has it's audience.  Currently I am working on my masters in Psychology and I must say that the depiction of an individual who is seriously considering suicide is far more accurate than most films today.  Despite popular opinion, those who attempt suicide are rarely brudding goths who always see the more morbid side of things and listen to Metallica.  They are generally normal people who just feel tired and lost, something that Paul Rudd brings across in spades.  Although they seldom film their deaths, most suicide attempties do discuss killing themselves and are often aware of how "indulgent" it may seem to others, a point discussed in the film.  Thus it is unfair to say that this movie is bad based on a half founded belief that the content is unrealistic
powerful teen drama. I loved this movie from the moment I saw it for sale at my video store's discard rack ten years ago. I recently received the DVD as a gift and the sound quality is a big improvement over my old vhs copy.  I recommend it for performances, the story and the photography. Jodie Foster's monologue toward the end of the film is particularly memorable. Each girl's story line is realistic and the film itself does a good job of capturing teen life in the late 70s before yuppie values took hold.  This is NOT a John Hughes film and is a refreshing change for anyone who was subjected that director's teen films in the 80s
X3-What would Bryan Singer do?. When watching the third X Men movie, one cannot help but wonder if Bryan Singer was involved in the movie.Brett Ratner does a credible job on his contribution to a movie franchise that Singer defined.The movie is loaded with great action sequences,new characters,plot twists and and resolutions.Unfortunately at 105 minutes it crams in too much when an over two hour screen time would better service under developed elements(The Phoenix,and the off-screen death of a beloved X-Men)and characters(Angel,Beast,Juggernaught,Rogue).The endings leaves the door open for this not to be the "Last" stand of the cinimatic adventure of the X-Men
Live at Lansdowne Road. Absolutely fantastic!!!  Overall great performance.  If you only were to buy one of The Corrs videos this would be the one.  Totally amazing to see them perform in front of 50,000+ fans.  The only complaint (if one could call it that) is that they do not highlight Caroline enough.  I have to admit she is my favorite of the group and it is totally delightful to watch beating on those drums with all that energy of hers and her drop dead smile !!!!
Comedy for male and female viewers. The Wedding Crashers is one of the modern breed of rom-coms (along with Hitch) that actually appeals to men as well as women. The formula is simple, amuse the guys by showing the male lead as a chauvenistic womaniser, then please the chicks by having him turn into the gushing romantic hero who falls for the female star. It basically means juvenile toilet humour for the first half of the film before the transition into unrealistic gushing soppy romance that never actually happens in real life in the second half. I enjoyed it, but it does get a bit sappy towards the end
Salt of the earth. This movie is a thought provoking exercise in conspiracy and reality drenched fiction.  It is a story that could well have been headlines all over the world.  The journey of an activist in Africa can easily be frought with danger.  Exposing a far-reaching conspicacy that compromises public health is a powerful subject.  One mans quest to uncover the truth and honor his dearly departed partner is a moving trip through the twists and turns of a complicated crime.  The coverup is something that could easily happen in real life.  It wouldn't be the first time that corporate greed compromised the public good.  While there is heartfelt vindication in the movies conclusion it is still sad.  There is no happy ending or lasting satisfaction.  But it is a grim reminder that courage no matter how worthwhile can get you killed in the modern world.  The value of human life is something that powerful people denigrate on a daily basis.  It is hoepful that this movie will strike a chord in the minds of the public opinion.  Question all motives at all times.  Keep a vigil out for the sick and helpless.  Sometimes a crisis in underdeveloped countries will go on festering for years.  It is on our watch that people everywhere should have someone to count on when there is a crisis.  The world owes those less fortunate to have a helping hand extended towards them.  This one man teaches a lesson we should never forget.  Always question those in power and hold them accountable.  Activism is a altruistic crusade that is much needed and deeply appreciated.  This movie makes you remember that and is must see viewing.  It is a sad reminder of what can go wrong in the modern world.  If only there was retribution more often in the real world.  For those who live in well-developed countries they have much to be thankful for and much to be expected of them.  Only when widespread disease and hunger are eradicated can we call this a civilized world.  Always be suspicious of those that profit from the plight of the poor man.  And never give up in the quest for truth and justice
"We need a druid, and you have cast a level 5 charm spell on me". Anyone looking past its intentionally hokey sound effects, bad edits, and storyline holes can acknowledge WET HOT AMERICAN SUMMER as the classic send-up of camp films that it is.Admittedly, there's not a lot of competition for the title (MEATBALLS, anyone?), but this movie earns its stripes with good will, funny dialogue, and preternaturally excellent casting. Michael Showalter (who co-wrote the film) is reasonably funny as the gawky counselor protagonist, and he's joined by the uniformly amusing Paul Rudd, Molly Shannon, David Hyde Pierce, Janeane Garofolo, and Michael Ian Black.A lot of care went into giving the film a sense of place as a summer camp in 1981, which, along with the ruthlessly gratuitous soundtrack, gives it the right nostalgic flavor. Sure, the last 20 minutes of the film are a write-off, but comedy movies often fall prey to the need to build the plot up to an unfunny climax. All I know is that for the first 70 minutes, I chuckled a good deal and only winced a few times; what more can you ask for
This beautiful film sort of frightens me a bit with its dramatics'. Having seen most of Bernal's films, I've grown to like him greatly as an actor, thus explaining my motivation for picking this up. I think this is the first English speaking film Gael has done and that I've seen. On the first scene when he open his mouth I was taking aback because I wasn't use to him speaking English with an English accent to top it all off. I won't lie it took some getting use too; to me he sounded okay but it wasn't the best.In this film his character is up for causing some mischief in this romantic thriller. Kit (Gael Bernal) plays a Brazilian immigrant living in London. He works odd jobs until he is provided a most fortunate opportunity. Carmen (Verbeke) moves to London to escape a troublesome past in Spain. Carmen falls in love with Barnaby (D'Arcy), a local Londoner, who eventually proposes marriage. The three end up crossing paths throughout the plot.Personally, I find the romantic drama as a genre in dire need of a wake-up call. Films such as this one, `Closer,' `Unfaithful', `Wicker Park,' and very few others, are daring to attempt something original, whether it be a more frank look at relationships, a less clichd or sexist view of infidelity, or a new take on the love triangle... and by new I mean new in both this film and `Wicker Park.' Rather than recycle `Shakespeare,' `Jane Austen,' or `An Affair To Remember' for the thousandth time, the director and cast has broke some new ground on this.The efforts on direction is good, well, that style of combining the footage in film and the one extracted from a camcorder, wasn't really good, you will learn near the end of the film that is justified but again, didn't feel neat when you see it. The budget for this film is low; you can easily guess that, especially in that Indie Film Festival scene when you realize that you are seeing another indie movie that couldn't make thinks work with its own money, because seriously, that festival looked fake. What I do love is the story, the twists and the characters.`Dot the I' is a good film that I'd recommend viewing especially to all the Gael Bernal fans.
One of the oddest films I've ever seen. The main character, Beatrice, is a saint in the making.Early in the film we learn that a monster has killed her 'fiance' Jim, and two other journalists, in Iceland. The fact that he was her fiance is our clue that she's still innocent, pure.She volunteers to go and investigate, meets resistance because she's so young, but prevails.We find out that her mother has recently died, and she has no other family. This establishes her as free of normal human connections, as a saint should be.Setting out, she can't get a cab because of a bomb scare at the airport; she can't take the subway because of a nerve gas attack. She gets a ride in the back of a truck belonging to men who destroy things for a living - demolitions experts.Her plane crashes into the ocean and she's the only survivor. She's rescued by a fishing boat and ends up in a hospital in Iceland, which was her destination.You see, NOTHING can stop her.It's pointed out to her that she has nothing - but she refuses money for the story of the plane crash, how the other passengers behaved, 'who was brave, who was a coward'. 'They were people', she tells her boss. And she's a saint, so she doesn't need money.She's given a choice: have an agonizing operation or remain crippled. Of course she chooses the operation, so that she can carry out her mission.During the surgery we see her doctor wincing and covering her ears in response to Beatrice's screams (covered by the soundtrack).When she's up and about she dumps her walker for a cane, and as her doctor drives her north the next day, in search of the monster, she ditches the cane at a cafe along the road.By the time the road runs out she's able to mount a horse and ride into the mountains. She's fully healed.The residents of a village who've been paying tribute to the monster drug her and leave her unconscious, wrapped in a shroud, as an offering to the monster. He won't hurt her.He proves to her that he killed her fiance; she cries but won't get angry at him.In an act of saintly forgiveness, she brings him back to New York to search for Dr Artaud, the one man who can kill him (his wish is to die).I won't go on. The movie is a fairy tale, religious allegory, and satire, rolled together.The first time I saw it I turned the CD off in disgust. Then I couldn't stop thinking about it... I went back to it and saw what I'd missed... this film should become a cult classic.
Memories Are Made Of This!. What do the following have in common?A boy named Ralphie and the phrase 'You'll poke your eye out'!A Red Ryder BB Gun and a sexy, black-mesh leg that's a lamp.A bar soap wielding mother and an expletive shouting father.A pepto-bismol pink Easter bunny suit and a boy who eats like a piggy.You're right! They all add up to A Christmas Story!It is about Ralphie, wonderfully played by Peter Billingsley, who longs for a Red Ryder BB Gun!He repeatedly hears 'You'll poke your eye out' every time he mentions the gun.Darrin McGavin is terrific as the contest entering father who is ecstatic when he finally wins.His prize, a leg-shaped animated lamp complete with a black mesh stocking!In his eyes the leg of lamp (I coudn't resist) is absolutely beautiful and,much to the dismay of his wife, he proudly displays it for all to see in their front window.The lamp is a major source of contention between them as each one attempts to move it!His language when anything goes wrong - from the exploding furnace to the sparking wiringto the neighbors free roaming dogs has reprecussions when, in frustration, Ralphie repeats them.Enter Mom with the soap! Don't worry you won't hear the actual words being said but you will getthe gist or should that be drift as this is a winter story!Little brother, Randy, is a picky eater and is only successfully coaxed to eat by his mother, played perfectlyby Melinda Dillon, when she has him pretend to eat like his favorite storybook animal, a pig!With his face firmly in the plate he eats like one much to the disgust of his father!Although based on the Red Ryder BB gun, there are many other storylines highlighted in this wonderful movie.There are bullies, school friends, Christmas tree lots, Santa coming to town and the hilarious Christmas giftof a  pink Easter Bunny outfit poor Ralphie has to try on! You will enjoy this movie!It takes place at a time when I was growing up and many of the scenes recall my childhood.To those of us who grew up in the forties and early fifties it brings back fond memories of our past Christmases.We had real trees adorned with tinsel and glowing with big colorful bulbs, no themed trees with just whitelights, our trees glowed with a rainbow of colors. We had favorite radio shows, wore galoshes and hadbackyards with snow covered sheds just like the ones in Ralphie's backyard.All of those are in this film, and as such, A Christmas Story has a wonderful familiarity about it.You can almost smell the heavy scent of pine mixed with the delicious aroma of a roasting turkey.This movie is a classic and will, once again, be eagerly watched by our family.Ah! Memories are made of this!
The original Zombies!. Creepy, good old horror flick.  They just don't make them like that anymore
Life of Verdi DVD. I saw the series when it was shown originally on PBS TV many years ago.The edition I purchased is technically somewhat dated and has been slightly edited, with some interesting scenes -such as the account of Verdi's last hours from his faithful friend and libretist Arrigo Boito- deleted.  The movie was filmed largely on location, which makes for a very realistic setting. For example the scenes done in Busseto, which aside for modern conveniences is as charming as it must have been a century ago are particularly moving.There is no option to select language sub-titles, and die-hard italianophiles will have to settle for English. The performance by all actors is superb, and after a while one forgets they are not speaking Verdi's mother tongue.The film Life of Verdi is a must-have for Verdi aficionados
Adam Dalgliesh on the Beat Again. A great story, loaded with suspects, suspense, etc. But this is beautifully shot, beautifully edited as well, and Martin Shaw I believe is the only one who can replace Roy Marsden (of previous televisualizations of P.D. James books) as the eternal Adam Dalgliesh.Buy this disk and enjoy
great, of course, it's south park. I'm a huge 21 year old South Park fan.  I watch this show almost every night.  Own all the DVDs.  Just so you know, I have seen every episode countless times.  I really can't pick a favorite Season.  The older ones are good in their own way, and the new ones are good in their own way too.  However, if you are picking up just one set, I'd pick this one, for a very simple reason.  This has the best DISK out of every season.  Me and my friend can't decide on a favorite season, but as far as a disk, after about a year of viewing them all countless times, we think Disk 3 on Season 6 is the ultimate South Park disk.  Disk 3 includes Ladder to Heaven, The Return of the Fellowship of the Ring to the Two Towers, The Death Camp of Tolerance, The Biggest Douche in the Universe, My Future Self N' Me, and Red Sleigh Down.  Six classic episodes that can be watched over and over.  We never get sick of these either, this disk is usually one that we are watching.  So, pick this up if you don't already have it, and check out the other seasons as well.
first class. I have attended more than ten productions of Les Mis.  Since there is no movie; this is as good as it gets for your home entertainment.
One more time -- the greatest of all movies. It is impossible to overpraise this film on any dimension of quality. Visually, it is so rich that I have found in my many watchings of it that it is worth taking your eyes off the centre of the screen and just absorbing what is going on at its peripheries. Depth of image, chiarascuro, mise-en-scen, mood and texture -- all are so nuanced. The cast is almost the definitive Classical Academy of French film and drama of the last century. Only Jean Marais is missing (catch him along with the underrated Maria Casares, who plays the only muted -- and smewhat boring -- part in Les Enfants -- in Cocteau's Orphee -- same period roughyl, same visual brilliance and the same five star rating), Pierre Barasseur, whose 19th century grand passion performance from Othello is in itself superb, the haunting Jean-Louis Barrault who with his wife Madeleine Renaud was the leader in classical French theater post World War II, and of course Arletty, the enigma around whom the entire film centers.... I cannot think of any film with such a peerless cast. Them there is Jaques Prevert's script.... And Carne's direction is peerless, reflecting perhaps his own very enigmatic personality; his other films share the visual and dramatic power of Les Enfants but seem more dated; here, somehow he found the exact style to create a film deeply rooted in history but not locked into it. No one has ever directed such a cast of varied and great actors and given them so much space of expression and style while maintaining a unity.The film is Balzacian in its breadth of story -- reminiscent of Pere Goriot perhaps? -- and covers so many moods and themes and scenes. It can be very funny -- Brasseur as the vain, worldly Frederick LeMaitre -- and so deeply sad -- Barrault as Baptiste, both of which are portrayals based on real actors of the 19th century and both of which are genuinely great in their capturing of the grand acting style of the period without this being pastiche or artificial.It is impossible to overrate this film. If you haven't seen it, don't be put off by the idea that it's a period piece, black-and-white, French and sure to be boring. It's over sixty years old now and still profoundly beautiful, deeply moving and most of all unforgettable.
GREAT WORKOUT!. I've seen the Pilates infomercials for a while now, but have been intimidated by the seemingly impossible movements. When I found this inexpensive "For Dummies" DVD, I decided to give it a try. WHAT A WORKOUT! I consider myself to be in moderately good shape, and this workout can definitely be felt! Within the first couple of days I IMMEDIATELY noticed a change in my posture, and a good burn in my abs, hips and thighs. I HIGHLY recommend this as both a great workout and a wonderful intro to Pilates.
Great dvd. This dvd is one of my sons favorites.  Maisy is fun and educational.  I would recommend this to anyone with a young child
underground, it's dark but funny. after loving the 'film black cat white cat', it was but natural that i   eagerly wrap up underground. and it did not disapoint me one bit.the better your knowledge of the history & politics of the region the better  you can appreciate the wine but the lack of knowledge cannot take away from the enjoyment of it.layered and intelligent under a veneer of sheer mindlessness you get entertained at the rate of thrill a minute and then you might like to see it again to marvel at the story narration, screenplay and characterization.the dvd only frustrates for not giving out special material, something the film is begging for.
The Great Wayne. John Wayne is one of my all-time favorite stars and this collection has a number of his best
Guilermo Del Toro's trailblazing entry intro the horror genre. Cronos (1992) A vampire film without vampires? It's the story of Jesus Gris, a  kindly antiquarian who comes across a mysterious ancient scarab which grants renewed vigor and immortality to its owner, but all at a deadly price. Sensual in its overtones, sincerely moving and highly surreal, this is one of the most underrated horror films of the 1990's.
Excellent choice if u love Girls Gone Wild, etc. Can't say much 'bout this movie but it's a must-have who wants the discovery of erotic or hardcore films. I don't call this "adult". I call this a more hardcore porn film than it has been 'cuz of the eroticness, sex, masturbating and everything. This would turn u out. 'Specially check out Playmate of the Apes w/ Misty Mundae in it. It's such a great adult classic
one of the funniest movies ever!!!. This is one of the funniest movies if not the funniest movie ever made.  You have got Redd Foxx, Richard Pryor, and Eddie Murphy in one film.  What more could you ask for? The fight scene with Eddie and Della is hilarious.  If you do not like this movie, you must be humorless or a racist
excellent, unconventional documentary. HIGHLY RECOMMEND. intoxicating, infectious, ethereal. despite the user's comment below, i found this film the exact opposite. very entertaining, informative, and most of all chock full of beautiful art. maybe the user below is one of those hardcore right wing graffiti enthusiasts, but for the majority of us who dabble in art, this film is a huge inspiration. the theme is simple - do you art at all costs. even if that means going it alone. ROCK FRESH was very well done. the extra scenes are very cool too. this dvd is definitely worth adding to your collection
Phenomenal Movie. This is a really great movie.....balanced all aroundwith many interesting aspects, very well emotionallyacted out by both leading actors, and so well constructedthat those watching the movie are pulled into the story,and taken for a ride lasting almost 2 hours, muchlike a rollercoaster. This is a movie very well done,very challenging to write and film, I would guess -butcompleted with incredible skill
Hook. A favorite of the family for many years.  Robin Williams and Peter Pan, what could be better
Not Just a Clever Title. "The Devil's Playground" is what the Amish refer to the modern world as. When an amish teenager turns 16, he or she is allowed to leave the community and join the modern world. It's called rumspringa. After this period, which could take months or years, the teenager is allowed the choice to either join the Amish church or join the modern world.The reasons for this tradition stem from the core beliefs that began the Amish church. The Amish church began because of the belief that babies should not be baptized, and only a person of accountable age can make the conscious choice to become a Christian. In the same spirit of free will, Amish teenagers are encouraged to enter the real world for a time in order to know what they're giving up.But Amish teenagers don't really get into it, right? They don't even know how, having been brought up under the strictest rules their entire life. Definitely not so. The documentary shows Amish parties, and they are just as wild as anything OSU can produce. It is a little stupifying to watch a group of 17-year old girls wearing bonnets and snorting crystal meth (Boys typically wear "english" clothes during rumpsringa. Girls do not). There is literally an Amish word for a teenage boy and girl sharing a bed. This is all sanctioned and permitted by the Amish elders, although they obviously stay far away from it while it is taking place.The film features three main people: A young man with a crystal meth addiction trying to decide whether to join the church (But ultimately doesn't), a young girl who happily goes back to the church, and a girl who joined the church only to leave again (Which is anathema to the Amish).The young man, Faron, describes the process of rumspringa as a "vaccination". "You get a small dose of the real world and that prepares you for defending against it. Then you can go back to the church happier because you made the choice." And most do make that choice.According to the film, 90% of the teenagers go back to the church, which is its highest retention rate since its founding. But what Faron discovers, and what you will while watching this film, is that those in rumspringa often don't really experience what the world has to offer. They live in small houses in groups of other Amish and get to experience all kinds of drugs, sex, electronics, and music. But what some of them never learn is that's not all the world has to offer. The girl who joined only to leave again is delighted to enter college, something she never imagined for herself. Most Amish teenagers leave rumspringa with no more of a concept of how big the world really is.This film is also a fascinating insight into the Amish in general. It was a difficult film to make, since most Amish do not allow themselves to be photograped. One of the stereotypes that is rapidly dismissed is that the Amish shun technology simply because it is technology. Most Amish carry cell phones (!). As an Amish elder put it, "The question is whether this particular invention will promote family and community, or whether it will tear it apart."Though clearly a documentary, The Devil's Playground is also a narrative in its own right in the way it allows you to get to know the real people of the Amish community in a way you otherwise never could. As someone who grew up in a Mennonite community myself, it was a huge eye opener for me, and one of the most educational 90 minutes I've ever spent.
I learned something interesting - & useful -  from this no-brainer action movie... I love watching action movies, even if some of them are no-brainers! My purpose of going to the movies is very simple: firstly, to be entertained within a span of about two hours, & secondly to pick out some interesting & useful ideas.Triple X is one such action movie. The plot is very simple: An extreme sports renegade (with no fear but has a bad attitude), Xander Cage (played by Vin Diesel), is recruited by a NSA big shot, Augustus Gibbons (played by Samuel Jackson), to spy on & then foil an attempt by a nasty group of Czech criminals, known as Anarchy 99, & led by a crazy villian, Yorgi (played by Marton Csokas) who had some nutty ideas to change the world using a biological virus, called Silent Night.The many high-octane action sequences (cars, bikes, skis, boats, helicopters,...), all the way from the opening scene & the attendant rampant explosions, plus all the state-of-the-art weaponry, including a super-duper Bond-like vehicle, in the movie are quite fun to watch. The dialogue is witty, too. [For example, in Prague, while Xander was about to go to bed with a sexy girl, with compliments from Yorgi of course,  he remarked: "The things I'm gonna do for my country."]Among others, there is one particular dialogue, between Gibbons & Cage, during the first half of the movie which strikes my personal attention.When Gibbons offers Cage a job to work for the US government, with a view to redeem the latter's crimes, Cage turns him down flatly. That's when Gibbons tells him the story about the difference between the eyes of a lion in captivity & the eyes of a lion in the wild.This also reminds me of an insightful dialogue between Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers) & Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) in one of the earlier scenes of the movie, Rocky III. [In contrast to Triple XXX, Rocky III is an intelligent movie.] The movie tells the story of how Creed convinces & retrains a down-&-out Rocky to go back into the ring to fight againt Clubber Lang (Mr T) who had earlier gave Rocky a thorough bashing in humiliating defeat. In that particular scene, Creed tells the story about "the eye of the tiger".  Creed desperately wants Rocky to regain his focus quickly in order to win. Incidentally, this is also the title of the movie's signature tune.These are certainly interesting learning points, especially in terms of understanding life (or survival) skills. I often share these stories with teens who are searching for directions in life.In summing up, I have enjoyed watching Triple XXX & learned something interesting - & useful - along the way
The great original version of a fantastic movie. This is without a doubt the best version of the original story. A must buy for lovers of classic movies
Ffantastic Ffilm!. When Ffolkes came out, Moore was at the top of his game as 007. This made his character especially ironic in his disdain for women. The theatrical poster played this up with a bearded, Bondlike Moore nonchalant as women are crawling all over him. Ffolkes, like several other non-Bond rolls that Roger Moore made are really his best work (particularly Sea Wolves where he has a very Ian Fleming character). As Ffolkes, Mr. Moore absolutely shines and the film itself is a wonderfully taut thriller with Anthony Perkins as a superb psychotic villain. Too bad he couldn't have played Blofeld! This is also a great example of how it doesn't take a huge budget to make an exciting movie.
fast. received the book way faster than I expected & it was in perfect conditio
This film is a powerful concentration of life in a small area of Italy. Although subtitled Grazia's island (Grazia is the lead role, magnificently realized by Valeria Golino), "Respiro" could have well been called "Scenes from rural Sicilian life", as the scenography, cinematography and tableaux-like imagery seem as important to the director as her thin narrative line. Respiro's locale is Lampedusa, a tiny island far off the west coast of Sicily. About the same latitude as Malta, this place is about as remote as it gets - Tunisia is closer than Palermo. It can be safe to say that Italian time here has pretty much stood still for decades; this is Italy of de Sica and Mascagni, not Fellini and Prada. The men go out to sea, the children play, women pack fish, old black-clad crones meddle and the languid summer air of total boredom hangs down from the cloudless sky.Throughout this film you would probably ask yourself, "Is she really as crazy as the family and neighbors think she is or just free spirited?" It's a fairly typical story, the type that a few great (and many, many average) Italian filmmakers have been serving up for the last three generations - life in the sun drenched rural, ritualistic and tribal south and the saga of one village denizen who dares to break the moulds. How long since "Cinema Paradiso?"What I like most about the movie, besides the appealing scenery, was the interrelations of the characters, the humor, petty gossips, the impromptu emotional outbursts, the displays of maternal and filial affection. The two boys are tremendous: the older Pasquale (Francesco Casisa) is the more mature of the two. The younger Filippo (Filippo Pucillo) has an unregulated diarrhea mouth filled with hilarious and inspired ravings, often without sense. His rant against the busybody women is a treasure, as is his little-brother-as-big-brother protectiveness of his sister from the policeman-friend. The boy embodies an epic Italianate inflammability far beyond his years. While viewing this I thought the son's affection was overtly and uncomfortably oedipal at times. They do spend a lot of time and energy comforting their mom plus defending her against verbal attacks in the village.After seeing this film, I have realized that the rural lives by the sea in many countries are similar, the differences are in the languages, but the feelings are same.  I enjoyed this film so much I might see it a couple of times.
Great Movie. Bought it for my Grandson.  It was my daughters favorite movies when she was younger.  Wonderful colors
Great revenge/action film. I never saw the Marvel Comics book so I knew absolutely nothing about this character Frank Castle. I rented the movie because I just love John Travolta. Thomas Jane is quite the studly tough man here, but is completely believable. He broods so handsomely throughout the rest of the film. His character is tormented by the deaths of his family and he is out to seek "punishment" not revenge as he calls it. Travolta is fun as the sneering villian and you can tell he really enjoyed his role. He's not an out-right bad villian, but becomes so after the death of one of his twin sons. Yeah ladies, check out the handsome actor playing his twin sons. Plus, he's got one beautiful but vindictive wife in gorgeous Laura Harring. It's a shame that her character was not better developed and had more to do than stand around in sexy outfits. It would have been fun to see her more actively involved in hunting down Castle. Overall, I enjoyed the film as a great action film
pretty darn cute. I'm 29 years old, clearly out of the age range the movie was going for. This movie brought back everything I felt when I met my first love at 18. I think the characters had great chemistry, and I loved seeing Mark Harmon (big NCIS fan) I watched this movie quite a few times, downloaded some music from the soundtrack on my IPod and even bought the DVD. That translates to 5 stars for me
Been there, been through that. This movie brings to light for me the all too painful memories of my Past, Pocatello Idaho, and my experience as a Mormon Missionary in Norway.Although I did not havve a romantic or sexual experience on my mission, I did not fit in with the mindset, I also had a "little secret."Aaron in this movie experiences that cut and dried die cast all or nothing reaction that all gay Mormons and gay ex-Mormons go through in the Utah-Idaho culture.The Church quickly excommunicates heretics and "perverts," yet both the Salt Lake and Pocatello valleys are clogged with usyet love conquored the extreme differences and outlooks between Aaron and Christian.Like I had to, Aaron has to give up all he used to believe to be real, truthful and authentic.Unless your heart is made of stone, or your bigotries are die cast, this movie will tenderly touch your heart!I have lived in similar circumstances, and like Aaron, my life nowadaysis a testimony of victory of the human spirit over stiff, unyielding dogma.It is good to see movies like this, of successful Brokeback Mountains
A must have for serious electric bass players. Jaco is probably the best electric bass player that ever was.  Many people have said this and I believe this to be true as well.  His music is very moving and his bass playing has it all: groove, technique, musicality, etc..  If you play bass and/or are a fan of Jaco's, you should buy this product.  While he was struggling w/ drug abuse and it's somewhat apparant in this video, you see what a musical genius this guy really was as you watch him talk and play.  He seems like a super cool guy too.  Even if he was out of his mind sometimes, you can tell that his sense of humor was great and that he was a nice guy with a serious passion for music.  He was the real deal and a one of kind for sure.  This is the best bass DVD I own and I own a lot of DVD's of instructional videos and concerts with great bass players.  Everytime I go back to this video, I learn some new stuff for the electric bass.  Do yourself a favor and buy this product if you play electric bass and want to improve.
How To Use Your Body Language To Win Friends And Influence People!!!!!. Julia plays a struggling mother trying to make ends meet and then she gets a job and takes on a Giant Corporation in a Court Of Law.Julia manages to extract a lot of information fom people mainly through her mammary glands and the benefits of a Wonderbra but that is just about all that this movie has going for it. I give this film 5 stars because Julia does look pretty attractive in it at most times
FOSSE DISAPPOINTS ON DVD. FOSSE WAS A DYNAMIC SHOWCASE OF THE CAREER OF THE GREAT BOB FOSSE WHEN IT PREMIERED ON BROADWAY IN JANUARY 1999. THE ORIGINAL CAST WERE DRILLED TO PERFECTION BY CHET WALKER AND ANN REINKING WITH INPUT FROM GWEN VERDON WHO WAS FOSSES' MUSE. BY THE TIME THE DVD WAS PRODUCED MOST OF THE BRILLIANT ORIGINAL DANCER -SINGERS WERE REPLACED AND REPLACED AND EACH TIME SOME OF THE LUSTRE WAS LOST SO WHAT YOU SEE ON DVD IS NOT WHAT WAS SEEN ON STAGE THE FIRST YEAR OR TWO ON BROADWAY. TOWARD THE END OF THE SHOWS' RUN THEY THREW A FEW CRUMBS BEN VEREENS' WAY AND THE RESULTS ARE PAINFUL-AFTER A NEAR FATAL AUTO ACCIDENT HE WAS NOT THE SAME PERFORMER I REMEMBERED AND HIS PERFORMANCE ON THIS DVD REDUCES ONE TO TEARS. THEY WOULD ALSO HAVE BEEN BETTER SERVED IF THEY HAD A STATIONARY CAMERA FILMING THE DANCE ROUTINES AS SEEN ON STAGE. CLOSE-UPS OF INDIVIDUAL DANCERS DURING PRODUCTION NUMBERS IS INSANE. OVER-ALL THE DVD IS A PLEASANT SOUVENIR OF THIS SHOW BUT ONE WISHES THAT ANN REINKING ETAL COULD RE-ASSEMBLE  MANY OF THAT BRILLIANT 1999 CAST AND RE-STAGE AND RE-FILM AND THIS WOULD BE GREAT RATHER THAN MERELY PLEASANT.'SING,SING,SING' STILL REMAINS AS ONE ON THE MOST THRILLING DANCE NUMBERS BOB FOSSE EVER CONCEIVED AND THE CLOSE-UPS AND CRAZY CAMERA ANGLES ARE AT A MINIMAL HERE SO THE ROUTINE IS BEST SEEN HERE-BUT WE STILL NEED THE ORIGINAL 1999 CAST TO PERFORM IT
Perfect for your little John Deere lover. We recently purchased this DVD for our three year old son who is obsessed with John Deere tractors.  He watches it over and over again until we can't take it anymore.  The songs are catchy and you will find yourself humming along even if you don't mean to.  If you have a child who loves John Deere, then this is a perfect DVD for them.
Entertainment and Scholarship. This 1963 film from 20th Century Fox, albeit oboviously compressed in time, offers a great opportunity for insight into the classic struggle of Rome's movement from a Republic to rule by dictatorship. Subtle references such as Cleopatra's teasing of Caesar's balding by referencing  his cognomen (nickname) "Julius" (means full head of hair), the burning of the great library of Alexandria, and the propaganda used by rullers of the time (Cleopatra claiming to be Isis and Caesar claiming to be related to Venus through Aeneas), give opportunity for scholarship; all the while being thoroughly entertained. Scenes like the death of Pompey, the mention of Caesar's pride, his 10th Legion, Cleopatra's references to Caesar's writings "Commentarii", Cleopatra's grand entrance into Rome with her son, Caesarian, the naval battle at Actium between Antony and Octavian, are all rich with generally accurate historical facts. The Latin word for school and fun are the same..."ludus, -i". This cinema offers both.
Seller's The Party 1968. Although it starts out a little predictable, about fifteen minutes into the actual "party" sequences should have you  LOLing repeatedly. Oh, and that first fifteen minutes is necessary to the story, so don't go to sleep. A real gem from Peter Sellers and Blake Edwards at the height of their film relationship (i.e. three years after they made The Pink Panther)
Whatever happened to Kay Reynolds?. Not really a review but an appreciation.  Kay Reynolds was absolutely delightful as "Smitty" in the movie version of "How to Succeed in Business Without Really Trying".  It was a small but memorable part in the film, and she did a terrific trio with Robert Morse and Michelle Lee in "Been a Long Day".She apparently had a very short career in movies and TV (1965 - 1969) and I've never seen her in anything else, although she's listed as having made a movie in 1969 called "The Picasso Summer".  Never seen it.She reminds me, for some reason, of Zooey Deschanel in "Hitchiker's Guide to the Galaxy" with the big, black horn-rimmed glasses and gawky frame.  I admit it - I'm quite in love with her.What ever became of her?  Does anyone know
Awesome Remake!. In a small California town, life was simple for a teenage punk (Kevin Dillon) who falls for a lovely cheerleader (Shawnee Smith) but one night there's a strange meteorite crashes outside of town with a weird pink goo that consumes an old man's hand. Taken to a doctor, the weird slimy stuff is really alive for it's a monstrous organism that devours any creature or person that stands in it's way, can it be stopped?Quite an awesome remake of the 50's sci-fi/horror classic with Steve Mcqueen that is just as good but with a new explanation on the creature's origin as it's a government experiment from space gone wrong. The acting is very good and so are the nifty special effects and gory detailed scenes of people being engulfed by the slime especially the memorable man being sucked down the sink scene, the blob itself is more nastier and meaner looking then the original glob of strawberry jam.This DVD has good picture and sound quality with the only extras being trailers especially to the movie, but if you love sci-fi horror and the original then get this movie, you won't be disappointed.Also recommended: "The Thing" ( 1982), "The Blob ( 1958)", "Species", "The Deadly Spawn (a.k.a. Return of the Aliens)", "The Stuff", "Jason X", "Predator", "Lifeforce", "Killer Klowns From Outer Space", "Creepshow 2", "Return of the Living Dead 3", "Critters 1 & 2", "Insemenoid", "Predator 2", "Aliens", "Alien", "Alien Resurrection", "Alien 3", "AVP: Alien Vs. Predator", "The Fly ( 1986)", "Undead", "Bad Taste", "Pitch Black", "Warning Sign", "Dawn of the Dead ( 2004)", "X-Files: Fight the Future", "Xtro", "Creature", "Night of the Creeps", "Resident Evil", "Resident Evil: Apocalypse", "Hollow Man", "War of the Worlds ( 1953 and 2005)", "Total Recall", "Starship Troopers", "Invasion of the Body Snatchers ( 1957 and 1978)", "Slither", "IT! Came from Outer Space", "Men in Black", "Contamination" and "Phantoms"
More like "Where's the Wolf?" and "Where's the Story-Plot?". I would have given this film three and a half stars,yet four had to be.Here you have another recent Nicholson film where you have a great cast and a great director and a great movie idea.But the script is just mediocre and it holds back all the actor's true star power.The film ,"The Pledge", was a prime example of this.Yes, Virginia there is no great Were-wulf story-plot here. Yet,it's just great to see Jack,Michelle Pfieffer,Christopher Plummer, all together in this were-wolf film.They saved the movie. Cave Vulpus!
Good Blu-Ray transfer. Although Schwarzenegger became known with the two Conan pictures, it was this movie that established him as a major star.This was a low-budget flick and the original picture quality was not that great, but it looks better than ever than on Blu-Ray, with rich detail in the night scenes, good color balance in the few daytime scenes, and a killer soundtrack.This is worth upgrading from the standard DVD, as both picture and sound are a substantial improvement.  The extra clarity and sharpness of Blu-Ray make this classic even more enjoyable.
No excuses excercise help!. These excercise sessions take all the excuses out of getting in your 30 minutes of cardio.  Fun, easy and convenient.  You'll want to walk away the pounds with your new best friends
clive barkers hell raiser needs five stars. A horror classic. A must have in ones collection. Great special effects by bob keen studio leaves the viewer captivated.  It can still stand up to computer generated animations today.It is dark, the acting is great and it is a film that will burn a permanent image in ones mind.Doug bradley first film hell raiser (pin head) had an offer to play one of the furniture removalists for the film...yet turned it down when offered the role of the lead cenobite
A Very Mixed Bag. In the early 90's, Hal Hartley was one of my favorite filmmakers.  THE UNBELIEVABLE TRUTH, TRUST, and SURVIVING DESIRE I would name as three of the greatest films of the 90's.  I loved his films and would drive two hours to the closest theatre playing them.  Although, I have to admit, after AMATEUR, I felt they started to decline in quality.  I have not been a fan of his recent films, even though I still love those early ones.This DVD collection is made up of six of his short films made between 1994 and 2004.  They vary in length and quality. The shorts are:OPERA NO. 1: (5/5 stars) - This is a fun one, sort of Hartley's take on WINGS OF DESIRE.  An eight minute opera starring Parker Posey and Adrienne Shelly (Adrienne Shelly!!!!   Still his greatest actress.  I hope they work together again one day).  They are roller blading angels, trying to fix up a couple.THE OTHER ALSO (0/5) - Two people, out of focus stand in a room while music and sound effects are heard on the soundtrack.  An attempt at avant-garde filmmaking that fails.NEW MATH(S) (1/5) - A misfire.  A wordless short of three people fighting over a math problem in a classroom.NYC 3/94 (1/5) - This one doesn't really work either.  Shot on video of three people on the streets of NY.SISTERS OF MERCY (5/5) - A must for all Hartley fans.  Parker Posey and Sabrina Lloyd (SPORTS NIGHT, ED) are in an apartment, speaking typical Hartley dialogue back and forth in this shot on video fifteen minute film.  But, what makes this so interesting, and a must for his fans is that the film appears to be unedited (is this a mistake????).  You hear Hartley in the background, running lines with the actresses, trying to set up shots in interesting ways.  Even all the small talk between Parker and Sabrina.  It is fascinating to watch, both because of the actresses and because of the insight into Hartley's filmmaking process.KIMONO (0/5) - This one never seemed to end (at 25 minutes, the longest on the DVD).  A bride (played by Hartley's wife), runs out of a car in her wedding dress.  She runs through the woods, losing her dress in the process until she winds up at a cabin in the wood where she finds a Kimono.   Two women, forest spirits or something, watch her.  Just ridiculous.The DVD also contains an interview with Hartley and clips from an avant-garde play of his SOON.So, a very mixed bag.  Several of Hartley's earlier films are missing from this DVD (two appear on the SURVIVING DESIRE DVD which is a must buy, but there are several made before TRUTH that have been written about a lot that are not on it).  I would have liked to have seen them.  But, as far as this DVD goes, SISTERS OF MERCY and OPERA alone make it worth the purchase.
The Cold War heats up. "Central Intelligence Agency," Captain Bart Mancuso growls, descending a ladder in his sub, "Now there's a contradiction in terms."He is about to match wits with a wily Russian sub commander, played stoically and well by Sean Connery, who is trying to surrender his ship to the Americans, "a ship with only one purpose." The Red October is the pride of the Soviet fleet, its newest and biggest - and with the newest toy; a caterpillar drive, equipped to travel through the water nearly silently and almost impossible to detect. Connery's Captain Ramius - I was almost ready to believe that Lithuanians -Ramius is supposed to be Lithuanian - speak Russian with a Scots accent - has had enough Cold War in his life and wants to make sure he can level the playing field as he leaves, or die trying. Enter into the mix Jack Ryan, a young analyst for the CIA and a student of Russian sub commanders, Ramius in particular.  I was always sorry Alec Baldwin did not reprise his role in the next Jack Ryan vehicle; I thought he brought a sense of urgency and brilliance to the role that Harrison Ford - don't get me wrong, I think he's good too - lacks- and I always thought Ford was too old for the part anyway. Baldwin had just the right touch, for the first movie. The camaraderie and mutual respect between his character and James Earl Jones' Admiral Greer is obvious; they know each other well, and trust each other's judgment.Recruited by Greer to convince a boardroom of military advisors on the sudden and mysterious naval activity in the North Sea, which is known to center around the new sub Red October,Ryan succeeds in selling the President's main advisor on what he thinks is going on - he's correctly surmised that Ramius wants to defect. Trusting that Ramius has already figured out the worst parts and has a plan  worked out, the advisor Pelt delegates Ryan to go out and intercept the sub before the Russian fleet chasing him gets close enough to eliminate him.There are excellent supporting roles - Scott Glenn, as Capt. Mancuso, spent time aboard an actual working naval sub to get the authenticity of his part, and he is superb. Until I watched the extras on the DVD I was unaware that Larry Ferguson, who plays Chief Watson on Mancuso's sub, had a lot to do with writing the screenplay; I liked him before that, but knowing that added another dimension. It doesn't get any better than the aforementioned James Earl Jones; and also good, in smaller roles, are Courtney Vance, Sam Neill, and the lesser Russian officers that make up Ramius's elite cadre of expatriots.In contrast to what's been going on the last few years, the Cold War seems almost genteel in its menace. I could almost look back on it with nostalgia. Almost. This movie reminds us that things are never going to be easy or without cost, no matter what method of persuasion is employed. I cannot recommend this movie highly enough. I know parts of it by heart
not perfect...but come on!. Ok, I agree with the other reviews to a degree. There is a moment of freezing on Paul Rogers song. I agree if the goal was to highlight the Fender Strat that there could have been more big names and more emphasis on the strat. But I bought this dvd for David Gilmour. Anything else would be cake. If you forget that this is a celebration of the strat and ignore minor technical glitches (hey this was a relatively cheap dvd) and just pay attention to the music- I found it to be quite good! I don't find the performers to be "bored and boring" in the slightests. In fact most of them look like they are enjoying themselves immensely! I'm really glad I bought this dvd. If you are a perfectionist stay away from this dvd. If you just like music of a wide variety of styles.... get it. It really is pretty good. And a live version of Pink Floyds' "Marooned" (which will be an extra feature on the Pink Floyd Pulse dvd when it is FINALLY released in September) is unavailable on any other dvd... so that alone makes the disk worthwhile
Soundtrack mixup?. Great show, great video quality, great sound quality. The issue: where is U2's "Pride (In the Name of Love)"? It was used on Calderone's Return Part 1 (also known as The Hit List) during the scene where Tubbs was racing in the Ferrari to Crockett's house in the lead-in to the climactic final shootout. It is on the VHS version, but NOT on the DVD version. The song in question was used in "Prodigal Son, Part 1," but it is only played as background music in a nightclub very  briefly. So I question the DVD's cover assertion, "With a sizzling soundtrack of all the original hit songs remixed in 5.1 Stereo Sound, including music by Phil Collins, U2, The Who and more..."Something is amiss here
The X-Men Trilogy. This is a great DVD set for anyone who are fans of the films. These are three great films with memorable charecters, fantastic special effects and action sequences as well as some very witty humor. They are also a great social commentary on todays society.here is what this set containsDISC 1- X-Men-2.35:1 Anamorphic Widescreen presentation-Deleted Scenes-Charlie Rose Interview-Mutant Watch featurette-Hugh Jackman Screen Test-Storyboards-Art Gallery-Animatics-TrailerDISC 2- X2: X-Men United-2.35:1 Anamorphic Widescreen presentation-Commentary by Director and Cinematographer-Commentary by Producers and WritersDISC 3- X-Men: The Last Stand-2.35:1 Anamorphic Widescreen presentation-Commentary by Director and Writers-Commentary by Producers-Deleted Scenes with optional Director Commentary-Alternate Endings with optional Director CommentaryBUY THIS DVD SET
Great Show. I bought this set for my daughter, but I think I like it as much as she does
Human Traffic. The person who wrote the review for Amazon has no idea what this film is all about and sadly compares this work of true genius to other films or seems to put it in some catorgory that does not exsist.This film is ONLY for people who have gone clubbing and enjoyed all the 'treats' that go with that life!  For people who work 9 - 5 and live for the week end.Enjoy
Great Stallone movie!!!. This was somewhat hated by critics, but I loved Judge Dreddwith Sylvestor Stallone and Diane Lane. It had great stunts,effects and action.Based on the comic book, Dredd is framed for murder, unawareit's the work of his serial killer enemy. He then embarkswith help from one of his friends to break out of prisonand certain death from Cannibals to clear his name.Great movie, a big thumbs up go to the real and fun visionof the director. Stallone as only he can do looks great.Also check out the comic book and the Judge Dredd video games
In your face 'In Country'. Some might suggest there are now three things not to discuss in polite conversation :  1) Politics  2) Religion  3) Viet Nam.In Viet Nam, the battle that would become known as Hamburger Hill resulted in over ninety per cent of one American platoon dead.  Yet a body count would still have been necessary to see which side suffered the greater losses.  Directing mass charges via waves of infantry in modern warfare was initially chronicled during the Korean conflict only later officially recognized as a 'War'.  And importantly, Hamburger Hill was also a battle before it was made into a movie also about a war named but never declared.As an overview, to modern war, film-making or Army life, "We Were Soldiers" merits full consideration.Mel Gibson turns in a flawless performance walking point on this sortie that became the first major battle of the Viet Nam conflict, later unofficially entitled a "War."One loses count of the important issues exposed in this courageous work.  Many would ask, "So who cares?"  And that would garner the first score for Gibson.Author Hal Moore, whose "We Were Soldiers Once, And Young" is the basis for this film, certainly deserves first bow for initiating this work, though he might return a horse laugh at the use of 'bow.'Employment of the term 'Broken Arrow,' classicly displays military communication at it's best. WWII vets lived the situation minus the handy appelation.  Thus came, 'Praise the Lord and pass the ammunition.'  That uttered by a man of God in the heat of battle.TL Farley,author,When Now Becomes Too Late
A first class series. This is one of my all time favorite movies.It is smart, classy and of coarse very British
Anne of Green Gables--Everyone's "Kindred Spirit". "Anne of Green Gables--the Sequel"  Is  a well done, beautifully photographed and scripted portrayal of the wonderful novel by Lucy Maud Montgomery.  This movie continues the story of the older Anne Shirley as she faces the challenges of separating from the home she loves and staying true to her strong sense of self as she  finds her place in her adult world.  The interplay of familiar and newly introduced characters is compelling.  This movie is well worth your time and money and a great conversation starter for family time together.  Get the movie "Anne of Green Gables" also and watch it first for the most enjoyment.
Circus Side-show. This is done in good taste, and is a very enjoyable movie--well acted--well played--with added mystery effective in drawing you into the story to see someone get what he deserves
Good horror flick, but not as good as the original. It is a good thing that Saw II is not a carbon copy of Saw I, which is honestly what I was expecting to see.However, it was also not as good as the first movie, and is more of a traditional slasher-type film.Still, for those who enjoy horror movies I would recommend it, and this 4 of 5 stars I am giving it relate explicitly to how good it is compared to other horror flicks.For those who don't like horror, I don't recommend this movie, because it is not ground-breaking like the first one
Nothin up my sleeve. These old R & B cartoons are the best. The DVD's are very clear and have all the episodes in order. Jay ward was at his best here. I wish they would release his other stuff on DVD like george of the jungle with super chicken and tom slick. I would buy those as quick as I did the R & B seasons. I also have season 3 and its great too. Can't wait for season 4. Come on guys give us george of the jungle too
The End is Near...... Yusuke vs. Toguro.  The match we've been waiting for on DVD for almost a year since DVD vol. 8, the Dark Tournament Begins.  Now the two are ready to finally fight it out, to the death.  There will only be one left standing.  And will Yusuke be able to defeat his enemy once Toguro powers to %100 percent at last, his power killing the weaker youkai in the process?  Well, the answer's not even in this volume since it's continued into the next one, but be ready for some real kick-butt action!  Oh, and in case you don't know who the guy is during the new end credits, his name is Shinobu Sensui.  He's going to be the next major villain in the series after the Dark Tournament storyline wraps up!  Here's hoping that after "Tournament's End," comes out in December, the next saga will begin soon
Waiting for a miracle... This comedy which received Best Picture award from Israeli Critics in 2004 reveals a world that most of us don't know at all - the world of pious, ultra-Orthodox Jews in the Jerusalem courtyards that seem to be indifferent to what century or even millennium is passing by. On the eve of the Jewish harvest holiday of Succoth, Moshe and Mali, a devoutly religious but impoverished couple, pray fervently for a miracle that they desperately need - for money they need to build a Sukkah for holiday, for "ushpizin" ("holy guests") to share the holiday with, and for the most wonderful miracle of all, for a child they dream of but don't have. A series of unexpected events occur, including the appearance of two "unholy guests" - two escaped parolees from Moshe's wild past. Moshe and Mali invited the guests to share the holiday with them, and more unpredictable events would follow..."Ushpizin" is the first collaborative effort between Israel's religious and secular communities and it features many non-professionals who gave very good performances in the movie. Shuli Rand, the writer-star of the movie and his real life wife, Michal Bat-Sheva Rand played Moshe and Mali, and their chemistry is palpable and real contributing to this thoroughly charming story of faith, love, and devotion.
Why isn't this in Widescreen?????. When is this dvd going to be out in a Widescreen version? I really like this film and thought this was some of Fox's best work
Excellent series and very interesting. I saw part of this series on cable and had to see more. Unfortunately they haven't come out with the full series on DVD yet - I think this is the only one available. It's extremely interesting viewing and shows a lot of research done with infants as support. I haven't seen any other programs like it
The Sentinel; a review of. Frankly, the idea of a Secret Service Agent having an affair with the President's wife is way out there in the first place. (Michael Douglas not withstanding).  If you like Keefer Sutherland (as in TV's 24) you will probably like this movie (his name could have been Jack Bower in  this flick too.  I thought it had good action, writing, acting and directing.  I would not mind seeing Keefer and Michael teamed up again on the same side.  I bought the dvd, but then again I collect movies for the actors.
Great Family Movie. Loved it in the theatrical release - looking forward to viewing it again and again
gracias totales. gracias por poder volver a disfrutar de la ms grande banda del llamado rock en espaol. de lejos soda fue lo mejor de este movimiento. sin concesiones folclricas ni otras expresiones de la abusada fusin musical. solo rock y del bueno, muy en la onda britnica, tan buenos como The Cure o hasta U2,disfruten esta sod
Great Comic Season. The fourth season of "Bewitched" is a delight.  The series had established a universe of characters so that they had an excellent variety & balance by the fourth season.  Several episodes were written with Darren away on business, presumably because Dick York was increasingly suffering from back problems.  I thought that my favorite character Aunt Clara was well represented in episodes like "McTavish" where her warlock boyfriend Aucky buys a haunted castle that requires Samantha to zap over to England just as Darrin's parents are vacationing there.  One professional reviewer did write, "Conspicuous by her absence throughout most of season four is Marion Lorne as 'Sam's' befuddled Aunt Clara, whose magical spells somehow always go awry. Seriously ill and suffering from a rapidly failing memory, the 84-year-old Marion Lorne was forced to severely cut back her work load; the actress died just after filming wrapped for the season, on May 9, 1968."  While I didn't feel an absence of Clara because of great episodes like "Out of Sync, Out of Mind" where Clara's spell throws Samantha's voice out of whack & "Samantha's Thanksgiving to Remember" where the Stevens & Gladys Kravitz get whisked back to Plymouth.  I also enjoy how the producers seemed to develop an ensemble cast such as bringing Craig Hunley back as a neighbor boy who wants to mow Darrin's lawn.  On another season's episode, he'd been an orphan that Samantha takes to the North Pole to prove there is a Santa Claus and in another he played the young Darrin Stevens.  On of the silliest episodes for the great Agnes Morehead was "Once in a Vial" where she drinks a love potion and then gets lovey-dovey.  Elizabeth Montgomery is a delightful comedienne with great double takes, confusion and continual surprise.  While Sony might have put a bit more information about the show in the packaging or on the extras, this is an excellent DVD set.  Enjoy!
Finally, the True Version. I first saw this movie over 10 years ago in its original language and I've loved it ever since. Not only because I'm a Street Fighter fan, but also because it was beautifully animated and had great fights.I was disappointed to hear how they dubbed it in english. The voices ranged from decent to crappy and they didn't even take the characters' accents into consideration (Cammy's british and Dee Jay's jamaican). Not only that, but they completely changed the soundtrack to hard rock and even edited out some scenes.In 1997, it was one of the first anime that was put on DVD in the U.S, so that might explain why they didn't add the original japanese audio track for those who didn't want to suffer the bad english dub. But Manga Entertainment re-released it in Europe in 2001 and still didn't include the original lauguage track.Now finally Manga gets it right. Although it still seems to have the same english audio track, it also contains the original japanese audio too... and it's uncut! I'd be happier if they did a better english dub, but this is great for now. Thanks, Manga
A Review of the Special Edition Features. I would rate the show as 5 stars, this is a review of the extras and features of the Special Edition issue.I recently bought all the Special Edition releases of "Stand Alone Complex" after trying to research what I was going to get as extras not included in the regular edition. I found the listings on Amazon's product details to be a little confusing and incomplete on some of the volumes so I decided to write this guide for others trying to decide. I'm not going to review the "Ghost in the Shell" episodes or the series in general because there are so many excellent reviews already on this site, and most of you probably know about this great anime TV series already. There are various other reviews that say that some of the DVD's and CD's have errors on them and Bandai will replace them with corrected discs if you send them in for exchange. I have not ran into problems yet, although I haven't gone through the whole series either. And I will also state that I love the TV series as well as both movies, but I would recommend the Imported Region 2 version of GITS2:Innocence if you have a region free DVD player. Dreamworks really messed up that release omiting the English dub and putting Hard of Hearing subtitles instead of regular ones on the early issues of that movie. Most people find them very distracting and annoying.First off the discs themselves, you get two DVD discs in each volume with the same episodes on both discs. Volumes 1-5 have 4 episodes each, 6 and 7 have 3 episodes each making 26 episodes total in the series. Both discs are Anamorphic wide screen encoded directly from the High-Definition Masters. Both Discs also have English subtitles. Each set also has two interviews with voice cast or someone associated with the production of the anime, and a printed DVD insert pamphlet or booklet with different interviews and such for each volume. All discs are Region 1.Disc one has Dolby Digital 5.1 in Japanese and English, and Dolby Digital 2.0 in English and Japanese.Disc two has DTS 5.1 in English and Japanese and a Dolby Digital 2.0 English track.Volumes 1 and 2 include soundtrack CD's of the music of Yoko Kanno, the most excellent and versatile composer of the music in the TV series. Anime lovers know her work from the many fine soundtracks that she's done for countless other anime movies and TV series.Volume 3 has a Black XL Fruit of the Loom Tee-Shirt with the section 9 logo on the front and a Major Kusanagi graphic on the back. Nice shirt!Volumes 4 and 5 have a collectable I.D. cards for a section 9 member.Volume 6 has a Black XL Fruit of the Loom Tee-Shirt with the section 9 logo on the front and a Batou graphic on the back, and another I.D. card. Nice shirt again!Volume 7 has another Tee-Shirt! This time it's a White XL with the section 9 logo on the front, and the Laughing Man logo on the back! Once again nice shirt! It also comes with a tin box that's supposed to hold all 7 volumes of the DVD set. I was excited about getting the box but when it arrived I was disappointed with the design. It's kind of like the rectangular lunch box that you used to take to school as a kid, without the handle and latch. Its also of a thinner metal that dents easily. It has marketing type of printing on the backside that pertains to vol. 7 only, and the DVD cases stack inside one on top of the other. The spines of the cases are not visible when you open the box, only the front of the last case you put in. So you have to take all the cases out of the tin to get to a specific volume. There's also not room for the cardboard sleves that the DVD's were in when you got the individual volumes, and no room for the soundtrack CD's either. All said, I was disappointed with the box. Because of it's odd dimensions it doesn't stack in well with my DVD library. I would have much preferred the normal five sided box that usually comes with DVD sets.Overall I'd say it's worth it to buy volumes 3, 6 and 7 new to get the shirts if they interest you and pick up the others used if you can to save some money on the series. That is if you're interested in the DTS soundtrack options. I much prefer the DTS mixes to Dolby Digital and wanted the soundtrack CD's as well. Also the cardboard boxes that come with volumes 3 and 6 are better than the tin box to store your set in when you complete the series, if you stack them on shelves one row of DVD's on top of another row, and you can fit the movies into those boxes as well to fill them the rest of the way
Where's the Special Edition?. Great flick, good for all ages, and above all else, it's SCHWARZENEGGER!!! I would really like to see a widescreen special edition of this film, but Universal is severely lacking in that department. The picture quality isn't that great and it's only available in fullscreen pan and scan. But it's a great film either way
ONE OF THE BEST "KING" ADAPTIONS TO DATE!. This is an impressive king adaption. Walkin is mezmerising as the man who can not only see the future,but he can change it. The rest of the cast is excellent in this first rate production of one of my favorite thrillers! This film deserves a completely remastered DVD treatment
Shades Of: A History Of Violence. I see shades of Viggo's recent movie: A History Of Violence in this movie Sean Penn wrote and directed. This compelling film brought out emotional, heart wrenching scenes that cause the same emotion in the viewer. We see the 'good brother' Joey (David Morse)--a peace officer, trying to help his deeply troubled, Vietnam vet brother Frank (Viggo Mortensen).On a personal note: Valeria Golino did a wonderful job in this movie as Joey's amazing, perfect wife.True to most of Viggo's movies in his pre-Aragorn days, here he is as a self-absorbed, heartless sleaze ball who cares basically for no one but himself. Whether it was the war or his feelings that life itself has played him a cruel hand, Frank cannot come to grips with the impulses and the rage in him. The murder scene and the bar scene both bring to memory: A History Of Violence. In this movie as well, he is more of a victim who victimizes everyone around him. One can almost feel his pain as he weeps over his father's death and later says 'sorry' to his brother for every heartache he has caused in the past. Still, later, one learns to hate him.I see Joey as this nave man who cannot see the warning signs in those hurting around him, like his father (Charles Bronson) who tries reaching out to Joey and then admits defeat and ends it. Nor can he succeed in helping Frank see the good side of life and all that it has to offer. Frank's poor wife Dorothy (Patricia Arquette) though, took the worst of Frank's sick behavior during his rages and ultimate abandonment of her. It seems that no one can get through to Frank who sees how life has been good to Joey--as he remarks how 'you got a kiss in and a- -, and I got prison.' Well, Frank, what did you expect? Bad boys get prison. Still, in the end it's the good brother who makes the ultimate sacrifice in this intense, gripping film.(Beware of nuttity and nudity)Vig, a message to you. You look HOT as a construction worker.  Just one question though, is this movie the one where you bonded with your old pal Dennis Hopper? Just wondering! I am looking forward to more of your films.
Riveting, Stirring!. This movies was very well done!  It keeps you in the thick of things but breaks away at just the right time when you think you can't take any more.  It is America at it's best.....people helping and caring for people
See Dan The Geek Scientist Marry In Haste!!!See Dan Repent In Leisure!!!. This is a very tedious and unfunny riff on the "fish out of water" films that were so popular in the 1980's. It is about this Major League Geek Astronomer Scientist played by Dan Aykroyd who falls in love with an Alien woman played by Kim Basinger. After watching this movie one can only come to the conclusion that good Comedic Acting is an Alien Concept to Ms. Basinger. This  movie is redeemed soley by the performance of Jon Lovitch who has excellent taste in cars and is the only funny guy in this entire movie. I give this movie 5 stars because thankfully Ms. Basinger has disappeared from our screens in recent years and her real life antics are  a lot funnier than this movie
Mega-Vegas Manilow. Barry's phenomenal high-energy Manilow Mega-Vegas extravaganza!  With over 27 superb musical arrangements, spanning approximately 1  hours, Barry croons our favorites, like the eternally sexy "Somewhere in the Night."  He does a super-cool rendition of Mandy where he plays and sings along with a video clip of himself from his very early days.  Wait till you hear the `50s "Bandstand Boogie" and "Venus," with Barry Avalonio, not to mention "Love is a Many Splendored Thing" and "Unchained Melody"!  You'll see a big stage Vegas set come down from the ceiling in Copacabana, `cause it is cookin'!  Barry's got fans rockin' in the audience from age 20 to 120 for this show, as a matter of fact, they hardly ever sit down! He does this DVD so well, you feel like you have a front row seat and he's singing directly to you.And if all that's not enough, there's a 2nd DVD, almost an hour long, full of behind-the-scenes extras, like tours, interviews, rehearsal, stage setup, photos, and three additional song clips.  Whaddah sweet deal!  This guy just keeps getting better all the time, a magnificent DVD from a super guy who truly values his fans.  Just when you were happy with the 110 % he always gives, he raises the bar to 130 % !No wonder this DVD set hit 3 times platinum barely a month after it's release!  "Doctor, they won't have ta give ya something to get that feelin' again" if you get this DVD!  And you'll want to watch it over and over again.
Much Better Than I Expected!!!. Once again, I read the reviews on-line before purchasing a movie and end up enjoying the movie much more than I expected to.  "The 4th Tenor" is not like one of Rodney Dangerfield's older movies, all which I have seen by the way, and shouldn't be compared to any of them.  But this happens to be a nice change up for him.It was a very cute and well made movie and there's hardly any sign of the 'brawdy' Rodney for previous movies, although many of the jokes are pretty hilarious!  It made me appreciate and respect the late great Rodney even more than I already do!Also, the supporting cast was very funny also!  When was the last time you've seen Charlie Fletcher ('Who Framed Roger Rabbit', and tv show 'Freddie') take on a more supporting role?  Or seen 'all around' tough ass Robert Davi ('Profiler' and 'License To Kill') dive for cover in a tub full of water and rose petals?If you have a quite Saturday with nothing to do, rent or purchase "The 4th Tenor".  You won't be disappointed.
La Bamba--Best of the Musical Bios. For those Americans whose first exposure to Ritchie Valens was from LA BAMBA, they were treated to the very essence that made Valens the briefly shining star that he was.  Director Luis Valdez correctly fused the major parts of Valens' life with some of the songs that rocketed Valens to the top.  Lou Diamond Phillips has a breakway role as Ritchie Valens and plays him with just the right note of self-assured talent and the conviction that his talent will not be stopped by the racism that was then rampant in the music business. We see Ritchie Valenzuela trying to balance a musical career that will not tolerate Mexican-Americans with his equally strong grasp for the love of a blue-eyed blonde Donna, neither of which will be easy to achieve.  Valenzuela learns painfully that no singer with a Latin name can hope to hit the top ten.  He compromises by choosing an Anglofied version--Valens.  But with Donna there can be no compromise.  His breakout hit "Donna" is his clarion call that there are some principles that he refuses to give in on.  Valens even learns to trust his instinct that tells him that a Spanish language song will be a bestseller.  Hence, the "La Bamba" of the title, which is played by the real life Les Lobos during a footstomping jam session.  Esai Morales as his weaker brother Bob pushes the film into soap opera territory, yet even here, Phillips as Valens keeps his feet and his voice solidly grounded in the basic business of the film.  I had a bigger problem with the airplane crashing foreshadowing that intruded far too often.  Valens' dreams of his own death in a plane crash gave the film an overheavy dose of inevitability.  During the last night of his life, Valens shares center stage with the Big Bopper and Buddy Holly, both of whom add their own verbal luminescence to the singing light that was extinguished far too soon.  LA BAMBA is a musical paen to those fortunate few who possess the ability to shake us out of our chairs and deposit us on dancing in the aisles.  LA BAMBA is one such movie.
great short film of karl(billy bob thorton). this is a very good short film i really like'd it. all though its not as good as the sling blad film its'self but its still a good film no doubt. i have seen this film only once and do not own it myself. but i reckon i own it soon. to me billy bob thorton made karl childers come to life in both these films. we see a darker side to karl on the some folks call it a sling blade film. then we do on sling blade its'self- and billy bob sure did do a great job on these films- perfectly done.i hope to see someday hopefuly soon a slindblade part2. now that needs to be done to take up where sling blade left off.
Great Depression-era Prison Film!!!. This is a great depression prison era film starring Pat O'Brien and the featuring the then emerging movie legend Humphrey Bogart.It's a must see!!
The Grey Zone. This is a film for those who seek reality without discounting the blackest realities imaginable.  Based on a true story, this film takes you inside Aushwitz and lets you know heroes and others personally.  It gives you a reality I would certainly have never imagined, even though I have worked with torture survivors from around the globe for several years.  I originally saw the film in IFC and immediately purchased it for my very limited DVD collection.  My collection does also offer comedies, etc., and movies like, "Truman."  But this movie is real and moving and unforgettable, and a part of history that must never be forgotten.  I feel it is very important, regardless of some misgivings that it is an absolutely non-fictional tale.  The author was really there; I believe he did his best to show us the story he lived
An instant classic!. There is no boudry to gondrys imagination. One of the most interessting directors of our times.A.Pa
Finally!. I've waited a long time for this IMAX film to be put on DVD so I could share it with my music students.  I'm so excited that it's finally available!Everything is there, plus some cool extras.However, my excitement is tempered by the following:The only reason I give it four stars instead of five is that the film was simply compressed from IMAX down to a letterbox.Everyone looks a bit squished - noticeably wider and shorter than they did in the film.  This is unfortunate because in the extras, everyone is proportioned correctly, obviously filmed with regular film instead of IMAX film
beautiful. Wonderful acting of very emotional, sad story. Beautifully done in black and white. This story will stay with me forever, the people seem so real. Duvall is one of the great actors of our time and should be remembered for this performance
Great workout to get back in shape. This is a great workout DVD and very easy to follow.  I've pretty much never exercised prior to having my baby (had a slender build), but a couple months after giving birth i found myself very anxious to lose all those extra pounds.  I've bought many other exercise DVDs, books, etc. and this has been the only one i've been able to stick with on a daily basis.This DVD is sectioned off, targetting arms, legs & abdominal muscles.  You have the option of starting off without weights, with water bottles and with weights as you progress.  The exercises are simple & gentle, but very effective.  The countdown & music/tempo are motivating and the directions are easy to follow.  You're told which muscles you're working on with each exercise - i've found that helpful so i can target areas of my body throughout the day (a few minutes here & there) even without having the DVD on.  Having the 3 ten minute workouts are a definite plus - fitting in 10 minutes is much easier than having to pause or stop and try to find where you left off!I *highly* recommend this to everyone who is trying to get back into shape - especially those who want to ease into it slowly or folks who don't usually work out
The BEST SPIRITUAL and INVIGORATING EXPERIENCE I've ever had!! Better than church any day!. I'm probably one of the few species you'll ever encounter: a 36-year-old African American/American Indian who has loved rock and roll and particularly Bruce's from when I was small! I saw this on TV a few years back, and I've been "reborn" all over again from just listening to Bruce, his wife singing in the background, the wonderful and awesome saxophone player (I've never known a saxophone to speak to my heart the way this saxophone player does)! Bruce and the E-street band rocks!!  I'm going to get his wife's, Patty Scalfia, CD, as well! It's inspiring to see a female rocker rocking with her husband! In this world of the teen and tween rockers who sing whiny songs, keep showing us all what rock and roll is about, Bruce and the E-Street Band!
Smart, funny and detailed. Tony Robinson manages to analyse the supposedly 'historical' claims made in Dan Brown's fiction to see if these claims - believed by many of Brown's readers - stand up to detailed scrutiny.  Such an enterprise could end up being earnest, boring or (worst of all) motivated by some Christian agenda, but as a veteran of popularising history, Robinson manages to keep the pace rapid and the tone light without dumbing down the content.The strength of this documentary is that it sticks purely to the evidence, comparing it at every stage with the claims Brown makes as part of the allegedly 'well researched' background to his novel.  In particular, Robinson demolishes the claim made on the novel's first page (under the bold heading 'FACT') that the so-called "Priory of Sion" is a real organisation.  Robinson takes to this claim with an entertaining combination of detailed detective work and obvious relish and lays out the real story of the 'Priory' - not a real medieval secret society at all, but rather a clumsy modern hoax by a French eccentric.With the claims about the 'Priory' demolished (complete with a rather funny interview with a visibly squirming *Holy Blood Holy Grail* author, Mighael Baigent) just about all of the rest of the 'historical background' to Brown's novel begins to fall apart.While this section of the documentary is highly detailed and definitely worth telling, other parts towards the end of the DVD seemed a little rushed by comparison.  Robinson features Leonardo expert, Charles Nicholl (author of *Leonardo da Vinci: Flights of the Mind*) who gives a very clear explanation as to why the figure of John to Jesus' right in The Last Supper is not 'Mary Magdalene' and why Leonardo would paint a young man in such an effeminate manner.  But, compared to earlier analysis in the DVD, this seems a little brief.  The 'fact' that this figure is 'definitely a woman' is one of the things that even casual readers of Brown's novel find convincing, so a bit more of the fairly extensive evidence about the traditional depictions of John as a beautiful youth would have been useful here.  Leonardo was working within the traditions of his time, but Nicholl's contribution is so brief that the DVD never makes this totally clear to Brown fans who think they can trust the evidence of their own (totally untrained) eyes over some 'expert'.Unfortunately, the weakest part of the DVD is the (again) rather hurried analysis of the Gnostic gospels.  The average viewer would get the idea from this section of the documentary that the gospels which give Mary a central role in the story are on the same historical level as the gospels in the Bible and they were censored by the evolving Christian faith out of pure sexism.  It neglects to make clear that these gospels are far later than the canonical gospels and tell us more about what Second and Third Century Gnostics believed than they do about Mary's likely earlier historical status.Robinson never explains the far later date of these texts or the fact that they were rejected largely because Fourth Century Christians knew they were of recent origin and didn't represent a truly historical picture of Jesus, let alone Magdalene's role.  Bart Ehrman is one non-Christian scholar who does a rather better job of putting these texts back into their historical context and making it clear that, as interesting as they are, they can't be taken at face value as an authentic picture of Magdalene's status in the earliest days of the Jesus Sect.  I'm no Christian, but it's quite clear that the Gnostic view of Mary is late, symbolic and theological, not early, authentic and historical.Robinson compounds this by baldly stating that Pope Gregory the Great declared that Magdalene was 'a prostitute'.  In fact, Gregory never said anything of the sort.  He did wrongly conflate Magdalene with Mary of Bethany and with the 'woman taken in adultery', but he never said Magdalene was a prostitute - that was simply a folk belief that arose later.  Robinson could have made this clear, but in not doing so he gives at least one of Brown's errors credence.There are also two other important claims that *The Da Vinci Code* makes which have convinced many of its readers - (i) that Jesus was considered simply a mortal prophet before he was turned into a god by the Emperor Constantine at the Council of Nicea in 325 AD in a cynical political ploy and (ii) that Constantine chose the books of the modern Bible.  Both these claims are complete and utter nonsense, but unfortunately Robinson never even tackles them.This could be because the documentary was long enough and detailed enough as it was.  That's fair, but there is quite a bit of time at the beginning given over to a British kook who thinks a tiny alabaster Roman perfume jar he's found is the real Holy Grail and a rather meandering excursus about the Cathars.  It's a pity Robinson and his producers didn't cut this stuff short and devote some of the documentary to the rather silly claims about the Council of Nicea and the formation of the canon of the Bible.It was a pity that Robinson was never able to get Dan Brown himself to comment on the historicity of the background to his novel, considering it's convinced so many readers that it's legitimate, historical and factual.  But Brown has become strangely shy about interviews in recent years.  Despite this, there was a time when Brown made some quite categorical statements about the history behind his fiction.  Robinson uses footage of one of these earlier interviews - one where Brown states emphatically that all the artworks, rituals and secret societies mentioned in his novel are 'all accurate'.That's quite a claim, but unfortunately it's far from the most extravagant historical claim Brown made on this topic before he mysteriously clammed up to interviewers.  In other interviews he insisted that the background was 'all factual'.  In one, when asked if he'd have written the book differently if he had written a non-fiction book he declared 'I don't think I would have', assuring the interviewer that, in the course of researching its background 'I became a believer'.It's a pity Robinnson didn't use those more damning quotes from Brown, since many of his fans try to pretend he never claimed the background to his fiction was historical, when actually he has done so several times.All that said, this is one of the best refutations of the pseudo history presented as the 'factual' background of Brown's fiction.  Brown has stated many times that this background is 'all factual' and Robinson has some glee in showing that it is mostly 'total rubbish'.  Many people wonder why anyone would debunk a fictional work, but they seem to overlook the fact that not only has its background been presented and marketed as 'all factual', but millions of readers have taken it as such.  If you want a detailed, intelligent, unbiased, completely non-Christian and highly entertaining counter to the idea that there is any validity in the background to Dan Brown's fiction, watch this DVD.Not the definitive scholarly debunking of this novel's background, but damn close to it.  Superb stuff.  Highly recommended
Great Adaptation!. Johnny Deep was great in this film! It really did justice to the stephen King novella. What else is there to say, the film is highly recomended to anyone who likes Stephen King
ONE OF THE GREATEST SEQUELS EVER MADE!. This has to be the best of the Alien films! This film, although not as scary as the original (I mean that it did not scare me as much as Alien), it is much more exciting and enjoyable than the first. Also, this would have been an ideal conclusion to the series. Go on, buy the Collector's Edition of the first and this and enjoy
Great trip down memory lane. I loved this as a kid but was hesitant to rewatch it as an adult.  At first, those fears were realised- I kept comparing it to modern, intricately scripted sci-fi shows.  Then, I remembered that this was tongue-in-cheek, comic strip adventure.  Buck is the kind of hero we seldom see anymore.  He's not the anti-hero type that is so popular today-  he's actually a "good guy."  Buck's a normal man with strong convictions who does heroic things.  This show works like a high-end update of a 1930's serial.  (After all, that's what it was intended to be.)  Like it's 1970s counterpart, "Battlestar Galactica" (the original- not the bland, depressing remake) it was designed to be pure escapism- a futuristic western with role models that kids could look up to.  Gil Gerard makes a great lead and "Buck Rogers in the 25th Century" remains one of my favorite guilty pleasures
such a great movie. Of all the movies Disney has made, this is one of their best. I really like Sinbad (he's so funny) and the music. "Pressure" to me is such a perfect fit for the movie's plot. If only they had extended the "Land of Funk" scene, because that was also pretty good. I think I'll watch it again tonight
Great Video For New Parents!. My husband and I purchased this DVD to learn what to expect when we bring our baby home.  We wanted an overview of everything, and that is what we got.  The DVD is broken down into sections and thoroughly explains each topic.  What is great about it is that you can go back and just watch a certain section if you need a refresher.  The entire DVD is about 1 hour long, so some information is summarized--if you need to, you can ask your doctor for more detailed info.  The price was great, and we feel more prepared for the arrival of our little one.
Two thumbs up. In my opinion this movie is exactly what you would expect it to be. Sure it is vulgar, sure there are a lot of explicits throughout the movie and much drug use, but it is what it is. Scott's charachter is coming to grips with his friends death and looking to fit in and rebel where ever he can. It is a dark movie not suited for children, but if this is the type of movie that you enjoy and go into it knowing that it is dark, vulgar and morbid, and that is what you want to see at the moment then you get what you rented. No this is not what teens are like, nor is TX Chainsaw real either, the point is just sit back and either enjoy it or hate it, but I give it 4 out of 5 stars. It is what it is
Bravo!!. Excellent film.  Have been looking for it everywhere and finally checked on Amazon.  I didn't think you would have it either, but lo and behold, there it was!  We could watch it every night.  Beautifully acted out in amazing setting
An intriguing DVD for fans of musical theatre. If you're a fan of musical theatre, you're almost guaranteed to find something you like on this DVD. Although the presentation is cheesy (with some awful bluescreen effects), the musical numbers themselves are entertaining.Highlights include Patti LuPone in Evita, Gwen Verdon and Chita Rivera in Chicago and Bonnie Franklin in Applause. But for me, as a fan of both the musical theatre and science fiction, the higlight was seeing a young Nana Visitor (Major Kira on Star Trek Deep Space Nine) dance her little heart out in an impressive dance number from My One and Only. In this particular number, you will also see a less than comfortable Twiggy trying to keep up with the rest of the dancers. She looks so out of place next to Tommy Tune.One of the few performances I didn't like was Betty Buckley singing Memory from Cats. Her singing was okay, but I just didn't buy her as a "cat"...Other than that, this DVD should warm the hearts of musical lovers around the world
Amazing Ballet. This DVD features some of the greatest ballet pieces you will ever find in any compilation.  I can't wait to give it as a gift
best war movie ever. This movie is so good in so many ways that I don't even know where to begin. the plot is simple, all hell has broken loose in the African nation of Nigeria and special ops commander LT waters (Bruce Willis) is sent in to evacuate American missionary Lena Kendrick's. But the mission gets more complicated when she refuses to leave without the people in her care. For those of you that say that I'm crazy for not saying saving privet Ryan is the best war film ever, you have obviously never seen Tears of the Nun. GO BY IT NOW FOOL.
It rubs the lotion on its skin or else it gets the hose again. I can't believe I never reviewed The Silence of the Lambs yet, simply because it is in my top 10 favorite movies ever made. Despite my father's best efforts to keep me from seeing it when it released, I still got my chance and I still love this movie like no other in my collection. I've always been fascinated with serial killers and this movie fueled my fascination even further.If you haven't seen this movie yet, I can only assume you've either been living in a cave this whole time, or you were too young to watch it when it came out. Either way, if you're one of the few people on this planet who has not yet watched it, go now. With so many reviews covering the plot, I won't go there, but if you like thrillers and serial killers and you've never seen this, you won't regret it. It's one you should own, not rent. It's timeless and amazing and it's worth it just for Hopkins' performance alone. Red Dragon and Hannibal were interesting and fun as well, but they have nothing on Silence of the Lambs. It will always stay in my top 10 favorites.
Setzer Rocks the house as usual!. Great seeing the boys back together for some rockabilly rockin!!!This DVD has lots of energy and I love the backstage extras AND old footage! Setzer is without any doubt one of the very BEST rockin guitarist todate, mixing styles on the fly like Picaso mixed colors
Stargate Ultimate Edition. At first, thought it was dull, but after watching the movie, i like it, never thought it would be the start of great series
Great comedy. This is an off the wall comedy. With john Candy and Eugen Levy. I had to get this one. Lots of laugh
1980's Classic. This movie is all about character development of people who are all drastically different.  This is a comming of age film for the 1980's.  The acting is wonderful.  It is a different style of movie.  There were some really great movies comming out then.  Ferris Beulers Day off, Pretty in Pink and some kind of wonderful.  This is another one.  It is a classic of the time period for the people comming of age durning this time.  The 1980's is a time I was fond of.  I do not find it tacky as the media is right now.  This movie is funny.  Some of these classics get refered to in  other movies.  You might want to watch it
Wow!!!. Fantastic!  But I'm wondering if I'm the only one who hears a slight (and sometimes NOT so slight) distortion in the sound?.. (mostly the Bass).   I don't think it's my equipment because everything else I have plays fine.Did I get a bad copy or do I have super-fine tuned "dog ears" that allows me to hear this?  I particularly notice the distortion on the first two songs, "Watching The River Run" and "House at Pooh Corner"  and occasionally in other places.  Over-all sound was good.  But I definitely hear some distortion.  Not enough to where I can't enjoy this video.  But I am a perfectionst when it comes to sound quality and I think this should have been corrected.   Okay everybody.  Tell me I'm CRAZY! But I know these dog-ears don't lie. It's there (least on my copy).  Four stars ONLY for this reason.     Otherwise, FANTSTIC SHOW!The absolute hightlight is on "Peace of Mind"  when Kenny Loggins un-leashes a total "blue-eyed soul" moment on the unsuspecting crowd.At first he's just trolling around the stage, about to lull everyone to sleep with this peaceful ballad.  THEN, out of nowhere and without warning, as if suddenly possessed by some sort of DEMON-OF-SOUL,  he BELTS out (with BOTH barrels and ALL cylinders firing) all the soul one WHITE man can muster!!   I've watched this a dozen times already and it still gives me goose-bumps and makes my hair stand on end EVERY time!You can't go wrong buying this DVD.  Trust me!!!
Good remake. Having seen both the original and the remake I found it difficult to decide which version I prefer and that shows the quality of this one.  Classic Hitchcock, well directed and solid perfomances. The only , in my opinion, grey spot  is the selection of Doris Day which seems not to work as well as the other leading ladies Hitchcock chose for his other films.  However, to her credit, she makes a good couple with  James Stewart.All in all an intense thriller that will satisfy the viewer
Elvis Lives. I'm a big Elvis fan and when I saw this on TV I thought it was great and had to have it.  The way they produced this film was great.  You felt like it was a live show with Elvis.  The way they jelled the past with the present was fanstatic.  A must have for any one who is a fan of Elvis, or someone just getting started.
Moths and Moonlight. "The moth don't care if the flame is real'coz flame and moth got a sweetheart deal,and nothing fuels a good flirtationlike need and anger and desperation."~The MothAimee Mann gives a great feel good concert with cool creative appeal. She gets you into a relaxing rhythmic groove and keeps you addicted right to the last song, then she gives you more.The DVD reveals how Aimee Mann keeps her connection with the audience on a human level. She never seems distant and even defends her love of boxing. As we can now see, she gave her the next album she talks about twice, a different name.Songs: The Moth, Calling It Quits, Sugarcoated, Going Through the Motions, Humpty Dumpty, Amateur, Wise Up, Save Me, Stupid Thing, Pavlov's Bell, Long Shot, 4th of July, Red Vines, Invisible Ink...and more. The DVD features interviews with the band and a slide show set to music.I first heard "The Moth" on her Lost in Space album and loved seeing this song performed live. Her lyrics appeal to my analytical side and the moods are rich with atmospherics to leave me feeling dreamy. As she sings on a stage awash in a moonlight glow, you can't help wishing you had attended this concert.~The Rebecca Review
Best of 2006. "Cars" is the inventive, creative, and entertaining automated film of the year.  Plugging into America's love with the automobile the producers offer a timeless tale that is destined to become a cult classic.  This action packed show speaks volumes through the roar, rumble, romance and racing of hotrods, race cars, and sweet rides.The characters' witty names reflect their personalities and help with screen play motion:  "Lightening McQueen" (Bullitt and the Cooler King would've driven this racer), "The King" (Superbirds always grab my attention!), "Tow Mater", etc.  This movie is brilliant and funny.  Your entire family will enjoy this DVD.  Your little ones will, especially, like it.I always prefer the wide screen version, but have also watched a friend's full screen "Cars".  Both are great.  If you want good clean fun, with a poignant moral at the end (honor, loyalty, and friendship are more important than winning, fame, and money!) then "Cars" is the fun-flick for you.  Race down your DVD soon!Happy Thanksgiving!
Terra Delu!. Checking my shipping status from work it says "Delivered"...sadly I must wait four more hours until Im off work! hmm I think Im starting to feel sick *cough* *cough* maybe I should go home
THE CAVE MEN DAYS. ONE OF THE BEST CAVE MEN AND CAVE WOMEN MOVIES I'VE SEEN IN A LONG TIME. IT JUST SEEMS SO REAL.WELL WORTH SEEING
fine anthology of filmed vignettes. Who would ever have thought Senator Thruston Morton could be so interesting? Yet De Antonio got some great material from him. Tonkin Gulf "No"-votes, Senators Ernest Greuning and Wayne Morse, also make wise appearances. Like LBJ, all three Senators left the government after the 1968 elections.This film is really about film-making, more than it is a History of the Vietnam War. It ends before Tet and the Paris peace talks, more or less around the time of the South Vietnamese national elections of 1967. It has compelling shots of Buddhist immolation, but overall it's addressed to the Hearts and Minds of late 60's Americans.This is not a history for your kids: too much is missing. That being said, In the Year of the Pig is a fine documentary. Emile de Antonio works forward from his material to present a viewpoint, instead of using cinema to work backwards from some deeply-held prejudice, a la Michael Moore. A good example would be the filmed address by General LeMay: how easy it would be to turn him into General Jack D. Ripper instead of presenting his argument in an almost, I-don't-know, reasonable way.The Home Vision Entertainment edition comes with a great essay by Douglas Kellner explaining de Antonio's cinemagraphic methods
Possibly the best movie I've ever seen. I watched the entire movie with my mouth open, glued to the screen. (Well, almost :) ). I have never before, and not afterwards, found a movie that was quite as good as this one in terms of captivation, plot, and the idea. The story sucks you in, and your brain is working the entire movie trying to figure out exactly what's going on. On my first take, I didn't quite get the outcome, so it took me some time and watching it again to really figure it out.The basic plot is about a guy who has an amnesia-like disability, where he does not remember immediate past events. The story progress backwards (!) from the end, and this technique makes you see the main character's predicament. Except we, as the viewer, see the 'future' and know what will happen to him next.I thought the actors were great, the director did a great job and, to quit raving about this movie, I have to say that it's simply SUPERB. Watch it and you won't be dissapointed.
When A Stranger Calls... The Original. When A Stranger CallsRating* RRelease Date* UnknownIn my opinion, this would have to be one of the scariest horror films I have ever seen, and I've seen a lot of horror films. Having the first 20 minutes of complete terror, this film scared the hell out of me. Much different than the remake, which was released a while ago on DVD, this original is "Much" scarier and is "Much" more scarier to watch.Jill Johnson is an average high schooler. Like most of the high schooled girls, she babysits. Deciding to babysit one night for a family called the Mandrakises.Babysitting their two young children that have the flu, Jill starts to get wierd phone calls asking her if she checked the children lately.A night of babysitting turns into a night of pure terror for Jill as she discovers the children were brutally murdered and a psycho tries to murder her.Jill escapes form the killer and the killer is sent to a medical hospital. The killer's name is Curt Duncan, a man that is "completey" crazy.After escaping the hospital 7 years later and getting off his medication, he begins to terroize Jill and her family.I highly recommend this, and if you have seen the remake and not this, don't think this is like the remake because it is not. The 20 minutes of the original is the whole movie of the remake. I found the remake "dull". I don't get this though;1. Original: The children are murdered and are dead the whole time. Scary.Remake: The children survive. Not Scary.2. Original: The Stranger keeps saying, "Have you checked the children". Not because he cares. It's BECAUSE HE IS WAITING UPSTAIRS FOR HER: Scary.Remake: Jill checks the children and they are sleeping safely. Not scary.3. Original: The Stranger comes for Jill 7 years later and HER kids. Scary.Remake: Jill has a nightmare in the hospital. Not Scary.4. Original: Carol Kane actually looks scared to death: Scary.Remake: Camilla Belle basically whines a lot. Not scary.One sentence, "Much better than the remake."Hope you enjoy! Don't watch when you're alone in the house!JordanOverall grade* A
The REAL deal. Nothing was censored. The patients lack of progress was never sugar coated. If they relapsed back into dangerous habits it was shown. 'Thin' is a very honest portrayal of what people with eating disorders go through.
Intriguing. I love the clip, clip of British acting and humor.  This trilogy is paced well, and extremely entertaining.  I'm glad I purchased it and know I will watch it over and over again.  I've watched it twice so far and can't believe the parts I missed the first time I watched because I was really absorbed in the plot.  I'm sure I'll pick up on other agenda/angles every time I watch it
A beautiful look back at a fateful decade. This was originally a chapter in the excellent Project Twenty series on television 45 years ago. It is a magnificent look at a decade that included the depression, the Roosevelt years, the labor strife, and the gathering storm clouds in Europe. Beautifully narrated by the the most mellifluous voice of Alexander Scourby. The last five minutes while Scourby narrates the end of an era over images of the 1939 New York World's Fair and the music of the "September Song" is overwhelming (especially for anyone over 70). There isn't any television like this nowadays. A treasure
What's not 2 like!. I loved this movie. No complaints! Great gore, cool acting, hot girls. It just works! See it!!!!!!!!!!!!
RL Stevenson & Twin Peaks & David Gordon Green = UNDERTOW. I read an article a while back, discussing some overlooked movies of the past few years. "Undertow" was one of them, and for some reason I took a chance and ordered it. As I always try not to read too much about a movie beforehand (it's such an irritation when reviewers give away essential elements of the plot), I wasnt quite sure what to expect. I had an uneasy feeling that it might turn out to be a slow moving artsy fartsy movie about Hillbillies. After the first few seconds my trepidations were gone and I was happily lost in the strange, eerie and entertaining world created by Mr Green. He truly is a remarkable talent and because of this movie I have also ordered "George Washington", his first feature film. I was very impressed by the four leads of UNDERTOW, each portraying their characters with gusto and  visible dedication. The cameos are wonderfully off beat, and well acted. The commentary track by Green and Jamie Bell provides insightful and amusing facts about the project and is well worth a listen. It's a good story with believable characters and some nailbiting moments! But, because of David Gordon Green's artistic touches, the movie is elevated to more than just a commercial flick. I do hope more people will become aware of UNDERTOW in future as it really deserves more credit and attention
test of time. This movie is still quite fresh and very tense. Stands tall among the current slasher trend
Mr Chang and his Shangri-La. When I heard this film LOST HORIZON (1937), was being painstakingly restored and with much more footage found in the vaults, after seeing some of the footage, I thought I had to see it some day.  They say every film student and movie buff should see it.The fact that actress, Jane Wyatt [Father Knows Best tv series (1954-60) and reunion tv-movie (1977), also played Spock's mother in a STAR TREK episode and Star Trek: The Voyage Home (1986)] also appears in the film peaks my interest.This version is with the complete 2 hours, 12 minutes soundtrack with only 18 minutes of found footage put back into the film.  Since 7 more minutes of footage was never found, this is replaced by photography stills and freexe frame images.I won't say anything about the plot, but this DVD package does contain a nice pamphlet containing the restoration work they have done on this film.  Jane Wyatt's swimming nude scene is included.DVD includes subtitles in Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, Korean, Thai.  Theatrical Trailer.Special Trailer include an Alternate Ending.  Restoration: Before and After Comparison with deleted scenes of Jane Wyatt.Photo Documentary.Restoration Audio Commentary.Jane Wyatt just passed away October 20, 2006 at the age of 96 of natural causes.Shangri-La was actually a hollow set at Columbia Ranch near Perduco and Hollywood Way in Burbank, california.  The site is now the Burbank Town Center Mini-Mall.Remade in 1973 in color with an all-star cast with Liv Ullmann, Sally kellerman, George Kennedy, Michael York, Olivia Hussey, Bobby Van.
A Masterpiece-Outstanding!!!. Someone is always trying to shove it into a musical catagory. Or always tying it in with the Rocky Horror Picture Show, but Hedwig and the Angry Inch is in a catagory all it's own.This is an outstanding rock movie that, even if you are uncomfortable with the sort of gay movie genre, you will quickly learn to accept and love because of Steven Trask's excellent writing ability that makes you feel for the characters and respect the music.Seemingly, a satire at first, tells the story of a boy who learns about life, the hard way, through a series of misfortunate things that happen to him and a wacky mother, in East Germany. Eventually after a catastrophic event, he finds himself in America, where life doesn't get any better; all the while searching to find himself, while trying to make his fame and fortune in the music world.If you're not sure, rent it first. I can guarentee you will fall in love with Hedwig, the men and women, and the music he so dearly loves
Draws you in. I watched this film without knowing anything about it.  Though it starts a little slowly, it isn't long before you're drawn in by each of the characters.  The acting is right on target.  The film is a wonderful depiction of very real issues without going over the edge - the push and pull between parent and child, misguided decisions and the resulting impact on those involved.
One of the better filmed and edited concert DVD's. FOR A BETTER VALUE, GET THE LOVERS ROCK/LOVERS LIVE CD INSTEAD.This DVD is sold in many different ways.  Here it is sold as the DVD alone.  For the same price, you can buy Lovers Rock, which contains a copy of this DVD as a bonus (it comes in a standard CD jewel case).  You can also buy the Lovers Live/Lovers Rock which is the same thing, but comes in a standard DVD box and costs slightly more.  Or, there is an audio CD version of Lovers Live, but it is only a single CD, 78 minutes long and does not have all the songs that the DVD has.  Confused yet?This is one of the best filmed and edited concert DVDs to come out in the last few years.   Most concert DVDs are filmed with inadequate lighting and with bad camera angles.  The editing can be especially bad, with the scenes constantly flipping, the cameras always zooming in and out, and the wrong person being shown at the wrong time.The filming and lighting of this DVD is extremely good.  The camera angles and close ups are great.  The editing is fairly good, but not as good as some classics, like Stop Making Sense.  For the most part, the scene focuses on the correct musician at the correct time.  The shots are held for more than 2 seconds.  There still is a little too much flipping around in some parts, like during the encore.  The shot never holds long enough for you to get a clear picture of the new outfit and hairdo Sade has just changed into.The extras on this DVD are not very significant.   There are shots of Sade and the band walking from backstage up to the stage.  And then there is a section of inane interviews of fans.This is the concert tour to support Sade's Lovers Rock CD.  So, there are many songs from that album.  Much of the music at this concert is played in the style of Lovers Rock, even most of her old classic songs.I prefer Sade's original sound to what she is doing today.  It is a subtle change, but I don't think the new sound makes the best of her voice and talents.  On the classic songs, I have heard Sade do them better in the past.The sound is a starker, muted sound backed by a rhythm that almost sounds like an electronic drum machine.  Her vocals are whispered in popish way.  I prefer the old days where she a lusher, but more jazz oriented sound.  However, I also like a couple of the new tracks on Lovers Rock that are blues oriented.For anyone who loves Sade, especially her more recent sound, this is a fantastic concert DVD.  You couldn't ask for more
Good Movie. Wasn't a bad movie.  I enjoyed this movie a lot.  I think it is worth having.  I purchased this movie as a gift for my mother.
Look beyond the boring cover....as there's way more inside. If you like Donnie Darko and Jena Malone you can give this a shot. Both movies refer partly to comics, both have the shining beauty of Jena Malone (please Jena, call me if you read this), and both dare to stap out of the ordinary. Most importantly, the movie is not childish as you would expect from the cover. I love the Mcfarlane art in it, and the story deals with alot of different aspects of life. In fact, you can watch it several times and you will realize this is way MORE than a stupid teen movie. In the end, it has some hidden poetry too (William Blake). It's nice to think of the concept behind this movie, as there are alot different contexts to recognize. Enjoy this little cult I would say...but forget about the poor cover.Cheers to the world!
Perhaps the perfect date movie... I really enjoyed Tristan + Isolde...in fact, much more than I thought I might.The performances were all excellent, especially those of James Franco, Rufus Sewell and the radiant Sophia Myles.  The period details and production design were quite well-done.  Best of all, the script dealt with such big themes as love, honor, duty and even redemption, but not in a heavy-handed fashion.I had recommended Tristan + Isolde to a friend who likes Jane Austen novels.  The movie has that sort of grand, sweeping romanticism she would probably like coupled with enough sword fights and action scenes to keep the boys in the audience entertained as well...in other words, this is perhaps the perfect date movie.
Awesome. I got my product alot faster than I expected and in excellent condition.  I have no complaints.
Classic movie that made them all big stars. Considerng the adult humor and partial nudity, I was lucky as a kid to even be allowed to watch this movie on cable, especially since the "Blue Lagoon" came out shortly beforehand. My parents probably thought this was an innocent little film about mermaids. Some 22 years later, the movie still manages to be funny and charming...plus, now I get all the jokes. Who can resist a tale about finding the woman of your dreams who turns out to be more than what you bargained for?  If you watch the credits at the end of the movie, you'll see the underwater city that Madison came from, something I had never noticed before. Ron Howard, Eugene Levy, Tom Hanks, Daryl Hannah and John Candy probably never this movie would be the platform for making them huge A-list stars some twenty years later.This is a classic and a keeper.  Future generations will enjoy as well.
Common Themes. For those of you waiting to see Pan's Labyrinth, this film serves as an excellent introduction to  Mexican director Guillermo del Toro. There are a number of common themes including horror, youth, civil war, the supernatural, etc. Not particularly horrific, but suspenseful and entertaining.
The Box Set Rules. All of the classics are here(minus Dial M for Murder, North By Northwest, and Strangers on a Train).  My only complaint with the box set is how hard it is to insert the disc's.  Oh well, now I revie each movie(on a scale of 1-10)1.  SaboteurDate:1942Rateing: 6/10Opinion: The oldest one of all the movies, and one of the few in black and white, and it  has some memorable scenes, most memorably, the Statue of Liberty scene.  But, it has its flaws.  The plot revolves around a man who is framed for firebombing a World War II airplane factory, by Nazis.  Then the flaws kick in,a sometimes wooden script, unatractivce female co-stars (the female star looked pretty good), and an offten stupid main charecter, and the traveling sideshow(Why is that there?).  Despite its flaws, its still a good movie.2.  Shadow of a doubtDate:1943Rateing: 4/10Opinion: Alfred Hitchcocks favorite movie, and one of my least favorites.  Its plot revolves a young girl (Charlie), who's uncle(also Charlie) may or may not be a serial killer, the marry widow murder.  Its not that interesting, the charecters are not that indearing, the story is slow, so slow.  But its not without its charms, such as the ending train scene, and Uncle Charlie.  Oh well, its in there.3.  RopeDate:1948Rateing: 8/10Opinion: The first color Hitchcock film, filmed exclusively in one room, in ten, seamless takes.  The plot revovles around two men(Brandon and Phillip), who decide they are better then God, and kill one of their ex-collage class mates(David), stuff his body into a trunk, then serve food off his coffin.  An ex-proffeser of their's though, knows somethings wrong.  The plot is exciting for some one who is anti-nietchze, and read about the Leopold and Loeb case of the 20's.  The slow parts happen when ever the two boy's are alone, because they can't bounce off other's personality's.  The movie was panned when released, and has only recently been re-discovered as a classic.  Oh well, I like it.4.  Rear WindowDate:1954Rateing: 10/10Opinion: Wham, my personal favorite, and Jimmy Stewarts favorite Hitchcock.  The plot is about a photographer, (L.B. Jeffery's) who is stuck in a wheel chair, due to breaking his legs, and is confined to a two room apartment, a single window his only escape.  While looking out the window, Jeffery's spies across the court yard, a possible murder, and he and his girlfriend (From top to bottom, Lisa Carol Freemont), have to find out what happened.  Along with that, their are five sub plots, the married salesman and his invalid wife, the beutifull Miss. Torso who dnaces in her underwear,  The newlywead couple who seem perfect for each other, the middle aged couple who's life has the commitment that Jeffery's fears, and the musician who keeps playing the same song over again, and Miss Lonley Hearts who is dying alone, are perfect for each other and don't know it.  The plot is exciting, and the scene where we first see Grace Kelly is one of the best in Cinema.  Lisssssaaaaap.s. The Song playing in the movie, by the musician, is proof of Lisa and Jeffery's destney.  The song is Lisa's Song.5.  The Trouble with HarryDate:1955Rateing: 7/10Opinion: Slow at first, the movie grows on you.  The plot revolves around four people who stumble on a corpse named Harry.  Every time they get rid of him, and burry him, something forces them to dig Harry up.  This movie is, a comedy, which is something diffrent from Hitchcock, and, the more times you watch it, the better it is.  A stupid plot, but great charecters, and the first operience of crazy, but beutiful Shirley Mclane.  And, the first music score from the amazing Bernard Herrmann.6.  The Man Who Knew Too MuchDate:1956Rateing: 9/10Opinion: One of the most exciting Hitchcock films produced, a remake of one of his earlier films.  The plot of this one involves an American familly vacationing in Turkey.  While their, a spy dies, in the husband's arms, and tells the two of them that a European Ambassador will be assinated.  Before they can do any thing, their son is kidnapped.  The Albert Hall scene is very well filmed, and much better then in the first.  The first version of this film is avalible on the internet, and isn't worh a crap.  It lacks the music of the second film, (Que Sara, Sara).  The music, so great, became another charecter.  Thanks Bernard Herrmann.7.  VertigoDate:1958Rateing: 5/10Opinion: Conssidered one of Hitchcocks greats, this one never at right with me.  The plot involves an ex-cop, who is asked by a friend to trail his wife, who may try to kill herself.  The problem is, he has a parilizing fear of hights.  The Music isn't as good, and the plot is unbelievable, but the opening credits are worth 5/10.  Last Hitchcock with Jimmy Stewart (Rope,The Man Who Knew Too Much, Rear Window).  We say, adue!8.  PsychoDate:1960Rateing: 10/10Opinion: You've been waiting for this, the greatest Hitchcock ever produced, if not, then the most famous.  The Plot is divided in two parts.  The first part involves Marion Crane, who steals $40,000 to bail her boyfriend out of debt.  She ends up at he Bates Motel, with Creepy old Norman Bates, and even crazier Mrs. Norma Bates.  Then, the shower.  The second part would give away the movie.  All I'll say is don't take a shower.9.  The BirdsDate:1963Rateing: 9/10Opinion: This one is also great and timeless, Hitchcocks unusual, unending terror.  The story was adapted from a short story by Daphne du Maurier, and the name explains itself.  The Birds is the first movie with Tippi Hedren, who was allmost the next Grace Kelly, and who would apear in Marnie.  The movie though could have been better with the original ending, which was a shot of the Golden Gate Brige, covered with birds.  But, the scene's when the bird's attack, the school scene in perticuler, are very well filmed.  Bravo!10.  MarnieDate:1964Rateing: 2/10Opinion: Oh, how the mighty have fallen.  After Hithcock directed three brilliant movies (North by Northwest, Psycho, and The Birds), this stinker came out.  Its the story of Marnie, a complusive theif, who tries to steal from her boss (played by Sean Connery[Who isn't American, or good at pertending to be]), who then shows his cronic bad chocies by blackmailing her into marring him.  Marine is scared of red, and lightning, making the movie amerture hour(two hours, four muinets) of thearpy.11.  Torn CurtainDate:1966Rateing:7/10Opinion: The last time Hitchcock and Herrmann worked together, as they had a falling out during the movie.  Oh well, its still got a good story.  The plot involves a professor and his wife going to East Germany, where the professor attempts to steal Soviet missle formulas.  The plot drags for a bit, but its exciting.  The escape is very well done, not overly complicated, and at the end, you cheer for the hero's.12.  TopazDate:1969Rateing:0/10Opinion: Possibley the worst movie I've ever seen, the plot is non-existent, something about Cuba and missles and the French, and spies named Topaz.  The plot has no star, the person who was suposed to star (John Forsythe), was in the movie for tweenty muinets.  Then, some dull French Man, who isn't French, sleeps with a Cuban woman, who he's met before, but doesn't know.  Then, random people die.  And, it goes on for two hours and tweenty muinets (augh)!  Don't watch this, if you do, take the following clensing steps.1.  Kill Self2.  Repeat13.  FrenzyDate:1972Rateing:8/10Opinion: The first true serial killer flick, that opened the door for Halloween, and Silence of the Lambs.  The plot is about a man who is framed for being a serial killer called the Neck Tie Murderer, and now has to figure out who framed him.  Trust me, this is a good movie, and the first film in England, since Stage Fright (1950).  Memorable for the qoate of the day, "Mr. Rusk, you're not wearing your tie".  A classic, enjoy.14.  Familly PlotDate:1976Rateing:9/10Opinion: The last Hitchcock film, he had a pacemaker while directing this.  The plot revolves a fake psychic, and her boyfrined who figure out that they can make $10,000 by tracking down the nephew of a rich women.  The nephew though, has grown up to be a murder and a jewl theif.  Barbra Harris is so cute, she makes me drool.  The last Hitchcock, the last Hitchcock classic, enjoy.p.s., Barbra Harris's wink at the end was improvised, and Hitchcock let her keep it!(wink)All and All, a pretty good box set
A Horror Classic. Even though it seems cheesy, even laughable today, there's no denying "The Evil Dead" is still a landmark moment in the horror genre. Made for virtually no budget by a group of struggling young filmmakers straight out of college, "The Evil Dead" became one of the most original films in the horror genre as well as films in general, and is still vastly entertaining today.Ash Williams (Bruce Campbell) and his friends have gone upstate to rent a cabin in the woods. Everything seems well at first until they find the so called Book Of The Dead, which is supposed to unleash unspeakable evil. That unspeakable evil is manages to one by one, turn each cabin dweller into mindless, bloodthirsty zombies, until Ash is the only one left standing.The plot is pretty much that, but it's still a thrill to watch. The death scenes are both hilarious and creative, and the performances are great, especially Campbell, who became a cult icon thanks to his performance as Ash.This new special edition comes with a wealth of special features, including audio commentary from the stars and the crew (including director Sam Raimi), and crystal clear sound and picture quality.An absolute must have
I love this movie!. Sidney Poitier is one of my favorite actors and he links up nicely with Abby Lincoln. A very cute love story
So that you know... Since nobody took the trouble of listing WHAT is inside of this edition, I bought one just to check it out. This DVD brings two of Buster Keaton's masterpieces: The General & Steamboat Bill Jr. Both transfers are worse than the Kino edition (which is the standard for Keaton's films). Even so, Steamboat... is not bad and the music is (if I remember well) the same as in Kino's edition. The General looks a bit fuzzier, the music is old jazz and not really related to the action, but not bad. If you take in consideration that this DVD is being sold for around a dollar... I think it's worth it. Still... to appreciate Keaton at his best, buy the Kino editions.6-15-06 P.S.: Well, I see they finally put the title to this DVD. Mission accomplished... ???? I also see that the price went up a little... so beware..
i worship cabin boy. this is one of the best movies! if you want a good laugh, its priceless. I've been hunting for it, but its out of print. so i amazoned it. and buying it made my day. the characters are a riot and the plot is hilarious. you cant get enough of the cabin boy dancing to cat on a hot tin roof while having cans thrown at him by pirates
James Dean, The True Original Rebel. This movie will never lose its place in movie history, a true classic with great actors that are truly missed and taken from us at their early ages, James Dean, Natalie Wood and Sal Mineo. I love this movie for its 50's style of teenage upbringing. The times have changed a bit, but the rebelness of teenagers has not. It was great to go back in time and watch the clothing and cars. James Dean, superb, Natalie Wood, innocent yet a wild teen, Sal Mineo, the shy young teen who idolizes his friend James Dean.
Creepy. The grand-daddy of all vampire movies - there may be earlier ones, but Murnau's 1922 NOSFERATU is the one we all remember - is still pretty effective.  Count Orlok (Max Schreck) wants to buy a house in Bremen, the nave and ambitious real estate agent Hutter travels to his gloomy castle to do the deal.  While there Hutter spills a little blood (those red marks on his neck aren't, as he believes, from the pesky mosquitoes) and, worse, he drops a cameo portrait of his `pure' wife Ellen (`nice neck') under the, er, robust nose of the contract-signing Count.If you've seen any vampire movie made since then, and there are thousands of them, you can pretty much connect the dots from the set-up to the end. NOSFERATU is the least frightening, yet most disturbing, movie I've seen.  Set against deserted and barren landscapes of cragged castles and enveloping arches, populated by characters who flow from one extreme pose to another, shadowed by Freudian debris from the blistered imagination of Bram Stoker, framed and focused through the Expressionist lens of German director F.W. Murnau, NOSFERATU is a filmed nightmare.  By today's standards the acting is broadly melodramatic and resoundingly bad, ham upon ham.  Orlok, the Dracula character, is a taloned and pointy-toothed grotesque.  Poor Hutter is a bouncing halfwit. Nobody and nothing reflects reality in this picture, at least waking reality.To be honest, NOSFERATU didn't begin to work on me right away.  I saw it years ago on a bad vhs tape and wasn't very impressed.  The Image print is clean, has many delicately tinted sequences (original, I believe) and a good commentary track.  Still, after the first viewing I had something close to my original reaction.  I watched it a couple other times after that, once with the commentary track, and found the acting increasingly less distracting and the images more insinuating and disturbing.  It's certainly a movie that grows with each viewing.  Highly recommended.
More artistic than historic. Called "A breathtaking journey into the heart of darkness."The cinema tail of the conquest of Don Lope de Aguirre (Klaus Kinski) and how it might have been as they traverse the Amazon river (Filmed in Peru) in search of the mythical lost City of Gold.Some see it as real others see holes you can drive a truck through; Any way you see it this is a good place to start in the New German Cinema movement. A good choice of actors and great visuals. This is also an intense way to learn some German. The victim on the raft is full of arrows and he gets kicked before the revealing statement "er ist tot"
Fun, light-hearted comedy. When young B-Rad's dad, a local politician is trying to boost his career the last thing he wants is his son, wannabe rapper B-Rad showing up and ruining his pep rally with his rap lyrics and funky friends. When B-Rad's antics nearly cost him the election, a close advisor suggests staging a fake kidnap to scare him into embracing his own culture. He hires two black actors (humorously portrayed by Anthony Anderson and Taye Diggs)who pose as thugs and kidnap B-Rad with unexpected consequences.This was a really funny film. I thought Jamie Kennedy did an excellent job with his portrayal of young Brad, and I thought the scenes with the Psychiatrist and the Korean store clerks were funny. 4 stars!
Touching and Funny Poke Episodes. Pokemon Advanced, Vol. 2: Tree's A Crowd contains three episodes and two bonus episodes.  These five episodes are 18-22 of the sixth TV season.Episode 18: A Poached Ego - This episode has Team Rocket finally doing a good deed.  A wicked poacher named Rico has captured some baby Koffings and Ekans.  Jessie, James, Wheezing, and Arbok fight valiantly to rescue them, with consequences I did not expect, that really made me sad!!!!!! WHAAAAAAAAHHHHHHH!!!!!!!!!!!!!Episode 19: Tree's A Crowd - A spunky rebel Treeko, a wood gecko Pokemon, wants to protect a dying tree that has been it's only home.Episode 20: A Tail With a Twist - A big bully Seviper terrorizes Mae's Torchik.  Treeko is beaten badly by it, and has to go to a Pokemon center for treatment for a Poison Tail attack.  Meanwhile, the Seviper just may have met it's match in Jessie.  Much humor in this episode.  After the sad, almost tragic first ep in the DVD, I cracked up a lot over the Seviper and it's antics and attitude.Episode 21: Taming of the Shroomish - A very cute Pokemon called Shroomish holds the clue to rumors of a haunted mansion which is designated for demolition.Episode 22: You Said a Mouthful - I almost fell over laughing.  This episode about a super-powerful Pelipper (Pelican Pokemon) and the greedy Team Rocket who tries to profit off it is great.  Pelipper is so cute and funny-looking, I laughed just looking at it
OMG!!. This season was very good!! Buffy is one of the best shows ever!!! Why did the show have to be canceled?????
Genius. Fox's cancellation of this show is everything that is wrong with network television, and hopefully will not be the end for this amazing show. I bet it is going to win the emmy, and I for one will not be surprised. This is GENIUS
Geronimo!. This movie was absolutely great. Mel Gibson is hilarious in this film. He usually tends to overact but in this movie it fits in perfectly. I guarantee you'll laugh at some of the scenes in this movie. Julia Roberts plays her role great along with all the other characters. The movie has an interesting plot with conspiracies and paranoia. It's very entertaining
Miike + Horror = A fun and scary time. Went to Blockbuster last night since I was bored and ran across this movie. I seriously never heard anything about it, but I do like some 'A-Horror' and I liked Ichi the Killer. I wasnt to excited about it cause I recently watched Pulse and thought it was pretty dumb and very slow and not that scary (except for the couch scene which I almost had to fast forward it was damn tense and freaky).But I was pleasently surprised with this rent. It actually kept my attention through the whole movie and didnt seem that slow at all. It definitely had some creepy moments also.The plot was kinda quirky imo though. I mean... if you know the person that gets the phone call, then I would take my damn phone number out of their phone...and then call the phone company and have them delete my account and shut my phone off. There would be no way in hell someone could call me. But still...it's a movie. A horror movie at that. I'm not here for plot..i'm here for scares. And it worked on me.What I didnt like about the movie:1. The whole Black Haired creepy girl thing is so over used now. It's really sad to see directors constantly use rip this idea off. But what's really sad is..it's still scary..so they'll keep using it.2. I didnt like our lead girl hugging that mom. That was just...wierd and eye rolling.3. The ending left me saying "wtf?". The candy kiss was kinda hot though. But when she started laughing at the end...I just was left clueless.Overall though...I really liked the movie. Now I'd like to rent part 2 (it was out). I heard it wasn't as good and the plot was really dumb...but hey..I'll be my own decision maker.I still want to see Audition also, but my Blockbuster doesnt carry it. I might just have to break down and join Netflix
VERY GOOD MOVIE. I MUST SAY I WAS VERY PLEASANTY SURPRISED BY THIS MOVIE IT WAS VERY INTENSE FOR ADULT ANIMATION
LONG LIVE VOLTRON!!!. I'M MORE THAN GLAD TO SEE THAT OLD CARTOONS ARE COMINGBACK TO LIFE & TO DVD!! I'M WONDERING WHAT LION THEY'RE GONNA USE FOR THE DVD SET COVER,BUT NO MATTER WHICH ONE WILL BE OR HOWE LONG I'VE GOTTA WAIT,HEY!!,IT'S AROUND THE CORNER TO BE RELEASE,SO PEOPLE,ALL YOU NEED TO DO IS BUY THE PRE-ORDER CAUSE THE MORE PURCHASES THERE IS,THE SOONER WILL BE RELEASE!!! AS FAR AS I KNOW OF COURSE!!
4-star hotel. Basically a filmed play - but so what?  It is a production.  So was "Driving Miss Daisy" a play with just three actors.The essence to the play is the end - Danny DeVito's "soliloquy" to the younger salesman about being self-righteous.  This requires the build-up of (verbal) events prior to this.  A good lesson for all of us.Essentailly a 4-star hotel.  5-stars are for "Dances With Wolves" and the like..
This show will change your life. I almost had her face tattooed on my body. My sister and I quote it like bible verses. The line about " How many of you want to wake up in a public bathroom lying in s pool of what you HOPE is your own filth" is on my phone. Devotion, or obsession? I do not know but what I do know is this is Hilarious!It's ridiculous but smart at the same time. My friend borrowed all three seasons from me one time and I got panicky.(Now he has my Arrested Development dvd and I feel that way again). Everyone I force to watch loves it...well all except one person. I won't mention her name, but we will never look at Liane the same way again.Anyway if you have seen an episode or two on comedy central and trying to figure out which season to buy, Season One is my personal fav. Of course you'll end up with all three... its addicting. But yeah season one is just one perfect episode after another.
A classic series. Grew up watching these movies on TV with my father who was a trucker himself. A convient combo that has all three movies. Only con would be the lack of DVD extras or features :
'The Man With No Name' rides into town for the first time... Sergio Leone shared a rebellious desire to tumble the old values and present the audience with a new, more mystifying piece of storytelling... The violence, the speed of action in his film announced a totally new European style...Leone placed the poncho on Eastwood's shoulders to give his character a veil of mystery... The cigar acted as a sort of pendant to those ice-cold eyes... He creates a quite unique character, with no name, no horse and no money, a cynical bounty hunter whose impassivity is his main attraction, an ultra-cool gunslinger who leaves us impressed by his exceptionally swift draw... He is a mysterious 'gunman with green eyes' who comes from nowhere and returns there, a cult hero (set against a dry and dead landscape) entering a noisy violent world where evil competes with evil..."A Fistful of Dollars" is distinguished by Sergio Leone's visual gift, and convincing fashion in handling violence, rape and torture... He presents his sadistic killers, invariably unshaven, sweating and bleeding in frequent big close-ups... Both the real and the unreal invincibility of his 'Stranger' are never better illustrated than in the final scene when the trembling Ramon fills the gunfighter's heart with bullets...Leone's very dark brand of humor stands out when Eastwood walks past a coffin-maker: "Gets three coffins ready" he orders... The town heavies make fun of him, asking where his old mule is... "You see, my mule don't like people laughing, gets the crazy idea you're laughing at him!" All four heavies get their just punishment for such mockery and as Eastwood returns past the old man, he corrects his miscalculations: "My mistake, four coffins."The film is strong on passionate emotions, and bloody violence... This aspect is completely foreign to the American tradition based on John Ford concepts of honor, bravery and romantic adventure... Sergio Leone's film deeply influenced the future of the Western in general and the Italian 'spaghetti' Western in particular...
james garner is the most underrated american film actor. arthur hiller directed this great movie while a young man, and never came near it again. this is julie andrews's actual first movie (pre-poppins) and remains her favorite, as well as the favorite of its star, the always undervalued james garner. he stars here as a procurer (read black marketeer and pimp) for military brass in the european theater in the days leading up to d-day. thru a bizarre set of circumstances, this professional coward becomes the first sailor killed on omaha beach -- a lionization leading to dismay when he shows up alive a week later. (as an aside, i especially enjoyed this tack, having had a high school teacher back in 1971 whose ship having been blown up in pearl harbor had been the first citizen of nashville tennessee to be killed in ww2 -- only to emerge weeks later, to the consternation of his family who had been voted a generous pension by the city fathers, who had to cancel the statue that had been ordered.) contrary to what many believed at the time, this movie is not anti-war; it is anti-glorification of war. it is fully cognizant of the need to fight at times, while refusing to acknowledge that there is any nobility in it. a great script by paddy chayefsky, and great acting by the stars and supporting players melvyn douglas, james coburn, and joyce grenfell.
Great Work out!!. This was my introduction to Pilates and man did it burn the first few times I did it. It got better the more often I did it. I still come back to this tape whenever I want a good Pilates work out. One of the other reviewers didn't think there were enough reps done. The fetal thighs have more than enough reps and I am always happy to get to the end. More reps would kill me.This work out got me into a smaller size and I was very happy for that
Great Comedy. I couldn't stop laughing the first time I saw this movie.  With great one liners and bits that are sure to instantly become inside jokes with you and your friends this movie is a must see.  Zach Galifianakis is beyond funny and the rest of the cast will keep you in stitches as well.  While this movie is definately targetted for teens, college-aged kids, and young adults it is still worth a see by all
Full Track Listing... Track listing of Paris Concert:1. Alphy Blondy - Bsweet Fanta Diallo2. Passi - Reviens dans ma vie3. Faudel - Je veux vivre4. Magic System - Bouger bouger5. Muse - Hysteria6. Muse - Bliss7. Amel Bent - Ma philosophie8. Matt Pokora - Elle me contrle 9. KYO - Contact10. KYO - Qui je suis11. Yannick Noah - Mtisse12. Yannick Noah & Disiz La Peste - La voix des sages13. Tina Arena - Aller plus haut14. Andrea Bocelli - The Prayer15. Shakira - Whenever, Wherever16. Raphael - Caravane17. Raphael - Ne partons pas fachs18. Diam's - Suzy 200319. Craig David - All The Way20. Axelle Red - J'ai fait un rve21. Calogero - Prendre racine22. Calogero & Passi - Face  la mer23. David Hallyday - My Sharona 24. Louis Bertignac - Cendrillon25. Axelle Red + Cerrone - Supernature26. Florent Pagny - Una Nube Blanca27. Placebo - Bitter End28. Placebo - 20 Years29. Zucchero - Il volo30. Zucchero - Il diavolo in me31. The Cure - One Hundred Years32. Youssou N'Dour - New Africa33. Youssou N'Dour - Lima Wees
Best Movie Ever!!!!!. If you love movies, you have to see this movie,very sweet and all the characters are endearing
Great Old School Actioner. For those waiting decades (literally) to get a remastered and widescreen version of this film and with the original English dubs, this is so far the one to get. One important thing though, is the Celestial Pictures remastered version, even though only with subtitles, the picture and audio quality is much better. You will notice the difference if you have both versions and watch them side by side. Another thing is the Chinese dub at least at one point came on. This was the scene when Hung See Kuan fights Pai Mei for the first time and grabs his groin. Pai Mei was supposed to say "Can't find it?" Instead it was spoken in Chinese. Another noticable thing is since it seems Red Sun was mixing the English dub when convenient, the syncing would be noticable off. For instance, in the last fight with Hung Wen Ding, the sound effects are a little late after the actual movements have occurred. This syncing problem also occurs in the Legendary Weapons of Kung Fu Red Sun release
Absolutely fascinating!. I watched this DVD set when I checked it out from the library where I work as a librarian. I found it so fascinating that I bought the set, knowing that I will watch it many times. The set is so chock full of information that you can't possibly absorb it all at once. David Attenborough is an absolute master of this type of educational documentary. I highly recommend watching this set, even if you just borrow it from your local public library
Dungeons & Dragons Series DVD. A wonderful boxed set that brings all of the cartoon childhood memories back to life.  Artwork is awesome and the extras are cool.  Even my own kids love the series.  The themes of today's cartoons don't give kids much to develop on, however, cartoons from back in my childhood at least offer some tools that kids can build on despite the technology level.  I would recommend this DVD to all parents of my genre for yourselves and your children to enjoy.  It was a great priced item and I am extremely happy with the results the set has given me and my family
AT LAST!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. My collection is now complete! This show was cancelled all too soon. But I guess as Buck would say, "If the big bosses at CBS were any blinder, they'd be flying in walls." They didn't know a great show when they had it.7 Men 1 Destiny
Our Man Flint......No 007. Our Man Flint is likeable. James Coburn is lacking the sophistication and suaveness that can only be the credentials of the one and only Sean Connery as James Bond. Coburn is good at what he does and he never lets anyone down. There is always plenty of action. It is not quite as intense as the car chases and death-defying stunts that James Bond not only attempts, but succeeds in making Spectre (007's bad guys) look and feel quite foolish. This is good entertainment. The language is bearable. Not a lot of advanced swear words. It is an appropriate length. Not a drawn out plot going nowhere situation. The clarity, color, and sound are amazing. I recently just purchased my first DVD/VCR and these three things really impress me.   Although not as a polished as 007 it is still a very good movie. In the end the good guys win, and isn't that all we want anyway?
Gene Kelly does fancy footwork of the swashbuckling kind. Wow!!!  All of the swordfighting scenes were EXCELLENT.  Gene was incredible with the sword, the fancy footwork, the gymnastics, the use of props in these scenes, etc.  There was absolutely NO LOOKING AWAY from the screen when he was doing his swordplay.  I want to watch this again soon - that first swordfighting scene must have been nearly as long as the famous swordfighting scene in 'Scaramouche', and every bit as good, possibly better.  I was truly amazed.It was just a really good movie, and the four actors portraying the Musketeers had great chemistry together, especially Gene & Van Heflin.  The sets were okay, the costumes were very good, the acting was great, and in some cases, such as with Vincent Price, outstanding.  But the swordfighting is THE thing I will remember most about this movie when all is said & done.1-10 scale, I'd give the movie a 9.0-9.5, but the swordplay scenes a 10+
The Best Trilogy Ever!!!. X-Men, X-Men United and X-Men "The Last Stand" are simply spectacular! The cast,the characters, the special effects, the story, the action scenes,and everyhting else seems to work to make these movies the best movie trilogy ever!!!.I have seen lots of movies in my life, but nothing compares and comes close to X-Men.
Hands Down, The Most Realistic WWI Combat Film To Date!. All I can say is wow!  This is Ricky Schroeder?  No way!  Rick does an unbelievable job in this movie and proves himself to be a true actor worthy of extreme praise.  The story line is excellent and true to the actual event the movie is based upon.  They spent the time and got all the details right on this one, the historical accuracy is extremely impressive.  This is not a "chick flick" as it has a lot of intense close quarter combat, which is not the case with many modern WWII films.  That makes some parts of the movie a bit graphic and nasty, but WWI was graphic and nasty.  The hand-held camera work is a bit jumpy and almost too over-the-top in trying to place you "into" the action at times, but the movie is certainly good enough to overcome the overzealous camera work.  If you want to know something of WWI combat, there's not a better movie out there right now - at least that I know of.  With all due respect to "All Quiet On The Western Front" of course - both versions. The Lost Batallion should be in any military enthusiast's collection.
Great Video Series. My 8 month old never watches t.v., but when I put this DVD in she was captivated. I was very reluctant to let her start watching t.v., but the slow moving screen and praise songs convinced me. I feel like I have the radio on and she is learning at such a young age to praise the Lord. This is a great product
Friendly Persuasion. This is a movie that I have seen on and off through the years and have always loved.   The Civil War, violence and how it affected members of different faiths and how they responded to it is a subject that I had not really considered when studying this in school.Gary Cooper is perfect as the strong father who struggles with his passion for horse racing (to church) with his friend and neighbor, and problems arise when he purchases an organ at the fair--music is not allowed by his religion!Son Anthony Perkins did well as a devoted son who feels shame at not fighting in the war and defending his home and family and has to make up his own mind how to respond when push comes to shove.This movie has everything; drama, humor and music!  I still love it, no matter how many times I have seen it
Mission: Impossible. Mission: Impossible is one of the greatest adventure shows of all time. I heard that Paramount is digitally remastering the episodes for DVD. There's a number of Paramount series that need to be released in season box sets. Gunsmoke and The Beverly Hillbillies just to name a couple
It's about time!. It's about time this series showed up on DVD, we've waited forever!  This is great, I love watching this show and looking at the San Francisco I grew up in and comparing it to the city today.  Notice all the vacant lots around town, I used to play in a lot of those lots and catch lizards when I was a kid, seriously.  I also played in some of the boarded up victorians which were torn down and some floated across the bay to build new cheap stuff,and they call that progress! Get real. Anyway, I'm happy with the picture quality, Malden's eyes are so piercing blue, and I noticed it's a CBS video?  I guess it took time for it to come out since CBS didn't want to let go of it (sell it)?  The only thing that bothers me in the series is that sometimes it shows them in Portrero Hill, and then 5 minutes later they have droven all the way to North Beach, impossible even back then with only 1/2 the traffic and cars. Why they make flaws like this I have no idea, same flaw showed up in Dirty Harry Movie when Clint chases a guy through North Beach, and then it shows the streets at 24th and Mission, and then back to North beach in the same foot chase... These flaws are sometimes irritating if one knows the city like me
Such a masterful surprise, I'm still loving the entire experience!. `Adaptation' was a huge surprise for me.  I was almost completely certain I was going to hate this film.  I didn't know much if anything about it but I knew it starred TWO Nicholas Cage's and I generally cannot stand him so I never bothered to watch it until last week when I raided the local Blockbuster for almost every movie released in 2002 and figured I might as well give it a try.  At this point it's resting at my number two spot of favorite films of that year, `The Pianist' just barely squeezing in front of it.What was most surprising to me was not the fact that the plot intrigued me or that the film entertained me but was the fact that Nicolas Cage blew me away.  As twin's Charlie and Donald Kaufman, Cage completely develops two completely different characters, embodying each of their personality traits to the full.  He's at one moment reserved and disclosed, nervous and insecure and in the next he's funny and outgoing, confident and hapless.  That takes true talent, and with this role Cage proved he had it.As Charlie, Cage plays a fictional version of the screenwriter himself who has been asked to adapt bestseller `The Orchid Thief' into a script.  He's immediately flattered that he was approached with the assignment but he's soon overwhelmed and frustrated with the mere fact that the novel has almost no plot and thus wouldn't be able to satisfy the viewing public.  He's also increasingly annoyed with his twin Donald's newfound desire and supposed niche for screenwriting as well and his compulsive and relentless badgering is beginning to wear thin on Charlie's patience and sanity.Meryl Streep is also fantastic, as usual, in flashbacks as Susan Orlean, the writer of the novel.  As Charlie contemplates the direction the film would take we see Susan in her adventures with `the orchid thief' himself John Laroche (Chris Cooper in his Oscar winning role), as she slowly falls in love with him and his line of work.  It's not really until the end though that Meryl starts to stun me once again with her brilliant character development and utter ability to transform herself into someone she's never been before.  She was cunning, stunning, breathtaking, heartbreaking and somewhat insane within seconds of each other.With great supporting performances by a long list of great actors and actresses including Tilda Swinton, Ron Livingston, Maggie Gyllenhaal and Brian Cox, `Adaptation' sits nicely on the shelf of great films that I won't soon forget and will be one that I recommend and enjoy for a long time to come.  This may be one of the nicest cinematic surprises I've ever had for Lord knows I didn't expect much, but I sure received quite a bit
It Takes A Brave Actress To Do A Show Like This!. I don't have Showtime at home, but had heard about this series, so took a chance and bought the DVD set. I've always liked Kirstie Alley, and after seeing this all-too-brief first season, appreciate her even more. Like another wonderful, mostly-improvised show, HBO's CURB YOUR ENTHUSIASM, this one follows Alley's plight as she tries to rebuild a sagging (no pun intended) career and wrestle with her considerable weight problem. (How brilliant to create a character that is at once bigger than life and yet who suffers some of the same demons we all deal with.) Take note, also, of some of the camera angles that go out of the way to show Alley at her worst, and you appreciate how brave she was to do this comedy about her shortcomings. Add in some very funny situations and excellent ensemble support, and you have a show that will make you laugh out loud time and again. (In one episode, she starts dating an older billionaire who turns out to have a quirky, over-emotional personality. I laughed so hard at actor Bill Smitrovich's star turn as the billionaire that I think I hurt myself. In another equally funny episode, Wallace Shawn plays Dr. Sigmund von Oy, whose theories Alley embraces in an attempt to try anything that might remotely help her lose weight.) It seems that this first season and its seven episodes will probably be the extent of this show; once Alley's weight is fully off the show won't play particularly well. Meanwhile, we  have these seven in which a fifty-something actress fighting the pounds shows us the flip side of glamour, and makes us realize even the rich and famous suffer the same challenges we all do.  Highly recommended!
The Indisputable Kurosawa Masterwork Given Worthy Criterion Treatment. Leave it to the Criterion Collection to give Akira Kurosawa's seminal 1950 masterpiece its due with this superb 2002 DVD package. First, renowned Japanese film scholar Donald Richie provides a terrifically insightful commentary as he does on classics of other Japanese genres, Yasujiro Ozu's family drama, "Early Summer" (1951), and K Ichiwara's sun-tribe melodrama, "Crazed Fruit" (1956). Second, there is a seventeen-minute excerpt about the film from a feature-length documentary about its masterful cinematographer, "World of Kazuo Miyagawa", who did similarly amazing work on Kenji Mizoguchi's "Ugetsu" (1953) and Ozu's "Floating Weeds" (1959). Third, if you choose to buy rather than rent the DVD, there is a beautifully designed booklet with relevant excerpts from Kurosawa's autobiography and the two short stories by Ryunosuke Akutagawa from which Kurosawa and co-writer Shinobu Hashimoto based their screenplay. Add a brief testimonial introduction by Robert Altman, and this becomes one of the best of the Criterion Collection DVDs.Set in feudal 12th-century Japan, it is a far more intimate film than its vaunted reputation leads one to believe and quite brief at 88 minutes. Ostensibly a courtroom drama, the multi-layered story focuses on the rape of a woman and the murder of her husband in a forest grove. The events of the crimes are told from four different perspectives - a swaggering bandit named Tajmaru, a woodcutter who witnesses the crime, the wife and even the murdered husband by way of a medium. Each account unfolds in a distinct style - an extravagant samurai adventure according to Tajmaru, the wife's melodramatic recollection as a victim, a heroic martyr's tale from the dead husband. In a blessedly economical style, the contradictions in their accounts multiply as the story unfolds.The framing device is the woodcutter's own flashback of the incident as told to a commoner, but his version is far from the definitive one as he may have stolen a dagger from the crime scene. Kurosawa does such a brilliantly dexterous job in structuring the differing accounts that as the film progresses, it becomes less about seeking the truth and more about the power and inevitable conflicts arising from everyone's sense of ego. The only thing that becomes clear by the end is how individual perceptions shape reality and that the absolute truth is a myth. Miyagawa's expert camerawork is stellar in a way that raises the bar for subsequent cinema, especially the vivid facial close-ups of the main characters, the sharp angles of the sun-dappled forest scenes, and the dramatically ink-tinted raindrops.A sterling cast has been assembled with Kurosawa's muse, Toshiro Mifune, a youthfully feral presence as Tajmaru. Masayuki Mori and an especially vibrant Machiko Ky, who later reunited in the ghostly "Ugetsu", lend particular distinction to the couple ensnared by the tragic situation, and the three legendary actors show impressive versatility in highlighting different aspects of their personalities in the various accounts. Takashi Shimura, who later starred in Kurosawa's poignant "Ikuru", is also superb as the woodcutter. Many filmmakers have since copied Kurosawa's then-daring narrative structure (for example, Martin Ritt's "The Outrage" and Edward Zwick's "Courage Under Fire"), but none comes close to capturing the pervasive sense of ambiguity that makes this movie retain its initial power
How to deal with lost clownfish. Finding NemoFinding Nemo is a wonderful motion picture.  It describes the story of a father who's wife and all the eggs but one were killed by a barracuda.  He names the single egg Nemo, after what his wife wanted him named.  When Nemo hatches, he has a gimpy fin and Marlin, the father, is overprotective.The next scene shows Nemo getting ready for his first day of school.  He is anxious to leave, but his father is anxious to be careful.  When Nemo gets to school, and he leaves with his teacher, Mr. Ray, Marlin finds out that they are going to the Drop Off.  The drop off is apparently dangerous because there are sharks and barracudas and others.  Marlin hurriedly swims after them and makes it to the drop off in time to see his son captured by a diver.Marlin swims off in a frenzy to find Nemo, and he meets a forgetful fish named Dory who "knows" the way the boat went.  They start swimming and they run into a shark.  He brings them back to his "fish anonymous" club and introduces them to his non-fish-eating friends.  But Marlin's attention is caught by the mask that the diver was wearing.  It must have fallen into the sea.  Dory gets hurt and starts bleeding, and Bruce, the biggest of the sharks, starts a feeding frenzy.  Dory and Marlin swim away into a torpedo tube, and Marlin finds that Dory can read.  Marlin pressures Dory to read, but they get in a bit of trouble when a minefield is activated.  They barely make it out alive and the mask drifts to the bottom of the huge trench in the sea.Meanwhile, Nemo finds that he is in a tank in a dentist's office.  He and the other fish make a crazy plan to get out.  Back in the trench, Dory and Marlin tentatively make their way into the trench and encounter a deadly angler fish with a light at the top.  Dory uses the light to read the mask and Marlin bravely...or not so bravely...battles the angler fish.  When Dory is finished Marlin traps the carnivorous fish at the bottom of the sea and they leave it to return to the lighter area of sea.Dory and Marlin make their way across the sea and to the dentist's office, but according to a cleverly orchestrated plan by the Tank Gang, Nemo appears dead.  But he is flushed as Marlin meanders back home and they meet up.  Then they are trapped by a net but they make it out through teamwork; they shout "Swim Down!"They make it out and return home.  This movie is a wonderful work of art by Disney Pixar and it has a wonderful message.  It is good for anyone who wants to read it.Review by Jan TirrnNowhere, Nothin
Cool!!. This Dvd really is neat. It has alot of features and a special bonus disc! But due to the release of her new dvd "Greatest hits: My Prerogative" this dvd is not much too buy. It only has 2 videos. But the Live performance is awesome, plus you get to see an interview with brit! This is a neat Dvd but if your looking for videos go with "Greatest hits: My Prerogative
Ferris. Bueller, Ferris BuellerOK, lets start off with what wrong with this edition of Ferris Bueller's Day Off.  there are two problem  I see with this new Bueller Bueller DVD edition of Ferris...One is the over use of actor/know it all Ben Stein and the missing director John Hughes's missing audio commentary.Now the good news. There are extras like a few great documentries with most of the cast talking about this movie.And then there is the movie itself-The extras are fine. However the film is a minor classic.Matthew Broderick emits an air of whimsey with a wink of his eye. Broderick's odyseey of adventure isnt lost on his audience. He is part Robert Preston from the Music Man/Part W.C. Fields/Part Robert Wagner from  It Takes a Thief. Broderick playing Ferris is slick, sly and a con man with style. He pokes a stick of his collective eye of Principal Jeffrey (Deadwood) Jones and we are laughing at his antics with enjoyment.The supportive cast of Alan (Spin City) Ruck and Mia Sara makes a sorta lover's triangle without love nor passion..more deeper friendship. The two combined with Broderick makes this film a buddy movie, rather than a TEEN  angst film (like Not another Teen Movies or Ten Things I hate about you)So want to laugh and enjoy the system being poked, get this filmand as Ferris would say, "What are you Still doing here? Why aren't you buying this yet?"Bennet Pomerantz AUDIOWORL
Vanessa Williams is fine, but, Chayanne Shines. I usually stay away from the chick-flick genre that I was forced to watch with my ex-wife, daughter and, prior to that various and sundry dates...but, from the first viewing of this contagiously exciting film, I was drawn into the world of proffesional Latin dancing. I readily admit that my initial interest was to see Vanessa, since, in my opinion, she makes too few films. But, the infectious sountrack and the easy-looking, but incredibly intricate dance performances of Chayanne and crew, made me say, to quote a line from the film, "I want to do that, too!"Chayanne, who is probably a superstar in latin circles, gives a utilitarian acting performance, however appealing his personality, and this whole movie was never in danger of being an oscar contender, however, I reiterate, the dance sequences are exilerating. A solid family movie, and with the popularity of "Dancing With the Stars," should be a must-see for fans of that show
Good chick flick. Bought this as a gift after liking it so much myself. Good girlfriends movie
Looks like fun. I heard about this game, it looks like loads of fun. It's a fun interactive game where each time you play it it takes you to a new path and you leanr mroea bout it and have loads more fun, it's like your watching a Bratz movie cause they look like what they do on their movies and stuff, but it's also a game. That's why it sounds like a ton of fun. Can't wait till it comes out. Bratz, Danny Phantom, and My Scene ROCK!!
No need for a barre in ballet. I am a ballet dancer and I want to clarify what one reviewer said about how this DVD is not worth it because it does not teach true barre work (since none of us have a barre in our homes). While ballet is often associated with having one hand on the barre at all times, the barre is actually supposed to be used for balance checks only, with your hand lightly resting on the barre. In fact, ideally none of us would use the barre because we all have great balance. I encourage anyone interested in this DVD to try it out and know that you do not need a barre to do plis or anything else. You will actually have better balance and quicker results by not using a barre. Oh, and the best studio I've been taught at asked us to hardly use the barre at all (except when on pointe)
The Book of Acts made interesting and understandable!. First, I agree with other reviewers here that the portrayal of Paul the Apostle by Anthony Hopkins is a standout performance worthy of an emmy nomination. Robert Foxworth's Peter is also interestingly done but our information is lacking about his ministry when he disappears after Chapter 7 in the book of Acts. Therefore the movie focuses on Paul's attempt to unite Jew,Greek and Roman in a trinity of new Christian faith and this film delivers on that concept, even though it is somewhat romanticized. Some very effective scenes remind you of "Jesus of Nazareth". One suprise is when Paul is being confronted by his "thorn in the flesh" while consulting with Barnabas and Mark, you hear a mysterious sound that is tough to catch but Mark inquires what it is to which Paul replies "just an animal". (Actually it is a devil). Also there is a great confrontation with the woman who throws her voice into statues and animals to ridicule Paul's ministry. When Paul tells her that she won't have the power to do that again it is effective enough to put a fear of the Lord into you! We get to see the journeys of Paul and Barnabas (you will notice a gradual decline in the richness of Barnabas shown in his clothing) , we meet Luke, Timothy, Silas, Mark and get a basic grip on what the spread of Christianity was all about in the ancient world. Nero's fay behavior will get on your nerves especially when he is engaged in conversations about Paul with his jailer. Paul's triumphant entry as a prisoner into Rome will remind you of Jesus and his entry into Jerusalem so much so that it can bring a tear to your eye. The original scene of Paul forgiving the Axeman when he is beheaded has been removed for some reason on this DVD. Well recommended to anyone who wants some insight into the early development of the Church and to understand persecution of the apostles!
More to the story than first viewing reveals. TEMPO is an odd sort of film.  It seems to be caught up in camera tricks, rapid sequence photography, and in search of a story to follow.  Sarah (Melanie Griffith) is a middle-aged, beautiful lady who lives high in Paris with a 'kept lover' Jack (Hugh Dancy) and supports her lifestyle by being a runner for the black market transportation of antique bric-a-brac, a life of crime she shares with Jack.  Her past is cloaked in mystery, but she seems to hide some deep pains by her co-habitation with the young and handsome Jack. While off on what appears to be a routine &quot;job&quot; in Munich, Jack meets and flips for a very young girl Jenny (Rachel Leigh Cook) sent to Paris by her wealthy family to 'get her out of their hair'.  She works in a classy Parisian jewelry shop and has all the rights of a trusted shop girl.  The two carry on a steamy encounter until Sarah returns unexpectedly from a botched 'job', desperate and on the run to find money to resolve a shady dealing.  It is at this point that the film becomes poignant, not because of the speed of the resolution of the story of how the money is obtained, but because of Sarah's being forced to face the fact that her young lover has found another younger mate.  In her search of resolution we are allowed to learn Sarah's sad background and how she came to be in the state in which she finds herself - an aging woman with a past, in dire need for a real love.  Melanie Griffith does a fine job finding this vulnerable state and it is her interaction with Dancy and Cook that makes this little mystery/chase movie worthwhile.  There are other good performances (including Malcolm McDowell) and the 'tempo' of direction by Eric Styles is full fast forward most of the time.  Worthy of your time, more as a character study than an action flick
Wild Wheels. I am the filmmaker so of course I am biased, I think this DVD is great!  This DVD has a year of additional work in it, including extra footage, Spanish Subtitles and my director's commentary both in English and Spanish which was really tough to do!  There's also two slide shows, one on art cars including ones that do not appear in the film, and a selection of images of the crew when making and exhibiting the film.  In addition there are two disks, one being the educational PBS broadcast version of the film and the other the director's cut plus all the extras.  Hope you enjoy it.  Thanks and ride on!  Harrod Blank
Words fail me!. These guys are awesome together. Someone should be writing new material and throwing it at Simon & Garfunkel to get them back together making music that we can all enjoy as much as their old stuff.If there is anyone today who can play, sing, enjoy, perform, or compose music as good as this, I want to know who it is. Being from New Zealand, we don't get many opportunities to listen to music like this. I could have bought it here for NZ$40, but I saw it at Amazon for US$15 so ordered it without even a preview. Wow! It's 1:00am over her and I've just finished watching and listening the whole concert through, it was an absolute blast.If good music makes you smile, sing along, and punch the air with joy, then you must have this DVD. I hope Simon & Garfunkel read this review and it encourages them to start afresh, because the world needs them to keep on
Musical enchantment. A beautiful movie.  You could watch this one for the music alone.  Bearte is lovely to look at, and the story of unrequited love is excellent too.  And it's nice for a change to see a movie without a lot of sex and swearing.   I plan to watch this movie many more times
Warrior. I think this is a great film and Bamderas' is really under rated. As an aside, it's one of only a few films showing good relations between Arabs and northern europeans. Some good special effects. Check out the scene where Banderas's horse jumps over Viking on horse back and the line "..that dog can jump"
This is a great movie!!. I don't know why people are so negative about this movie. My family and I think it is hilarious! It's a great movie for kids and adults. It also follows in the lines of the book. My whole family stops what they're doing to watch this movie when I put it on. It's one of the few "older kid movies" that my younger brother will watch. This is an awsome movie for anyone!
A Good WWI Documentary. This is a good WWI video for anyone who enjoys good colorized footage, and accounts from letters from the battlefield. There are also veterans of the war that are still living that give their first-hand accounts of their experiences, which are very interesting. Several historians also give their insight, and the war is very nicely explained. Although several pieces of footage are reused quite often throughout the video, it is still enjoyable for anyone who has a genuine interest in the history of the war.
wonderfull for children. superbThis is a captivating and memorable dramatic tale which teaches basic good vs evil morality to small children in a way they remember and understand. Older children and adults can understand it more deeply and the story's ultimate message is profound. There is no superfluous violence, no excessive special effects or scenes unsuitable for children. This is not like the many Disney "childrens" movies which turn out to be PG rated. Why can't Hollywood make movies like this?
High Five. An acid-trip of things that you have always wanted to say.  I'm actually waiting for the merchandise.  I want a puppet of Middle America.If you're as cynical as I, you'll love this show.  If you take yourself too seriously and look for the meaning of life in entertainment, you won't like this show.  If you rely on critics and customer reviews to mold your opinion because you do not know how to think for yourself, then you will not understand this show
A Portrait Of Cinema Past. One of those films that I hazily remember from my youth, and decided to revisit.  A few reasons led me to take a second opinion: I found out it was a big influence on Luis Bunuel ("it opened a big window for me"); Joseph Cotton is always good; the much-vaunted photography by Joseph August; the director is William Dieterle, the German expatriate who directed one of the very greatest films of Hollywood's Golden Age, "The Hunchback of Notre Dame" (1939).The film starts in the best mood: a camera floating through the clouds, the fisheyed lens distorting 1930s New York (when and where the film is set) into some wonderfully sunlit and ice-capped vision of loveliness and mystery.  We find Cotton's struggling artist (a painter) appropriately struggling through another New York autumn and winter, failing to sell his rather uninspired landscape paintings.  Then he meets a beautiful and mysterious schoolgirl in the park, dressed in old-fashioned uniform and speaking about a long-vanished theatre...Obviously, this start can only lead to romantic complications, heartbreak for the artist and a kind of final transcendent closure for the girl, now become a woman.  The conventional themes are all here: the inspiration of the artist through a tragic entanglement; the desire of people interested in art -in this case the owners of an art gallery- to feel the artist's sincerity permeating through his work; and, more darkly, the death of the muse in order to raise the artist up to the level of romantic (/Romantic) artistic fulfilment.Technically, the film works well enough, although sometimes the editing is far too fussy, not allowing August to shoot his scenes in depth, as he so clearly wishes.  Yet when the camera takes flight -for instance in the opening sequence, and also in the fine tinted climax on the rocks- the film benefits as a whole, elevated as it is to the level of romantic whimsy that it aims for.  Musically, the repeated motif can get a little irritating, as can the carousing Irish-American characters that Cotton encounters.Overall, a decent if minor Hollywood film, hampered most of all by the fact that it is a film out of time; a bona-fide romantic melodrama made in an era of location shooting and gritty film noirs (although it must be said that the film does try to include as much real-life scenery as possible in its filming of New York).
Great workout. This dvd is wonderful.  You will not be bored.   The moves are different and the video is fast-paced.  Chris Freytag is fantastic and her programs really work.  Do not be afraid to order this one and "Drop It in 30".  They are both great and well worth the cost
Charming, but needed more focus. A 10-week program in New York City schools teaches ballroom dancing to 5th graders, imparting lessons about self-worth, respect, and etiquette.  Some of the students go on to dance in a city-wide competition.  This documantary focuses on the children of three schools as they prepare for the showdown.  As many other reviewers have noted, the film would have benefitted from a finer focus on a smaller number of kids.  This would have allowed us to see more of their personal lives and place the program in its context.  Nervertheless, there are many joyful sequences in this film, and the children are charming.  Those qualities go a long way
Becoming a man in a world gone mad. When it was first released, my wife and I saw Tea with Mussolini at a small theater in our neighborhood, the Drexel East theater in Bexley. The cast was simply wonderful, bringing a multidimensional story to life, complete with a whole set of characters of depth and realism.The movie's official tagline is, "a story of civilized disobedience," but I found myself focusing on rather a different part of the story, that of a young boy who became a man. The young boy, Luca, was the illegitimate son of an Italian businessman. With his mother dead and his father absent, Luca is raised by an Englishwoman, Mary Wallace (Joan Plowright), who is part of a group of English living it Italy just before World War II. Mary enlists help from her friends to ensure that the boy is taken care of. A wealthy American who sometimes lived among the English "Scorpioni," Elsa Morganthal Strauss-Armistan (Cher), was a friend of Luca's mother and set up a trust for him.Mary not only ensured that Luca was going to school and pursuing his studies, but she spent time with him, spoke with him, and instilled in him the values that would make him a proper English gentleman--apparently the only desire that his father had for him.As Italy became increasingly aligned with Nazi Germany, the charming and peaceful existence in Florence gave way to incarceration for the Scorpioni, and a great deal of mystery surrounding Elsa. Luca was sent to an Austrian boarding school, as his father determined that Italy's future was not with England, but with Germany. After his studies, he returned to Italy, and soon found himself jealous of Elsa's Italian lover, deeply infatuated with her, and in her employ: secretly delivering documents that would allow their Jewish recipients to flee the country.I was especially taken with the character of Mary; not only was she able to perceive what was right and wrong but she acted on it and worked good among those within her sphere of influence. Her strength, moral courage, and gentleness made quite a difference for young Luca. And he was wise enough usually to pay attention. Even after he had gone off to school and returned fully grown, Mary did not hold back from correcting him when he behaved badly. She became cross with him when his youthful jealousy blinded him; even so, in her reprimand, she offered him what he needed not just to understand that he was wrong but what he must do to correct his course. "What are your hurt feelings when there are lives at stake?"Rather than stupidly insisting on pursuing his misstep, Luca wisely took the lesson; he not only quit complaining about being Elsa's "messenger boy" but also used the money that Elsa had years earlier put into a trust for him to help the resistance and to get Elsa to safety when her life was in danger. When the resistance asked where he got the money, he told Wilfred Random, Lady Hester's grandson, that the money was intended to help him grow up, but that it didn't help very much because he forgot the first rule of a gentleman: love thyself last.  (This is a reference to Shakespeare's Henry VIII, which reminded us of a wonderful scene earlier, when Mary used Shakespeare to entertain and to teach the young boy under her guidance.)In his corrected action, Luca set aside whatever inconvenience and heartache he had, moving beyond them, taking action intended for more than just "to feel good" or "to have fun," but to adhere to a principle that was important to him, one that was instilled, we presume, by Mary Wallace. It had an impact was both concrete and specific: it saved the life of a woman whose generosity with her fortune allowed him to be educated and raised in relative comfort. He acted well in the moment, and (as Johann Kaspar said) performed a good action to all eternity. Would that others thus behaved; what atrocities might have been avoided.Tea With Mussolini is a delight, a story both worthy of consideration and immensely pleasurable to watch
WOW... awesome movie. this movie kept me on the edge of my seat for the whole 90 minutes... especially when the ending of the movie came around. all i can say is expect a big twist. when the movie was over, i had to sit for about 5 minutes and think about the ending.... and then i realized that i was an idiot for not noticing all the clues that showed up during the movie lol. anyway, this movie deserves a 5 star rating just for the ending itself
A  Masterpiece. Although somewhat dated this is the best documentary about the Trojan War and whether it occurred that I have seen. The topic is thoroughly examined from a number of different perspectives
This spectacular romp is supercharged! .Who is the guy who robs Bruce early on?. Very lively, very visual, everybody does things that no other movie has the ground strength for them to do it in.  The best soundtrack...whether it is being rhythmic, emotional, or grand.  THis is one film that has to be seen to be believed.  Once you get to know it after more than one screening, you get to love it, especially since it's heart (Lelu) is so genuine, along with being gorgeous.  But my favorite little scene in this spectacle is the maxed out gonzo who tries to rob Bruce Willis at his little mod-port apartment....he's a complete wreck....speeding out of his mind, and unable to keep it together...turning the moment into great comic effect. Whoever you are, you're one of the best things in this movie...and talk about not skimping, don't forget the asian guy who floats his junk-styled ship over to Bruces window to sell him noodles and then floats aways into the fantastic skyway...just a little something to add to the great charms and fantastic touches of this one of a kind film!  anybody finds out who that robber guy was, lemme know!  andre thedre@value.ne
Creepy. The grand-daddy of all vampire movies - there may be earlier ones, but Murnau's 1922 NOSFERATU is the one we all remember - is still pretty effective.  Count Orlok (Max Schreck) wants to buy a house in Bremen, the nave and ambitious real estate agent Hutter travels to his gloomy castle to do the deal.  While there Hutter spills a little blood (those red marks on his neck aren't, as he believes, from the pesky mosquitoes) and, worse, he drops a cameo portrait of his `pure' wife Ellen (`nice neck') under the, er, robust nose of the contract-signing Count.If you've seen any vampire movie made since then, and there are thousands of them, you can pretty much connect the dots from the set-up to the end. NOSFERATU is the least frightening, yet most disturbing, movie I've seen.  Set against deserted and barren landscapes of cragged castles and enveloping arches, populated by characters who flow from one extreme pose to another, shadowed by Freudian debris from the blistered imagination of Bram Stoker, framed and focused through the Expressionist lens of German director F.W. Murnau, NOSFERATU is a filmed nightmare.  By today's standards the acting is broadly melodramatic and resoundingly bad, ham upon ham.  Orlok, the Dracula character, is a taloned and pointy-toothed grotesque.  Poor Hutter is a bouncing halfwit. Nobody and nothing reflects reality in this picture, at least waking reality.To be honest, NOSFERATU didn't begin to work on me right away.  I saw it years ago on a bad vhs tape and wasn't very impressed.  The Image print is clean, has many delicately tinted sequences (original, I believe) and a good commentary track.  Still, after the first viewing I had something close to my original reaction.  I watched it a couple other times after that, once with the commentary track, and found the acting increasingly less distracting and the images more insinuating and disturbing.  It's certainly a movie that grows with each viewing.  Highly recommended.
SOUL MURDER. Luchino Visconti's Marxist take on the changing Italian society circa 1960 was one of the most controversial and influential movies of the early 60's.  Like LA DOLCE VITA it caused a sensation in the US and made an instant, international star of Alain Delon.  Visconti mixes Old Testament themes starting with the expulsion from Eden & Cain and Abel, throws in lots of Dostoyevsky & even some of Bunuel's VIRIDIANA.  It's quite a stew but I never heard anyone say they were bored.  As the mother Katina Paxinou who was Jean Simmons' vile governess in THE INHERITANCE chews up enough scenery for 10 movies.  Annie Giradot playing a prostitute gives such a vibrant performance that you wonder why she appeared here in only 2 or 3 movies over the next 30 years.  Alain Delon's Rocco is a beautiful Prince Myshkin but he's very bland.  As Simone his immediate older brother Renato Salvatore exudes so much animal magnatism he may have you jumping out of your skin.  When he seduces Rocco's middleaged employer (to rob her) half the audience wishes they were she.  Giuseppe Rotunno's beautiful black & white cinematography often acts as a commentary on the action especially in the scenes of more than graphic violence.  Nino Rota wrote the fine score
Not as good as 1-3, but definitely better than 4. Although it doesn't live up to most of its predecessors, American Pie 5: The Naked Mile, is still a pretty good comedy. The big stars from the trilogy are overall absent as the movie focuses on Steve Stifler's little cousin Eric.  Being something of the black sheep of the family for being a senior in high school and still a virgin, Eric gets a guilt-free weekend pass from his girlfriend to visit a college campus for the legendary Naked Mile...The movie, though not a masterpiece, is quite funny and it is guaranteed to provide more than a just a few laughs. The casting is pretty good, but it's just too bad that most of the original characters are missing. An appearance by Seann William Scott would have been great!The setting, the dialogues, the music and the humor, are overall good.As for the film's highlight, it has to be the girls! Jessy Schram and Candace Kroslak to name a few were simply AMAZING!!!Overall, it is a movie worth watching, and even though quite silly at times, it will surely put you in a good mood!
very accessible. I enjoy a lot the work of Rodney Yee, this disc is just right for me, not exhaustive but yet challenging. It gives a nice perk up if done in the morning. Beware that the whole routine takes only about 20 minutes
Forster's Tragic "Angel". Most of E. M. Forster's novels on film have a sense of lightness that the world of tragedy may only peripherally intrude upon.  But in WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD, director Charles Sturridge presents first an Edwardian England, then a song-filled Italy, where the elements of tragedy are introduced ever so slowly so that if one has not first read the novel, then one might be forgiven for thinking that this one too might end up with a fluffified ending.  Helen Mirren is Lilia, a forty something widow whose wealthy inlaws can't understand why she is not content to sit back in England and ossify herself. Her ex-inlaws are merciless in insisting that she show the proper respect by not re-establishing a new life.  But re-establish it she does by vacationing in Italy where she has the gross fortune to find a man (Gino, played by Giovanni Guidelli)whom she believes she loves.  She complicates matters by marrying him and then bearing his child.  At this point, Sturridge faithfully nudges the action toward irrevocable tragedy. Lilia's inlaws determine to "fix" things by going to Italy to bring back Lilia's baby to be raised in England. One simply does not plan such a heartless act unless the script hints at an unhappy closure. By midpicture, Lilia unexpectedly dies, leaving her baby with a father who is alternately charming, then caddish. Gino plays the brute controller of Lilia while she lives and does not hide his infidelities. Later Lilia's ex-inlaw siblings (Harriet as Judy Davis and Thomas Wheatley as Phillip), arrive in Italy with a full head of steam only to be derailed by the charm that is Gino and the infectious musicality of Italy. Helena Bonham Carter is Caroline, who also travels to Italy for the same baby-snatching purpose and is similarly derailed by falling in love with Gino. Sturridge ends the film on a series of jarring notes with each one peeling back the onion layers of character that come into sharp focus as the film progresses.  Some (like Caroline) change for the better and become more self-aware even at the price of a broken heart. Others (like Harriet)for the worse. And still others (like Gino) drift back and forth from conviviality to boorishness in a manner that leaves one gasping at the thinness of his character. When the closing credits hit the screen, Forster's tragic vision of life as a muddle has been indelibly etched on the viewer's mind, leaving that viewer with no choice but to seek elsewhere in the Forster canon to find a lighter vision of self. WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD is a terrific film that ought not be missed
Necessary as opposed to gratuitous. This review discusses the structure of the movie starting from the approach of a very important spoiler.  Reader beware.When I first saw this, I felt pretty disappointed in how a sense of the glory of war still seemed to have slipped its way into the mix through the character of Elias, played by Willem Dafoe.  Somehow Dafoe's moralistic inner-strength and the way he can run into combat to kick butt without any support because, "Other people just slow me down," seemed incongruous with the overarching point of intensifying the destructive feelings of fear, stress, and anger felt during combat.However, regarding Elias as a symbol of what the innocent people like Chris wanted to believe came out of war helps to reinforce the theme stated at the end of the movie: "We are in war against ourselves and our enemies are really within us."  Sergeant Barnes' (Berenger) hidden execution of Elias shows the ultimate distruction of that romantic heroism from within rather than without.It is from that point that the high levels of violence, bodies ripping apart, disturbing fights, and harrowing warfare surrounds itself to become more than just voyeuristic appraisal of the Vietnam War.  Much has been said about Oliver Stone's involvement in the war and how this movie was created of his experiences, but I think it's important to point out that Stone's writing and directing is strong enough that his reputation as a veteran is not the only excuse for the disturbing and disgusting images of a film that has upon second-thought no inspection, but contains itself admirably as a parable for the state of American politics at the time.  Sure his use of an almost all-black cast for Sgt. Elias' half of the troop and all-white cast (a good few with strong "hick" accents) for Sgt. Bob's half is a bit heavy-handed, but the point is still solid.This is also probably a really good film to watch just to cast light on a lot of what happens in Stone's other films.  Ultimately this is the only Stone film I've seen so far that I've felt comfortable calling a "Stone film" because of his strong and specific approach to it.  Nothing in this seems as gratuitously extreme, only necessarily extreme.--PolarisDi
" That Dear Old Menace,  Alastair Sim". There's no denying "Green For Danger" is a winning, particularly witty murder mystery, a genre the Brits do markedly well. What singles this effort out more than anything else, I'd say - and in agreement with most earlier  reviewers here - is the presence, odd character and extraordinary voice of Alastair Sim. His police inspector is a wonderfully sarcastic fellow yet, as a human being, oddly detached. As Leo Genn and Trevor Howard begin a serious fight, for instance, rolling about on the floor of a hospital room and possibly about to do serious damage to one another, Sim, with great delight, pulls up a chair so he can more closely watch and enjoy the violence. What an unusual detective, this! Vocally, too, it's a joy to hear his plummy, over the top savoring of every syllable he utters. His voice, like Edith Evans,' is one of the great (here preserved) treasures of English stage and screen
Pete & Kate. Stellar performances by O'Toole and Hepburn. King Henry #2 and his fair Lady, Eleanor full of intrigue and princely plots. Love me, hate me, leave me episodes throughout. In the end King is jubilant, queen goes back to jail and the 3 naughty boys resume their plotting to seize the throne. "O well, what family doesn't have its ups and downs "?  This is an oldie but a goodie
Eastwood takes one for the Pres. A psycho (played by John Malkovich) plans to kill the President, and Clint Eastwood, an aging, almost over-the-hill secret service agent, is trying to stop him. Malkovich torments Eastwood - Eastwood was on duty protecting Kennedy when he was shot in Dallas, and he didn't react accordingly when the shots went off; Malkovich knows it and drives him batty about it. Eastwood's been carrying that psychological scar ever since, and now he has a chance to redeem himself.In many of Eastwood's movies it's hard to sympathize with him because he's either so cruel and antagonistic or else almost unscathingly superhuman; here he does win our sympathy because finally he IS more human and like the rest of us: he's out of shape, he gets the flu, it takes a while to win the girl (Rene Russo). It's a nice change. There is nothing unique about the story or the way the plot unfolds: crazy man on the loose, Eastwood and cops try to track him down - though it's done very well. The tension is maintained, yet the director (Wolfgang Petersen) takes time to develop the characters, especially Eastwood. Of course there's the wow finish: Eastwood takes the bullet meant for the President (he's only wounded), thus redeeming himself. It's a very well-done thriller; definitely worth a watch
Audrey. As a collector of Audrey Hepburn's movies, I just could say: another wonderful piece
Before spell-check and plagiarism school. Only the acting pros Clark Gable and Doris Day, and their foil, Gig Young could make the news biz an entertaining treat. Of course, it's a sex chase wrapped in cellophane, but we don't care.For those who would argue that Gable was too long in the tooth for perky Doris Day, look into the number of college professors in the 60's who grew their hair long and snatched a coed.This is an old-school battle of the sexes, with sub-plots to underscore the decency and humanity beneath the facade of gruffness.Today, it would be a car chase diversion. The hang-over antidote that Gig Young serves up is one of several hilarious episodes taken as a bon mot. I would rather spend a couple hours with Mr. Gannon(Clark Gable), the newspaper editor, than Geraldo Rivera any day.It is just another old book that I go back to again and again. And no jerky cameras for "reality" either and hipness, like ya know,bogus creativity.Light entertainment with sprinklings of truth and humanity. Rated G as in genuine.
A BEAUTIFUL AND SENSITIVE FILM. I agree 100% with the previous reviewer.  Here I found myself, on Super Bowl Sunday, watching this beautiful film for the upteenth time, where as has been pointed out, was shown on TMC last evening.  The film is one which must be experienced rather than discussed.  The love of a little boy in wartime Italy, which metamorphisizes into his love for the father-figure who provides him with this outlet, is moving, sensitive, and above all, so human.  The film is highly atmospheric, and one almost feels like they are right there in the middle of the village, which is so simple and bumpkin-like, that the Paradiso Theater offers the occupants their only source of entertainment.  Time passes, and the boy comes to love his mentor as he would have loved his own father (who dies as a casulty of World War II).  The true nature of this father-son love is not really revealed until the film's conclusion.  Make no mistake:  this is a gem of a film in any language.  I'd love to see our American film "geniuses" come up with something which even approaches the sheer beauty of "Cinema Paradiso"
Nail on the Head. I first saw this in the theatre because I like Dennis Quaid and Scarlett Johansson.  I had never really seen Topher Grace outside of 'That 70's Show' which I never kept up with on a regular basis.  I fell in love the movie first time I saw it and bought it soon after it came out on DVD.Mr. Grace plays a 26 year-old executive moving up faster in the world than his experience allows him to comprehend.  He's become such a machine in a competivie world that he's loses his way in life.  I was able to relate to his character very well and assume many my age did too.One of mentor's has told me repeatedly that the mid-twenties can be one of the roughest times in life.  So many things are going at once on so many levels.  To me, this movie captured that.  Paul Weitz did a great job writing this.  The cast was exquisite
Tuesdays with Morrie. It took me all of 4 hours to read this book.  It was insightful and entertaining.  It was also sad.  I cried so hard at the end of the book that I hiccuped for 3 hours.  I work at a children's home and have passed this book to several of my 'children' who returned the book damp with tears and facing challenges with new resolve.  I highly recommend this book to anyone who has to face ANY TYPE of challenge, whether mental, physical, financial, whatever
Can we get this guy for president?. I'm starting to think that the number one requirement for the job of "president" should be "acting experience."  We seem to do rather well when we have an actor in office, whether in fiction or in real life.  I also love Ben Kingsley's character in this film.  Someone with his integrity in the White House . . . Perhaps that's too much to hope for.  We can always dream, though, and "Dave" is quite a pleasant daydream, even if it could never happen in real life
The "Joshua Tour" Movie. While the album contains some tracks that are not present in this movie which document to 'capture the moment of the making of an album' as stated by the band members, while the band goes on with their American tour in support for their epic album THE JOSHUA TREE Lp- the movie did succeed in capturing the essence of the band in that period, if that is indeed the purpose for the making of this flick (and to cash in some profit at the same time, matter-o'factly, of course). Consisting of behind-the-scenes backstage interviews, sessions, rehearsals, and concert footages - this documentary feature also contain certain portions that are not included in the companion 2 Lp set:* `Exit' (live) = A fine better rendition of the song from THE JOSHUA TREE, which wind totally hacked nearly to a completely pointlessly passable track when it appeared in its studio version due to the production rendered by Daniel Lanois and Brian Eno. In this live rendition- the essence of the song is very well audibly felt as a bluesy track, which segued into the song 'G.L.O.R.I.A.' - not their track from their 1981 sophomore album OCTOBER, but rather by their fellow countrymen veteran recording artists Van Morrison & The Chieftains.* `Where the Streets Have No Name' = the very track that's used for its movie trailer (included on the dvd) where the band is seen entering the stage (and the first shot to bring the concert footages in colour) presented in slow motion for the trailer; and also there's the live rendition of their chart topper `With Or Without You'; plus their epic ballad from the same JOSHUA TREE album `Running To Stand Still', and a great heavier rock live rendition of 'In God's Country' against it's atmospherical country-ish studio version which appeared in the said album.* A performance of their song 'Mlk' and 'Bad' from their 1984 lp THE UNFORGETTABLE FIRE, that didn't level in any way close to their classic performance of the song that appeared in their 1985 4- tracked ep (consisting of a pair of studio outakes and one of the couple live tracks from the said album), WIDE AWAKE IN AMERICA - that rather turned as a curio when Bono perhaps on an absent-minded impromptu impulse sang a pair of ROLLING STONE songs by the end of it - seguing to 'Ruby Tuesday', (which went quite incoherently to the theme of the song), and most peculiarly ' Sympathy For the Devil' - that seem to tell the song 'Bad' is rather spoken under the perspective of the so-called virtue-istic sentiments by no other than Satan himself! Perhaps just an incidental quirk, or perhaps an intentional pun of sorts coming out from Bono- who years after donned the McPhisto-devil alter ego persona of his against the Fly, who stands to symbolize egotistic arrogance in its persona, being that Bono had the knack for 'tourrette' psyche, flaunting whatever criticism or comment that's thrown the band; which I guess is also the responsible driving factor for U2 to turn techno-pop, almost to a point that's as scary to sound nearly a lot like the pop music of Michael Jackson.However, on the RATTLE AND HUM lp, there's that track called `God part 2' - an antithesis for John Lennon's track which appeared on his 1970 debut album PLASTIC ONO BAND - a song which state that Lennon only believes in himself and his wife Yoko Ono against NOT believing anything or anyone else - whence the U2 song went to state "I don't believe the Devil, I don't believe his book... I believe in love."* 'Sunday Bloody Sunday' = When I first saw this then, I got a little peeved rather than blown away when they played this perennial track o'theirs - seeing that Bono appeared to've tried to force himself in trying to move the audiences with his anger-filled rhetoric regarding the revolution on their homeland of Ireland. Bono did stated however before the segment is shown that they almost never did included this said segment in the film- thinking that many are not likely to comprehend or relate to the grievances that they are expressing regarding the Irish's plight about Ireland's political struggles; which is followed up by their performance of 'Pride (In The Name Of Love)' that wrapped up the flick- with the song 'All I Want Is You' playing in the background as the end credit rolls up.The portion for `The Star Spangled Banner' which opened up their performance of `Bullet the Blue Sky' actually happens to be the very same Jimi Hendrix rendition that appeared in WOODSTOCK - quite a bit of a feat that's not different from what peeved George Harrison regarding the band in filming their video for `Where The Streets Have No Name' on top of a roof, as its been done before; in this case Hendrix's performance of the American anthem's been used on the opening for Neil Young's great concert movie RUST NEVER SLEEPS. The movie, although containing a number of tracks that appeared as well from its lp companion did have some of those tracks as different versions to those that appeared in the album- such as `Angel of Harlem', `Love Rescue Me' and ` Desire', which are live studio sessions, that on the latter the band lengthened the refrain of the song stamping some pun about traveling-preachers (which also went as the same case from a line on the narration portions of their performance for `Bullet the Blue Sky'); and the full live rendition of `I Still Haven't Found What I'm Looking For' (which is on the album) only appeared here as a segment, wherein the song is being practiced by the band with the gospel choir on a small community chapel (with tolerant looks on the faces of the Christian choir- perhaps seeing that there's no real Christian message in the song).Overall, although some had dismissed this whole documentary movie feature as merely a whole lotta nothing but some "pRattle and Hum-bug" from U2 -- it's quite one of the finest music films about a band ever filmed.No flags are waved.RATE: 8 out of 10
Uncle Buck Rocks!. Uncle Buck is absolutely hilarious, and no better actor then John Candy to play this role! Uncle Buck is a Slobby, Unorganized, Middle-Aged Man, and is asked by his brother to stay over his house, so he can take care of his 3 kids, while he and his wife are out of town visiting her sick father. Even though Uncle Buck seems like a careless slob, we get to see his paternal side as we see how he actually really cares for each of these children. Best scenes are the ones where he has to look after the oldest child who is a rebellious teenage girl, also starring in this film is a very young Macaluay  Culkin and Gaby Hoffman as the 2 younger children. This movie is a classic, and I totally recommend it! Not to mention that it's a John Hughes film.
Polish saying: "Sto Lat!" - "May you live a hundred years!". I have not seen A Generation, the first film in this box set, but I have seen the others.  I felt compelled to write a review, because there was none so far and I wouldn't want anyone to be turned off from these films due to ignorance.  I am half-Polish and have visited the country half a dozen times since I was a little boy.  What struck me most about Poland when I visited as a young man, was the kindness people expressed to each other, even if they were complete strangers.  I asked an older woman for directions in the street and she pulled me close and put her arm around me in a motherly way, pointing in the direction I needed to go.  The fact that such kindness and humanity have persisted under decades of oppressive totalitarian rule seems both ironic and appropriate.  It's as if the more Stalin beat down on the Polish people, the more resilient and warm-hearted they became.  Knowing Polish people helps you understand their films.  But, not everyone interested in Wajda can have that luxury, so I will try to give you a summary in a way you would relate to.Kanal is a very compelling film, very accessible to American audiences.  It is taut, suspenseful and portrays the WWII conflict from a perspective I think many Americans will be unfamiliar with.  Much of the film takes place in a sewer, as the refugees try to find an escape from certain death at the hands of the Nazis.  Fans of claustrophobic thrillers will appreciate this.  The atmosphere is almost choking at times.  It's a powerful experience.  Steven Spielberg revealed in an interview that he screened Wajda's war films to his crew in preparation for  Saving Private Ryan, to give them a better sense of how to create the mise-en-scene of war torn Europe.  Kanal contains some virtuosic camera work that should be of interest to any serious film student.Ashes and Diamonds is a monumental film, probably the most important in all of Polish cinema. (the only other one that comes close is Wajda's Man of Iron, winner of the Golden Palm in 1981).  Zbigniew Cybulski is the antic, nervy hero, indeed a James Dean-like persona.  Tragically, Cybulski also died young, missing a step while hopping onto a moving train, he fell and was crushed.  Ashes and Diamonds will be of most significance to those familiar with the politics of the time and place.  It's not an easy film.  In fact, it's heartbreaking.  But the staggeringly honest portrayal of conflicted allegiances to government and one's soul will resonate with all who see it.       A man is hired to assassinate another man.  A simple story treated realistically, with all the second guessing and anguish a real person would feel.  The Polish sense of compassion extends even to her enemies.The cover art on this box set depicts a blood soaked bed sheet flapping on a clothesline.  When I visited Poland, white sheets drying on clotheslines was a common sight, be it a rural or urban area.  But beyond the evocation of war and bloodshed, the red blood has another significance.  Red and White make up the bi-colored Polish flag, which closely resembles the bedsheet in the graphic.  It is a symbol of Poland's bloody history and the traumatic turmoil of this period in time.This box set and Kieslowski's the Decalogue comprise a healthy chunk of the brilliant cinema found in Poland, a country with one of the earliest and most successful film schools in the world
Good Times. I'm looking for the season with Janet Jackson in them.  I have bought the 1st and 3rd season but I can't find anything that says she's in them
Very good lighted hearted film. I like films that are funny and cheerful nothing drab and sad. Something to make you smile and laugh
Another good movie that has gone unnoticed. Exceptional movie about a highly unlikely love couple. Age issue, the other way round, because the guy is younger and they have social different backgrounds.But true love is ageless, and they seem to have more in common than a good eF U Cee Kay. So in spite of difficulties and judgments they experience from family/friends/colleagues, they finally decide to go for it. Not an average Hollywood flick, and great, natural acting. Could be a European movie
Enjoyable feel-good flick. I think I can safely say this movie is one of the best purchases I have made all year. After waiting for over three months for Amazon to finally tell me they could not obtain stock, and thinking I had missed out (trying to get hold of Vincent D'Onofrio films in Australia is next to impossible), I found a seller in the Amazon Marketplace selling a used copy for $5. I snapped it up, and I wasn't disappointed.I won't go into the details of the film, as that has already been outlined. But this movie was immensely enjoyable. It wasn't a 'we will conquer all' film in the typical sense of the word (think any Hollywood sporting flick where the underdog makes a comeback and wins against all odds). It was, however, a feel-good flick in the sense that the two main characters attain achievements that no one else thought they could manage.There's plenty of humour through the movie, and it has its crude moments, but they can be overlooked in the grand scheme of the entire movie. The entire film was simple, but fantastic, and much less of a cliche than I expected it to be
WILL MAKE YOU SHAKE YOUR BUTT ACROSS THE LIVING ROOM. I expected this to be a good DvD and I was not disappointed. I watched it 3 times the first day.  The production values are solid with good audio and video. The lineup of songs is great, but as usual there are some that are missing that you wish weren't.  I would not hesitate to call the backing band some of the best musicians in the world.  There are all kinds of instuments being played and being played well.  Two things stuck out about this DVD.  First I had always considered L&M to be mainly a Kenny Loggins gig with a little help from Jim Messina. I could not have been more wrong, Jim Messina is well represented on this DVD and it opened my eyes to his overall contribution to the team.  Second alot of their music is mellow, and I thought this DVD would also be a bit on the mellow side. Again I was wrong, I actually danced, and as my title suggests "shook my butt across the Living room".  Spend the money, buy the DVD, you won't be disappointed
Keaton's marriage life slapstick farce. This splendid slapstick farce was  Keaton's revenge to the tensions and bitterness of the marriage life with his first wife, Nathalie Talmadge. The film is a torrent of very calculated sight-gags with a unstoppable rythm that arrives to its "climactic" explosion in the spectacular scene in which the character incarnated by Keaton, a wrecked lawyer who have to be married by 7 p.m. of his 27th birthday to inherit a big fortune ( this is, in 24 hours ), must choose between five hundred spiteness brides or a rocks avalanche. The film knew a very poor remake in 1998 called " The bachelor ". Another masterwork of one of the greatest technician and comic artists of cinema.This DVD edition contains too the early Keaton's shorts : "Neighbors" ( 1920 ), a shakesperian underground farce and " The balloonatic "( 1920 )
Serious Science Fiction Shocker. Tuesday is Soylent Green Day.That ominous statement is delivered in the film as a kind of TV advertisement, an informational message aimed at the desperate denizens of an utterly socially ravaged world not so far removed from our own.  Tuesday is a day they can look forward to because they can get Soylent Green.  Considering the dismal nature of this future society, it's something which is sadly believable.This film remains one of the more starkly realistic and disturbing portrayals of a future in which people have almost nothing of their own - including food and shelter.  They have little human dignity left either.  This is not the glorified future of Star Wars with blinking lights and merry talking droids and wise teachers over flowing with hopeful messages.  It's a dirty, ridiculously over crowded nightmare where people treat each other as little more than cattle and even love is a dangerous luxury.Charleton Heston plays a cop investigating the brutal murder of a powerful business man.  In his quest to find the truth, he uncovers a thing so shocking it takes away loved ones, nearly robs him of his own sanity and leaves the viewer with such uneasiness it approaches the dark tone of a horror movie.However what makes Soylent Green so powerfully unsettling is that so much of the fictional story could indeed come to pass.  Indeed, this cautionary tale is even more timely now than when it debuted back in the 1970's.  If you're looking for a sci-fi romp through a colorful world of zippy space ships and wacky alien races, look elsewhere.  This is hardcore uncompromising science fiction which will stay with you
And you thought you were having a bad day. I am glad &quot;Ms. 45&quot; is back on the shelf, because for a long time it was hard to find, certainly up here in Canada.  This film is superior to &quot;Driller Killer&quot; in every way except for the lead track.  Nothing touches the live performance of Tony Coca Cola and the Roosters playing The Grand Street Stomp.  It is quite obvious in &quot;Ms. 45&quot; that that is not the sound of a trumpet.  Anyway, for those who don't dig this, you can't tell me you can diss it.  This, his second film, is night and day between &quot;Driller Killer&quot;.  What an obvious improvement. I was hoping that the DVD wouldn't be Vanilla and have at least a directors commentary.  &quot;Driller Killer's&quot; commentray is legendary.  And while you could chalk this up as being the female version of &quot;Death Wish&quot; there are some elements here that make it a true horror flick. For all those who liked &quot;Eating Raoul&quot;, this is a must see.  Suspension of disbelief is an obvious exercise here, but you won't be disappointed with it if this is your thing.  See if you can spot Michael Richards as one of the extras at the Halloween party
Prisoner of Azkaban is Fantastic..... I love this movie!! I like the direction Alfonso Cuarn took with movie compared to how the first two movies were made. The Prisoner of Azkaban is darker than the first two movies. Prisoner of Azkaban shows the maturity and more character depth for each of the main characters now that they are growing older.Everything is fabulous about this movie including:1) The storyline2) Movie pace is not too slow or too fast3) Great acting, special effects, costumes, set design, cineamatography and so onI highly recommend this film to all
surprise. I just want to say that I know I am in shape but the next day, my abs were sore. The twisting really work
Beautiful film about fullfilling your dream. Great film with poetry in every frame and line, a film about a man who wants to direct an opera and will stop at nothing to get what he wants, this portrays the journey that he takes to fulfill his dream, a masterpiece that will stand the test of time
sick, sad and heart warming. i bought this last night having only heard of it, but having an active interest in the lifestyle.i certainly got more then i had anticipated. the scenes are extremely graffic, some painfull.but then you have the human interaction, and a guy just trying to deal with his illness. this really is his life, no holds barred. intimate, painfull.even if you have no interest in the lifestyle, you will still grow to like bob, and be saddened at his death. a definate recomend for anyone who is in the life.
Can't Get Enough Of Curb!. Again a funny and greatly entertaining series, I just can't get enough.  What will he think of next, I hope there will be more, but I suppose it's not for everyone, There's no violence, some amusing swearing, an inside look at hollywood types, I'm glad I don't run in their circle of friends. Yes it's funny and you will laugh if you GET IT! Some people won't, you can certainly see his ideas in Seinfeld. I suggest you get all five seasons and enjoy the laughter over and over
IM STILL TOO SCARED TO WATCH!. Oh my goodness. i had to look up this movie, and sure enough, it still scares the hell outta me, i wanna buy it just for memory sake, but i dont think i can watch it. i remember viewing the movie as a child in '89, and you talk about terrified, i dont think any of these so-called HORROR films hold candles to these 80's classics
Class Cross-Over on Love Tube: "I'm Comiiiinnng". The theme that thrills me most is the class emphasis of the film. True love breaks the class barrier cheaply, this has been severally proved in real life to be an age-old truth. Possibilities became reality.Marissa Ventura (J.Lo) was the voice of the voiceless poor that the film gave a giant microphone to. Yes and True! Fate brought them (Ventura and Chris Mashall) together, but the cord of principled truth could not be broken by the wishes and schemes of a society programmed to divide the poor from the rich.If only for the unblemished truth of pricipled and positive sel-worth that the film preaches. I vote for it in this review. It teaches: Never, never, to denigrate your self-worth, even when you have been programmed by the accident of birth into a class that  "hews wood and fetches water" for the rich. Your break would certainly come, if you faint not!The reason why the film was an instant success is because it spoke for the millions of single-parents, in North America,  who had to "work-it-out" in sweat to sustain and patch up the remnant of emotion, product of unfulfilled dreams. It gave them hope to dream again. Rekindled dreams, they shall have, if they watch this film.To the millions of defeated and poor laborers who dare to dream again, I ask you this question: are you coming up? you can say yes with either buying or watching this film
Wow. A few weeks ago my 18-year-old son asked me if I had ever seen a movie about an old man who drives his lawnmower on a long trip to see his brother before he dies.  I said it sounded vaguely familiar but no, I couldn't recall actually seeing that movie.  He said he had watched it on tv late at night and it was about the best movie he had ever seen.  Last night, it was on again. I had to stay awake until after 4 AM to see it, but it was worth it.  For it to be so moving to both an 18-year-old boy and his middle-aged mother, viewing it from two such different perspectives, it has to be something special. And it is.
Not Complete. This is one of Bill Hicks best performances but sadly this dvd is incomplete. A very taboo joke is missing from it and I have no idea why. The performance itself is worth 5 stars, hell just about anything from Hicks is worth 5 stars. Recommended if you are a fan of his work  or you're looking for comedy that's still relevant today. A master comedian who left us before he should have, but what he has left us is pure gold. The dvd itself looks much better than the previous bootleg I was forced to watch and has stellar extra's. But the incomplete performance, when the footage is available, is really unforgivable for me. The reason I bought the dvd was to have an excellent copy of it, and it pretty much is but whomever decided to discard the joke should be held responsible. Buy the this disc anyways cause if you haven't seen what's missing it won't hurt. I miss ya Bill..
How to get a studio to pay for a party for you and friends. Step 1} Make a wonderfully surreal movie (Repo Man)Step 2} Make a critically acclaimed film about a rock/punk icon and his dead girlfriend (Sid & Nancy)Step 3} Get a bunch of punk/new wave musicians, buddies, characer actors, etc together, and tell the studio you're going to go to Spain and make a wonderfully critically acclaimed surreal movie.It doesn't matter if you're telling the truth in Step 3, because after you've spent the studio's money and delivered the resulting  cans of celluloid worms, they only have two choices (if your contract was cleverly-written enough, anyway):Choice 1} Release it.Choice 2} Sit on it.They released it.My first wife and i watched it.We loved it.The more you know about/appreciate spaghetti westerns, the more you'll probably like this film.And the music is wonderful -- not surprising, considering it includes in the cast the Pogues, members of the Circle Jerks, Joe Strummer and so on.All i can say is that, if you can enjoy sloppy self-indulgent silliness made by a talented cast having fun, you might want to look at this film.(There is a re-issue of the soundtrack album, but it's missing some of the better music -- particularly the Pogues' version of "The Good the Bad and the Ugly", but does retain Zander Schloss's "Salsa y Ketchup" and the Pogues' alternate [and better] version of "If I SHould Fall from Grace with God"
Shocking casting. This movie has great casting. The actors play characters that they usually don't play. This may be the best acting I have ever seen Keeanu Reeves do
very entertaining. i loved this movie and think it is the best out of the trilogy. it  is so erptic that even gay guys would enjoy the scenes
A superb and mindbending story. If you watch this movie, you must open your mind and expect anything
AWESOME MOVIE!!!. I thought it was like Clerks but in a restaurant instead of a convenience store.However I would love to know why the full screen version costs so much more than the widescreen version.  I didn't pay $3000 for my 53" TV to have only a 25" picture
Timeless Fun. This is a timeless original Disney classic. They don't make them like this anymore. If you like Sean Connery (James Bond) then you'll definitely love him in this before Bond classic
Perfect Parker Posey!. This film is a delightful, light hearted look at both sides of where the "club kid" rave scene blends with the New York art, music and performance art worlds (with a cameo by the omnipresent Miss Bunny).  This is "Torch Song Trilogy" for the perky-post-teen girls.  "That Girl" for our disaffected, affected millenium times.The dialogue is fast and funny, and Parker Posey's costumer deserves - if not an academy award, at least - a stadium "wave" of kudos.Of course, this film rests on the very stylish platform heels of Miss Posey, and she is perfectly cast.  Like a lot of her acting work, it may not be very deep, it is often self-referential and, well, posey... but it all WORKS.  She is an entertainer, and this film entertains, she carries it on her shoulders like a faux leopard wrap, and never lets it drop to the floor.Mary is a superficial party fashionista who isn't above stealing desinger clothing from a friend's closet or making out with someone else's boyfriend.  On a deeper level, this is a story of a girl and her friends who are care-less in every sense of the word, including about other people; and the process of learning that caring is neccessary to life.The script is beautifully crafted, witty, and the only performance that disappoints is the Aunt, in a role that was much too one-dimensional and heavy handed; a more nuanced performance from her, would have deepened the relationship between the two... but... hey... this is comedy.  The best performance is by the fallafel selling boyfriend.  We should all be so lucky.I rate this as a 4 because it isn't a great moment of film history, it is not a classic, and it is not great art (all of which get deeper and richer on re-viewing).  But it has everything an entertaining film needs, and is worth viewing several times for the clothes alone!
A master chef deals with 3 daughters and retirement. I watched this movie once and thought it was just OK, but then I watched it a second time and liked it much more.  Not sure why, but maybe it was because the movie is a bit slow and subtle and takes some time to appreciate.I enjoyed the scenes of the master chef cooking these incredibly complex and intricate meals.  When he was in the kitchen, he was in total control.  His problem, however, was that he wasn't always in the kitchen.  After he retired from his job, he had to deal with three single daughters, a new love of his own, and the unwelcome knowledge that he is getting older.  The movie is about the lives of the master chef as he tries to deal with his retirement as his daughters lives play out in unpredictable and surprising ways.You can enjoy this movie on many levels.  Watching the master chef prepare meals is a treat in itself.  The cinematography is very good too with many beautiful scenes of the chef's home and the foods he cooked.  The story is sometimes sad and sometimes funny but it was always interesting and entertaining with lots of twists and turns.
Masterpiece. I am continually amazed at the huge variation in people's tastes. Someone can give a 1 star rating and the next a 5 star rating for the same film. I can be touched by a film so deeply and yet the person sitting next to me feels nothing. I guess it proves how different we all are. &quot;The Sacrifice&quot; touched me. I would rank it amongst the best 5 films I have ever seen. The film is mysteriuos, haunting, slow paced, impecably filmed and acted. So many images remain in my mind. The woman who breaks down and has to be pacified by a tranquilizer, the haunting music associated with the witch that permeates throughout the movie, the long take as the house is burned etc etc. This is a truly great masterpiece. What a shame Tarkovsky died so young
Excellent First Season. This DVD is a fine copy of an excellent first season to the Lois & Clark show which relates the Superman story in a warm, family-friendly and humorous manner not via the superhero primarily but the average interactions of the title characters.  A great supporting cast rounds out the two excellent leads to make this a fine addition to any DVD collection.
The Maisy Trifecta!. Bright, bold, colorful and amusing we love Maisy and recommend all three fabulous DVD's - Are there any more
about the ending. I Just want to say something about the ending, which is absurd to some. Some previous reviews say that was beyond comprehension. I guess it takes a little more understanding about the Chinese mythology and traditional stories to comprehend that scene. In some Chinese myth, gods would sometimes be punished to go through normal men's life. The purpose sometimes is for them to gain experience and to understand and be able to correct their misdoings. It could also be that two gods hated each other be put on the earth as humans like you and I do without remembering they were gods and be tested in occassions similar to the quarells they have had in heaven when they were gods. This is often for them to understand "an eye for an eye" is not a proper way to solve the problem, which sounds quite an essential part to the Chinese, or maybe Buddist's philosophy, in my opinion.But, anyway, Chow, the fat guy and the manager was somewhat like the gods that has been put on the earth. Chow was the God of Cookery. The manager was a dog in heaven - Yes. There could be animals in heaven too. But, of course, "God of Cookery" (the movie) did not explain why they were put on earth.I hope this helps people who don't understand enough Chinese mythology to make sense of the ending of the movie. But, sadly, I realize and I agree many Cantonese jokes do not translate quite well to English.I am form Hong Kong and, so, I understand everything very well. But the down side is that my English ability may not allow me to make my point
COMEDY. IT WAS VERY USEFUL TO SHOW MY AMISH FRIENDS HOW WE THINK THEY REALLY LIVE
This is the review of a whealthy family who lost everything... ...and the fans who had made the choice to keep it altogether; but every good things must come to an end! I don't agree with that or at least: let last the pleasure we have watching this tv show and enjoy the thing as well. Anyway it's a great, smart, funny, hilarious...(and many more) show. And I say watch the thing from season 1 to 3 if you haven't and share this information with you friends. Spread the word: Great show, great show, great show but no more episodes. or maybe not
Great show, but DVD has poor picture quality. I love Larry Sanders... it's just a brilliant show, and paved the way for reality TV. I was a bit disappointed, however, in the picture quality. Couldn't they have at least remastered these? They look worse than my Comcast reception. The picture is actually fuzzy
Burt's best romantic comedy!. This film is a perennial favourite with me.  It's  funny, warm and charming every time.  Burt plays a man who is reluctantly splitting from his wife (Candice Bergen).  His brother, (Charles Durning) and sister-in-law (Frances Sternhagen) set him up on a blind date dinner with potential love interest (Jill Clayburgh) who tells him to look her up after he is over his break-up.There are many funny scenes, thanks to the script, by James L. Brooks. I liked the divorced men's workshop in the church basement, the dates Burt went on and the familiar feelings of being elated or trapped during a relationship. Burt played this convincingly as a lonely, vulnerable, loveable man who is unprepared for change.I highly recommend this film as a feel-good romantic comedy.
No English audio/subtitles on extra disk?. I LOVED this movie!  However, my Extras disk has neither English audio nor English subtitles.  Does a version of the Extras disk exist for people who speak English
A Strange One. I still give this one five stars , because it is part of What they are outlining as Zatoichi's life and the fact is that he can't see what is going on around him  but we can , so with that in mind you can only imagine the reallness that this movie in particular adds to the saga. I will say that I was surprised, as was the friend I watched it with . It is quite a depressing  story by itself  and I would not reccomend it being the first Zato you veiw but if you choose to don't say I did not warn you. This story in general touchs on the very essence of others and mainly Zatoichi because he is caught up in this huge mess and can't see, so you kind of sit there and feel for him but are helpless, It's really quite ironic , I mean, these are some bad people he's dealing with . I think this one outlines the really really really bad side of human nature that we seldom deal with or see in such an emotional way that is why this movie in particular comes off as quite intrusive to the viewer, it left me scratching my head and kind of quiet like. I will say that the picture sound and overall look of the dvd is outstanding as are all of the Animeigo labeled ones. Perfect.
This Was The Best Season. I loved this season to bad it was the last one but last is still not least. LOL. Because as far as I am concerned this was the best one yet. My favorite episode is when Thelma and Keith got married, I cry every time I watch this episode. So if you want to choose a season to purchase and keep this is the one to buy
Blue Max. The movie content is great, but the quality of the recording was a disappointment. Many of the scenes  in the second half of the movie were very dark. Fortunately, the flying scenes were good. All in all, I was disappointed
Excellent, a must see. I am an 18 year old white male from a high-class family.. I loved this movie.. The performance of Omar and ll cool j is just amazing.. i would recommend this movie to anyone who likes suspense movies and doesnt mind a movie about black suburbi
Dark Angel season 2. Just as good as season 1 but wish could hav3e gone on to give us a real ending instead of leaving it open and not a finish
OVER ALL- THUMBS UP. I LIKED THIS MOVE BECAUSE IT IS AN INTERESTING STORY, THESE KIDS FROM HARLEM WHO DISOBAY AND DISRESPECT AND GET INTO TROUBLE. tHEY ROB A STORE AND KILL THE OWNER. SOME FEEL POWERFUL, WHILE SOME FEEL GUILTY. THAT "NOTHING CAN COME BETEEN US" FALLS APART, AS (TUPAC'S CHARACTER) GOES INSANE WITH THIS NEW POWER. IN THE END, ONLY TWO REMAIN AS A FIGHT TILL DEATH BETWEEN GOOD AND EVIL. WHOMEVER WINS- HAS ALL THE JUICE. "ALL THE HOOD RESPECT"I FOUND THIS TO BE A CLEVER STORY... SOME PARTS FUNNY... LOTS OF CATCHY PHRASES... ACTING IS BELIEVABLE, THESE COULD BE KIDS FROM SOMEWHERE GOING THROUGH THIS HIARARCHY OF DOMINANCE. HAPPENS EVERYWHERE. AND I GOT INTO IT AND FOUND MYSELF ROOTING FOR A SIDE
Great. Jessica Lange does an excellent job in portraying Frances Farmer.  Not only does she resemble her physically, but her actinig is remarkable and it is no wonder that she won an Oscar.  This movie is incredible and really makes you think, about Frances Farmer and how the mentally ill are treated.  This movie does have some disturbing images though and I would not recommend it for younger children.  With those images though, it provides you with an actual picture of the horrible brutality in which Frances Farmer was treated.  This movie is very good, but only to be watched by people that can handle disturbing images
Fine adaptation of a great American tragedy. Tennessee Williams's &quot;The Glass Menagerie&quot; tells of a lonely, over-controlled, over-controlling former Southern belle, now displaced to a small apartment in the city, and how she unintentionally, but quite effectively, creates great unhappiness for herself and her two children. She only wants the best, but ends up making things worse and worse.Katherine Hepburn fits the role perfectly, and showed how fine an actress she was. She was not alone, though, as everyone played their parts to perfection: Joanna Miles, Sam Waterston, Michael Moriarty. Everyone comes off as sincere, earnest, seeking happiness, and finding only misery. This is tragedy at its finest, and a perfect example of how the pursuit of happiness is often the best route away from it
Top-notch war thriller!. Based on real facts, this movie scrutinizes the ethic side of an idealistic and disappointed German medic / P:O:W:  who decides by own will to become spy for his captors. He will be parachuted in order to demonstrate his firm resolution.This might be the masterpiece of Anatole Litvak and the best performance ever given by Oskar Werner.Tense, absorbing and high voltage movie.
Big Sunday dinners with the whole family!. I wish my whole family,aunts,uncles,cousins,yada,yada,yada,would do that on Sundays,even if my grandparents are dead. Big Mama's brother was alive,and he didn't like McDonalds[Everyone loves McDonalds!] He loved only homecooked soul food.I saw this in my class on semester with Nobody's Fool,Home For The Holidays,The Joy Luck Club,Soul Food,Bastard Out Of Carolina,and The Burning Bed. Big Mama didn't want to have her leg or arm amputated,so it killed her
You're old only when you forget you're young. When I think of Cary Grant, I think of the suave, immaculate, debonair actor who defined cool in his own era as well as our own.  Monkey Business, a delightfully funny screwball comedy from 1952, shows us a very different side of Cary Grant.  Blessed with major talent the likes of Grant, Ginger Rogers, Marilyn Monroe, and the lovably huffy character actor Charles Coburn, Monkey Business delivers good old-fashioned comedy from start to finish.  Grant plays Barnaby Fulton, a chemist working to develop an age-retarding formula.  Ginger Rogers is Edwina, his more than understanding wife; she handles his absent-minded episodes with grace and style, putting his interests before her own every time.  Fulton's boss Mr. Oxley (Coburn) is very anxious for the solution to be found, for he is already past retirement age, but some piece of the puzzle just will not fall into place - not, that is, until one of Fulton's lab monkeys escapes her cage, mixes her own formula, and then stashes it in the water cooler.  When Fulton tries out his latest concoction, washed down by a cup of water, he soon reverts back to a teenager mentality, running around like a wild man and even entertaining Lois Laurel (Monroe), Mr. Oxley's secretary, for the afternoon.  Eventually, the effects wear off and he returns to his normal self, but both he and his wife conduct several more experiments (both accidentally as well as purposely) as the movie progresses, each of them regressing farther and farther back toward childhood each time.  Naturally, with all these goings-on, a big, zany ending is in store for everyone involved.The best part of this movie has to be the childlike antics of Cary Grant and Ginger Rogers as they carry on for some time like a couple of eight-year-olds.  Marilyn Monroe is stunning and her character never fails to produce laughs.  Lois, who has begun coming to work early each morning because her boss isn't satisfied with her punctuation, was not hired for her secretarial skills, but, as Mr. Oxley says, anyone can type.  Marilyn gets a fair share of screen time in this early film of hers, but there can be no question that Cary Grant and Ginger Rogers thoroughly steal the show with their comedic antics.  In the end, Monkey Business shows that youth is a state of mind, best expressed by Barnaby's line, "You're old only when you forget you're young.
Gwendoline Hot  and Fun. Gwendoline is free spirited and lots of  beauiful skin adventure  and action.Good choice of entertainment.They need to bring back a lot of these typemovies with lots of skin and  G-rated action. Nudity mades these films very special..If you liked Sheena or Beast Master this is a good choice
not bad. not his best performance but enjoyable to see him live, sound quality is great
There is only one Guinea Pig Box Set...and No Other "Similar Items". I bought this New from Amazon for $80.00 and felt it was worth every penny. There are no other DVDs like these 4. Each DVD is very different. I could not watch more than one at a time...too intense. You are NOT a True fan of Horror/Cult films unless you see the Guinea Pig Set. This would never have been made in the USA. I read some of the other reviews.  There are also Zombies, Talking Heads, Weird Genitals, talking Poop, etc.  The makeup and special effects are far better than any of the "Living Dead" George Romero films. The Japanese element is a definite plus and gives it some comic relief and the Extras and behind the scenes footage shows that the actors/actresses had alot of fun doing these Films. Plotwise these are at least as good as 3/4 of the Masters of Horrors Showtime Series. Buy it before it becomes unavailiable or the USA Bans these DVDs
We love it!. My son is 4 and my daughter is 1 and they both love this video.  We are seeing the live version of the video and now I know that those tickets were not a waste of money.  My 1 year old talks to the TV during the video and my son sings the silly bridge's songs to everyone
OK Populist Drama. "Meet John Doe" is an engaging populist drama with some elements of screwball comedy, but it lacks the resonance of director Frank Capra's "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington".  Now Capra is not the most subtle of directors but he is really wearing his sentiments on his sleeve here.  Gary Cooper and Barbara Stanwyck are fine here but not outstanding.  Walter Brennan is, well, Walter Brennan.  The presence of Edward Arnold as the newspaper magnate with political ambitions telegraphs the ominous direction the film's story is going to go.  I kept thinking that what if an actor with a little more subtlety who doesn't wear the black hat so prominently was cast instead, like say, Claude Rains.  I also thought to myself while watching this how the Coen brothers were influenced to some degree by Capra in films like "The Hudsucker Proxy" or "O Brother, Where Art Thou?".  This is a good film but not one of Capra's best
Outstanding piece about life in the trenches in Indochina, or as some call it, Vietnam. Filmed in late '66-early '67 but releasedin early '68, it includes the outstandingsong by Sgt. Barry Sadler. Watch this thenread Bo Gritz book(s)! Bo REALLY was theGreen Beret Commander this movie was play-ed out from - but eight movies based rough-ly on Lt. Col. Gritz starring everyone fromGene Hackman, to Chuck Norris, to DavidCarradine to Sy Stallone played Gritz toone degree or another in movies like P.O.W-The Escape, Uncommon Valour, The MissingIn Action and Rambo films
Pretty typical Ashley Judd. Not Ashley's greatest film, but there are some good scenes, like breaking into the school, and the car on the ferry boat scene.  Tommy Lee Jones is playing the same character he's played in several other films (different name of course) but he still is solid.  Ashley goes to prison for murdering her husband, serves some time and comes out none the worse for wear...Still as gorgeous as the day she alledgedly slashed hubby to death on the yacht.  Husband and husband's girlfriend are pretty stupid in the over all scheme of ...Ah..scheming.  The plot has some problems, but with solid acting by Both Jones and Ashley, this is a decent way to pass a couple hours.
Speedy & Great Condition. I received my item within a week of ordering.  It was still wrapped in the protective cellophane and it was in great condition with everything intact and accounted for
great flick. I remember seeing this movie as a kid in a kiddie matinee, crowded with kids at the long gone Fruitvale Theatre in Oakland.  Great Flick!!!  At that time, it was state of the art, and a thrilling plot.  Bought this DVD and after not seeing it in over 30 years, it actually is a well made film!!!!  The thought of a black box that grows peg legs, walking around depleting the earth of its electrical supply and destroying everything in sight is pure camp and fun!!!  It is good to see this movie out again
Good... Bad... I'm the guy with the gun... Third in the series (Evil Dead, Evil Dead 2, then Army of Darkness).  This movie is a cult classic.The one-liners constantly flow out so easy and and Bruce Campbell delivers them perfectly.This movie is so entertaining, I watch it at least once a year
A better influence for science fiction than Star Trek. Okay, you have three key officers:  a captain, a doctor, and a science officer.  Oh, and the chief engineer is a Scotsman!  Does any of this sound familiar?For the 1960s, the original Star Trek series is hailed for breaking feminist ground by allowing 'wimminfolk' to answer phone calls on the bridge and change bedpans down in sickbay.  On Fireball XL-5, Dr. Venus is a brilliant space doctor who often makes key contributions to the success of the missions.  She participates as a fellow adventurer, and not simply as a 'damsel in distress.'  She even flies a supersonic jet and saves a space general's life!Yes, Dr. Venus gets coffee for Steve Zodiac.  But he's busy flying the spaceship and can't leave his station, and her act is not submissiveness but simple kindness and courtesy.  Remember when men and women liked to please each other?  It seems to me that she is far and away one of the best feminist role models to emerge from 1960s TV sf.Meanwhile, a few years later on the 'non-sexist' Star Trek, Captain Kirk commands a spaceship where the females all wear miniskirts, the yeoman falls into his lap every time the Romulans attack, and he saves the universe again and again by bedding alien females.  Steve Zodiac may have joked, "Just like a woman!" but he always showed Venus genuine respect, while Captain Kirk may have limited his remarks to a smirk but blatantly treated women merely as objects . . . if not playthings.Yes, Fireball XL-5 is nothing more than a children's show.  It is also nothing less than a ground-breaking television series in the science fiction genre.  It certainly paved the way for the portrayal of more realistic human interest stories in science fiction, and that contribution shouldn't be overlooked just because you can see the strings.
A Cult Classic. This movie has been a favorite of mine since it came out in 1999.  In fact, I saw it the first time as a rental.  I laughed so hard, I had to watch it a second time that evening when my friends came over for a visit.I am a Minnesotan by birth so many of the extra little jokes ("bars", "Sin Cities") were especially funny.  Most of my friends have now seen this movie - at my urging - and we often quote lines from the movie to each other.If you like black comedy (like "Heathers"), you will LOVE THIS MOVIE!  Alison Janney - in particular - is fabulous
A triumphant comeback for Kurosawa. The mortally wounded Lord Shingen (Tatsuya Nakadai), engaged in strife with two opposing warlords for control of feudal Japan, commands that his death be kept a secret for three years in order to prevent both disarray among his clan and conquest by his enemies.  Upon his death, his kagemusha, or double (Nakadai again)--a lowly thief with a startling resemblance to the lord--takes over under the strict supervision of Shingen's closest associates.This visually striking film explores the extent to which a person's identity is constructed by others.  The double begins to impress those around him as he seems to grow into the role, even winning the devotion of Shingen's grandson.  The man and his social position become blurred until it becomes unclear which is the real person.  When the double is unceremoniously humiliated and ejected from the palace toward the end, I could almost imagine that the rage of those who pelted him with stones was also repressed anger against the real Lord Shingen.  When the double witnesses the tragic fate of the Takeda clan at the end of the film, it is as if the ghost of Shingen himself has appeared to witness the end of all his dreams.  A powerful, thought-provoking, and moving film
One of Woody's best. This is a satirical comedy that is almost prescient in how it depicts events in Central America. Banana's lampoons everything from American Foreign Policy to torture techniques and was very applicable in the 1970s, and amazingly (maybe) in the present day
Midway. I have never received this item.  It was first mis-delivered (not to me) and never arrived.  Now, it has not been sent.As for the movie, I've seen it more than once.  It's a great movie.  Just wish I could get it delivered.  Can you help me out
Tops!. This is an excellent movie and very realistic.  If you don't like to see what war does to people it's not for you.  If you like military history it is.  This true story is incredible
HAPPY 40TH ANNIVERSARY DARK SHADOWS!!. I'm writing this on Dark Shadows 40th anniversary. The show premiered on June 27th 1966, the day before my 8th birthday, and it was the best early birthday present I've ever had. A gift that goes on giving...  Forty years later the love affair continues, with no end in sight. The school bell would ring and I ran home from school that day so long ago as fast as my legs would carry me. Little did I know that I'd be running still nearly five years later when the show had its sad farewell episode. During those five years I sat glued to the tv screen, enraptured by the mesmerizing spell the shows vampires, witches, werewolves and ghosts cast over me, a spell that has never lifted. For a lonely kid with a vivid imagination, this show was manna from Heaven. For all of us children and youths of the sixties who discovered the show during its first run, and for the millions who stumbled upon it during its ten-year re-run on the Sci-Fi channel, no explanation is necessary. For the uninitiated, sit back and prepare for a real treat and get ready to experience addiction. Perhaps even possession...Dark Shadows lives on. I've been to a couple of the conventions and met some of the stars and crew of Dark Shadows as a middle-aged man. I've also collected several of the books on Dark Shadows. This year alone will see Lara (the witch Angelique, my kitty's namesake) Parker's second Dark Shadows novelization, The Salem Branch. Starting in September there will be the beginning of some Dark Shadow audio dramas with original cast members. But these DVDs are the real gold, the beginning of it all. This is the greatest television show ever as far as I'm concerned, flubbed lines and wobbly tombstones and rubber bats included. To all of the marvelous cast and crew, thanks so much for the memories past and future! God bless you all. Forty years later to the day my love affair continues.LONG LIVE DARK SHADOWS!!  I RAN HOME FASTER THAN ANYONE!!      Gary Swaffor
One Hundred Years of Sunshine. This historical epic/family drama from the master of Hungarian cinema, Istvan Szabo (Mephisto, 1981; Being Julia, 2004) is a wonderful and memorable film that has been overlooked, underrated and sadly under-seen.This is a moving and always engrossing drama about one Jewish-Hungarian family that rises and falls throughout the 20th century. Ralph Fiennes is outstanding as the grandfather, the father and the grandson. All three - complex and tragic characters, victims of their times, politics and wars. I think it was a brilliant idea to cast one actor as a face of three generations of one family. If ever anyone attempts to adapt Marquez's "One Hundreds Years of Solitude", that's how it should be done, IMO."Sunshine" is three hours long but never for a minute had I felt it was too long or it was losing its power. It is a serious, thought-provoking film which is also a superb work of art.4.5/5
Marta's Baking Favorites. Is an excellent product. The bakers should do more of this dvd for the persons who doesn't have the naturally kitchen art. Thanks Patrici
awesome anime. this is the best. the graphics are cool, the layout is the bomb, the story line is amazing! i love it! from beginning to end you are on the edge of your seat
Crazy Movie!!. This movie had me rolling in laughter, but there's an important message behind this movie. The production is quite low and the acting will not win any Oscars, but this is one of the best Blaxploitation movies I have ever seen
One of those films that stay with you. This is a dark and realistic film about how Wallenberg wanted to save defenseless men, women and children. I think that the selection of Wallenberg for the job amongst a group of Jewish leaders was rather heart gripping. The leaders referred to his papers saying his diplomas weren't that great and job history wasn't of that kind that would make him a first choice for the job. But, Wallenberg kept on saying; - You don't understand. I HAVE DECIDED THAT I AM GOING TO DO THIS JOB.In Budapest he did what he could to save Jews of all ages. The viewer is also allowed to witness how it becomes increasingly harder to save people.In this film you are made to face the brutal facts of what that happened during World War II. The film stays with you. Still, I normally watch films that I like many times, but with this one I haven't been able to do so.Even so, I cannot forget what I saw.
Hilarious. I first saw this on PBS.  This show is great if you appreciate the type of humor presented
Too deep for Americans. This is a truly great movie that is wasted on American audiences that are accustomed to the shallow themes, a truly beautiful movie for those who are deep and sensitive.  I did not find it slow for it has great depth and almost hypnotic quality.  It held my attention throughout and this is very hard to do.  I got lost in the movie but of course those who like cheap thrills and are shallow could never appreciate it
Jeff Allen at Bananas. You will laugh yourself silly!  I was laughing so hard my kids wanted to know what I was laughing at.  They joined me and now we walk around saying many of his punchlines. Billy Graham says on the back of the DVD "You will be blessed.."  He was right.
Men in War - Cult War Classic and Psycho-Drama. &quot;Men in War&quot; may just be the best pschological study of combat ever made and should be considered a cult classic (and probably is) even if it is a cult of one. Anyone who claims this is a &quot;Standard war film set in Korea&quot; might also claim &quot;The God Father&quot; was a standard gangster movie or &quot;The Wizard of OZ&quot; was a standard children's flick. &quot;Men in War&quot; is a concise, classic study of combat that just happens to be set in the Korean War. Anthony Mann's direction impacts every aspect of humanity  subjected to sustained combat. Amid the horror we see from the all-but-doomed patrol kindness, depravity, valor, self-interest, despair, hope, and, finally, relief without joy. In short we see how desperation exponentializes human emotion. The unusual camera angles give it a Film Noir &quot;look&quot; that highlights the conflicts and tragedies played out by the forlorn platoon. Robert Ryan and Aldo Ray are the perfect dueling co-protagonists who show that our toughest fights are not always with the ones defined as the enemy. The movie is all very real, all real personal, and all very difficult to watch sometimes because of the graphic truths, not the least of which is the insight into the final thoughts of several doomed souls. There is no going back with this film. Once you watch it you are hooked. It would be best for some esteemed critics to actually watch it once before reviewing it
The book. I haven't seen the movie just yet but the book is just excelent, I don't know if the english translation is good or not but the original french version was so deliciously good to read..but I do wonder if the director was able to recreate those wonderful scenes in the book, like when Amelie(who is also the author..it's a semi auto biographic book) imagines throwing herself through the building window, that particular part in the book was amazing because of her description but can it be as beautiful on film
Gable Rules as Ford Looks On. Great to have MOGAMBO on DVD. It looks good. Not your usual John Ford film from my view. Clark Gable is the man and really he seems to have more effect on the look of this film.  Good loves story flows tailored for Gable no doubt. Good one in all.
Great for beginners!  Highly recommended!. This is a great DVD if you're just getting started.  The instructor adds light humor to keep you going thru the yoga practice (without being cheesy).  She also adds alternative stretches for non-flexible people and for people with back problems.  It's also set up so you can just do a few stretches at a time for hectic lifestyles, or you can do all of the stretches at once(about 1/2 hour).  This DVD is fun and DO-ABLE!
Fascinating. Discovered this gem courtesy of a science museum.  We watch this as a family.  Beautiful cinematography!  I get a kick out of the subtitles being used for information on the current birds and their migration.  A great addition to a nature/science video collection
It's About Darn Time!. I am a huge fan of "F Troop" and loved the Complete First Season box set. My dad really loved it. Over the course of a week or two, we went through the entire season, laughing hysterically all the way. Just as we will with this one.This show is an undisputed classic. As well as unappreciated and woefully undershown these days. TV Land has become a sad joke, showing nothing but lousy '80 junk like "Knight Rider", "The A-Team" and "MacGiver". As well as more lousy '70's cheese like "Happy Days", "Diff'rent Strokes" and "Soap". And they're trying to sneak in some '90's crap with "Wings". Hardly classics.But anyway, I'm now all geared up for Season Two of "F Troop". I would say "Bring on all the rest of the seasons", but sadly, this is the final one. One of those two-season gems, along with "The Munsters", which, I guess were just too good for television. We'll never see their like again.And that's sad
A Very Good Suspense Film: Highly Enjoyable!. When I heard friends describing this film, I thought it was going to be terrible. It was not, and in fact it is a very good suspense thriller. I don't believe that "Chain Reaction" is a masterpiece by any stretch of the imagination, however it is an interesting and exciting suspense film nonetheless. Eddie Kasalivich (Keanu Reeves) is a machinist working at a top secret government facility testing a new formula for cheaper and cleaner energy. The bad guys, anyone from Oilmen and others with an interest in seeing this new formula never see's the light of day, conspire to ensure that all traces of its existence disappear. If this new energy reaches the market then oil and its related products will no longer be necessary. With their vital interests at stake, these men will go to any measure to see that this formula is in their hand's alone.However, Eddie stumbles onto the conspiracy [no spoilers] by mistake when he discovers something at the lab he was working at. Going back to pick up a jacket he left, he stumbles onto what the 'bad guys' have been up to. Taking off on his motorcycle, [the entire lab is rigged with explosives] he tries to outrace the detonation about to occur. The explosion takes out quite a bit of the city. Eddie eventually has everyone from the Chicago police, State police, FBI, Justice Department, and of course the 'bad guys after him. Fred Ward gives an outstanding performance as an agent with the Justice Department who believes Eddie did not do it. Also, Paul Shannon (Brian Cox) the bad guy of all bad guys gives a great performance as well. The film is very good, suspenseful, and highly recommended
Sorcerer - feedback. For being an old movie it was entertaining, I saw it years ago when it came out and it is still good, worth seeing
Real Sweetness. Yoji Yamada's "Twilight Samurai" was an extraordinary treat.  Following in similar footsteps, "The Hidden Blade" is again a samurai tale where a lower samurai must weigh matters of principle against what is politically and financially advantageous.  Shown at film festivals in Berlin & Newport Beach, the main character is Munezo Katagiri whose sister marries out of the household.  Masatoshi Magase who played so romantically as the second love interest in "The Sea Is Watching" does the title role.  He's very sensitive and honest, but a bit out of touch with his own emotional needs.  Takako Matsu who has only made 3 films including 2006's "Suite Dreams" plays the housekeeper Kie.  She works hard and lovingly takes care of Katagiri's house.  Matsu's beautiful good looks and expressive face make her a charmer.  Caste issues divide her from the samurai.  When Kie marries, her new family abuses and fails to appreciate her.  This results in her illness and rescue by Katagiri who barges into the household and rescues Kie from her own husband!  Kie is nursed back to health.  Meanwhile Yaichiro Hazama is from the same samurai clan and has gone to the big city of Edo where he gets caught in a plot to overthrow the Emperor.  He's brought back home in a basket and imprisoned, rather than being given the dignity of hari kiri.  The authorities come to Katagiri and give him the charge of dueling with Hazama, who breaks out of prison and holes up in a rural hut.  The lovely Reiko Takashima plays Hazama's wife and comes to barter with the only commodity she has, her body, to try and save her husband's life.  She goes to the Chief in charge (forgot his title) and makes a similar deal when Katagiri refuses her.  Unfortunately, the unscrupulous Chief has no intention of freeing Hazama and fails to inform Katagiri as he has promised Mrs. Hazama he would do.  Min Tanaka who played in "Twilight Samurai" is the retired martial arts instructor Toda who gave Katagiri knowledge of a special move called the Devil's Claw.  Now living in a pastoral setting, he gives Katagiri a few last tips.  The duel takes place with Katagiri surviving.  The Chief suffers justice at Katagiri's hands with the lightning fast Devil's Claw dispatching him to the next world.  Deciding to follow Toda's example, Katagiri renounces his pledge as samurai and sweetly approaches Kie who has not remarried and no longer has a caste restriction separating her from the man she obviously loves.  There is a real sweetness and innocence in the story of "Hidden Blade" that shows a moral compass.  The performances, direction and cinematography are first-rate.  Bravo!
An unusual sci-fi allegory. This film is best interpreted in a symbolic and allegorical way.  The plot is too implausible and riddled with inconsistencies to be taken literally.  Instead, what Logan's Run offers is a bizarre vision of the cult of eternal youth evolving into a police state.  Some of the scenes are riveting, such as the early depiction of sanitized mass murder carried out in a spectacular ceremony.  There are clear references to a commercial culture that glorifies youth and lives in denial about death.  The world depicted here is at once hedonistic and claustrophobic.  The environment is a kind of shallow, Disneyesque paradise from which there is no hope of escape.  The implicit subtext of the movie, that hedonism is a kind of deathtrap, is well taken.
Fun. I was looking for an activity that would help keep me motivated or want to do again, this really is fun. I do motify it for myself because of my knees (it's not low impact) I am use to doing this however and didn't think that it was a problem the whole work out you are learning a dance and the two women who lead the video really have so much energy I want to be like them. I might feel silly if I did this in front of an audience of adults but my 8-10 year olds really think it is fun and help keep me motivated to do it. If you don't put a lot it to the work out you you wont get much out it really depends on your intensity, the main thing is that it is fun to watch and do.
Hello, Cowboy!!!. "Hello World", well stated from the cowboy!!This film is awesome entertainment!!  It's right to the point. For me, half the movies these days are just a recycled product over and over again.  Even though this is a documentary, it's different!  It's something I never seen before, things that did not interest me in this movie, interested my friend.  It is a very well balanced film.  I also liked the way this film ended.
"History written with lightning". President Woodrow Wilson made the statement I used for the heading of my review when discussing "The Birth of A Nation." Whether you like or detest the film's core message, I think Wilson got it just right.I've seen scathing reviews calling the film "racist." If it is so, is that because the demeaning of the blacks and the glorification of the Ku Klux Klan are a falsification of what really happened -- or because they are all too painfully true?I've read that the director, the auteur behind the film, D.W. Griffith, did extensive historical research in preparation for it -- but then used only the research which dovetailed nicely with his own preconceived notions. Oh? Imagine the director of a historical film doing that! Did anyone say "Sergei Eisenstein," or "Oliver Stone"?The three-ring circus atmosphere of the state legislature as run by blacks, and as depicted by Griffith, has been attacked as defamatory and historically inaccurate. Do we really know, at this late date, that it didn't happen precisely that way?A movie that draws raves, and also curses, is probably a landmark movie. "The Birth of A Nation" fits that description exactly.
hit or miss season. season 8 is the first season without Larry David and clearly you can see the show lost a lot of its quality and even exited the shows normal traditon of slow paced small talk comedy. The show became unrealalistic with birthday wishes coming true and others. But with all that went wrong with the classic show it still was one of funniest shows on tv and had its share of classic episodes including yada yada yada,and the comeback. while the quality fell a little bit the show was still nominated for outstanding comedy series at the emmys and also picked up yet another Best Supporting Actor in a comedy series emmy for Micheal Richards. and It still stands as the one of the greatest and most popular tv shows ever made. ****1/2 star
Suspenseful Masterpiece by "The Italian Hitchcock"!!. What would we do without the internet? Ok maybe what would I do without it. With "Unsane" (the heavily edited version of "Tenebre) and "Suspiria" being the only Argento films I was able to see for many years I was always disappointed I couldn't find his other works. Especially this one as, I'd heard it to be his "masterpiece". Luckily now, I was able to see what everyone was talking about.Deep Red is a visually stunning film as are all of his works. Arguably the best Argento film, shot in glorious widescreen with some incredible screen compositions . Very effective scares throughout featuring great murder scenes typical to the director.  Dario Argento's rare visions and a creepy score by "Goblin" make for a truly chilling, moviegoer experience. I guess people condsider it to be Argento's masterpiece because the plot seems to come together with more fluidity than his other works. All and all it is a great work of art and a definite classic.The only flaw that I saw, and luckily I rented this first, is not with the movie but with the DVD itself. Maybe it was my version but there were parts that switch back and forth from English dubbing to Italian with English subtitles. I hear that's the way Anchor Bay transferred onto the DVD. I read a review that said if you can stand subtitles to watch the whole movie in Italian as the voices dubbed over don't catch the mood of the actors. I will rent it again and do exactly that. Then, most likely, will add it to my collection. No Argento fan will be disappointed with this phenomenal giallo masterpiece
John Fisher's wisdom in different situations. It's a great resource, covering selecting a breed of dog, tips related to training, and information related to dog behavior.  It shows footage of dogs in different situations and a little of John Fisher but the narrator often talked over him.  The final chapter, chapter 8, was an interesting recital of a personal experience John Fisher had with a challenging dog and how he handled it.  This DVD is an overview and not heavily focused on oral commands
A Paul Newman classic. One of the most realistic preformances of Paul Newman's legendary career.  As Hud, Newman is sincere, sensual, and raw.  He lives on a cattle ranch with his father, teenage nephew, and fairly attractive middle-aged housekeeper.  Hud is about to face his most difficult challenge yet. His father has to make a life-altering decision about the future of the ranch, which sets the stage for one of the most powerful preformances of Paul Newman's career.  Whether he's at odds with his father, tends to his nephew, or gradually becomes infatuated with the housekeeper, Hud is passionate, and unrelenting.
EXCELLENT!. A truly outstanding movie, In the Name of the Father, brings to the screen the true story of a young Irishman who was wrongfully detained by the British forces in Northern Ireland in connection with an IRA bombing.It is a film about human relations, hope and second chances, but most importantly about trust, love, and inner strength.Daniel Day-Lewis, Pete Postlethwaite, Emma Thompson, and the rest of the cast, have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are exceptional to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)! Very well written and very well presented, the movie is without a doubt guaranteed to provide more than just a few tears.  The film is simple enough, but does a great job of describing the complexity of Northern Ireland.The setting, the plot, the dialogues and the music are all wonderful!In short, In the Name of the Father is a movie definitely worth watching and one to seriously consider adding to your movie collection!
Not "Complete" History. Overall, this DVD set is pretty good!  The only reason it's not 5 stars is that they completely gloss over the Infante years.  Sure, they weren't great years by any stretch of the imagination, but in order for it to be a "complete" history it should have been covered
Best in its Class... I cannot praise this series enough.  Remarkably complete and ultimately absorbing, this series does for WWI what "World At War" (1973) did for WWII.  Every installment is a fascinating, up-close and comprehensive examination of the often complex elements and participants fighting in the world's first truly "modern war."Special attention is paid to specific details that most other series leave out; for example, the role of the Ottoman Turks, the significant naval battles between Germany and Great Britain, the battles in the Middle East, and the contributions of the British Commonwealth soldiers from across the Empire. It makes the old CBS series narrated by Robert Ryan a mere footnote and PBS's politically-correct "The Great War" resemble something of a mere amateur documentary filmmaker. Much of the unseen footage secured by Channel 4 in making the documentary was recently discovered from archives in Central and Eastern Europe.  The series also takes a close-up look of the weaponry and the letters/diary entries of soldiers from both sides.Can a excellent documentary compel you to read more on the subject?  Well, this one certainly can.  This series makes WWI a most fascinating subject worthy of further study and analysis. Too often, what has been mistakenly taught in school is that WWI was merely a "dress rehersal" for the rise of fascism and WWII.  This series proves otherwise and we need more first-class documentary series like this. Kudos to Johnathan Lewis and Channel 4 for putting together such a superb series. I liked the series so much, I purchased the Hew Strachan book the series is based on!  A real gem...
"It's good to be the king". This isn't one of Mel Brooks best movies but it is a classic. There are many hilarious songs and cheesy jokes.  I would recommend this movie to any die hard Mel Brooks fan
A jolly good show. Moving, intelligent, realistic, not overly acted (as could quite easily have been the case).About a 20 year old who has gone off the rails to come back onto them again...you see why this has happened, feel sympathy, and just want him to do well when the film ends.A story about hope, in a world with little..
great check it out. ok this movie starts out very strong and just keeps giving, when i got this movie i had no idea what it was about just new there was five girls and some lesbian kissing thats was good enough for me. ya ya i know.After the first 10mins i was really into the movie and wasn't worried about seeing the girls do anything but servive.For a low budget movie this is one of the best i've seen the writing was very reality based text, thing most people would say in the given situations,acting was great for actors I haven't heard that much about almost the lines and emotions were believeable.good story - witch craftwell directed and editedall of it was Very well done.plus its canadian 2 thumbs up for canada.this dvd is a must buy and well worth it.enjoy the movie.
Shaking the Crime Stick!. I had been aware that once there was a show called "Mr. Show", starring Bob and David, and that it had been on HBO. But I had never been compelled to buy any of their DVDs until this weekend, when the power of Satan...um, compelled me to pick up the first two seasons. All I gotta say is: Praise Satan for leading me to this glory!The first season, comprised of four episodes, is fantastic, with flashes of brilliance on "The Gay Porno Video", but it's the second season that really will make you a fan. Such oddities as F.F. Woodycooks, Only The British Can Fly, Child-Labor Comedy Writers, the Iguana, and Jeepers Creepers: Semi-Star unleash the funny like you'd never believe.Mr. Show proves that there is a market for intelligent, hilarious sketch comedy...on cable, or in the case of KITH and Monty Python, imported from other countries. But Mr. Show is homegrown, it's comedy at a breakneck speed, and there's never a dull moment in either season. You'll laugh, you'll cry, you'll learn how to fight crime with a "crime stick" and ice cream, and enjoy tofu-based products while your business goes to hell...led by a red balloon."The security guard and I shared something in common...Me!
Grand Historical Epic. Lord Mountbatten: The Last Viceroy, is a history of the final tumultuous weeks of the British Raj.  In the post World War II period maintaining control of India was no longer practical for Britain, and the Labour Government agreed to negotiate independence for the subcontinent, which was seething with discontent and religious and ethnic strife.Lord Louis Mountbatten, great-grandson of Queen Victoria and second cousin of King George VI, was chosen as the last Viceroy.  Lord Louis and his wife Edwina Ashley had been glittering members of London Society since the 1920s.  During World War II they both revealed hitherto unsuspected depth, Lord Louis as one of the principal Allied naval leaders in the war against Japan, and Edwina in dealing with the catastrophic health and relief efforts caused by the conflict.This 6 part series is a good depiction of the  enormous problems India faced in 1946-1948 and of the Mountbattens' attempt to deal with them. The rioting and massacre scenes are intense, leaving little to the imagination.  Mahatma Gandhi is well acted, but Nehru and Jinnah tend  to come off less well, primarily because the series focuses so much on Mountbatten and his British assistants.  Edwina, admirably played by Janet Suzman, is really the heroine of the series as she attempts to alleviate the sufferings of the millions of Hindus and Muslims.  Her relationship with Nehru, which has been the subject of intense speculation and gossip over the years, is left up in the air, and different viewers will come to different conclusions as to how physical it became.This series does a good job explaining the decolonization process from a Eurocentric point of view.  Just be aware that Nehru and Jinnah would seem far more active and positive protagonists were six part series filmed depicting their roles in the ending of the Raj.
Great edition of this classic. They really did a good job with the video on this. So much clearer and better looking then my old vcrtape. Bonus extras are nice too
sex sex sex not for kids. This movie has a SEX sceane in it that is not kid friendly.
Great stuff!!. Very easy to learn. Simple techniques. People who have no dancing background can easily pick up dancing routine. Recommended to anyone who wants to learn from scratch
A BRILLIANT CINEMATIC MASTERPIECE. When I first heard about this film I really wasn't interested. I thought the film was about an underground fight club. But it was more than that. This film is without a doubt one of the most stylistic and smart films I have seen, and is definetly Edward Norton's best film. Norton, who narrates the film has a dead-end job and an unfulfilling life. As he see's it, his life is one of a drab-consumer-oriented-yuppy trying to keep up with the american dream: such as acquiring as many material possessions as possible through his unrelenting purchase of consumer goods. This will make him happy right? Wrong, it only makes him despise himself and others like him all the more. There is an anti-consumerism message being played out here in Norton's pysche. And thus, an insomniac is born.Enter Norton's alter-ego Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt) who gives an equally impressive acting performace. I must admit, the film took me totally by surprise. As for the violence in the film, it is only a means to an end in telling the story. The fight club itself is not the main idea behind the film, only a vehicle for advancing the film. It's the mental breakdown of Norton, and his split personalities that I found totally original in the film, and how this is brought to a conclusion that floored me. The ending of the film is one of the best I have ever seen--and especially with the music of the Pixies blaring away as the building's are collapsing. A great film, and highly recommended. [STARS: 5+
What a wake up call this documentary shouts!!!. What a wake up call this documentary shouts!!!Professional scientists around the world all agree that what Al Gore presents in this film is a very conservative generalization of what's in store for us... most all scientist actually believe things will be even worse!!!Though I was aware of most all of the data presented, I didn't realize just how perplex and intertwined the issues just are (i.e. How most all of the suns rays are reflected back into space when we have ice caps & how most of all the suns rays get absorbed by the water; soon the artic will be open seas during the summers).Only thing that bothered me was that completely crappie, not enjoyable cartoon.  Anywhoo... I'm definitely going to show this to friends and family.I leave by pointing to the facts that have been known now for at least a decade... unfortunately we still have people in this country who still believe the world is flat!!
Steal This Review. Abbi Hoffman,Not a figure us brits are aware of, and although this film has had its share of critisism, as a fan of D'Onofrio, it's a must for any Vinny Gals archive.Well acted, great music and good story, this film may not fully explain Hoffman's exploits or his fanatisism to the cause. But its an intelligent and well thought out film.Jeanne Garulfo should do more of this kind of film. She shouldn't have to play second fiddle to people like Urma Thurman. Very whitty and as Abbi nicknames her "Bright Eyes".Also worth buying just for the commentary.. informative and very funny. Garulfo is a delight!Don't steal this movie.... buy it
The Video Collection - Brad Paisley. This collection of the best of the Brad Paisley video's is a real joy to watch and listen to.  Presented in a good sequence and fun to watch for the entire family. Any fan that enjoys Brad Paisley's singing will want a copy of this DVD
Very good take on the werewolf story, albeit one that goes abit too long. 1981 was a great year for werewolf movies. There was the excellent An American Werewold in London by John Landis and Joe Dante's equally creepy The Howling. To finish off the trifecta of werewolf films for the year there's Michael Wadleigh's Wolfen. Wadleigh's film was a very good werewolf tale that added abit of Native American folklore to the typical lycanthrope story, but it's slightly overlong running time keeps it from being as great as Landis' and Dante' contributions.Wolfen takes place in the city of New York and its growing urban jungle of decaying and condemned buildings in the city's ghettoes. One has to remember that the late 70's and through on the mid-80's the inner-cities of most of the major metropolitan ctieis in the US have turned into rundown ghettoes rife with drug problems, high-crime rates and unemployment. It is in this setting that Wolfen takes place in. The film used the screenplay co-written by horror veteran novelist Whitley Strieber and Strieber's quirky style heavily influences this werewolf story. Strieber's screenplay mixes together a police procedural, political intrigue, business corruption, race and class relations, Native American lycanthrope folklore and horror. Wolfen tries to combine all these different elements together as well as possible and it mostly succeeds, but there's times when the film gets dragged down abit trying to accomplish this.The cast is made up of mostly new actors (well young and new at that time) with a few veteran actors holding things together. Albert Finney gets the choice role of NYPD Detective Dewey Wilson who begins investigating a series of brutal murders of three individuals whose race, class and personal status brings no discernable clues that ties them together. Joining him in his investigation --- which Wilson gradually suspects has some sort of supernatural angle to it --- were the very young Diane Venora  and Gregory Hines. Edward James Olmos plays a Native American whose knowledge of ties to who or what was involved in the killings might be closer than everyone thinks. The performances from all involved were pretty good though Hines comic relief performance was abit too blackface in its tone and execution. 1981 Hollywood was still not ready to discount such racial stereotypes and it gives Wolfen a certain sense of creepiness and insensitivity. Maybe the screenplay was written just that way to highlight one of the film's themes of racial and class inequality. If it was then Strieber sure did an excellent job of hammering home the point.The film has very creepy moments whenever the story switches over to be told through the viewpoint of the wolfen. The skewed perspective the camera takes on to signify that we were seeing things through the eyes of the wolfen was disorienting and creepily well-done. Wolfen never really has pure horror moments in the film though in the hands of a director like Carpenter, Hooper, Craven or Cunningham. Wadleigh does a good enough job, but it seemed like he was treating the horror aspect of the story with less attention than it was its due.Wolfen marks the weakest of the werewolf trilogy of 1981, but thats not to say that it was a bad film. The finished product was a well-done film and its attempt to be very ambitious in its storytelling has to be commended. The fact that the filmmakers and all involved were able to keep all the different themes and genres together without having the film spiral into utter confusion makes it a worthwhile werewolf film
louis malle's masterpiece. emotionally shattering true-life tale (well, sorta) based on an incident in director louis malles youth wherein the school in which he (played by the very beautiful gaspard vanesse who sadly did not continue acting) was enrolled served as a haven for jewish students hiding out from the nazis. what could have been merely a suspense tale or a coming of age movie (and it IS both, and splendid examples of each) instead resonates as a meditation on survival, betrayal, and accomodating and forgiving oneself. a great film, but only for mature audiences.
Satisfied Fan. I enjoyed the LaFemme Nikita series so much on television and really hoped they would bring it back or not cancel it.  So, purchasing the series by DVD just had to be done.  The series is as great as expected and can be watched over and over.  Included are the Special Features with a 'gag reel' which is an added bonus
BUT WHAT ABOUT U.S.?. In the first installment, when the proposed party conference theme of "FINDING THE RIGHT WAY" turns up as simply "THE RIGHT WAY" at the actual event, the lines have been brightly drawn for the viewer. The preceding and following interactions between the needs of governing, personal ambition, money, corporate influence and a tainted media all join in a hilarious and terrifying Danse Macabre. Presented with such dark and furious glee, the story lines, subplots, acting, casting and surgically-lit observations of character combine for moments of the blackest comedy and the most tragic drama. It's easy to understand why such a view of the political system would never have a U.S. equivalent: it comes way too close to the truth of things for Joe n' Jolene Voter.That's because the greed, divisive partisanship, set-in-stone ideology and hubris on display here is only barely fiction. From "nothing like starting your own little war to see a lift in the polls" to defining freedom in business terms, manipulating the press from both ends and shutting off assistance to the poor and needy, good ol' Francis Urquhart -- affectionately known as F.U. -- may seem strangely strange, yet oddly familiar.While it's imperative to pay attention to the day-to-day details of our own government's action and inaction, nothing is as effective in communicating the dismal and all too human antics of politicians as wrapping up all the specifics with a keenly observed, nuanced and entertaining summary of what makes these folks tick. Which is to say cap "P" power or, as F.U. puts it, "The getting of it, and the holding on...."Regardless of the age, era or epoch, "House of Cards" nails it. Coming as it does on the heels of Reagan's America and Thatcher's Great Britain, the "House of Cards" trilogy is even more appropriate to the long, hard and fruitless slog we now share under George the Second. Power indeed
And the Band Played On. I received this product on time and in perfect shape. I enjoy the high quality of Amazon's site
Original version?. Hey, does anyone know how I can get the original version of this movie? That starts out with a long view of the sub barracks, gives a glimpse of Baldwin meeting Connery at an embassy party in DC, builds up the radiation badge issue, and so on.  I must have seen this movie before they trimmed it down for broad issue.  "Directors cut" does not appear to have this.  Any ideas?As we all know, it's a great movie no matter what edition we view
I love it. What a relief. Somebody intelligent on film. No explosions, no car chases. And I was spellbound from start to finish, and laughed so hard I thought my bad eye would pop out. Highly recommended as an antidote to Pokemon and  South Park
One of the best videos I've bought. My daughter who is 17 months and her friend who is two yrs. love this video.  My daughter tries to dance along with the kids, and she loves the songs.  I only wish I had it on dvd
Bound ( A movie you bound to have ). If  Drama, suspence, a little humour and an impressive story line is your thing, then you are BOUND to like this movie.  Two  ladies ( sort of ) swindles the mob over two million dollars...drama unfolds from the begining throughout the movie keeping you at the edge of your seat.P.S warning there is a little lesbian scene that deterred my mom from watching the whole movie ( however this was early in the film )
The War in Romania, Greece, and Egypt. "Fortunes of War" is the dramatization of six Olivia Manning novels: The Balkan Trilogy and The Levant Trilogy.  The seven parts of the mini-series (6 plus hours in all of viewing) follow the fortunes of a young British Council English teacher, Guy Pringle, and his new wife, Harriet, through World War II.  The couple is living in Romania at the beginning of the war and flees to Greece and then Egypt to escape the Nazis.This is not a tale of fighting men on the front lines, but rather a domestic drama about civilians bearing up through the momentous events of war and the loss of friends and homes.  The miniseries takes its time; you may find parts one and two slow moving, but part three and four are edge-of-the-seat tense. Throughout are atmospheric touches and scenic photography -- not least of which are the wonderful eyes of Emma Thompson (Harriet). The series is readily believable: no hyperbole here, phony heroism, or false notes. The novels were auto-biographical and one can believe in the reality of the series.In the books Guy Pringle is an exasperating, generous, ebullient, near-sighted, Soviet-loving fool of a man. Kenneth Branagh's rendering of him is too restrained. Emma Thompson, however, is superb as his sensible lonely wife who finds marriage exhilarating at times but more often frustrating.  The greatest character of the series is the drunken spendthrift Prince Yakimov, wonderfully played by Ronald Pickup.  He's a Micawberish-character worthy of Dickens.It's a good series, not quite great because of the so-so portrayal of Guy Pringle by Branagh, but well worth viewing for a unique look at World War II.Smallchief
but...not for beginers. I know a bit of martial arts and have been doing yoga for awhile so this workout was perfect for me.  Not too long, not too short.  I was quite the sweaty mess when it was done.  But if you're a real beginer, with no yoga or karate training, this probably isn't for you.  Namaste
An original, classic and must-see for any horror fan!. I can't believe it took me so long before I was ever introduced to this film.  This is truly a classic and one of my all time favorite horror movies.  As soon as my friend lended it to me & I viewed it, I was afraid to go down the basement!  I ordered my copy the next day.  Remember, this film was made for drive-ins years ago when video tape didn't exist so it must be appreciated as an early work of art that is timeless and horrific
must love dogs, lovely movie...i love john cusack  & diane lane... once again, i can relate, being in my 30`s and loving my pets, relationships are not that easy this day and age.but this was a sweet movie.john cusack & diane lane made a good on screen couple.its so difficult to know who is the one for anyone.just when you think, you found your true love and soul mate,sometimes they are not the one afterall.then, we are left with a broken heart, thats life.that is why, sometimes, it comforting to have these types of movies to be there for us.movies like this that make you smile, make you laugh and sometimes, make you reflect...i loved the ending of this movie!but thats just my personal opinion..
All the charm and wit of a stage production. Noises off! is a delightfully comedy of errors look at what goes into a stage production and what goes on backstage. Michael Caine is the director of a play that is just days away from showing. While rehearsing with the cast of hilarious cast members: Christopher Reeves, John Ritter, Carol Bernett, and that curly-haired guy from that hit tv show PERFECT STRANGERS.What I liked about this movie is that they got the attitude just right. It really does feel rushed and confusing when you are in a stage production and the shananagians backstage are just as funny, if not a little funnier, than the antics going on onstage.People flubbing lines, missed cues, missing props, re-appearing props, character conflicts, hidden romances and more! This is a classic comedy that doesn't stop with the laughs until the very end.You'll love it
Very Good. I am a personal trainer and tried this DVD.  I was surprised to hear the comments about the workout exercises hurting peoples back, in all my years of training, its probably more a case of improper alignment and sloppy form on the users part.Pilates is all about the core (abdominals)and over time like any workout just about anybody will improve.  Overall I think this DVD is good for its variety and multiple workouts.  As a personal trainer I would recommend it to anyone.
RIP Clifford Antone: One Of Blue's Biggest Supporters. This DVD came out in 2004 in Australia. I have been looking for its US release for 18 months. Unfortunately, Clifford Antone died earlier this year so this DVD has been posthumously released. This documentary is extraordinary. It has RARE footage of Eddie Taylor (Hey, probably the only footage of Jimmy Reed's axe man and Freddie King's mentor) it is wonderful! Also the glimpse of Jimmy Rodger's playing and jamming with Jimmy Vaughan. That is worth the whole price of the thing.Plus, it has B.B. King recognising Clifford's support of the blues, plus more RARE footage of Pinetop Perkins and the great Sunnyland Slim. Albert King and Albert Collins are both discussed and we see Albert Collins playing in the club with the house band. Also we see a young, pre-famous SRV playing in the club BEFORE he was with Lou Ann Barton's band (and even playing a Telecaster for a second!).As a guitarist I have always been a big fan of the Texas Blues Guitar and in this DVD you will get the whole lowdown on the scene since the 1970s. Warning: the film is rough, lots of incomplete snips of performances, a bit amateur on the filming and editing, BUT the stuff is so rare and the fact that you also see the only available footage of so many greats, like Luther Tucker (he was lost to the scene for over 10 years) totally makes the investment worth it.You will enjoy this film if you love Blues or even music in general. It has great still pictures of the greats of Blues from Clifford's collection, good interviews with Antone, Kim Wilson, BB King, Jimmy Vaughan (The T-Birds were the house band at Antone's), Lou Ann Barton, Angela Strehli, Marcia Ball, Willie "Big Eyes" Smith (Muddy Water's Band), Billy Gibbons and many more. The whole section on Hubert Sumlin (Howlin' Wolf's guitarist) is also very touching. Clifford took Hubert in after Wolf died and had no more gigs-he even got him glasses to see what he was doing again! Get this DVD today
the parallax view is a great paranoid thriller from the watergate era. when this movie came out the watergate scandle was in full bloom and no one trusted the goverment anymore, i mean the president was make up the rules as he went along and that was one reason that all the thrillers of that time are so paranoid.in this film beatty plays a reporter(at the time almost all the heros were reporters because we though that they were the only people we could trust) who along with other reporters sees a senator assassinated and soon notices that all the people who saw it are dieing in "accidents". now in fera of his life beatty must find out what is going on and what the parallax corp. has to do with this and other deaths and assassinatens.once he starts to look into in we quickly see that our man is in way over his head and is now a prime target himself and it looks like he's being framed for something. this is really a great movie and the ending is part of that great 70's beleaf that the little man stood no chance aganist the "big boy" of wealth and power. if you like some meat in your thrillers this one is for you!
Perfect Love Story. Love story meets dark comedy.  Cameron Diaz said it best in "There's Something About Mary" - Harold and Maude is the greatest love story of all time.  The story is great, the humor priceless, and the soundtrack is fabulous
Funny As Usual. What can I say Matt and Trey will forever hold a spot at the top of the comedic foodchain. This is a deff a must have for any fan of there work. Excellent for any collectionist. Do buy this
Kind of a sad movie but worthwhile and absorbing. This Canadian film (set in British Columbia) tells the story of a young working class woman who learns she has a fast-growing, untreatable cancer and will be dead within months.  Oddly enough, she decides not to tell ANYONE (how can she stand it?) and instead makes a list of things she wants to do before she dies.  Much of the film involves an affair she has (with a character played by Mark Ruffalo) -- she had her first child at 17, and her husband has been her first and only, so she wants to broaden her experience of life before she dies.  I think the way she handles this news of her impending death is odd and probably unfair to the people she loves (she doesn't see it that way), and I think  someone who did that in real life would leave a lot of angry people behind, who never had a chance to say the things they wanted to say.  But this is a film, after all, and it's credible that someone would do this.  She is, after all, very young and  the very young don't always make great choices.  If you watch this film with others, I think you'll find lots to talk about.  Don't watch it if you're already feeling depressed, because it's a sad movie in many ways.
Quite possibly the greatest film Spike Lee has ever made. Arguably Spike Lee's greatest film, Malcolm X falls into that realm that many biopic's strive for yet don't achieve, it's so good it causes itself to be imprinted on your mind whenever you read about the REAL events. For years after, when you hear of an event from Malcolm X's life, the visuals of the film will be entertwined with the real visuals you may see....Denzel Washington's voice will be the voice you hear in your head when you read Malcolm's words....Yes. It's that good.Denzel Washington turns in an amazing performance which was completely deserving of his Oscar nomination that year (if not the win he didn't receive). Washington's rendition of Malcolm believably shows the emotion and the transformation he undergoes throughout his life, from petty thug in his early years, to polarizing civil rights leader, to his later days as a more MLK-esque supporter of peace.Although a bit long at 201 minutes, this movie rarely feels it, since so much of Malcolm's life is shown over the span of the film, the length seems necessary for the amount of information it contains.
Good jobs by the entire cast... High-level surgeon William Hurt comes down with cancer, and is forced to evaluate modern-day health care from the viewpoint of a patient. He finds that even with his wealth and education, the world of oncology is scary and confusing and at times, degrading. Does it make him a better doctor, to have been on the patient's side of the room for months? Take a look at this well-done movie and you'll get an answer.
A must see for Americans with a conscience. Those who are apprehensive about my 4-star evaluation, do not be afraid. You'll see more on that in a bit. This film is among the most important today... Indeed, I've already invited activists to my home to see it!There are different perspectives on the Iraq "war." The WMDs that didn't exist; the distorted information which Condy Rice and other second rate flacks are trying to rationalize. There's even the fact that Saddam Hussein was, alas, a brutal, self-serving dictator. But there's also a dimension of which we think little because the "liberal media" haven't brought it up enough, i.e., the privatization of this conflict and who's making the money off of it.We traditionally assume that the military does its own food preparation (the proverbial mess seargant and KP) and laundry, right? Not any more. Now we contract out those services. And the company doing our troops' laundry charges $100 a load. Even more--if there can be more--is that it's poorly done! One troop does his own laundry in the sink as the expensively laundered fatigues come back dirty!Then there's the security and torture issue. Blackwater USA provides largely former military people to provide security to, for example, Bremer, who, despite his complete lack of knowlege of Arabic or Iraq, was assigned as head honcho there. And many of its employees have been responsible for Abu Ghraib-type atrocities. However, if one is in the military, he or she is punished for such actions. If you're part of the "private sector," you're sent back to the states, and can return to Iraq a week later with another company.I'm familiar with some of those who spoke in the film as I attended a Senate hearing with them. Many witnessed the deaths of their comrades because KBR, a Halliburton subsidiary, apparently treated their driving into an ambush as a triviality. Then there's the Blackwater employees who were killed also.Robert does a wonderful job of noting that the victims and their families are human, they have personalities, and there are consequences to their deaths. That, indeed, is one of the strongest traits of this film. And others testifying in the film are teary eyed over how their companies have been fleecing the American tax payer.Oh, then there's the Halliburton contract for millions of dollars to purify water. I don't want to give anything away (except that the water isn't purified!) In short, the troops whom we purport to "support" with our yellow ribbons are bathing in, brushing their teeth with, even making coffee with water the catalog of bacteria in which is mind boggling.Robert slips in clips of the salaries of the CEOs of these companies. Suffice it to say, it's much more than I'll see in my entire professional life!Another important dimension of the film is exposed in the end credits. Robert tries to avoid corporate sponsorship of such a project. I suppose he can be far more candid--and honest--without that business representation. So he gets donors to contribute to the project thereby avoiding that potential conflict of interest. The many, many names of those donors are among the end credits. And over these credits, he shows himself and his staff trying to contact key personnel from the companies on which he's commenting, then summarizes how many times he tried to get their side of the story with no--not one--positive response!Now, why four stars? It's not so much the film's fault. I only wish Robert could have covered MORE. Robert recommended to me the book "Blood  Money" (available here on Amazon.com) which exposes even more companies and what the alleged conservatives are making off this conflict.Yes, it's important for ALL Americans, but EXPECIALLY those of you who call yourselves conservative. We're all being taken for a ride, and your tax dollars are being spent to enrich those of negative merit.See it. See it!
Best concert on Video?Probably so... After dismantling the mammoth stage productions of ZooTV and Popmart in the nineties, U2 returned with the old fashioned approach to the live concert setting.Stripping away all the excess lighting and props(remember the lemon?)and not doing what other veteran bands have gotten into the habit of doing,like filling the stage with background singers and musicians.U2 did not want to to have any distractions on stage and therefore did away with it all leaving just them and their audience and very minor backing tracks.The band look and sound excellent,joking with the audience and having an all around good time,Bono even invites his young daughter onstage with him while they play"Mysterious Ways","Until the end of the World"the song about Judas Iscariot's betrayal of Christ comes to life and out does the studio version by far.This is U2's best concert dvd to date,every music lover should have this disc in your collection.You won't regret it...Enjoy!This is probably one of the greatest concert's captured on video
DESTINED TO BECOME A CLASSIC. Some reviewers have said this is an "anti-war" movie. That may be optimistic. Maybe it is a movie about the misery of being a submariner on a suicide mission near the end of a war they know has been lost. But I think director Wolfgang Petersen tried and succeeded in presenting an honest portrayal of the once proud German "wolf pack" U-boat hunters of the sea who would sink anything afloat for the Fatherland.Exhausted and demoralized men, the film opens with their drunken cabaret party in occupied France just before they ship out on yet another mission. The tough, thoughtful captain played by Jrgen Prochnow is becoming contemplative. He loves his men, and he seems certain each mission will be their last. Yet he is the strictly by the book warrior who will follow his orders to the end.What carries the film is the conflict between military commeraderie and purpose, combined with certain failure and danger, and imminent death under the sea. Yes there is an undercurrent throughout DAS BOOT of repressed contempt by the U-boat captain for the Nazis, their discredited ideology and even Hitler and his henchmen. But one cannot help wondering whether this is part of loyalty to the truth of the actual U-boat officers' attutudes to the politicians in Berlin in 1945 ... or a contemporary impulse to be politically correct in Germany of the late 20th Century.The combination of superb acting and unbelievably skillful camera work aboard an actual submarine made this among the 20th Century's most outstanding war films from any country. Also it froze in time a group of mostly young and bewildered submariners who had to function highly efficiently while at the same time, nearly constantly paralyzed by fear.There is some glory and very much sadness and tragedy in DAS BOOT. Mainly, the film exhibits the terrifying absurdity of life on a German U-boat at the end of the Third Reich, lived by gallant but doomed young men ... and that of their leaders who while not much older than their subordinates have been made ancient by their ordeals in warfare. This film is intense and continually absorbing. No one can be indifferent while viewing DAS BOOT. A real spellbinder.
Basic but Challenging. The title of this videos is Basic Caminadas, but the steps and figures being taught here are quite challenging. Argentine Tango can be very complex, and this &quot;basic&quot; video gives a preview of things to come in future, more advanced volumes. The material presented requires the man to think ahead of his steps and maintain his lead throughout the dance. Without mastering the first volume of this series, &quot;basic caminadas&quot; may not be easy for some novice tango dancers, but it surely is fun to do. Can't wait for the next volume from Tango Dynamics and Fabian Salas
irish lore. my son and i loved this movie. it is full of irish lore. it is well crafted and such a different type of story.  we both loved the accents
White Hot Stripes. I being fairly new to the White Stripes scene, saw them play for the first time on  one of the awards shows which I believe was the MTV music awards 2004. I became interested and intrigued by the two person raw energy rock blast. I found this DVD to be an untamed electric charge of raw  pure white hot plasma, just like the duo who is the White Stripes. For two people they sure make a lot of music. Completely ingrossing and utterly enjoyable. I could not take my eyes off the screen. The only thing I did not like was the fuzzy style camera filter{which personally I do not enjoy}, I would think that having a clear and many angled focus, would have been much better. I'm not saying this fuzzy filter did  not fit the Stripes style, but as a director its a move I would not have made. Minus one star for the cam work.Great music, great show. I like the White Hot Stripes.
Finally! I've been waiting years for this DVD to be released. Oh my. I love this movie. It even makes me cry. It's sexy, cute, and heartwarming. Yes, it's a little bit hokey but what musical isn't? I am so excited to get this! I love this movie. I'm a huge musical fan and I've been waiting years for this one. They must have finally convinced whomever had the rights to release it on DVD. I don't know but I'm really excited! One Hundred Million Miracles! I love that philosophy. It makes me happy and it's a miracle that this is finally available. Get your kids/teens to watch it!
Not your father's Galactica. There are many great reveiws here- Ditto to the accolades and step by step commentaries. In gestalt, the series is aging like fine balsamic vinegar; multiple layers of concentrated and pungent aromas creating an essense that both satisfies and leaves a desire for more. A heady draught that leaves intermingling aftertastes both strong and pungent yet filled with intricate subtleties. Highly recommended for mature audiences not afraid to examine the viscerality of a dwindling humanity; plunged raw and vulnerably into a hostile environment with primal emotions dissecting credible survivors of near utter global and galactic, holocaust. Do we really deserve to survive?And...they have a plan.Recommended highly for all adults of all genres- no sci-fi interest required
"Anyone?, Anyone?, Bueller?". Matthew Broderick stars in this very funny film about a high school student who decides to take a day off of school.  What happens next can only be described as remarkable and somewhat crazy.Broderick stars as Ferris Bueller, a somewhat clever and deceitful (in a funny way) high school senior who, along with his best friend Cameron (Alan Ruck) decide to skip school and visit the sights and sounds of downtown Chicago in springtime.  Ferris convinces Cameron to take his father's prized red Ferrari out for the day.  Reluctantly, Cameron agrees, and soon the two are off on their adventure.  Their next plan is to get Ferris' girlfriend Sloane (Mia Sara) out of school so she can go along.  Ferris and Cameron devise a plan to call the school and tell Dean of Students Ed Rooney (Jeffery Jones) that Sloane's grandmother passed away.  Dressed in a long trenchcoat and hat, Ferris arrives at the school to pick up Sloane, and the three drive happily away.  However, Mr. Rooney suspects that something is up and immediately suspects that Ferris is at the root of it.  He sets off to find Ferris himself and bring him back to school.  By the end of the movie, Mr. Rooney probably wishes he had stayed in his office.Meanwhile, Ferris' sister Jeannie (Jennifer Grey) has figured out what Ferris is really doing.  Angry that Ferris seems to get away with everything, she has to deal with the entire school taking up a collection for poor, sick Ferris while she really knows what is going on.  In the end, though, she proves to be a big help to him.After heading downtown, the trio take the Ferrari to a local parking garage.  Cameron's father knows the exact mileage of the car, so Cameron is already nervous about allowing Ferris to drive it.  But that's just the beginning.  The garage attendant decides to take the car out for a joyride and racks up over 180 more miles on the odometer.During their day,Ferris, Cameron, and Sloane manage to see the Sears Tower, a Cubs game, visit the Art Institute, and see Ferris sing "Twist and Shout" from a parade float.  But when they head back to the garage to get the car, Ferris finds out about the extra mileage, and Cameron goes crazy.  Ferris seems to think that by driving backwards that the miles will come off, so they jack the car up in the garage and put it in reverse.  However, the miles don't come off.  Cameron, having suffered through a tumultuous relationship with both of his parents, takes out his aggression on the car.  Soon, it goes careening out of the back of the garage and lands in a pile of trees.  Cameron actually feels relieved because now his father will actually have to talk to him.  But Ferris realizes that he has only 5 minutes to get home before his parents do.  Will he make it in time?This movie has attained a sort of "cult" status over the years and still remains as funny as ever.  Matthew Broderick is perfect as the scheming Ferris, while Jeffery Jones does a very good job as Mr. Rooney.  Jennifer Grey plays the part of the overlooked and jealous sister perfectly, and Alan Ruck's job as the reluctant and somewhat confused Cameron is the perfect companion to the wild and reckless Ferris.  Let's not forget the funny cameo by Ben Stein as the teacher who coined the term "anyone, anyone, Bueller?"I recommend this extremely funny movie very highly.  The acting is great and the story is very funny.  As a Cubs fan, I was glad to see the scenes in Wrigley Field and hear Harry Caray's voice.  Watch this great movie and see how much trouble and mischief three friends can get into in one day
The children this is made for cannot write a review. This review is written for average people who have small children.When my daughter got this DVD she was very happy, but I was not.  The name seemed very ominous for a childrens program.  I watched it with her, as I watch everything they watch the first time, and it was horrible.  I could go on for several pages about how bad it is.But my daugthers really like it.  And after reading these reviews I realize that children can't really write a review.  And this is for children.I am not a long time pony fan, or a collector.  I am a father of 2 small post-toddler girls who are smart little kids.   However, they like to watch entertaining programs just as much as millions of adults who watched "everybody loves raymond" and "friends".  Those shows had the same weak plots, and the same lack of moral content and learning fiber as this my little pony DVD.  If my kids were to be able to write a review and rate this they would rate it 5 stars I am sure.So here is the breakdown to help you decide to purchase:1) If you are an adult who likes childrens programming, do not purchase this.  You won't like it.  Flat out.  Just click on something else.2) If you are a parent who always wants your child to see something educational, don't buy this.  (the ponies do go over friendship, teamwork, etc, but this is not a little einsteins video).3) If you are thinking of buying your little girl a DVD just for enjoyment, I mean, something that she will actually like and enjoy, and something to snack on popcorn to, then they will not be disappointed.  At the present moment, my daughters would like to watch this daily if I would let them.Don't get me wrong.  I think anyone over the age of 7 or 8 would find this terrible.  But if you are talking about a 3 to 5 year old, honestly, they are going to enjoy it.I rate it 4 stars based solely on the fact that my daughters, whom I believe are in this program's target audience, enjoy it and from that perspective I got my money's worth.  And THAT is the purpose of this DVD.As an added bonus, it doesn't have all the grossness, the occasional grown-up themes, and the general rudeness of Sponge Bob and a wide variety of other animated programs that are on TV
Interesting Noir Film!. This remake from the Reckeless moment has many points to wein. The interior drama, the triple crossroads feelings in this mother, and the outer intrigue of the pressure exerted by the blackmail, plus a superb photography and good cast conform to my mind a film above the average.The picture is far from being another explosions and special effect picture. It's a challenege to the viewer and maintains its force till the unexpecetd end.Recommended without reserves.
Elegantly Debauched Life, Whimsically Portrayed Death. Through John Huston's directorial talents, the colors of Toulouse-Lautrec's palette are duly celebrated as he recreates the night life of fin-de-ciecle Paris.Our story begins at the famous nightclub in 1890, the year after its opening, where can-can girls and a few professinal male dancers compete for customers' attentions and occassionally brawl with each other.Serenely sitting at a table sipping cognac and sketching the scene is Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec, the physically deformed son of a noble family, whose condition causes him to empathize with societal outcastes,played with all the elegance of the nobility  by Jose Ferrer, who, in a dual role, also portrays the artist's father.Before the last can-can of the evening, the raucous behavior of those on the dance floor is broken up by the appearance of Jane Avril(the always-exquisite Zsa-Zsa Gabor), who sings a ballad that sounds as hopeful as it is melancholy. Muriel Smith, who plays the exotic Aicha, provided Gabor's singing voice.One inaccuracy of the film is that Avril was the only dancer of the Moulin Rouge allowed to wear colored underwear.As the artist walks home down the dark, foreboding streets, fending off a potential pickpocket, and passing by one lady of the night beforehand, the audience reviews his early life; once expected to carry the traditions of his ancient family into the future, fate dealt him a cruel blow when an accident( in reality, two accidents within two years) revealed a genetic condition that stunted the growth of his legs. Rejection by the girl he loved drove him to make his life elsewhere.He saves prostitute Marie Charlet(Colette Marchand) from arrest, and shelters her, but suffers because of her ingratitude, then becomes even more unhappy when he tries to part with her. Depressed, he drinks even more heavily to the point where  even his mother, Adele(Claude Nollier)encourages a reconciliation in the hope that he will not drink himself to death. But the reunion is not sucessful. In the grand tradition of artists, Toulouse-Lautrec puts all his emotion into his work, which immortalizes such Moulin Rouge regulars as the wiry, hook-nosed Valentin Le Desosse(Walter Crisham), and Louise Weber, a.k.a., "La Goulue"(Katherine Kath).One interesting character who is absent from the story is the red-scarved insult comic, Aristide Bruant, who insulted everyone who came to the Moulin Rouge except for Henri.Gradually, we watch Toulouse-Lautrec make innovations in art as a draftsman, and gain stature in his profession,and the character of the Moulin Rouge change from a bawdy dance hall to a more sophisticated societal club. The flighty, fliratious Jane continues to have affairs, La Goulue becomes more superficially pompous and difficult, and the King of Prussia (Theodore Bikel)purchases one of Henri's paintings. The pauses in which the artist's sketches dance across the screen are truly a feastfor the eye.As Henri takes up with a society woman named Myriamme Hayam  (Suzanne Flon), the couple observe Jane's rise in status as a stage performer, and they manage to rescue La Goulue from oblivion.Elegant surroundings do not alter Henri's view of love or his cynical, self-deprecating humor.After his affair with Myriamme ends, his drinking increases, and his art dealer, Maurice Joyant(Lee Montague), and his housekeeper, Madame Louet(Mary Clare) stand helplessly by. But the film politely deals only with part of what leads to his demise and does not mention syphilis, as it would if it were made today.A tragic fall down a flight of stairs leads to the 36-year-old's return home to his family chateau to die. His mother expresses  her grief, and there is a fictionalized expression of remorse from his father.... But in the mind's eye of the dying artist, the characters he knew at the outset return to bid him farewell, led by the non-speaking Black male dancer, then Le Desosse on the arm of La Goulue, who stopped fighting with Aicha....Then out of the mists of time, memory, and imagination, his beloved Jane, who bids him adieu and then must be off...Soon, Henri leaves us too, amid the viewing of one last fiery can-can by dancers waving handkerchiefs...Would that the ends of all of our lives could be that whimsical
BEST LITTLE WHORE HOUSE IN TEXAS. ONE OF THE BEST DOLLY PARTON (MUSICAL) MOVIES IN THE ARCHIVES.  GETS LITTLE OR NO RECOGNITION FOR BEING ONE OF THE BEST MUSICALS NOR DOES BURT REYNOLDS GET ANY NOD FOR HIS WONDERFUL CONTRIBUTION, EXCEPT OF COURSE FROM DOLLY!!
masterpiece cinema. The very template for an entire genre of film-making, Kurosawa's gritty dust-swept sets and wrinkled obi's and tussled-haired Samurai and black-tooth geisha chicks and rough-hewn anti-hero could have been shot by some indy director yesterday, they're so cutting edge. Shot in 1961, Kurosawa's samurai flicks are lively and gritty and inspired a generation of Hollywood rip-offs. Film school 101 stuff kids. Miss this at your own peril
simply fantastic. A one of a kind production, excellent performances. I just wish we had more shows like this
I love The Show. Just A Note about the DVD. Can't say anything bad about the show. I love it. I collected all 8 seasons of it. Thanks to Anchor Bay for putting it out.My little minor gripe is that Season 7 promises a "Don Knotts Tribute", and I expected a sort of mini docu with interviews and archive footage and such. It was nothing more than a "Best of Furley" collection
Frenetic and Disturbing. What's your color? That's a simple question. I actually enjoyed this movie. I found it to be very interesting and thoroughly engrossing. Lawrence Tierney seems like the most dangerous man alive and Michael Madsen the most dementedly evil. I don't know who is worse. The cast and their performances are unparalleled. Steve Buscemi is quite a character in his own right. This is a real nail bitter. Great character studies hold your interest throughout despite the implied graphic violence.
This may not be sparkling original, but it's well executed. There are many movies about sports, some very good, some really bad and this one falls into the very good category. "Goal!" is the typical sports movie about an exceptionally talented young amateur who is given a chance to shine among the professionals and win the heart of the girl he loves. However, "Goal!" works this premise and makes it fresh and entertaining. Director Danny Cannon had complete support by FIFA and Newcastle United and it shows, he has created some of the most realist and remarkable football scenes in film.Kuno Becker is very good as Santiago, although at times he is overshadowed by other members of the cast. It seems as if he lacked some presence on screen. However, he is still young, and certainly will improve with the years. Alessandro Nivola steals the movie with his performance as Gavin, a notorious football star whose convoluted public life begins to take its toll in his performance in the field.Cannon's approach to the story may seem clichd, but the movie is never boring nor tiresome. Sure, he follows every rule in "Sport Movies Handbook" but he does it with care, good eye and love for the sport. Just like sport movies should be done. The movie flows smoothly between remarkable football scenes and Santiago's struggle with his own personal demons. While at times it seems that both Cannon and Becker are more comfortable in sports scenes, the movie's dose of drama is well handled and completes an enjoyable experience. Even though it's frankly predictable most of the time, it transmits passion, emotions and a love for the game that few movies do. That's why "Goal!" can be considered a successful and important film. It is the first film about football soccer that transmits the emotions that have made the sport to be the most popular sport in the world. And that's got to be worth something.It may not be a perfect sports film; however, "Goal!" is the beginning of an adventure, and hopefully, of a new way to make football movies. This initial film of what is called the "Goal! Trilogy" delivers high energy entertainment for fans and non-fans of the sport.
Excellent Purchase. Excellent product fast and easy. Been a Godzilla fan since young and was thrilled to have this collector's item.Thank you very much
Bob Newhart Show. It's Bob. What can you say but "funny!"They are still funny now
Five Stars. I always want to see Blind Melon in a Dvd and i think that is a real good Recital, whit the bonus tracks in Much Music. The songs are very nice, the sound is the worst thing but is not a problem. Well, if you are a Blind Melon fan, you have to buy this dvd
1 Other thing better. This DVD is sooo worth the buy. THE 2ND SEASON NEEDS TO COME OUT! Its been several years since the show has been cancelled. The 2nd season is even better than the first
Sexy and campy. But mostly sexy. After watching the movie and then looking at the reviews, it seems unreal that anyone could actually write four paragraphs about this movie, but then it does have Salma Hayek and Penelope Cruz, so maybe four paragraphs just isn't enough.The movie is pure camp, and does a great job of it. How can you argue with a film that positions Hayek and Cruz as bank robbing buddies. Of course the relationship gets off to a rocky start, Hayek being the European educated aristocrat and Cruz coming from a more humble background. Their bank robbing hi-jinks kick off when they both independently stumble into the same bank to rob it at the same time. After that robbery is complete we're entertained with a cat fight in a church that features a Holy Water wet t-shirt view and some fantastic back and forth slapping. It's just fantastic.After Hayek is exposed to seeing how the other half lives her heart grows two sizes and she and Cruz vow to rob more banks to help the people. The priest hooks them up with an experienced bank robbing gringo for training and before you know it, Hayek and Cruz are doing wet pushups in a creek, while white boy splashes them. Pure genius! And this is followed almost immediately by a dramatic plunge off a cliff into a raging river, where we once again get soaking wet Salma and soaking wet Penelope crawling out of the river onto a small sandy beach. This movie is fantastic!As the training continues they give each other piggy back rides, wear chaps and corsets and otherwise prove the beauty of modern cinematography. There's a clip when Salma watches Penelope sleep, then walks over and puts a blanket on her, and then lays next to her on a blanket about the size of a twin bed. Then Penelope throws an arm and a leg around Salma. Pure movie goodness. Next up, they appear in skimpy showgirl type outfits with cleavage aplenty, and they pose for provocative photographs with a naked tied up guy. LUCKY [...]! Then they take turns kissing the guy. Of course the guy, is a criminal investigator played by Steve Zahn, who is "on their trail". And that's all just in the first thirty-five minutes or so.And then what to our wondering eyes should appear? Mr. Criminal Investigator's wife. A hot young blonde with blue eyes. Basically, exactly what this movie needed.Now, I'll take a brief rest as I need to explain how we got here.The  opening sceen was with Quentin (Zahn) investigating a crime scene set in auditorium. It was a classic University still room for meetings and education. The purpose of this, was so Quentin could show the local Police Department(s) how science can assist in criminal investigations. After his session is over and he leaves the auditorium, his fianc (the gorgeous blue eyed blonde) pops in to give him a kiss. There, that's what happened and we were introduced to two characters in the film. If you're a bit under whelmed, don't feel bad, so was I.Next we're a fly on the wall as Jackson (Yoakum) gives the promise to his bosses at the Bank of New York that he will "take care" of any issues in acquiring the land the bank needs to finance a potential rail road.The plan seems simple. The landowners are unable to pay the exorbitant interest on their mortgages, Jackson and his men serve notice on the foreclosures, which usually means shooting the man that goes out to talk to them and then destroying the humble homes that were built on the property. One of the men served is the father of Maria (Cruz). He is left for dead, but she finds his body and is able to get the medical assistance necessary, from the church, to save his life. In the meantime, Sara (Hayek) is visiting a man, it appears in order to get some medicine for her horse. While she's there Jackson's gang shows up and they shoot and kill the man. Sara witnesses all of this. She escapes with her own life by fleeing out the back. Before she is able to return to her home, Jackson is there with a pack of men, and they're standing over Sara's dead father. Sara's father was the President of the bank that was actually performing the foreclosures, with assistance from their new partner, The Bank of New York. With him out of the way, Jackson and his crew now run the backs in the area, under the umbrella of The Bank of New York.Almost immediately Sara and Maria, who have only met once in passing at Sara's house, each independently decide to rob Sara's fathers old bank. Of course it's a comedy of errors, but quite entertaining. The stress level rises when it is noticed that Jackson and his gang are closing in on the bank. Somehow the ladies get out with the money and their lives, it appears with assistance from the bank manager.But our Thelma and Louise bandidas aren't quite where they need to be yet. They take refuge at the church, where Sara wants to take her half of the money and return to Europe, where she has spent the last ten years attending school. Maria is adamant all the money be spread to everyone cheated out of their homes, to feed them and such. This starts a nice holy water having slap fest, which is quite nice. The result is the padre walks in and asks if he can show them something. He takes them to a remote cave that is crawling with displaced families due to The Bank of New York's scheme. This moves Sara and she and Maria decide to rob more banks. Again, hearing more than he should have, the father returns and tells them how to find someone that can teach them how to rob banks. All the fantastic bits of that interaction are described above.Now the bandidas are on their way, robbing bank after bank, and getting, their faces plastered around town on wanted posters and Jackson is leading the search to capture them. In order to help, The Bank of New York hires Quentin (Zahn) to help track down and capture the two fugitives. One of his first actions was to investigate the crime scene where Sara's (Hayek) father died and he is lead to believe that the victim was on the receiving end of some foul play, possibly murder. He assumes it's Sara.Sara and Maria end up in a position to overhear a conversation between the priest and Quentin, where he appears to have questions regarding Sara's relationship with her father. He leaves without getting an answer, but is soon confronted in his hotel room by Sara and Maria, in dancing girl outfits. All the good stuff, is listed above. They end up taking Quentin with them to the bank to help fill him in on how the foreclosures were being done, a farm for a single peso. He recalls seeing the documents before, with Jackson. But that time Jackson removed them from his hand and told to him to stick to his own business. Now as they're playing around in the bank, Jackson's men are waiting for them. The girls take Quentin as a hostage, but it was actually his idea to do so, and use that ruse to make their escape.After this, Jackson brings a bunch of out of town folks to assist in the hunt of the two bandidas. And while they're off in the wilderness surviving, Quentin shares some tender (non-sexual!) moments with both Maria and then Sara. While with the later, he states that he would like to assist, and a good way to change up the robberies, would be for Quentin to go in with only one of the ladies, since authorities are looking for two women. It works well on their first robbery together, and the three get away with all the money. During the robbery Quentin and Maria are posing as newlyweds and there is a hot and heavy kissing scene, which of course Sara watches through a telescope and shows her disgust for. On their next robbery Quentin and Sara are up. She poses as a widow, where her mother has died and they are looking for a bank to deposit the inheritance. He's her lawyer or friend or something. Again, lucky Quentin gets a hot and heavy kissing scene, this time with Sara while Maria watches on through a telescope, showing her disgust. As Quentin and Sara progress inside the bank, she becomes nervous and is unable to perform her role. In order to calm down, more tongue gymnastics with Quentin.Quentin is the luckiest man in the history of movies.But not all goes well in this robbery and they do get caught. As they are being taken by carriage to the gallows, they are rescued by the peasant farmers, the ones that they had been helping all along.Now Jackson has convinced the Mexican authorities that the only way to protect their gold reserve is to move it by rail to Texas. Of course, he's doing this so he can rob the gold reserve for himself, since his deal with The Bank of New York to acquire land has fallen through. Of course this results in a nice little shootout when the bandidas along with Quentin show up to rob the train too. Quentin's fiance and her father are also there. In the melee that ensues Quentin gets shot and Jackson escapes to the last car, where the gold is stored and disconnects it from the train. Our two little chica's make the jump and confront him in the gold car. He escapes out the side door on a horse riding next to the train, but doesn't get far. Maria's horse is right behind, and from the start of the movie they've been showing this horse whisperer type ability she has to communicate with her horse, and her horse somehow has power/control over what other horses do. So her horse, tells his horse to throw Jackson, and viola, we have a climactic scene of good versus evil. Jackson is laying face down in the dirt and Sara tries, but determines that she just can't shoot him, an ongoing issue throughout the film. Maria decides that she can shoot him, and when she tries.....click click. Counting the number of bullets fired is an ongoing issue for her throughout the film. Jackson stands up and mocks her for not counting, grabs a small two shot pistol from inside his vest and turns to stare them down. Then the gun fires, and Sara did it. She was able to man up, so to speak, and take the [...] down.The go back to the train, give their hugs and kisses to Quentin, thanking him for his help as he returns to civilization with his hot blonde blue eyed wife (Audra Blaser). As the train pulls away, they share a hot and steamy reunion (Quentin, so lucky!) that Sara and Maria will critique as they ride home on their horses. And in the closing dialog Maria asks Sara "How are the banks in Europe?". To which Sara responds "Bigger!".Teasing us with a sequel? God we can only hope.The natural scenery in the movie is gorgeous, typical southwest stuff. The acting is actually pretty good. If you're familiar with Salma Hayek and Penelope Cruz, you know what you're going to get here. Not spectacular acting, but nothing bad either. And its visually stunning. Steve Zahn is, as usual, pretty funny. The guy could carry a comedy on his own if given the chance. He's been solid in stuff like National Security, Employee Of The Month, and Saving Silverman. Here he plays the straight man, and makes it work. Must have been rough having to share the screen, and the scenes he did, with three gorgeous women. Dwight Yoakum played the nasty slimey smarmy bad guy, and he had it down perfect.
Two Views of James' Elegent Chiller in one hit. In this new Masterpiece Theatre spin on James'classic bone-chiller Ben Bolt depicts an elegent but updated  reinterpretation of the book . Unlike versions before it, we have a choice of interpretaion of events.Other versions have underlined  the analogy of the single metallic turn of the screw within resisting but eventually accepting softer material(analogous of the outward relationship between a young governess and her charges).You eventually realise that Bolt might be presenting another dimension for us to unravel this evidently infamous mystery. The story is presented thus: just whom has taken charge of the care of two upper-middle class orphans; their very material new governess the attractively humane and proper  "Miss" or possibly more ethereal antagonists from the recent past? Do we really have a choice in this matter? And if we do should we vote for the obvious?In Mr Bolt's production the answer to the mystery may be more shocking even than the evil desires of malevolent phantoms. We may enevitably ask ourselves,what side of Miss's bodice, within or without, so to speak, is propelling the awful inevitability of what happens?Does Miss really see phantoms of the recently fallen and self destroyed evil, local protagonists or are they merely a product of her own semi-repressed sexual infatuation with her employer or someone in her past? Here you may note the young Governess' slight fetish with her employer's wardrobe cupboard.Is the large, chatty housekeeper's growing fear for the children developed from her agreement with the young carer's constantly expressed misgivings or is she becoming terrified of the young lady's own obsessions and their effect on her charges?Is Miles, the dapper little boy under her care, a roguish but vulnerable young charmer recently and tragically orphaned of both parents or a manipulative future monster-in-the-making presently apprenticed to an evil phantom?Finally,  Bolt's tribute to the author is made clear by his even handed approach. For me  he seems to find it difficult to discount either understanding except to realise that such a genuine genius as James is somewhat more a pioneer of the then new psychological side of the literary than a recreator of the literary methods and archetypes from his own cultural past. Inevitably a fiercely partisan view of either take on the story is, I think, useless.  This production is both humble and majestic and is a signature effort by the director and all listed in the credits. The best "Turn of the Screw" I have seen
Ya'll peep is crazy. This was one of the best movie I've seen all year. Guliana Rabissi (sp?) is PHENOMINAL.  People giving this movie low ratings must not understand the complex, multi-demintional plot.  The acting is excellent, the cinematography is capticating.  I rarely purchase DVD's, but I bought this one because of how much it touched me.  It's a remarkable piece of art.
Five frybread rating!. Poetically intriguing! I am sure Alexie will be criticized for showing the ugly side of reservation life along with the beauty, but this film sticks with you. It addresses all the angles. It shows the intra-tribal prejudice that happens when someone leaves the rez and becomes successful, and the ones who could have, but chose not to. The images of childhood innocence woven with gasoline huffing and Lysol sandwiches are sad and beautiful at the same time. The great dialog, Alexie's writing, great casting and cinematography make this all around good. It  has more "meat" than Smoke Signals, I highly recommended it
THE FORGOTTEN PAST. What a amazing picture this is. I was up on the edge of my seat,not for climax but all the time.it starts with a beautiful music given  by one of the famous musician "MAX STEINER" and the photography in black and white is haunting in itself.The Director raoul Walsh who himself is so famous directed this movie making it a thriller with closeups of handsom Robert Mitchum as Jeb Rand a man of few words was adopted into the family of The beautiful Teresa Wright who also was his step sister and her brother adam when the tragidy befalls and he did not remember ut had flashes of memories of the past.Instead of giving much of the plot it would be nice to find out watching this movie and where Robert Mitchum says to Alan Hale "YOU KNOW I FLIPPED THIS DOLLAR TWICE-AND I LOST BOTH TIMES-LAST TIME I LEFT FOR WAR -THIS TIME I LEFT THE RANCH".Pursued is a good story written by Niven Busch.I did not find anything negative about this movie,it is a stunning movie.
Glad I got this!!. I was a bit hesistant to get this DVD to complement my copy of EMI's three-CD audio set.  The CDs, after all, constitute the soundtrack of the film, with the lip-synching movie action filmed a few years later, so I thought this DVD might be redundant.  I needn't have hesitated!  If you don't actually see the opera, you won't understand a lot of what's going on. And who wants to read about the action in a booklet anyway?  Plus, this is a movie production and not a regular staged opera so you're treated to a 360-degree view of some hauntingly evocative sets.  A stunner
I Love Gene Kelly!. I grew up with Gene Kelly performances and so this box set is wonderful.  "Singin' on the Rain" is one of his classics, as well as one of his best performances.  "On the Town" and "An American in Paris" are suberb too, highlighting Kelly's different strengths.  I especially liked "Anatomy of a Dancer" though because it shed light on Kelly's life that I did not know. As such I grew to respect him and his work even more. I highly recommend it for Gene Kelly followers and musical lovers alike
Queen of the Damned. OMG! How can i begin to descibe the sexiness of LESTAT! (Stewart Townsend)He's like the hottest 500yr old ever! You don't have to love VAMPIRES to love this film. Lestat (Townsend) is a rebellious loner type vampire who is fed up with living in the shadows of eternity and wants to live out in the open of the 21st century. So he does what anyone who wants to be heard, known and worshiped would do... he becomes a rock star. It's there in his new found fame and fortune that he catches the eye of a young woman named Jesse. She becomes facinated with Lestat and the dark relm he lives in. Then theres the competition, Akasha,(R&B singer Aaliyah) the Queen of all who are damned. Aaliyah gives a grand performance as this "take no crap from any human or fanged fiend" mother of vampires everywhere. This movie is the latest in the Vampire Chronicles of Anne Rice. It is not set in the 1400's but it does give tales of the old and the new. It's a great flick pick for a Friday night with any kind of company, the living or the undead.
So nice to have this in my collection!. "Lambert the Sheepish Lion," "Paul Bunyan," "The Little House"...all of the cartoons I loved when I was little, and now I can finally watch them again!  I used to see these shorts all the time on the Disney Channel (before they forgot what "quality" was and started churning out their vapid teeny bopper sitcoms), and I was really disappointed that they were no longer shown.I would have preferred something without all of the Alice shorts on it--they never appealed to me.  However, there are plenty of others on the 2-DVD set that are fun to watch.  The quality is just fine...Really, if you're looking to see all the old Disney classic shorts again, then I would recommend this product!  There's not much more that can be said about it
Great trilogy, especially if you haven't read the books. I find it rather amusing how so many kids writing these reviews bash the trilogy mostly because they have no patience and lack the ability to respect a well-detailed story.For someone who hasn't read the books, I absolutely loved this trilogy. The fact that so many people considered the acting in these movies horrible surprises me.. I thought the acting was the best I've seen in any movie in a long time.The beautiful landscapes portrayed in the films are another thing I enjoyed. All of the creatures in the films, mostly the orcs, looked almost hauntingly real. Orlando Bloom did a fantastic job in learning archery for this movie.. The battles shown in these movies are a thousand times better than the weak one shown in the newer movie, "The Chronicles of Narnia".As for people saying to watch the Shrek series instead of this, I don't even understand why you're comparing an animated comedy to a long epic in the first place.I admit, I felt that the end of "Return of the King" seemed to drag on, but the movie itself is still worth watching. The power of friendship is really shown in this last movie, as well as the power of the ring. I think Elijah Wood was a bit weak [acting-wise] in some parts of this movie, but how great he was in "Fellowship of the Ring" definately makes up for it.Basically, this trilogy is great for anyone who enjoys the fantasy genre in general. If you're all about the newage action movies and comedies, don't bother. There may be several witty comments shared between Legolas and Gimli, but that doesn't make any of the movies a comedy.If you've read the books, get the extended versions of the movies. If you think they're long enough already, then you'd probably get bored, so I wouldn't recommend it
Second Hand Nothing. This is a first class movie....my husband and I were thrilled to find it on Amazon. Good cast, good story,one to watch again and again.........my husband does
An Experience You Won't Forget. This was the televised (on PBS) gala that turned me from a casual, occasional opera listener into a full-fledged fan.  And most specifically, it introduced me to the beauty and splendor of Wagner.I recorded the gala on video, and have watched it from time to time over the years.  While the PAL version referred to by another reviewer may have contained the entire performance, this DVD does not.  It comes awfully close, though.  There are missing arias which were performed that evening by Alfredo Kraus (Werther's aria), Gwyneth Jones ("In Questa Reggia"), Vladimir Chernov (Figaro's aria from Barber of Seville), and others -- most notably, a wonderful "Va Pensiero" performed by the incomparable Met chorus, and Cherubino's aria by the wonderful Fredrica Von Stade (much better than the selection included here by her).  But when you still have close to 5 hours of glorious music like this, these complaints are minor.To this neophyte opera listener, I knew Wagner as the composer of the rousing music used in "Apocalypse Now".  I was not prepared for the astonishing beauty of the prelude to "Rienzi", which opens the gala, nor could I believe the intensity of Waltraud Meier's performance of Isolde's "Narrative and Curse" from "Tristan und Isolde".  But it was James Morris' performance of "Wotan's Farewell" which moved me to near tears, and which, as noted earlier, turned me into a devoted fan of this music.There are many other wonderful moments on this DVD (another personal favorite:  Roberto Alagna's and Bryn Terfel's duet from Bizet's "The Pearlfishers").  You probably won't watch this in one sitting, but with each performace, you will be thoroughly won over by the Met orchestra.  Incredibly, unlike the Met Centennial Gala, which used many conductors, the entire James Levine 25th Anniversary Gala was conducted by Maestro Levine.  May he grace the pit of the Metropolitan Opera for many years to come.Needless to say, I couldn't recommend a DVD release any more highly
sweet dreams. 1 of the best music DVD's that i have a film about her life, and times,and the music is greatpatsy and charlie were real peoplea real film about patsy cline and her life and times"and thats what i love about the south"
Excellent Movie 4 Traders. Ok 4 Others. To fully apreciate this movie you have to be a trader, a trader who has experienced loses.  Many of the emotions that Nick goes through are similar to the emotions that most people experience when they begin to trade.  While Nick's trading style is different than most people's (price arbitrage and huge amounts of equity), the emotions are still there, fear and greed
Even kept my girlfriend interested... My girlfriend hates my motorcycle and has absolutely no interest in motorsports.  I started watching this one night at her place and before I knew it she and one of her roommates had gotten sucked into watching.  It puts a very human perspective on the trials and tribulations of arguably one of the most challenging motorsports arenas.  Watching Gary McCoy throttle slide a 200+ HP motorcycle out of a turn, some crazy spills and victory wheelies doesn't hurt..
a love story undiminished by time. An immortal wartime romance with Ginger Rogers and Joseph Cotten, I'LL BE SEEING YOU remains one of the most beloved films of the era.  Rogers plays Mary Marshall, a female ex-con on parole, who meets by chance the handsome yet severely shell-shocked soldier Zachary Morgan (Cotten).  Their romance plays out against the odds; two damaged people who find comfort and understanding in each other.Based on the radio play "Double Furlough" by Charles Martin, the screenplay by Marion Parsonnet amiably showcases Rogers and Cotten in some of their most vivid and unguarded work.  With Shirley Temple, Spring Byington (who had previously co-starred in 1940's "The Blue Bird"), Chill Wills and Tom Tully
Parrallel Political Intrigue. While being accompanied by a member of the press during the Persian Gulf War, an army unit is ambushed.  The men of the unit don't remember much of what happened after the attack but they all remember that they were saved because of the actions of Sgt. Raymond Shaw (Liev Schreiber).  After the conflict, Shaw was nominated for the Congressional Medal of Honor by his commanding officer, Capt. Ben Marco (Denzel Washington).  Shaw won the award and the recognition he received allowed him to successfully run for political office.Years later Major Marco runs into another member of his unit, Al Melvin (Jeffrey Wright) from those days who questions Marco about what really happened in the desert and asks him if he ever has any dreams.  Marco politely dismisses Melvin's accusations, but he knows he speaks the truth because he hasn't stopped having any dreams since he returned home and he spends his time off duty as a broken man.  Melvin's meeting sets off a chain reaction with Marco's brain and he begins to remember things better.  When he sees that Raymond Shaw has been nominated for a Vice Presidential nomination, he sets out to meet with Shaw and discover the truth.  It's a journey down a rabbit hole more terrifying than anything Alice ever met: from mind altering implants beneath the skin, convenient murders, brainwashing, with an international corporation known as Manchurian Global trying to covertly take over the world.When I first heard that Hollywood was going to remake THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, I was very skeptical.  The original film has become a classic example of political intrigue.  That film was made in the heyday of the Cold War and not only captured the hovering suspicion leftover from McCarthyism, but also portrayed the attempted assassination of a president, eerily foreshadowing what actually happened to President Kennedy just a few month later.Two generations have passed since original THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and the geopolitical landscape of the world has changed drastically.  Except for the overpopulated nation of China and a few small countries scattered around the globe, Communism no longer poses a threat to democracy.  In its stead we are faced with a new type of conflict that has no national, political, and religious borders.  This new conflict provides the opportunity for businesses to engage in legal international war profiteering, something that the world has never seen the likes of.  It is against this backdrop that the new THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE is set warning not of sabotage from a foreign power, but of a secret and sublime internal takeover brought about by corporate greed.I really enjoyed THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE.  The acting is top-notch with fine performances from all lead actors (Washington, Schreiber, and Meryl Streep as Eleanor Shaw give Oscar-worth performances) and most of the supporting cast.  The script has been rewritten in such a way that it doesn't mess with the spirit of the original film and novel, but is able to add some new twists and present the troubling concept as a very real possibility more relevant than ever in our current political landscape.  The film has a great plot, wonderful writing, and some very powerful artistic and directorial techniques that add to overall tone.Of course, even if I believed otherwise I might not say it because even now they're watching you, you know.The DVD includes a commentary with director Jonathan Demme and co-writer Daniel Pyne, a couple of featurettes, deleted and extended scenes, outtakes with optional commentary, and Liev Schreiber's screen test
a kneeslapper. despite his rude sexual humor, Pablo is definetly one of the funniest guys in stand up comedy. His sound effects are legendary and his face expressions are hilarious! Great DVD, you will have fun listening to it.Although Pablo isn't 100% funny throughout the whole show, he get's pretty much all of your attention anyways.4 out of 5 stars, cuz I'm sure he can be even funnier! Other than that, great DVD!!!
JUST LOVE IT. I love this show. I would recommend it to anyone. I wish it was still on the air. I like that it includes the kids and the ex-spouses
Class movie all the way. With Anthony Mann at the helm and James Stewart heading the cast, you expect real class all the way, and this 1952 western is no let-down.Irving Glassberg lenses Oregon beautifully, making the stunning landscape one of the main stars, as in all great films of the genre. Hans J Salter provides most of the music, which really comes into its own during the first nighttime sequence.I could really identify with the themes of betrayal, integrity and virtue, no doubt due to Stewart's brilliant performance, which is both inspiring and heartbreaking at times
Missing Logo on box???. I just received all 5 Norhtern Exposure box sets from Amazont.  I notice Seasons 1&2, 4, and 5 all have the same packaging (logo on front, logo on spine, discs slide out the right side).  But on the 3rd Season set i received, the discs slide out the LEFT side, and there is NO logo on the spine.  In fact NOTHING on the spine.  No DVD logo, no Universal logo, no Northern Exposure logo.  It will look a bit out of place on my shelf, when it's the only box set without the title on the spine of the box.  Does anyone else have this problem?  Is this inherent in ALL 3rd season box sets, or did i get a mis-print?  Any help would be great.  Thanks
A Cult Classic. This film is required viewing for anyone who enjoys comedic, graphic violence with plenty of high pressure blood splattering.  What can be said?  This ranks up there with "Repo Man", "Blazing Saddles", "Taxi Driver", "Monty Python and The Holy Grail", "Godzilla", "Silence of the Lambs", "Mad Max", "Full Metal Jacket", "Videodrome", and "The Warriors".  A must see, must own for the couch potato
"I'm a street fighter.  All that kickboxing and grappling stuff is overrated.". I wish that I could fully describe how great this movie is but I will try.  If you are a fan of B-movie martial arts flicks then you will know this storyline well.  It is your typical prison movie where they have kickboxing matches between the inmates.  What makes it stand out from the rest of the pack is that it is the most groundbreaking martial arts movie I seen in a very long time.  It has a ton of top notch Hong Kong action type of moves, new, inventive ones I might add, but the mixed martial arts incorporated into the fighting is equally impressive.  There has never been a definitive movie that showcased MMA properly.  'Undisputed 2' does not take a Ken Shamrock fight move by move and shoot it on screen, but the realism in the fights cannot be matched by any other movie.  Spinning back kicks come out of nowhere.  Leg, arm, and ankle locks are worked seamlessly into the fights without cutting frames or using trick editing.  It has numerous techniques applied and you will watch this over and over just so you can take it all in.  There is a bit of undercranking and some film tricks are used, but no wires, and some of the moves being pulled off are jaw dropping.  A fantasy film for fight fans and it has the most realistic yet stylishly choreographed one on one fights imaginable.  J.J. Perry has to be mentioned for choreographing these brilliant fight scenes making it look like an event you would actually pay to see.Michael Jai White from 'Tyson' and 'Spawn' stars as the current boxing champion who gets framed while working in Russia and goes to prison.  He actually takes on the role that Ving Rhames played as George "The Iceman" Chambers in the first 'Undisputed' but this movie is pretty different.  The prison is owned by the mob who hold illegal UFC types of fights.  It is actually the villian played by Scott Adkins who steals the show.  Michael Jai White is great but Adkins really gets to show off everything he has.  His presence is amazing and I loved him in every scene.  There is a good job of character development with friends of Jai White helping him along, and holding him up.While the fights in this movie are truly second to none, the story is very well done also.  Don't expect your typical Jean Claude Van Damme movie where we have to just accept that it is going to be badly done, though it may have some good action.  This movie is expertly directed by Isaac Florentine.  The plot is totally unbelievable, but still well written.  With this, Florentine looks like he will finally take off as a big time director.  I think he can handle it and this movie shows that.  Don't expect action from start to finish but it has plenty of fights.  Florentine takes the time to set everything up so we actually get a very good overall movie.  Like most all great martial arts films, there is a training sequence.  This happens before the final fight for Jai White, but Adkins gets to show off the most throughout the entire film.  Great acting by everybody also helps this movie out tremendously.  Don't expect your typical B-action flick.  It has a good ending and is a worthwhile movie to watch all the way through.It is amazing that this did not have a theatrical release but I look forward to seeing more from everybody involved in this.  Most of all I am looking for Michael Jai White to get better roles now that he has shown he has some very good acting skills.  This is what a fighting movie is supposed to be, a good movie with great fights.  Too bad it rarely happens.  It is a masterpiece of the martial arts genre and action movies in general.This is a great release from New Line Entertainment with booming sound and good picture quality.  The picture is grainy at times but still very good and is also widescreened.  They don't skip out on the special features either.  There is a 20 minute making of with behind the scenes and interviews with the cast and crew.  Nice to see director Isaac Florentine showing off his moves.  Also included is a commentary track with the stars Stott Adkins and Michael Jai White and the director.  This is a great conversation of everything that went into making the movie and their thoughts on it.
Fantastic singer. Hayley Westenra is a fantastic singer.  I can listen to her music day after day and always enjoy it
You Idiots!. This is a great movie. It needs more good reviews. You are crazy if you don't think this is a good movie. B.T.W. nice Jaws 2 tribute close to the end
Your holidays are set!!!. You'll be officially good to go with these DVD gems that cover the holidays from Thanksgiving way into the New Year. Martha took 3 of the busiest holidays and gives you one idea after another on how to make it festive, beautiful, and as always, delicious.The quality of all of her DVD's is per her usual superb standards to digital transfer, with the colors pure, and the sound clear. Many of these are from her former TV show format, so with the quiet backdrop, and occasional soft music to set the mood, she gives you slow and steady direction to master all of her idea's. There are many printable recipes and plenty of information that you can download, so whether you have a computer or not, you can have all the notes you want, or need, to accomplish your desires.The three disc set comes each in its own separate jacket, then placed within a holiday box. The back of each jacket has the listing of what is contained within that DVD so you have your index right at your fingertips. The DVD's are as such:Disc One: CLASSIC THANSKGIVINGTurkey 5 Ways: turkey, stuffing and gravy 101/ deep-fried turkey/ rotisserie turkey/ black-lacquered turkey/ boned, rolled, and tied turkey.Best Stuffings: cornbread, Challah, and fruit stuffing/ fruit and nut stuffing/ low-country stuffing/ sweet and savory stuffing/ stuffing 101Favorite Side Dishes: brussels sprouts with lemon vinaigrette/ cauliflower with brown butter and roasted hazelnuts/ mom's creamed spinach/ garlic horseradish mashed potatoes/ Native American succotashSpecial Desserts: Alexis' sweet potato pie/ cranberry pistachio biscotti/ pumpkin souffle/ individual rustic apple tarts/ perfect pecan pieTable Settings and Decorations: gourd candles/ leaf-print tablecloth/ cornucopia tabel setting/ branch napkin rings/ 6 napkin-folding ideas/ harvest mantel/ thanskgiving table setting/ edible centerpieces/ etcKids Thanksgiving crafts: cornhusks dolls/ paper place mats/ pinecone turkeys/ silhouette kids tableSpecial Features: how to carve a turkey/ classic turkey platter presentation/ cranberry bog field trip/ 10 helpful how-to demonstrations/ thanksgiving planner/ printable recipes and instructions/ raffia cornucopia/ 6 gravy tips/ turkey trivia place card/ thanksgiving clip-art place cards/ etcDisc Two: HOMEMADE HOLIDAYHoliday Baking: chocolate truffles 101/ gingerbread people/ meringue mushrooms/ birch de NoelHoliday Decorating: simple winter decorating/ making a wreath/ice votives/ spiced pinecones/ pearl tree topper/ elegant table settings/ etcHandmade Ornaments: millinery fruit ornaments/ fumdrop ornaments/ clothespin ornaments/ origami ornaments/ ribbon candy ornamentsChristmas Dinner: standing rib roast w/ Yorkshire pudding/ seafood salad/ baccala ravioli/ duck breast with pomegranate walnut sauceHanukkah: Hanukkah gelt bags/ martha's potatoe pancakes/ zalabiaGift-wrapping Ideas: gift wrap supplies and storage/ bubble print wrapping paper/ chenille bump ribbon/ rickrack cardsHandmade Gifts: velvet frame/ polar fleece hats/ button necklace/ magnetic chalkboard/ candy wreath teachers giftSpecial Features: classic eggnog/ collecting Christmas ornaments/ sliegh bells/ candy kitchens/ planners/ marshmallow snowflakes (what a blast!)/ cookie glossary and recipes/ etcDisc Three: NEW YEAR CELEBRATIONHor d' Oeuvres: shrimp cocktail/ antipasto for a large crowd/ cheese bites/ grilled curried shrimp/ bar snakcs/ stuffed mushrooms/ fig hor d'oevures/ seafood bloody marys/ mini quiches/ baked brieDrinks and Cocktails: how to chill champagne/ Dom Perignon/ white cosmopolitans/ flavored fruit vodka/ passion fruit champagne/ cranberry sparkler/ snakebiteParty Fun: kids bubble jumping/ newspaper party hats/ noisemaker balloons and placecards/ well-wishing party hats/ confetti tricksDecorations: New Years Eve flowers/ sparkling table runner and dessert buffet/ hor d'oeuvres platter presentationSpecial features: printable recipes and instructions/ bar essentials checklist/ dessert buffet recipesSo there you go; all you need for a great holiday from November to January!! All the best from our friend Martha to us!
Makes you wanna dance along with him!!. I absolutely enjoyed this dvd.  I couldn't keep still, it took me back to when I was a teenager listening to these songs and seeing the videos.  Only problem is, I wished it was longer (but it only for my own selfish reasons, haha).  It's length is perfect but I could listen and watch for hours.  Michael is a true entertainer and those who appreciate true talent will appreciate him as a artist
M. Night Shyamalan's  best movie. This movie impressed me, it was so well done and so creepy and grose sometimes,Bruce Willis is excellent and the boy is also excellent in his role.The dead people looked realistic.At the end the movie has an unexpected twist.It will make you think...am i dead?!... Who could say?.M Night Shyamalan is a great director, he prooves it with every  movie he makes
compelling storytelling. finally, this wonderful series has made it to the u.s.one of the things i most like about poliakoff's work is that it avoids the melodramatic, the sensational and the pathological. also the infintile. this is a story about people who do not shoot up, or shoot, do not beat others up, do not throw temper tantrums on sidewalks, do not plan elaborate and vicious crimes. soap operas offer hysterical and mentally unbalanced people doing immoral, unethical and contemptible things to those around them. poliakoff offers characters like the rest of us, but possibly better dressed.this is storytelling that captivates with wonderful plotting, wonderful dialogue, and wonderful stories. the characters are annoying, irritating, charming, eccentric, courageous, talented, kind, selfish, admirable and hateful and very real. if you loose interest in the story, the sets will keep your attention.there are a few scenes that keep the series from being child-friendly in the united states, which is a shame, since the series could spark an interest in family history in many children. as the dialogue has it, 'there are at least three great stories in any family.
Surprisingly good. My apologies in advance to the legion of fans out there, but somehow the idea of a &quot;good&quot; Frank Sinatra film seems oxymoronic.  But this is a fine film, with Sinatra believable as the American martinet, and a simply outstanding supporting cast.  I must single out for special mention the wonderful performance by Edward Mulhare, a much underrated actor, who rarely had the opportunity to show what he could do.  His performance as Father Costanza is a gem, and one of the elements that makes this movie really work (and his German is excellent!)
Hee-haw, I love the over-analytical reviews!. I am from the South; my ancestors settled along what is now the Tennessee-Kentucky state line in far west Tennessee in the early 1800s. One thing about the South is that one's "place" is essentially determined at birth. As the descendent of white folks who farmed and worked on the Gulf, Mobile & Ohio (now merged with the Illinois Central Gulf) railroad, my "place" now is middle-class, college educated (B.A. journalism, M.A. teaching), and with it the "proper" way of behaving. I refused to fall in line and do what was expected of me -- so now I live in the south, but the southern part of Arizona, and have now for 23 years. I still go home and feel that oppressive sense of "having to fit in" and fulfill my role. In Arizona, the culture's different. It's OK to sit on the porch and sip on a cold beer. In Tennessee, only "white trash" and people of color would do such a thing. And so, I sit on the back porch on my rare visits "back home." I am a Southerner, but a Southerner in exile by choice.As such, I was dazzled by this "documentary," which is as much a documentary as "Spinal Tap" is. An earlier reviewer complains that Mr. Crews' identity and academia background aren't detailed. Well, heck, it says right on the screen under his name, "Novelist." What we have here is, as Paul Newman said in the South-based movie "Cool Hand Luke," is a "failure to communicate. White's South is one bite out of a region that, like gumbo, is a mixture of ingredients. Were Jim White African-American, I'm sure the movie would probably be populated by more Pentecostal churches, barbecues, grits, chitlins and greens.No one gets it, but this is all a joke! It's as real a picture of the South as "Spinal Tap" is about the real day-to-day life of a working rock band. It's parody. Anyone who's from the South is going to realize that's what presented is one skewed, caricatured image of the South that meets some folks' preconceived notions. If you let go of the falsity that this is a true slice of reality, what you have is a very interesting folk tale, a story, hogwash. Why, early in the movie, does Professor Crews talk about how in the "old days" they used to make up stories based on the too-perfect people picture in the Sears, Roebuck catalog? Well, because what you're seeing is a movie filled with stories just as "real" as those driven by the imagination of people flipping through the "too perfect" people in the Sears catalog.Stop being analytical and enjoy the fact that life is a big cosmic joke, and the "documentary" you are seeing is just one long video folk tale. Do that, and you'll see the majesty of this film.Keep reading the "scholarly" reviews if you want. But talk about blowing smoke! Hee-haw, y'all... Some folks are just too darn smart for their own good.
One of my favorites. Ever since I saw this movie I have wanted to own it.  It is one of my favorites and I love the way Barbra Streisand sings!  The ending was sad but watching the movie was enjoyable
Choices. The opening scenes of a bakery and the violence that ensues draws you into a tangled tale of lust and survival. Not only does the director deal with difficult decisions, he seeks to draw on your sympathy for all humans caught in the clutches of love.As a young man runs from a bakery in fear of his life, a bloody handprint starts to fade into the future. We are taken into the present day as a woman and her husband walk home, arguing about life and seemingly insurmountable problems. Instantly you can recognize Giovanna's desire to be protected, loved and desired. She is unfulfilled and seeking adventure. To be honest, she is ripe for an affair mostly because her husband is not meeting her needs and seems to be lost in his own world of employment hell.Suddenly she is talking to the sidewalk, because Filippo is talking to an elderly gentleman (Davide) who is suffering memory loss. After taking him to the police station, they all end up back and the noisy apartment complex where people hang their clothing out the window. It is all so romantic.Then, we notice the facing windows. This becomes a focal point throughout the movie and is where most of the action occurs. Giovanna distrusts her husband's ability to look after the family, but it actually turns out she distrust herself and must meet Davide who will lead her to her destiny. He shows her how to transform her hobby into her life.The entire plot seems centered around choices people make to survive emotionally and physically. We see flashbacks of Davide's life and he also has many hallucinations due to his past experiences.The eyes in this movie are especially revealing. The director focuses on the eyes in many instances and the results are almost a terrifying intensity that I've never seen in any movie. The actors convey their emotions so well, it was stunning. There is one scene where Filippo is feeling his life is completely inadequate and the look on his face almost made me cry because you could imagine a man feeling that inadequate and desperate to not only please his woman, but provide for his family.The cooking is especially wonderful and kitchen scenes and chocolate cakes dripping with dark chocolate icing are delicious moments in the movie.In the end, we can see this is a movie about two individuals trapped by circumstance and overwhelming choices. Do they make the right choices in the end? Oh, the torment...and the beauty. I watched this four times in two days because this movie will take hold of your heart and I loved the kitchen scenes and Giovanna lurking about in her dark kitchen looking into a life she wanted to live.~TheRebeccaReview.com
Body Snatchers!. First let me say Contrary to popular belief this movie WAS NOT shot in a widescreen format, it was CROPPED into a widescreen format by the studio before release, having said that this movie remains a fine piece of 1950s si-fi highly enjoyable great pic on the DVD as well
Fun and Easy to Follow. Easy enough routine to jump right in and go at your own skill level (I got this a few months after having my baby).  Instructions are clear and easy to follow.  It was almost as if you were in a class at the gym with a good intructor.  I loved the pilates and yoga blend.  After the first workout I realized that it worked my core really well because I was sore the next day!  And I didn't even push myself overboard since it was a new routine!  Smart purchase
Another Film Hollywood WON'T make.. I scornfully mock the idiot schmucks in Hollywood who are too concerned with the aged 13 to 22 market segment to put out a decent adult film.This film can today only be made in France where they obviously understand that people older than 22 want to see good-INTELLIGENT- movies and will even pay money to do so. Go ahead Hollywood..keep making movies like "Miami Vice" and "Snakes on a Plane."Eventually, everyone will just stop going altogether, even the kiddies, and you'll have to try to make an entertaining film that doesn't insult the audience such as "The Beat that My Heart Skipped.
This is a must-have for all the Sherlock's fans out there. You must watch it. As a matter of fact, you must watch all the DVDs in the series. I love the performation of Jeremy. He sometimes can be a little too dramatic. Nevertheless he was the only guy who really captured the essence of being Sherlock Holmes. The maker of the series really put a lot of efforts in. You can tell by the elegant design of the rooms and costumes. Even the smallest detail was paid attention to
Cheyenne Social Club. I was very impressed with the quality of the product and the speed with which it was delivered
An absolute must for any He-Man fan. I wrote reviews for both the He-Man "Best Of" collection DVD, and the Season One, Volume 1 DVD, which were fantastic. I'll be stopping off on the way home from work tonight to pick up my Season One, Volume 2 DVD...and, call me a dork, I can't wait.Yes, I'm years removed from being that 12-year-old kid who flew off the bus after school to park his fat little butt on the chair religiously every day to watch "He-Man and the Masters Of The Universe". But, as the years go by, the memories fade, and thanks to the majesty of DVD, we can go back in time and enjoy guilty pleasures such as this wonderful show that consumed so much of my life.Some of my favorite episodes are on this DVD collection, most of which I have not seen since at least 1985. And, like what I experienced during my viewing of Volume 1, the memories will come flying back. It was so cool watching these episodes, and somehow remembering what happens. Once you hear that music, it's like being transported back to your youth. Isn't that alone worth the money?The treatment that this show has received in these DVD releases is nothing short of fantastic. From the DVD's themselves, to the artwork that they are packaged in. It's like 1983 all over again.Ohhh yes, my wife will ridicule and laugh at me for sitting around content, on my same fat butt, watching these episodes. But I don't care. Let her laugh. I'm enjoying myself.By all means, if you ever enjoyed this show, pick up these DVD's. I guarantee you will not be disappointed
why?. WHY...did he take his life? So much comedy and so unrewarded for it. Ricjard Jeni should have been a Comedy Central regular. His humor, from yeast infections being surrounded by helicopters, to pubic hairs escaping on a bar of soap, was incredible. His best bit, is the Belching Gourmet (not here).WHY...did he not recieve the accolades of much lesser comedians who reached fame? I watched every HBO special he did, and was hilarified.WHY...hasn't someone put together a collection of his cable specials?WHY...do I feel so bad he killed himself when I never met him? Because when I watched his shows, I DID feel as if I had met him.ANY DVD, VHS you can find, get it. Richard Jeni was not one dimensional like Sam Kinison, an icon, and deserves your laughter.
If you Love MASH... Alan Alda fans will love this movie.  Alda haters, stay away.  Alda is great in his role, as are Rita Moreno and an absolutely smokin' hot Bess Armstrong--and I mean en fuego.  Carol Burnett is so-so.  The story is great, and the script fast-paced.  Alda wrote and directed.Three couples vacation/spend long weekends together in each of the four seasons, accompanied by Vivaldi.  When divorce strikes one of the couples, much self-examination, mutual analysis, mortality fears, etc. occur.  Definitely a good movie.  And did I mention Bess Armstrong is smokin' hot
Not the best laid film, but it gets extra points for originality. I must say that 'Best Laid Plans' is in a league of it's own.  I have never seen a movie that took me for the turns this film did, and anyone who says that they guessed the ending is just lying to make their hatred for this movie resonate.  This film may not be perfect, and there are some boring scenes as they try to hard to explain the state Nick is in, but the overall plot of this film is one I've never seen done before.  From the opening scene in the bar when Reese enters till you find her chained up in the basement and she tells Nick "we're screwed" you start to realize that what you think you know, you don't...and thats the case throughout this entire movie.  From the start to the finish you have no clue who's involved in what.  When Nick (Nivola) makes the bad choice of stealing some dope with friends and his friends are caught he ends up at the bad end of the gun.  He has just a few days to get $15,000 or he's going to be worse than dead...Then his friend Brice (Brolin) moves back and Nick and Lissa (Witherspoon) come up with a plan, only it backfires, and then they find a way out of it, but that plan backfires and before you know it their back where they started, litterally.  THis movie, for all it's twists and turns and ORIGINALITY, while not being perfect still is a recomended film for anyone who wants to see something fresh and different than the normal popcorn munching drama.  4 1/2 stars
A Different Julie in Her Movie Debut. Charlie Madison (James Garner) is the king of the black market.  He is the attach for a Navy Admiral and his main job is to see that the Admiral and his cohorts are well taken care of.  Emily Barham (Julie Andrews) is a war widow who works with the military as a driver.  She is no nonsense and refuses to take advantage of her position.  But they fall in love anyway.Charlie's Admiral is having a nervous breakdown and its only a few days to D-Day.  He has decided that Charlie is to film the Navy invasion on Omaha beach and that the first man to die would be a Navy man.Charlie does not see any honor in death and tries everything to get out of the mission but as fate would have it not only is does he arrive on Omaha beach but is the first to be shot.When Emily finds out that Charlie is dead, she comes to realize what he was saying has merit.  But Charlie is not dead, just wounded and we have a "happy" ending.Paddy Chaefsky was best at satire.  This film is comedy with touch of satire.  This is not Chaefsky's best work but it is better than most other's best.There has been some controversy over the casting of Julie Andrews as Emily but that had to do with her other more wholesome roles to follow.  But looking at it 40 years later and Julie having diversified her portfolio, she was the perfect choice.  This was a typical James Garner role and he could do it with his eyes closed but he worked well with Julie, so it seemed fresh.This is a great anti war film that really is not an anti war film.DVD EXTRAS:Commentary by Film Historian Drew CasperAction on the Beach - Featurette on the filming of the invasion of Normandy (well Malibu).
Go Thumbs!. All the thumb movies are hilarious, with half the humor coming from how the thumbs look like. Thumb Wars is special because it was the first Thumb feature, and has the intro from Steve Oedekerk and the character with the "Most ridiculous name in the universe." Be sure to either rent it or buy it with Thumbtanic, because the feature is only 29 minutes long.I also highly recommend Mel Brooks' Spaceballs for other Star Wars fans
The Start of The Sitcom. I laughed so hard I nearly choked!  I've watched "I Love Lucy" countless times (people of a certain age were practically weaned on this show).  As I watched these early episodes, I saw how the actors and writers slowly created genius.  Here are the famous Vitameatavegime and Freezer shows.  But here are also some unique and odd gems that I truly don't remember (Lucy thinks she isn't married to Ricky!  The gang hold a s?ance.)  Simple, brilliant, classic, American humor.  Get and watch - just be prepared to laugh your head off
Say Hello to Tony. "Scarface" is the story of the rise and fall of Cuban refugee Tony Montana, who comes from the gutter and soon becomes a drug lord in Miami.  The look of this movie perfectly captures the excesses of the 1980s.  It's also a uniquely American film, a rags to richs immigrant story, albeit not of the typical American dream.Al Pacino plays Montana in an over the top performance.  Although not altogether souless, Tony has few, if any, redeeming qualities.  He's both repelling and mesmerizing to watch, with his obnoxious personality and utter lack of class or refinement.  Maybe this is why Pacino is so watchable in this movie.  He portrays Tony almost like a cartoon character, "the bad guy", as he describes himself, with his white suits, profanity, and, of course, the infamous scar over his left cheek and eyebrow. I don't know a Cuban accent, but Pacino chose his and kept to it throughout the duration of the film.Michelle Pheiffer plays the world weary Elvira, mistress of drug lord Frank and later the wife of Tony.  She's a gangster's moll, but a bored and discontent one.  From her emptiness eventually rises a loathing for Tony following a marriage that has stifled and disgusted her.  When she throws a glass of water into Tony's drunken, stoned face in the restaurant scene, she finally shows some self-respect by walking away. "How DARE you speak to me that way!" she explodes, previously dead eyes flashing with rage and hatred.  And then she leaves him, severing her pipeline to cocaine and all the trappings of drug wealth.  It's a gutsy and terrific performance.Not for the faint of heart with its violence, and certainly not for young children, this film is a stark journey into the dangerous, depraved world of drugs and crime.
The Three Faces of Eve. It is a good older movie, if interested in mental disorders
House rocks. i am not a sophisticated reviewer like many that review on amazon.  But for anyone who likes house, this is a must buy.  i got season one before it went up in price, and popularity, and will continue to collect the subsequent seasons to come.  these shows are fun to watch over again when there's nothing else on the 200 channels on the tv, on a rainy, or whenever you just need a dose of sarcastic humor.
Hilarious Movie - Must See for People Who Love Comedies!. If you loved Anchorman, 40 Year Old Virgin, or Old School, this is the movie for you.  This film stars the cast of The State (the hilarious sketch show on MTV from the 90's) - some of the members went on to Reno 911! and Stella.  These people know comedy.  The humor is random, silly, and unforgettable.  Paul Rudd is also in this (Anchorman, 40 Year Old Virgin) and he is absolutely hilarious - one of my favorite characters.  If you like to quote movies with your friends, do yourself a favor and buy this DVD - you will be quoting it for days
Strange?..............Not!!!!!. This video is quite good, even for us strange movie lovers. I love Alyssa Milano, and she does some of her best acting as Hugo. The strangest part of the film, is the part with Sean Penn, which to this date, I still have no idea why he was even in it. Why in the world would someone be drawing water, for a pool, from a lake?? The ending was not what I expected, but do give this movie a try. It'll be worth it!
Renee Taylor is # 1. This is the funniest movie. I just happen to find it while channel surfing. And I knew it was Connie Stevens as soon as I heard her voice.The adults in this movie were wonderful. The kids soso.Gina Malacici, the girl, was a rude brat. If it wasn't for the fact that they were the reason for the story line they could have been left out.Renee Taylor & Lainie Kazan were great. All through the movie I kept thinking of The Nanny & kept looking for Fran. But she wasn't in it.
"the hotest movie i have ever made" wayne said of this great action movie. i love this movie! wayne and jim hutton(tim hutton's father) make a good screen team as they fight oil well fires around the world,and each other the rest of the time.hutton marries wayne's daughter(the beautiful katherene ross) and they both try to get wayne and ex-wife vera milles. the action is great and the story has more than it's share of humor. kick back and enjoy this "hot" action movie
Not their best DVD. There were a lot of good points to this DVD. I liked the fact that it was a couple of exercises that worked the abs, then a couple that stretched the abs. It made the workout easier to get through. Some of the exercises didn't seem like yoga to me but more like cardio with sychronized breathing. One review said the music cued you. While that is true, I like that feature. It makes it so I don't have to watch the DVD, but I can just listen to the music and know what I should do (a good thing since this type of yoga should be done with your eyes closed). I do admit that the music selection in this DVD is a little odd and not quite as good as what they usually choose.The reason I gave this exercise four stars is because I didn't feel like I worked my abs very much. I just didn't feel a burn like you normally do in an ab workout and the next day, I wasn't sore at all. I only knocked one star off though because I know you can do more in the poses and make them more difficult. I've only done the workout twice and I usually modify the poses. I'm going to try the DVD again and do the poses as they're shown. Also, the stretches are absolutely wonderful! I'd continue to do this DVD if just for the stretches!Overall, the DVD is ok. I still prefer their Fat Free Yoga - Lose Weight and Feel Great and Ultimate Stretch to this DVD though
The Wonderboy music video alone is worth getting this DVD. I don't remember how many years ago it was but very late one night I was watching MTV or MTV2 and the Tenacious D music video "Wonderboy" came on.  I had no idea who they were but I thought the video was fantastic, visually & vocally.  I never saw or heard about the song or video again.  Back then, my attempts to search the internet for the music video came up w/the Michael Douglas movie of the similar name "Wonderboys."I remember watching the video that fateful night thinking, "hey, I've seen that guy before on that HBO program, Mr. Show."  Jack Black was a triple-threat even back then.  His performance on Mr Show was full of energy and his lead role on their take of Jesus Christ Superstar was over the top!It may have taken a few years but it's good to see the music video and even the making of it is now available.  The fact that Wonderboy is a Spike Jonze video makes sense.  I've enjoyed Spike's other videos & movies.I can't wait to revisit the video and check out the rest of Tenacious D at last.  To me, this is a win-win DVD.  Jack Black, Spike and Wonderboys music video all in one!
Please enter a title for your review. *contains spoilers*Nothing horrifying in this movie/episode, the one bloody scene is visually downplayed, but it's an original relationship drama. The main character Ida talks in a robotic voice which I didn't get used to until halfway through. The other four key characters are her fratboy laboratory co-worker who she gets along well with, their conflicting personality types never made into an issue. Her conservative landlady. The landlady's granddaughter. And her new girlfriend, Misty, whose arrival co-incides with that of a mysterious bug which was intended to keep Ida and Misty apart but ends up bringing them closer together when it impregnates both of them. How sweet.
Hidden Treasure. I love buying movies that no one had heard of, just by reading the box. This one was a true find. Very sweet hidden love story and an all around wonderful movie
Civil War. Great movie, great actors for such a sad part of the U.S. history ! It is great to see in this movie some men who really existed (especially "Stonewall" Jackson). We don't know if the personalities showed into the movie were really like this or if it is a pure fiction, but at the end of the day it's not very important, because the historical interest is preserved
A touching MOVIE. Notice I capitalized the word "movie" in the title of the review. The reason I did this is because it is a *movie*, not fact. While it is doubtful (although not entirely implausible) that the people whose lives Mr. Holland touched would be able to pull off a concert honoring the man like they did at the end of the movie, WHY should that detract from your enjoyment of the film? As Woody Allen said in ANNIE HALL, you can't get things perfect in life, so you try to get them perfect in art. Who the hell wanted to see Glenn Holland walk out of the school the last time dejected and forgotten? This is a man who gave up his dream (at first out of necessity but eventually out of dedication) to teach high school kids the wonder of music, and at the end of the movie he should walk out of the place for the last time thinking he's a failure? That is nonsense.As for his less-than-perfect character, it made him human. His profound disappointment at his son's deafness (something perfectly understandable, as he's a musician and wants to share his love of music with his son) is something he eventually comes to terms with (although it takes a long time) - yes, it's selfish of him to feel that way, but again, he's human. The moment when he figures out a way to communicate with his son using music is wonderful. As for comments about the place of the arts in schools, when Mr. Holland tells the school board that they're creating a generation of children who will not be able to think or create, he's absolutely right. There is a bankruptcy of imagination in this country, and cutting the arts is a big part of that problem.I myself enjoyed this movie tremendously and share it with everyone I can.
If you loved the movie, you will love this. I really enjoyed most of the cd. I would have liked some other songs to replace 2 of the remixes of the &quot;Dancehall Queen&quot; track. I jammed to &quot;Little and Cute&quot;, &quot;Joy Ride&quot;, and &quot;My Jamaican Guy&quot;. And the track &quot;Unbelievable&quot; reminded me of my husband! All in all, this was a great cd and I would buy it for a friend
A House Divided Will Fall, But This Film Soars!!!  On my 10 best list!!!. This is one of those small arthouse-type films that few have heard about, but should certainly see.  All too many reviewers on here have given away the entire plot of the film and that unfortunate as this story is also something of a mystery.  I will just tell why and how much I loved this film.The acting is so powerful and believable that your heart will be tugged in every direction and you will find yourself so moved by the difficulties each character faces and how each can be both right and wrong at the same time as right and wrong.  This story is about the gray areas in life as we rarely walk in absolute black and white.  I have never witnessed such moving characters who, like in real-life, make mistakes, compound errors, attempt to improve their lives even when they don't know how, and lose what the most want to keep or regain.The script has such believable dialogue that you will believe that you really know these characters.  The direction is very unobtrusive.  This film would have been disasterous in the hands of someone like Oliver Stone.  The music is compelling and the photography capture the mood swings of the story and characters beautifully.This is an awesome character-driven film that will haunt you long after it is over.  Both my wife and I wept while watching it.  It is an extremely emotional film and I couldn't more highly recommend it than I have
"I was promised seven bags of rice to turn you into mince meat and put you in a pie.". Based on a Japanese manga by Tetsuya Saruwatari, which developed into an animated series and finally this live action film, Riki-Oh: The Story of Ricky (1992) aka Lik Wong is probably one of the most comically gonzo, graphically gory features I've seen since viewing Peter Jackson's comical horror splatter fest Dead Alive (1992) aka Braindead.  Written and directed by Ngai Kai Lam (Erotic Ghost Story), the film stars Siu-Wong Fan (Supercop 2) as a young man with superhuman abilities who ends up taking on the sadistic leaders of a corrupt prison system.  Also appearing is Mei Sheng Fan (Year of the Dragon), Frankie Chin (Operation Scorpio), Yukari Oshima (Death Triangle), and Ka-Kui Ho (Once Upon a Time in China II).As the movie, set in the not to distant future of 2001 A.D., begins, we learn prisons have been privatized, and are run as franchised businesses, at least in Hong Kong, and we witness the arrival of a group of new inmates including a young, muscular man named Ricky.  Shortly after settling in to his new surroundings, Ricky runs afoul of a mid-level flunky/bully, who subsequently recruits a homicidal blimp named Silly Lung to dispatch Ricky in the shower.  Thing is Ricky isn't any ordinary schmuck, as he possesses superhuman strength along with powerful kung fu, enough to punch a hole through his obese attacker's guts causing them to spill out all over the floor.  This causes the sadistic assistant warden, a fat slob with a hook for a hand and a prosthetic eyeball, to take notice, enough so to order the Gang of Four, a group of powerful prisoners with awesoma skills who rule the inmate population, to take Ricky to task.  As Ricky stands up to the powerful and brutal leaders of the prison, the rest of the inmates start developing a rebellious attitude, seeing Ricky not only as their hero but their savior.  Things eventually come to a head as Ricky uncovers, and subsequently destroys, an illicit business being run from the prison, resulting in the Warden, who was on vacation, making the scene, with his fat, goofy, annoying son in tow.  More fights ensue along with some flashbacks, eventually leading to a full-scale riot as Ricky finds himself battling the warden himself, whose unorthodox kung fu is mighty to say the least.This film extremely violent, disgustingly gory, and actually, pretty funny, if you share a decidedly bent sense of humor.  A lot of the comedy comes from the ridiculous English translations of the dialogue, along with the outlandish, and often grotesque, situations that ensue during the fight scenes.  There's one scene where Ricky literally guts an opponent and the man, in his death throes, uses his own intestines to try and strangulate Ricky.  Perhaps one of my more favored lines of dialogue, taken from the English subtitles, comes as Ricky threatens the warden with the following exclamatory statement..."You'll die mutilated today!"Classic stuff...I can't wait to use that line at work...anyway, I learned a number of things from this movie, including the following...1.	If you're a wee, runty little fellow in prison it's probably best not to attack someone larger than you with a hand plane as they'll probably swipe it from you and use it to peel your face off, which, I'm guessing, is as painful as it sounds.2.	In prison deceased inmates are transported wearing handcuffs, as I guess there's a concern that they may come back as the undead and try to escape.3.	Severed tendons can be tied together in order to restore ones ability to utilize the affected limb.4.	Crows seem to really love eyeballs, especially ones knocked out of someone's skull during a fight.5.	Prison cell doors are rarely locked allowing the prisoners to come and go as they please.6.	Apparently a flute and a trumpet sound so much alike they can be mistaken for one another.7.	Keeping your prosthetic eye in the same glass of water that you drink from is kinda disgusting.8.	The hollow part of a glass eyeball is a great place to store your breath mints.9.	A leaf can be played in such a way that it sounds exactly like a flute...that is if you've still got your tongue.10.	Prison finks generally don't fare well behind bars as they usually end up getting their skin removed or having their head literally punched off.As far as the story, well, it's fairly dodgy as there's plot holes galore (some of them ginormous enough to drive a bus through), but the visceral action sequences (the head popper bit is worth the price of admission alone) are copious and spread evenly throughout enough so to have kept me distracted from such shortcomings.  Just to give you an idea of the brutality consistent with the film in one scene our hero is immobilized in a strange, rebar construct, and he's being uncooperative during the subsequent interrogation, which results in one of his tormentors shoving a fistful of razor blades in Ricky's mouth, taping it shut, and then smacking him viciously in the face.  I won't tell you what happens next, but it's truly classic.  All in all this is a spectacularly horrific film, certainly not for all audiences, but if you like your action extremely violent and cartoonish, your gore abundant, and your subtitled dialogue atrocious, then this one should be right up your alley.The back of the DVD case for this Tokyo Shock DVD release states the picture is presented in widescreen, with an aspect ratio of 1.85:1, but I'd say it looks closer to 1.78:1...regardless, the picture is fairly clean and comes across well, and the Dolby Digital audio, available in Cantonese, Mandarin, and English, is decent.  There are subtitles in Chinese and English, along with the original theatrical trailer, cast and crew biographies and filmographies, along with a text synopsis of the plot.  Also included are previews for the films Heroes Shed No Tears (1986), Last Hurrah for Chivalry (1978), Duel to the Death (1982), and Magnificent Butcher (1979).Cookieman108
Ask And Ye Shall Receive. No sooner had I finished writing a review of THE BORIS KARLOFF COLLECTION saying that someone should release THE BLACK ROOM on DVD when lo and behold here it is. The fact that it's being issued by Sony means that it will use the best prints available which is great considering how often Boris is badly served by substandard prints of his non-Universal films. Sony has already issued a couple of the Columbia Karloff "Mad Doctor" films on DVD (THE DEVIL COMMANDS, THE MAN WITH NINE LIVES) and while they were devoid of any real extras, the visual quality of the films was an improvement over the old VHS copies. This will complete the set and give us THE BLACK ROOM in the bargain which is the finest of the films he did for Columbia. Directed by Roy William Neill (known for the modern day Sherlock Holmes films with Basil Rathbone and Nigel Bruce) THE BLACK ROOM gives Boris one of his best acting opportunities in a double role as twin brothers one good the other evil (a triple role when you consider he also plays one brother impersonating the other). The other films are THE MAN THEY COULD NOT HANG, BEFORE I HANG, and a comedy THE BOOGIE MEN WILL GET YOU. Although I haven't viewed the set yet I assume that Sony will do the same for these titles as they did for the others with hopefully a few extras thrown in although it's a shame that they didn't include the previous two on a third DVD to have all the films in one package. So Karloff fans rejoice even more so than for THE BORIS KARLOFF COLLECTION as overall the quality of these films are better. Thanks to these, THE VAL LEWTON COLLECTION, and the British films THE GHOUL and THE MAN WHO CHANGED HIS MIND, virtually all of Karloff's 30s and 40s films are now on DVD. That just leaves THE WALKING DEAD which Warners should have issued in their upcoming HOLLYWOOD LEGENDS OF HORROR COLLECTION.... ADDENDUM: I have now seen the set and the picture quality is excellent. Unfortunately there are no extras whatsoever not even chapters for the various films
Lilo and Stitch and the importance of family.  Review by: Adam Platts. Lilo and Stitch is an animated movie that emphasizes the importance of family.  All of us lose loved ones at some point in time during our lifetimes, and we all face those solemn feelings of despair and loss that accompany the passing of ones we hold dear.  I did not expect to encounter such a powerful message when I put the DVD of a "cartoon" into my player and began to watch, but that's what happened with this movie as it unfolded and told the story of two sister's striving to keep their little family together.Mahalo,Adam Platts
Very Good!. I saw this movie a few months ago on an import dvd. I do have to say, the movie was great.Brad Renfro plays  Mark ,a rebelling boy, who knows something that he don't have to know. Susan Sarandon plays a lawyer who helps Mark. She did it great. Tommy Lee Johnes plays a Lawyer who want to ask Mark what he saw.You must watch it..
Criterion's Biggest set yet. This release is the largest to be released by the Criterion Collection to date. It contains six major films by Eric Rohmer and several short films too. It also contains a novelization of the 6 main films in the release.Disc 1 contains the film "The Bakery Girl of Monceau" originally released in France as "La Boulangre de Monceau" which is about a man who patronizes a bakery in Paris and befriends a young woman working there. The special features are the short film "Presentation, or Charlotte and Her Steak" "Prsentation ou Charlotte et son steak" in French, and "Moral Tales, Filmic Issues" a conversation between Eric Rohmer and Barbet Schroeder.Disc 2 contains the film "Suzanne's Career" released in France as "La Carrire de Suzanne" which is about two friends who meet a young woman and fall in love with her. The special features are Rohmer's short film "Nadja in Paris" in French as  "Nadja  Paris"Disc 3 contains the film "My Night at Maud's" known in France as "Ma nuit chez Maud" which is about a Cathoic man who falls in love with a woman he meets at Mass and them meet a woman named Maud who he has a long talk with. The special features are a theatrical trailer for the film, "On Pascal" known in France as "Entretien sur Pascal", and  an episode of the French program "Tlcinma" featuring interviews with one of the actors and some other people.Disc 4 contains the film "La Collectionneuse" which is about two friends who go on vacation inthe French Riviera. They share a room with a young woman. The special features are a theatrical trailer Rohmer's short film "A Modern Coed" known in France as "Une tudiante d'aujourd'hui", and an episode of the Canadian television program " Parlons cinema" interviewing Rohmer about the filmDisc 5 contains the film "Claire's Knee" known in France as "Le Genou de Claire" which is about a diplomat who become obsessed with the knee of a teenage girl named Claire. The special features are a theatrical trailer, Rohmer's short film "The Curve" known in France as "La Cambrure" a scene from the French TV program  "Le journal du cinma" with interviews of some of the film's actors.Disc 6 contains the film "Love in the Afternoon" known in France as "L'Amour l'aprs-midi" and also known as "Chloe in th Afternoon" which is about a married man who can't take his mind off another woman. The special features are a theatrical trailer Rohmer's short film "Vronique and Her Dunce" known in France as "Vronique et son cancre", and an afterword with Neil LaBute.This box set is comprehensive and contains many good films
A Proper Rememberance for the Best of the Best. Rory Gallagher was one of those legend musicians that was the absolute best of the best in the R & B music world.  The finest and most popular guitarists across this planet revered him as such during his career.  Up to the time of the release of 'Live at Montreaux', Rory Gallagher was never fully documented so one could view the progression of his music across decades providing the evidence for the respect that he and his bands generated. 'Live at Montreaux' provides that documented view with music he recorded on his first solo album 'Rory Gallagher' in 1971 to his last efforts just before his untimely passing.  This recording compilation will stand as testament to his greatness and a remembrance to the fans he left behind
Good stuff. This movie is a comedy/drama that is about a dull nerdy guy that doesn't have a snowball's chance getting a girl. A necklace suddenly changes all of that, and he goes on a wild ride to Turkey. This is definately good stuff from Bleibtreu. He does a lot more acting in this than Run Lola Run. I understand German pretty well, but there are a couple of spots that I went back and turned on the subtitles. The accents sometimes get a little thick from the cast of characters he encouters
Fresh is the word... This DVD totally covers pretty much everything you should know about the B-boy and B-boy culture.  As far as how it started, to where it stands today.  The interviews are raw, and to the point.  From the footage of the early days, to the present, is very well put together. It just, all flows.  Very fresh.  Also the special features isn't just a bunch of crap, which usually gets put on DVD's.  This DVD is way worth the price, and well wicked.  Buy It!  peace
Stark, harrowing, cruel and incredibly funny. "Nighty Night" is one of those programs that truly causes the jaw to drop, even for those of us who are accustomed to edgy comedy. It really keeps you guessing.I am a huge fan of "Strangers With Candy", and when I initially got into that, I thought... "wow, what a bizarre and politically incorrect concoction."  "Nighty Night" is politically incorrect in its own hilarious way, but it seems far more "out there" to me, probably because I was raised in the US.  Buttons get pushed in "Nighty Night" that simply don't happen in American programming, even on the raciest of cable programs.The writing is clever and the characters well developed. The acting is admirable, particularly on the part of Rebecca Front.It's hard to say anything about this show without giving it away, and it's a bit pointless to speak about it in really vague terms.  I'd recommend it without hesitation to anyone interested in quality, boundary-pushing comedy.  If you're easily offended, and you think "Friends" is the best show ever, you probably won't enjoy "Nighty Night"
Great DVD, Shame about the story. This DVD is worth the money just for the great "Sonny James" & the brilliant "Del Reeves" both singing a couple of their mid sixties singles. The other singers are a joy to watch with the possible exceptions of the two 50's sex bombs Mamie & Jane. I just skip to the songs & watch it in about 20 minutes
Big Review. The 1988 movie Big was about a 13 year old boy named Josh Baskin who changed to 30 over night. After being humiliated at a carnival by the fact that his crush is allowed onto a roller coaster and he's still to little he decides to go to a wishing game where he wish's that he was big. In the morning Josh wake's up as a 30 year old man, terrified his mother make's him leave the house. With no where to go he rents an apartment in New York and  gets a job at FAO Schwartz toy company where he quickly progress's up the ladder in the company. After being 30 for a while he begins to have feeling for his co-worker Susan Lawrence. He's then face with a huge decision to change back into a 13 year old boy or to stay as a 30 year old man. Susan persuades him to live out his childhood. So Josh and his best friend Billy Kopecki went to find another wishing machine to wish Josh little again. Once he returns to school there is a new girl who look's exactly like Susan but younger.Big was filled with comedy and made me laugh. I think it was one of the best movie's Tom Cruise played in and I'm not really a big fan of his. However it does give of the hint to kid's not to wish they were older because it might just happened. Overall I'd give the movie two thumb's up
I Usually Hate Ben Stiller Movies. I generally can't stand Ben Stiller movies.  They are usually far too crass for my enjoyment and I've turned more than one of his movies off early.  I'd heard good things about this from my wife's family over in England (having spent many years living in England my sense of humor slants in that direction and British humor IS different)  so I gave it a shot.  Zoolander has some really great visual moments (in the coal mine hiding against the wall covered in black coal dust and then opening those eyes and grinning) and lots of subtle gags about vantity.  David Duchovny as the world's greatest hand model "We're an entirely different kind of animal" was literally unrecognizable until he started to speak.Some of the dialog in the "tea party" scene was unecessary but it wasn't too offensive really.There are many momentary cameos in Zoolander, I'm sure I didn't catch them all.  I saw Billy Zane, David Bowie, Lenny Kravitz, Claudia Shiffrin (I think) and a bunch of other people I recognized but couldn't name.The scene at the gas station with the male models when a harmless game of flinging winshield washer fluid at one another escalates into playfully spraying/drenching one another with gasoline (with Wham's Wake Me Up Before You Go Go playing in the background) in an all out gasoline war...  I had tears in my eyes, it was so ridiculous, and laughed 'til I cried again when they showed the memorial fountain for the gasoline warriors at the "Zoolander School for Children Who Can't Read Good and Want to Learn Other Stuff"  Hilarious!  One of the funniest gag scenes of all time, really!Don't mind the professional critics and their bad reviews, they often get it wrong and did this time.  Yes it is over the top silly but in a way that will make you laugh yourself silly
The Amazing Grace. This is one of those corny, but charming, horror movies from the 1980s. It falls into the same category as Fright Night.  But there is one element in this movie that sets it apart and makes it truly worth watching: Grace Jones.  She gives  a totally erotic performance as a female modern-day vampire. Gedde Watanaber also gave a very funny performance as a rich Asian-American college student named Duncan.  Chris Makepeace and Robert Rusler were the stars, however, Gedde Watanabe and Grace Jones basically stole every scene that they were on.  It's worth your time to watch this movie
I've always loved this one. In the vein of The Matrix, revealing what's real and what's not is a great plot device. The Thirteenth Floor was a refreshing movie that really gets you thinking about one's perspective. This one's a keeper
Shed a Tear for Kindness. The initial episode, 'Chat!Chat!Chat,' is another attempt to put some closure on the Laughing Man mystery.  This time we are invited to a net discussion of the nature of the phenomenon, one which pursues many avenues, but never really pinpoints the 'enemy.'  Kusanagi voices the opinion that the latest outbreak was a composite of many 'stand alone' actions, inspired by the Laughing Man, but not orchestrated by him.  Is she right?  We may never know.'Jungle Cruise' is about a serial killer compelled to re-enact the gory killings he committed in wartime as a subversive terrorist.  Whether he is driven by training or by personal pleasure is unclear, but he has never shaken the onus of the war.  Batou, who served in the same war, was deeply affected when he discovered the activities of those trained to discourage the opposition.  Now he must confront his own demons and deal with need for final justice while he hunts the killer.The third episode takes us into a ward for individuals (mostly young) who are victims of 'Cyberbrain Closed Shell Syndrome' a disorder that is evidenced as a compulsive connection with the net.  In a way, these children are the future's equivalents of the autistic children of today.  But they are more than that, and when a hacking incident originated from the hospital Togusa is sent in as an undercover agent.  There he expects to find staff corruption, but finds something even deeper in the inmates.  Once again the laughing man makes a mysterious appearance.The final episode combines two themes.  Batou's tachikoma goes for a walkabout and encounters a young girl who is seeking a lost pet.  While the machine learns a lesson in the meaning of grief it discovers a ghost case which still has a resident.  In a curious parallel Kusanagi investigates the ghost and rediscovers her own ability to cry.One of the things that fascinates about this series is the care taken to make this a story about not only machines with personalities, but personalities who have machines.  The tenuous line, the presence of the ghost is often the only marker for human intelligence and spirit.  Nor does the ghost guarantee human behavior.  Instead, the human mind often flees into the machine or the net in an effort to find some freedom from their 'real' lives.While the initial episodes of this DVD are more in the typical Ghost tradition, the last two episodes pursue the conflict between multiple realities and possible consciousnesses.  The viewer is not asked to judge once, but many times, making the point that life has many possibilities.  In truth we cannot judge
Great Series comes to an end. Well if you have got to Vol.7 you probably know about the story anyway.  The music CD that comes with the deluxe version is quite good, the storage box is good for the whole series and fits the standard version dvd cases just fine.  The toy model that comes with the  deluxe verion is a little cheesy, like something that comes free with a box of breakfast cerial
Runaway . . . This is a downbeat film that threatens often to turn into tragedy, as a runaway teenager, with the ironically innocent name of Heidi, looks unsuccessfully for a place in the world and in other people's hearts. Loneliness, in fact, seems to prevail as characters reach ineffectually toward each other, often coming away empty-handed.Shot in winter in the mountains of New South Wales, where local ski resorts provide a tourist economy and a flood of young people looking for fun and casual encounters, the film brings Heidi together with a local boy who has troubles enough of his own and is running away from them with hard drinking. While he eventually rebuffs her overtures of affection, a new friendship with a convenience store co-worker is soured by the girl's father, and a motel manager whose son is doing time rents her a room but proves there are limits to her generosity.Beautifully filmed, with an effort to capure images of ice, cold nights, snow and fog to represent the isolation of its characters, this movie is a harsh story of the heart's hunger for love and acceptance. As such, it is an adult treatment of that subject and while there is a kind of resolution at the end, the dark undertones of a tragedy averted dominate the final images. The DVD includes a short making-of featurette
The Dirty Harry Collection-A Fan Review. This collection of the classic Clint Eastwood Dirty Harry role was excellent!!  Each DVD was remarkably clear and captured all of the elements of the big screen.  I have thoroughly enjoyed each of the five films.  This was money well spent on a good entertainment investment
The End of the Affair. Deborah Kerr an excellent performance, heart felt emotions of the timeing of this movie explored! Van Johnson a deep pull from his own life's expereice was performed in this movie. Very enjoyable from start to end!
The Hindenburg. A superb video that should definitely be reproduced in DVD form
Excellent movie. If you enjoy scientific investigation, a slow paced scenario, and mystery, this movie is a total success. I was riveted on my seat from beginning to end. Splendid. Not a movie for action-lovers or brainless jerks
A Good, Fun And Entertaining Vampire Flick!. All is not well in Santa Cruz, California. "Lost Boys" is fun and entertaining vampire flick that doesn't take itself too seriously: And this is shown with the use of comedic moments throughout the film. When Michael (Jason Patric) encounters a young girl (Jami Gertz) he falls for; there is more to her past than he realizes. With her friends, led by the leader (Kiefer Sutherland) of these new friends of Michael, things turn a bit ominous. They are not your typical teenagers out for a good time. The film centers on Michael and his new friends, and whether or not he is worthy enough to be a member of this new band of friends: A group of friends with a dark secret.An outstanding and delightful cast make this film a notch above your average teenage fare. (Corey Haim), portrays the younger brother of Michael and he is funny throughout the film. The cast is rounded out by (Diane Wiest) as the distraught mother of these two young teenagers; Bernard Hughes, who portrays the enigmatic grandfather who has lived in Santa Cruz for quite some time: And knows more about his town than the film lets on. Further, he is very low key about past and present events in his town. However, it is the portrayal of Edward Hermann [I won't give away his role] as the man who is seeking out Diane Weist as a wife, that gives the film it's strange turn of events. This is a lighthearted vampire flick: Not serious but entertaining and well worth the watch. Recommended.
One of the best movies about Vietnam. Based on a true story; Location; Vietnam in The valley of the death. Lt. Colonel Moore leading 400 American troopers is surrounded by 4000 North Vietnamese soldiers.Amazing combat scenes, costumes and weapons with perfect graphic authenticity, making this movie stands apart from all the Vietnam movies ever filmed before.The casting, the dialogue and colors are amazing as well; not to forget the perfect acting of Mel Gibson and Sam Elliott.I have seen all the war movies about Vietnam. In my opinion, `We were soldiers' is one of the best that came so far. From all the aspect described above including the historical side, this movie is a must own to all collectors of this genre.
A Classic. The title says it all, I think this movie is a classic.  A good yet strange strange movie that strated a very crazy animated cartoon show
Better than usual remake. Whereas many remakes of beloved films stumble and fall, this "Father of the Bride" shines in its own right.The wonderful Steve Martin steps into Spencer Tracy's shoes (no enviable task)as the harried and worried father of the bride, George Banks.Diane Keaton is lovely as Nina, George's wife and mother of the bride.  She provides the grounding voice of reason to George's hysteria, much as Joan Bennett's Ellie did in the original.Kimberly Williams is simply a breath of fresh air as Annie, the bride (taking the place of Elizabeth Taylor's Kay). Her enthusiasm, excitement and joy over her upcoming nuptials simply jump off the screen.George Newbern as Bryan, the prospective groom, is solid and he proves to be as stable to Annie's excitement as Nina is to George.Martin Short as Frank the wedding coordinator is priceless.  His theatrics and mannerisms alone make this movie worth watching.Kieran Culkin is appropriately cute as Annie's younger brother Matt.The best parts of this movie?  The sheer comedy. Martin's Banks is far more comedic than the more stoic Banks as played by Tracy - - Martin doesn't even need to speak, his expressions are priceless by themselves.  Martin and Keaton also share a witty and comfortable banter that was not expressed in the original (where Tracy and Bennett slept in separate twin beds, as was the custom back in the 50s)  The genuine love and affection between Annie and Bryan is also more evident in the remake, versus the almost too-proper courtship of Kay and Buckley in the original, where Kay announces she is marrying as if she is announcing an upcoming test or rainstorm.That aside, though, the Tracy version seems somehow more solid and honestly touching than the remake. Without the comedy masking the true feelings, we can feel the honest pain and sadness that Tracy's Banks feels at losing his only daughter.Additionally, the money angle plays a larger part in the remake.  We understand that Martin's Banks owns his own company (a sports shoe manufacturer) but $250 per head? And a pricey wedding planner/coordinator?  Whereas the original film dealt with Banks' fear and confusion over the financial aspects of the upcoming wedding, the remake really hits home how costly everything is - - if you want to travel first class, that is.Overall, the message is the same as in the original.  Father loves his daughter, who he only wants to be happy, even if it means relinquishing her to another man.
One of my favorite movies of all time. I'm a 22 year old guy, and I love this flick, it's great family fun, and Even I like it haha.  It's got a ton of adorable animals and a pretty good story line.  A must have if you have any kid under 13 years old, or just dorky kids like me!
Great Routine!. I'm back on this page because this is the third time I've bought the DVD's and am back buying them for my friend who just had a baby.  After reading some of the reviews below I figured I'd chime in.  Yes, so obviously they shot them in a small dance studio somewhere, not a TV set or beach.   Fact of the matter is the routines are awesome and not devoid of personality like some other squeaky clean made for the day time TV crowd videos.  Not to mention they are real workouts.  For a full work out I do the advanced dvd, my boyfriend sweats like a dog - but I'll tell you this is the only yoga video he agrees to do with me and things have only gotten better in the sack since.  Even the beginner video which I bought for my mom, you break a sweat yet beginners can do all the yoga and feel the benefits fast.  Now mom is doing the intermediate video and dad seems happy!  Go figure.  I love these videos!
This Is What Got Me Into Monty Python. Man, some of my all-time favorite skits are in this wonderful compilation here.  For some reason, the Monty Python crew decided to re-do the skits, so instead of being in their original form, the skits have slightly different sets and costuming, but (thankfully) the masterful dialogue is not altered in any way.  I guess the crew felt that the original skits weren't 100% true to their vision, so they made a few changes to match their original intent.One of the many stand-outs is the Dirty Hungarian Phrasebook, where a poor hungarian man thinks he's asking for cigarettes by when he says, "Drop your panties Sir William."  Another is the marriage counselor who flirts with a man's wife because the man's to sissy to do anything about it.  Still another is the accountant who wants to be a liontamer, provided that lions aren't much different from anteaters.And of course you'd expect the classics like the Dead Parrot Sketch, Nudge, Nudge, the Lumberjack Song, and last but not least the Upper-Class Twit-of-the-Year, which happens to be the appropriate finale.My personal favorite sketch is the Expedition to Mt. Kilamarjaro, where John Cleese sees two of everything unless he covers up one of his eyes.  I also get a kick out of the sketch where people fall out of high buildings.This movie here contains the best writing from some of the best comedians to ever walk the earth.  It's a real treasure in every sense of the word
A Classic. I first got hooked on William Powell from watching the Thin Man Movies.  His acting style and personality fit the "rich man posting as a butler" genre perfectly.  His mannerisms, and speech would fit either role in life.  Carol Lombard to me always seemed like a breath of fresh air.  Eugene Pallette adds a little humerous touch to every role he plays.  The entire cast play their roles perfectly, and make for some humerous as well as warm moments. I first saw this movie on a DVD I purchased in a "thrift bin" in a retail store.  It was fuzzy and had the usual spots that most old movies have.  Even so, it became one of my favorites.  When it was released in a colorized version, and had been "cleaned up" and enhanced, I jumped at the chance to own it.  I would highly recommend this movie to anyone who a William Powell or Carol Lombard fan.  And if they are not fans, they should be after watching this movie.
Someone actually read the book!. For anyone who appreciates when classic literature is read and respected, this version is for you.  This version, unlike most other versions, actually follows the book.  And, in my opinion, that more than makes up for some of the movie's shortcoming of having been obviously low-budget.  I have since purchased other children's classics from these producers and have yet to be disappointed.  While they may not have the huge budget to have perfect production quality, they respect and adhere to the story as it was written -- something I believe my children will thank me for someday
American Slapstick. EXCELLENT DOCUMENTARY ON CHAPLIN WITH INTERESTING MOVIES AND ESSENTIAL INFORMATION TO KNOW BETTER THE WORK OF THE GENIUS OF CHAPLIN
Wickedly Funny. This movie is really entertaining, and so funny. I heard of the original black and white movie. but this was a nice little gem. its a shame they dont have the movie soundtrack to it. I'd go out and buy it in a heart beat.
I"ll be seeing you. Great wartime story with so much heart. They don't make them like this anymore. Ginger Rogers plays a different kind of role then you're  use to seeing and she pulls it off great.
A New Convert! I'm A Believer!. I have become a new fan of this series recently, and it is by watching season one. I was very surprised how well done this series is. It is so good, I couldn't stop watching and I have watched about seven episodes a day. So I finished this season really fast. The acting is excellent and the stories are always interesting with a twist in almost every episode. I like how this season reveals more and more background stories to the characters we were introduced to in the movie Stargate. This is a must have for every sci-fi fan. I'm just sad that I didn't become a fan sooner, this series is fantastic. I haven't seen the other seasons yet, but I can't wait to start watching season two. If this is considered to just be an average season by fans, I can't wait to see what's to come because I know it will be awesome. Get it! You will love it
Es muy buena. Es una de las pocas secuelas que me gusta, por lo general las segundas partes no lo son. Sobre todo la introduccion que hace el DVD sobre como sigue la historia despues de que Vin Diesel escapa. Excelente!
Excellent DVD Teaching Blends, Vowel Teams, and Silent 'E'. My son has every Leapfrog DVD and they're all *excellent*. Code Word Caper is no different, showing children long vowel sounds, how the silent "e" changes a word, vowel blends, etc.This DVD explains how that although there are 26 letters in the alphabet, there are far more sounds than just 26.Through an engaging caper at the Complex Word Complex, Tad, Leap and Lily learn about A, E, I, O, U and sometimes Y. At the Silent E Machine, it's explained that the silent "e" makes the first vowel say it's "name". For example, cap and cape, pet and Pete, hid and hide, hope and hope, cut and cute, dim and dime, not and note. There's a fun song reinforcing this principle with lots of examples.Then, at the Ch-Sh-Th Sound Machine, the youngsters are shown how to make blends and how they sound, e.g., chin, chat, ship, shop, thin, and think. Using another fun song, children are shown how consonant combos form blends: "First you take a letter C then you add a letter H--put them both together and a whole new sound you make."Lastly, Code Word Capers demonstrates "vowel teams"...when two vowels are "stuck" together. For example, oa, ea, and ie. An excellent song (whose lyrics were once on either Sesame Street or the Electric Company...I remember it as a kid!) says "When 2 vowels go walking, the first one does the talking". So the first vowel says its name in a vowel team. E.g. team, tail, leap, pay, pie, goat, boat, bee, and see.My son really enjoys this DVD and it wasn't long before he was singing the songs around the house! Code Word Caper has helped him read consonant blends, vowel teams, and words with the silent 'e'...the results are very noticeable.I highly recommend this DVD for children who have mastered short vowel sounds and 3-letter words and are ready to move on to more advanced Phonics
Hilarious, and the cameos make it even better. It's a funny concept to begin with, and Stiller is hilarious. Then you throw in Rip Torn (probably the best film Judas, among his many credits over the years), and these cameos that are out of control (Shatner, Armstrong, Norris) and you've got a comic classic.
Childhood classic. I first watched this movie as a kid in the 80's, and practically wore the old vhs copy out back then. It was great to find it on dvd and relive the memories all over again. This movie has a little bit of something for everyone. Also of note is the pioneering CG special effects used in this film.. (the environment mapping on the spaceship). Groundbreaking for the time..
80's Movies Fan. TEX was a great Movie,I own THE DVD..A must See IF You're Matt Dillon's Fan :)
Candy Cane hearts Rusty Nail. Joy Ride with Paul Walker and Steve Zahn is the ultimate horror/thriller flick of 2001. They play brothers in the film, one is a nice well-rounded college boy and the other is a bad apple who just got released from jail. They embark on a road trip, they play a mindless little joke on a truck driver and well the joke backfires on them. This film was written by J.J. Abrams who created t.v. shows, Felicity, Alias, and most recently, Lost. Great fright fest, gotta check out this under-rated gem
Perfect antidote to "The Last Samurai". As real as "The Last Samurai" was false.  Better than any documentary in showing how far modern Japan has fallen from the mythological high point of bushido.  A hard honest look, from the viewpoint of alienated Japanese schoolgirls, at a society without any real reason for existing besides accumulation. I love Japan, and I'm sorry to see it going down the tubes (though, quite honestly, when I'm in Japan, everything seems fine -- but then, the people I associate with aren't teenaged schoolgirls).  Perhaps enough honest self-criticism of the kind embodied by this film will turn things around before it's too late. Children are the future.  If children don't see one, then there isn't much hope. "Bounce Ko Gals," a very similar film with a much bigger budget, is also worth seeing, but more "Hollywood" than this one.  I'm soap-boxing, but the film doesn't. Very entertaining despite its (hidden) moral, and the guerilla film-making technique adds to the sense of veracity
Can I give it 6 Stars?. An excellent movie, The Last Castle, brings to the screen the story of a highly decorated three star general (a legend among his peers) that finds himself in a military prison after disobeying an order that led to the death of eight of his men in Africa.  Things become a bit complicated when the warden decides to start a personal vendetta with the general in what can only be described as a power struggle that will shake the very foundations of the prison...Robert Redford (!), James Gandolfini, Mark Rufallo, and the rest of the cast, have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are outstanding to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)! Very well written and very well presented, it allows for a highly entertaining movie that can be watched over and over again!The setting, the plot, and the dialogues, are all wonderful!In short, The Last Castle is a movie definitely worth watching and one to seriously consider adding to your movie collection (if you haven't done so already)!
A John Woo &quot;Made for TV&quot; movie. The violence is toned down (no bloody gun battles here) and the story is not as dire as other films by this director/producer but the film still is very good. The action sequences are well choreographed and everything still has that &quot;Woo touch&quot;
"Road to Nashville". The quality of the film would normally rate a lower score, but I actually remember seeing this same sort of film quality on the silver screen at  movie theaters.Believe it or not, it wasn't that long ago that we went to theaters which actually charged admission to watch  first run motion pictures that were not in digital quality nor in full-surround high fidelity sound.The main shortcoming of this DVD is that there was no information about the cast and the performers.The film could have been renamed Road to Nashville History
GREAT ADDITION TO THE SET!. Have them all now-- a complete set.  Liked the 'extras
A perfect show. A wonderful moment in the careers of two fine singer-songwriters. The 9 new arrangements of Elvis's tunes by Allen are nothing less than a revelation. Both performers play within their respective comfort zones and obviously have a love and mutual respect for each other and their music. The Imposters and the New Orleans horn section augment each other impressively. This must have been one of the highlights of last years Montreal Jazz Festival and is a must own for any true fan of Costello or the remarkable Mr. Toussaint! Highly recommended!
A great addition. The episodes are not that great, but they are not horrible either.....it is still entertaining and astonishing to see how the show had evolved since 1989. there isnt a lot of humor really, and the animation/voices are comepletely different then it is now...but what do you expect, even mat groening admitted that they didnt really know what they were doin
Charming little film. For those unfamiliar with Grard Depardieu, GREEN CARD is a charming introduction. Good performances from both Depardieu and Andie MacDowell, and Bebe Neuwirth is delightful in a supporting role. When things get "unfair", the reminders that the central marriage of convenience is illegal are refreshing.The DVD is presented in 1.85:1 anamorphic widescreen with both English and French Dolby 5.1 audio tracks. No extras, but even so an excellent bargain
so funny. This is probably the funniest movie I've ever seen.  Seriously, if you have a sense of humor, you will enjoy this movie to the fullest. Heck, I'd even watch this movie instead of some afternoon delight.  Maybe even with some afternoon delight.  It's that good.
The best Batman movie ever. Tim Burtons Batman is the best Batman movie ever and one of the best super hero films of all time. Jack Nichlsons performance as the Joker is one of the best I have ever seen. If you have'nt seen this film you need to rent it and than youll probably want to buy it. This film is deserves to be a classic. I suggest this film to any one who loves movies filled  with great acting, action, and cool gadgets. If you plan to buy this movie I highly recommend the 2-disc collectors edition. If you like this Batman I also recommend Batman Returns. Batman is not a film for younger children trust me
a fine giallo. The opening ten minutes are a little rough, with an overdose of crash zooms, distorting lenses, clunky dialogue and poor model work. After the first story twist, however, the film becomes a superior giallo, worthy of comparison with Bava and Argento. Director Sergio Martino stages some strong set-pieces, displaying a visual flair only hinted at in THE STRANGE VICE OF MRS WARDH. It's possible Dario Argento saw SCORPION'S TAIL before making DEEP RED, as some scenes are remarkably similar (check out the murder in the theatre). There's even a bold female reporter, who helps unmask the killer at great personal risk. While DEEP RED is the better film, Argento owes Martino a debt or two. George Hilton is a solid lead - is it his own voice on the Italian soundtrack? - and spaghetti western regular Luigi Pistilli adds a touch of class in a rare good guy role. The plot twists are satisfying, though the photo blow-up trick was well parodied by Mel Brooks in HIGH RISK.
Spicier... Wow, the more I see of this series, the more I love it. There have been many good parts before in the series, but these four episodes are where things really start picking up. You learn dark secrets and Ed and Al's loyalty to each other is tested. This DVD really allows the series to shine. I warn you though, the last episode on the DVD ends in a huge cliffhanger, leaving you howling for the next one
Donny Osmond - Live at Edinburgh Castle. I enjoyed this DVD so much!!  I can't get enough of it!!  His performance was spectacular...he sings like a dream and his voice gives me goose bumps all over!!  I love you Donny!!
who could ask for anything more. The bubbly and energetic Deanna does it again.She sings dances and entertains you from an era long gone.Each movie is enjoyable and fun watching.Her voice is captivating and outstanding.I just lov e watching her on the screen.The quality was terrific.If you are a Durbin fan dont miss this collection
She jives by night. I've been writing downbeat reviews lately, so I decided to write one about one of the five funniest movies ever. Just to answer the obvious question, the others are Monty Python's Meaning of Life, South Park:Bigger, Longer, Uncut, Seven Year Itch and The Bank Dick.The reason this one's so good is because of Howard Hawk's direction, a super sharp Wilder-Brackett script, Gary Cooper's innate comic timing (sadly under used in his career), Barbara Stanwyck's second best comic role of her career (The Lady Eve was a role to die for) and a boatload of wily character actors.The premise stems from eight professors spending several years writing an encyclopedia with the help of a willed grant that has them all living under the same roof of a NYC mansion. One day a garbageman (Allen Jenkins) enters their sheltered circle with some eye-opening questions and Prof.Potts (Cooper) realizes his three weeks of compiling slang is obsolete. He decides he must leave his austere surroundings to learn the language of the street. This decision is met with much apprehension by his seven older associates. He braves the street all day recruiting a wide array of slang-savvy consultants. He winds up in a night club featuring Gene Krupa and Sugarpuss O'Shea (Stanwyck).I think my favorite part of the movie is when Potts goes backstage to recruit Sugarpuss and she tries to give him the brush. Well, pretty soon we've got a wild mix of sex and academics and gangsters.It's sweet without being syrupy, it deals with mores without being sanctimonious. This is a neat trick that is very rarely achieved and makes this always funny movie better than the rest. Also, for me, it has the funniest ending ever.Boogie
An Early Showcase For Ollie. Norville Hardy (he added the Oliver later in honor of his father) began his film career in 1914 in Jacksonville, Florida where he appeared in literally hundreds of films. He was known as Babe Hardy because of his babyish face (the famous toothbrush moustache would come later). By 1920 he had come to Hollywood as a member of Larry Semon's stock company. In the early 20's Semon was a big comedy star known for his outrageous gags that were carried out on a grand scale. Two of Semon's comedies on this disc THE SHOW and THE SAWMILL (with Hardy as the principal villian) bear this out. In 1925 Ollie was teamed with diminutive comedian Bobby Ray in a clear precursor to the Laurel & Hardy films. In STICK AROUND they even wear derby hats. In 1927 on loan out from Hal Roach, Hardy made the amusing CRAZY TO ACT for Mack Sennett. But it was with Roach that Hardy would find steady employment and eventual screen immortality when he was teamed up with Stan Laurel. That was in late 1927. In 1926 he appeared with Laurel in 45 MINUTES FROM HOLLYWOOD. Both had supporting parts to star Glenn Tryon (who?). 45 is also noteworthy for the last film appearance of silent screen vamp Theda Bara who has a very brief cameo as herself. There are eight shorts total in this collection and it's great to have these examples of early Oliver Hardy as it gives us the chance to see him develop the Ollie character that we know so well. This is part of Kino's second installment in the SLAPSTICK SYMPOSIUM series (Charley Chase and Harold Lloyd are featured once again in the other two offerings). The prints from Lobster Films are very high quality and the piano accompaniment by Eric Le Guen serves them well. Perfect for fans of silent comedy and/or fans of the duo. Others shouldn't have too bad a time of it either
Modern masterpiece!. Karl (Billy Bob Thorton) is a mentally challenged former killer that done a serious crime 25 years ago has been released back home. While he's there he meets and befriends a young boy (Lucas Black) and his widowed mother (Natalie Canerday) whom has trouble with the abusive boyfriend Doyle (Dwight Yokem) as it suddenly remindes Karl of his horrific past.Brilliantly acted and original drama that is a thought-provoking and well-written movie that moves the viewer and made Karl one of the most memorable screen characters ever that ranks up there with Raymond Babbit from "Rain Man" and Forrest Gump plus it made Billy Bob Thorton a star. The film co-stars John Ritter as a gay store owner, Robert Duvall as Karl's long lost father and J.T. Walsh, the film is a powerful and sad film experience that i strongly recommend! it's always been an all-time favorite of mine.This 2-Disc Collector's edition has the never-before-seen director's cut with audio commentary by writer-director-star Billy Bob Thorton with great extras like interviews, a featurette on Billy Bob's road to stardom, a Bravo profile featurette on Billy Bob and reviews of the movie.If you like movies then get this 2-Disc special edition! highly recommended movie
IT IS STILL A GREAT SHOW. IT IS STILL A GREAT SHOW I HAVE SEASONS 1 - 3
One of Neil's Best Works Yet!. This performance was just so well done.  It was very emotional, entertaining, expressive and gave me a better appreciation for Neil's music.  His introductions to the songs were great - they help the viewers/listeners achieve a better understanding of his songs and their meaning.  I highly recommend it
great movie. this is a very funny movie, steve Zahn is his usual antic self, great supporting cast.  can't keep this movie on my shelf, people 'borrow' and never return
Excellent show, but bad package pricing. This is one of the best shows I've seen in a while. If you buy both seasons seperately, you would save some money because Amazon has priced the package higher than if bought seperately.
Dude, Wheres My Car?. Alright, this isnt the funniest movie to come out. And all the 1 star reviews, I dont bother to read. This movie was funny when I first seen it. I have the DVD. Its just REALLY stupid, and it makes it hilarious. Like when the dog was high, tell me that wasnt funny? I was rollin. This movie is funny from  beggining to end trust me. Just give it a try, rent it at first to try it out. If it dont make you laugh, then you need to lighten up. Both the main actors in this movie, are known by everyone, and they can be funny. In this movie they are really stupid/funny. When they get captured by the nerds, wow, I was literally rolling, it was hilarious at how they acted. It has good stuff in this movie, just check it out. Its really worth the watch!
I HOPE THIS HELPS!. THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE DO NO LISTEN TO ANYBODY INLESS THEY HAVE 5 STAR REVIEWS 'CAUSE THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE
Normal Life. Based on a true story because no fiction writer could make it believeable. Well worth the time
A Wonderful Film About Faith And Charity. Millions, a film directed by Danny Boyle, of 28 Days Later fame is an uplifting tale of a child's faith and new found fortune.  The back drop of this film is a new housing development on the eve of Great Britain's conversion from the Pound to the Euro.  Young Damian, played captivatingly by Alex Etel, misses his deceased mother and is fascinated with saints and heaven.  His older brother, Anthony, played with as much charm by Lewis McGibbon, just wants to move into the family's new house and get on with life.  Damian has visions, visions of saints.  As young as he is, he seems to have memorized Butler's Lives of the Saints.  He hopes to find out if his mom is doing well in heaven.  He is fixated on the eternal, unlike his older brother.  In all this money literally falls out of the sky, during a conversation Damian is having with a cigarette smoking St. Clare of Assisi, right into Damian's cardboard playhouse.  That is where the fun and trouble begin.  Damian shows the money, almost $250,000 in Brit Pounds, to Anthony.  Damian sees it as a sign from God that he is to do good works of charity.  Anthony sees it as luck and an opportunity to buy whatever he desires.  Will faith win out over fortune?  Well, that is the journey in this film.  Millions also presents us with a fine supporting cast, James Nesbitt as Ronnie, the boy's father.  And Daisy Donovan, as Dorothy, who we are not really sure we can trust.  This is a great family film, for any time of the year, and should not be pigeon-holed as a "Holiday" film.  This little film is well deserving of 5 stars
Amazing. I'll keep this short. If you are a baseball fan (you're a dying breed) then you will love this. This series magically takes you back in time to a place where the game was played for sport and pride and not money. Before free agency there was a thing called respect. Baseball helped to make hard times a little easier and to forgot lifes troubles for awhile. Buy this DVD and show your children what sports used to be. What men used to be
Ballet Russes -- a real treasure. I realize that the DVD has not been released yet -- but, I did see the movie with a group of friends several times.  We all agree that this movie is a treasure and have been anxiously awaiting its release on DVD.  Every one of us will purchase it the day it comes on the market.....
What a movie. More hong kong action from the greats.  You really should see this movie if you're into hong kong action.  The shoot outs are great, and the action is incredible.  I also really love the story.  Also, you can really see alot of John Woo's tradmarks appear in this movie, like the use of dove's and religion.  A great movie
moe DVD is good but the same show on HDTV was better. All it all, I really enjoyed this capture of a moe event.  One thing I should note, I have previously seen them on HD TV and recorded the show on my set top box.  The quality of the show on HD TV was/is excellent particularly the video portion.  I then bought this DVD and discovered it was the same show.  I noticed to my surprise that the quality of the video on the DVD didn't hold a candle to the same show that I recorded off of HD TV.  It's not my gear since I have many rock shows on DVD that are of phenomenal video quality.  Did someone at the production company cut costs on this disc?  Seems like it to me.  Still, a great show.  Buy it anyway
BUY IT! A MUST HAVE!. Seinfeld is great on itself, but adding those extra few things make it even better. You are able to surround yourself with Seinfeld. The episodes are unbelievable, the script is great, characters are memorable. There is no way you can beat this. Jerry will never get away from the show, neither will Jason Alexander, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, and Michael Richards. This show is definately the best show of all time.
Love the Lt., not the Misses. I'll continue to buy these series; that is how much I enjoy Columbo, but "Universal", I'm not interested in the Extra item that you have included. No offence intended to Kate Mulgrew, but in the world of Columbo fans she's not even divorced from this Lt Columbo but another police officer of the same name; this Lt. Columbo was never divorced, ie seehttp://www.columbo-site.freeuk.com/mrsc.htmIf you think there's a market for it then release the "Mrs" series separately. Why are you unable to include some real extras of interest to fans of the Lt. in these collections ?Even the website, "ColumboDVD.com" (small print on the back cover), has the bare minimum:-Fan Sites: Links to 4 very good sites !-Home: 3 pictures (one of which is the Season 4 DVD box)-Synopsis: EMPTY-Cast: EMPTY (???)-Bonus Features: Lists the Mrs Columbo episode
Good for toddler. I purchased this video for my 2 year old.  [...] it could've included a bit more, but I haven't seen anything better out there for young Tots.  My daughter loves the "1,2,3,4,5,6,7 where is my friend" song.  Very catchy.  I figured if she learns all the vocabulary introduced, it would've been worth the price.
Phenominal show. I rented this DVD and wasn't really looking forward to watching it, but this past Saturday afternoon I stuck it in the DVD player and only got up to go to the john till it was over. Ms. Stritch is just amazing in this show. I'd seen her in films and on TV on occasion, but this performance puts them all to shame. Her story about understudying Merman is just a riot. Her Judy Garland story is wonderfully funny, as is the story of her Rock Hudson dating. She's sad in recounting the story of her husband's death and in relating her long, long battle with alcoholism. Her name dropping stories are in turn funny and sad. The songs are great, even though you can tell the years of booze and cigarettes have certainly taken the toll on her voice. Her innocence in the early days of her Broadway career, and even as late as the early 70's in Company when she didn't know who Mahler was, is just amazing. All in all, Elaine is just a force of nature and this video should be watched by all lovers of the Broadway theater. A great companion piece to this would be the DVD of Company:Original Cast Album. Her efforts after a 15 hour recording session to do Ladies Who Lunch and failing is just heart breaking.This lady is one of the greats of theater and is well deserving of her living legend status
NOT SO MERRY CAMELOT. When watching this excellent film, one must remember that this is a military prison, so one wouldn't expect the usual let's break in the new kid's butt or stab someone in the showers.  THE LAST CASTLE makes sure the viewer understands that even if these guys are criminals and incarcerated, they are still soldiers and deserve the dignity and respect any human being deserves.  It is the commandant's downfall that his lack of respect for anyone other than himself ushers in a new regime.Robert Redford is very good in the role of the General Irwin.  At first, he seems reticent and willing to serve his ten year sentence, one that he realizes is justified.  James Gandolfini brings a smarmy arrogance to his role as the commandant who smoozes all over Redford on his initial meeting, but then when Redford makes note of the fact that Gandolfini has never served time out on the battlefield, Gandolfini's jealousy prompts him to treat Redford just as he does everyone else!  When several inmates inform Redford of some highly suspicious deaths, he decides to lead them in a takeover of the prison.The supporting cast is brilliant: Mark Ruffalo, Delroy Lindo, Steve Burton, Paul Calderon, Samuel Ball, Jeremy Childs, Clifton Collins jr. and Brian Goodman among them.Director Rod Lurie (The Contender) keeps things going and the climax battle is a doozy!A wonderful film that is both inspirational and thought-provoking.  I liked it very much!!
Wonderful Family Movie. I first saw this movie when I was only 3 or 4 years old and could have told you only that it had a really cool tree house in it if you asked me about it yesterday.  I happened to see it at the video store yesterday and have always had a good feeling about the movie, so I ended up getting it and watching it again.I'm glad I did, because it's a wonderful, well crafted movie from Disney Studios.  It's amazing how many images stuck in my mind from that movie when I first saw it years ago.  Ernst trying to ride the ostrich, the logs rolling down on the Pirates, the rescue of the animals from the stricken ship on the reefs, and yes, that amazing tree house.Yeah, it's a little sugary sweet, and made in a more innocent age.  But it's a Disney movie and it never was meant to be anything more than entertainment for the whole family.And in that it truly suceeds
Daylight Bombing of Tokyo!. This is the true story of the Doolittle Raid on the Japanese home islands just after Pearl Harbor. 16 B-25 bombers under the command of Col. Jimmy Doolittle take off from American aircraft carriers off Japan and bomb numerous Japanese cities. They fly on to China and are eventually sent back to the States. Several crews were shot down or crashed and were captured by the Japanese. Based on the Book of the same name. The raid did little damage but was a huge propanganda success in the USA. Stars Spencer Tracy as Doolittle, and a very young Robert Mitchum. One of the very best of the WW2 movies. Don't miss this one..!!
One of John Woo's best!!!. This classic Hong Kong flick is one of John Woo's best films!!! 2 sequels followed!!! This is the first and the best of the series!!! The action is intence!!! Anchor Bay did a top notch job with this DVD!!! I'ts in 16:9 Widescreen and has multiple language tracks and great subtitles!!! Some trailers and production notes round out this awesome DVD!!! Two thumbs up!!! A
Two Classics of Epic Proportions. Even with all the Austin Powers movies and such, Wayne's World still seems to be some of Mike Meyer's greatest work, and no one else could possibly play Garth Algar except Dana Carvey. Together they created a comedic duo that connected with Gen X with their constant catch-phrases, parodies, puns, and gags (not to mention characters -a naked Indian?). Sure, some of the humor is more related to pop culture over a decade ago, but for some reason the movies seem almost as fresh as they were when they came out some 12 years back.I bought the pack for $15 at my local Circuit City, and I must say that has been one of the best purchases I have ever made value-wise as far as DVD's go. Not much is given in the special features, but for $15 can you really go wrong on two classic comedies? Didn't think so.
Very dark - very scary. Se7en is one of the best thrillers ever made, and if 12 years later you still haven't seen it then you have missed a fantastic film.Its a simple story - two detectives start investigating a series of murders that increasingly seem to relate to the seven deadly sins - Gluttony, Greed, Sloth, Pride, Lust, Envy and Wrath. As the film progresses the film gets darker and darker, and its only at the very end that detectives, David Mills (Brad Pitt) and William Somerset (Morgan Freeman), realise that they have been pawns in a bigger game.The cast, which also includes Kevin Spacey and Gwyneth Paltrow are very good and the script is brilliant. Take nothing for granted in this film. Believe me if you haven't it already seen the film, the ending will leave you fairly surprised (I think thats an understatement!). The director is David Fincher who also made Fight Club and Panic Room.The film is grisly and quite repulsive in places. Although described as a mystery-thriller on the back of DVD case it has enough unpleasantness to be classed as horror-horror. So don't buy if you are easily spooked, or have a weak stomach!The extras on the 2 disc special edition are well worth watching and amount to another 163mins worth of material
A Movie With A Quiet Intensity. Bruce Willis and Samuel L. Jackson star in this movie, and M. Night Shyamalan is the director and filmaker.  I love Shyamalan's work, and also recommend The Sixth Sense, which he also wrote.  This movie may not be better than The Sixth Sense, but it is better than The Village and Signs (also by Shyamalan).  It quietly advances leaving you wondering where the impact is going to be, then you see it and it is significant, interesting, and sometimes intense.  If you watch with a careful eye, you will get the most out of this film.  Be patient; you are in for a whammy of an ending
Real-life portrayal of a hearing child with deaf parents. Once again, we have what should have been a wonderful movie diminished by a totally unnecessary sex scene.  Also, there was no point (related to the story) for Aunt Clarissa, after her husband moved out, to have a new man in her house in the next scene.  Other than those incidents, it is a fine move.  The 9-year-old Laura is a real sparkler.We knew a couple of sisters who were friends of our daughters whose parents were deaf, and we found little Laura to be very much like those girls.  It is a great movie to show children how the lives of some of their friends can be very much different from their own.  Then, to teach them that, unlike some of the kids in the movie who were mean to Laura, if we understand the friend's life from his or her point of view we can and should be nice to them.  This movie gives a real feel for the experiences and unique frustrations of a hearing child of deaf parents.The movie is pretty much the usual child finally wins the approval of a disapproving parent story.  Therefore, the main value of the film is that this child has very different obstacles to overcome that can help kids understand and accept "odd" classmates.  I'd give it an 5-Stars on that basis if it wasn't for the unnecessarily thrown in scenes that go contrary to traditional values
Absolutely The BEST version out there.... This live-action musical version of the beloved &quot;Little Red Riding Hood&quot; story by The Brothers Grimm is a must see/have. The songs are fun and absolutely addicting and the acting is very good.My favorite song is &quot;Never Talk to Strangers&quot;. The movie elaborates on the original story by adding more plot to spice the story up. The story goes as follows: A baroness whose husband dissapeared in a war years ago lives in nice house in the woods with her daughter,Ninet(a.k.a. Red Riding Hood). Ninet's evil uncle has taken the throne in her fathers absence and now resides in the castle while the baroness chooses to live a simple life. But the heartless uncle wants the Baroness to be his wife and does everything within his power to make it so. When all his attempts fail,he employs the help of a werewolf named Dagger to get rid of Ninet so that she does not poison his name to her mother. It's realy a good movie,and the DVD has crystal clear picture and is in surround sound so that you get the complete theatrical experience. The original Cannon Movie Tales trailer makes a nice bonuse feature as well. The only downside is that the movie is in fullscreen and there is no widescreen version. I know a widescreen version exist because the German DVDs contain that version. But this is forgivable because of the high quality picture and sound. I give this DVD five stars! Now, if only they would release the other Movie Tales in the series..
Costs Less Than A Movie Ticket with large popcorn!. I've seen some of these at art cinema houses 30 or more years ago-the prints were no better;they aren't bad by a long shot.if you love cinema (i mean the art of film) get this collection!Owning the DVD with young Kirt Douglas & Barbara Stanwick in  "Mrs--" is alone worth the cost of the set.The "bonus" of 30 film noir historical trailers is not a film historians grand history-but is worth a viewing
I am not a romance fan... I am not a romance fan... but this movie still remains in my top 50 list. And, I must admit, I cry at the ending, everytime.The acting, direction, editing, and cinematography are all excellent, a rare feat.I guess it is the story that gets me the most. If you have watched "Roxanne" you might recognize the plot.
This does happen to women. The story is around a woman who decided to work in the mines so she could give her children a decent life. Men didn't want women there. They felt it was jobs being usurped by them. They used sexual harassment as a tool to get them to quit there jobs.I found this difficult to watch since I filed a lawsuit (and won) again the factory I worked at where the men got paid more than the women for doing the same work. Fortunately, I didn't have to endure that kind of harassment (but I was harassed occasionally). I don't think I could have handled it. This kind of treatment even if it's not on the scale she dealt with does happen.Then the fact she had to go to court where the scrutinized her sexual background really made me angry. It's just not right that women had to put up with this injustice.I don't know how much is truth or fiction. It's "inspired by a true story". But it rings of emotional truth and that's what's important. I recommend this movie if you are a contemplative person.
An Intense, Absorbing Ride Through One's Mind. In my personal opinion (less than an hour after first watching it), I have determined that I have just finished another of many film tasks; to find something unique and striking, and discover a new perspective on a certain level. But this 'something' is also extremely well made, and deep; it's also incredibly sad, and visually grotesque (a few scenes made me recoil, a rare enough occurance for a man who owns at least 300 DVDs, and has seen countless films with more gore, and even more gratuitous carnage). It is also one of the very best films I have ever seen.The film is about a man named Peter Winter (played by Peter Greene [if you don't know who he is, slap yourself]), whom was recently released from a mental hospital for reasons unspecified. From then on he makes a journey of sorts to find his daughter, Nicole. Of course, if the film was merely about a sappy kind of father/child reunion, I would have stopped watching mid-way and called it a night, but there is a very huge problem with Peter. He is a schizophrenic, a man whose brain functions almost like a car radio, tuning in signals, noises, and bizarre voices, all displayed aurally in juxtaposition to the visuals (the effectiveness of this audio technique is so disturbing and enthralling that even David Lynch's personal sound man could not better it's precision). This not A Beautiful Mind. There is no easy way out, and there is no solution for his problem, and the film makes it a point to show you why he acts the way he does. After a while, the effect becomes so oddly familiar, that when, in one scene, Peter's actions are separated from this horrifying noise, we chillingly see the reality of his situation. The only way Peter can (temporarily) relieve himself of this horror is best left for you to find out. If you have a weak constitution, or stomach lining, then consider this a film to avoid, to dread. One scene is of such stunning depravity that it may very well make you leave the room in a state of uttter shock.Seemingly, in a decade which was known for being upbeat (both to it's credit and sizable detriment), this little puppy dropped out of the sky in 1993 and stunned whatever few people were fortunate enough to hear it or watch it. I implore you, be one of those people.
Dabbling in the Desert. To be sure, this 1936 David O. Selznick production has a very tame storyline, bland even, by today's standards. But what it does have is Marlene Dietrich, Charles Boyer and Basil Rathbone and a steller cast, with beautiful music and some of the best Technicolor ever produced. It's well worth having as an example of Hollywood color filmmaking at its best.
Shame. I thought this last release was quite bitter sweet, as we know what happened to the NewlyWeds,and it wasnt "happily ever after". Not as enjoyable as the first 3 seasons, but if you are a fan of the show (as I am) you will still find it entertaining. I had to chuckle when, on Valentine's Day, Jessica told Nick (sitting in a restaurant with the cardboard heart she had made for him) : "here you are still sitting with your heart on". Wasnt that the problem - he always had a heart on but she wasnt always in the mood for it? :-
If not the greatest, then the most original thriller ever put on film. "Memento" eclipses everything which preceded it, and set the bar so high it may never be topped.  And all for $5 million in production costs.Director Nolan does a remarkable job of juggling the complex plot elements, but sabotages himself with some of his rather ordinary visual schemes.  I refer you to the diner sequence in which characters portrayed by Guy Pearce and Joe Pantoliano converse over soup.  Given that the film was shot in Panavision's 2.35:1 anamorphic process, the scene would have played more effectively if Nolan had simply planted his camera for a medium shot of two skillful actors as they provided plot exposition.  Instead, Nolan intercuts between close ups of the two, which is a method more typical of and appropriate for the narrower aspect ratio of television.  Close ups work best when used judiciously and to provide emphasis.I mention this only because this is how detailed I have to go in order to find fault with the film.  If I didn't know better I would swear that Pearce is an American actor--his accent is that authentic.  All of the performances are convincing and it's always fun to see "Eve 6" (Harriet Sansom Harris) from that great "X-Files" episode.This film is proof of the morally bankrupt notion that movies have to cost $200 miilion or more.  I am SICK of ugly, witless, loud blockbusters which are polluting pop culture.  If the choice is to spend that sort of money making a movie...or allow the movie to go unmade..."Now, where was I?
A WEEK IN THE LIFE OF A COKEHEAD. Having lived through the cocaine 80's, I can assure you this flick hits the nail on the head. Forget about getting up and going to work tomorrow, where's the party? Humorous, compelling, and sad, with a marvelously redemptive ending. I'm not a big fan of Michael J. Fox, but I have to say this is the biggest role, in a small film, of his entire career. Forget TEENWOLF, this is great acting. Especially compelling is his soliloquy as he reassesses his marriage while he's swinging around a wine glass and bouncing off the walls of his living room. Great stuff. The funniest scene is when Sutherland is looking for coke in the dust of Fox's apartment and takes a freeze to the gums. Wow. Been there, done that.If you think the book was better than the movie, think again. The screenplay was written by the author, Jay McInerney. So it actually resembles the novel. Nice job.And those of you who think this is a stretch for Fox, think again. Michael had his own coke problem which is what drew him to this role in the first place. Great job, Michael. I think this the most mature performance of your career. Best of luck to you, brother. Sutherland is great too.And yes, I'm in total agreement with previous reviewers, this begs to be rereleased in widescreen.Don't be fooled by the lackluster reviews for this flick, it's one of the best films ever made about being lost in addiction. Hope this brings up the reviews a little. IT'S A WONDERFUL FILM
Interesting Movie. My husband and I had seen the movie several times before I ordered it from Amazon. We never get tired of it even tho the movie is of a different sort! It has love,murder and lots of things to keep you interested. It isn't a movie just for the girls but I would keep it to adults or older teens
A Highlight of Tony's Career. Wasn't this the movie that made Cary Grant the most money, the most successful Grant film, and the one that broke the record for consecutive weeks at NY's Radio City Music Hall?  After a recent re-viewing, I can see why, although it is hardly Grant's best.  In fact, I don't suppose it even approaches his Top Twenty.  For Tony Curtis, it's a different story.  Tony, signed for most of his studio career to Universal, didn't really get much of a chance to develop his full potential, and except for oddities like SOME LIKE IT HOT, THE VIKINGS, and SPARTACUS, most of his films were pretty much dreck.  (Think of all the classic directors whom Janet Leigh worked with, and then ask yourself how did Tony fail to take advantage of his status as #1 USA leading man.)  But OPERATION PETTICOAT does give you an idea of the kinds of things Tony was best at, and kudos to the young Blake Edwards for writing him such a good part with page after page of surefire comic situations and stage business.Had the script been filmed ten years later, well, Grant wouldn't have been in it of course, but I think the times would have allowed more of the full implications of Tony's character's sleazy promiscuity to emerge; here the sexuality is tamped a bit by the submarine setting and the general Radio City atmosphere.  Wasn't Cary Grant even the least little bit annoyed by playing a script in which he would be basically the old fuddy-duddy like James Cagney in MISTER ROBERTS, with Tony as the playboy, the signature Cary Grant role?  In fact OPERATION PETTICOAT must have been trying for some of the "Everyman" service comedy of MISTER ROBERTS, it has the same febrile energy and, in his awkward introduction of servicewomen and other female stereotypes, something of the same drab fire; I imagine women enter both films only to suggest that there wasn't any hanky-panky between Cary and Tony because no way could either of them have been gay.Dina Merrill is appropriately icy here, as though she knows she's not really welcome, she's just there to allay suspicion.  I love her look, but she's no Grace Kelly, that's for sure, and human warmth is as far away from her range as working-class solidarity
Promises kept!. This is a sexy romp from the 60's and it is a really a lot of fun.  The movie has a number of nude scenes of Jayne at her most voluptuous.  I'm also looking forward to seeing the photos that were not used in the original Playboy spread.  They are supposed to be in with the bonus features
A real treat for fans of "Alias" and "24". I liked but didn't love the first two MI films.  The first was artsy but somewhat convoluted and not well-paced.  The second was exciting to the extreme, but bloated, pretentious (e.g. the signature John Woo doves) and lacking any sort of subtlety, as we've seen in other Woo films (e.g. Face/Off).MI:3 feels completely different than its predecessors, thanks to the writing and directing of JJ Abrahms, the creator of "Alias" and "Lost."  You can see his style all over this film.The best way to describe MI:3 is this:  The first half is like a really, really good episode of "Alias," but with a $50 million budget.  The second half is like a really, really good episode of "24", but with a $50 million budget.  If you like both of these exciting TV shows, I am pretty sure you will like MI:3 a lot.I know Tom Cruise has lost of lot of folks' goodwill, with the couch-jumping hysterics, his totally out-of-line comments about Brooke Shields' post partum depression, and other high profile screw-ups.  It would be totally understandable if you didn't want to bother with his films anymore.  But I respectfully ask you to cut him a little slack, just for 120 minutes, just long enough to enjoy this film.  It's worth it, trust me!
IF YOU'VE SEEN THE 1ST ONE BUY THIS!!!!!!. This is a must have the price is not bad and you willl laugh from start to finish, but you should see the first full metal panic if you haven't already because you will understand it better. The first one is half comedy and half action this one is like 80% comedy and 20% action
inuyasha. my daughter absolutly loves inuyasha she can't wait to get the others to complete her set she watches the show every chance she gets
Side Splitting Laughs. From the first time I saw these guys on Blue Collar Comedy Tour: The Movie, I instantly thought they were funny.  Bill & Jeff were their usual hilarious selves, Larry was ok.. his voice sounded a little off but Ron, wow... did he even pack on the pounds!  I think all that drinking fattened him up and took away his ability to be funny.I thought this installment easily was up to the level of the rest of them, and that end bit with the photos was the funniest end bit of all of the shows.  Each of the guys' comedy was right on and had me laughing endlessly.  In this one, all four routines were well spaced and perfectly long enough to be fully satisfied, plus the material seemed very fresh and new. The finale was also absolutely hilarious in seeing old photos of the guys from years before. Some of them were obviously doctored by a computer, but the guys' reactions to them were great. This was an awesome movie, the Blue Collar boys hitting a home run in their last at-bat. Overall, a must buy!
Pretty good despite cheesy title. It's 1961; the USSR has finally finished its nuclear powered submarine and is ready to deploy it off the East coast of the United States for the purpose of...brinksmanship? But hold on, there is a problem; the Soviet Union is staffed with incompetents!!(one of communism's most odious flaws is that it does not inspire the common man to excel). The menacing black submarine is doomed from the get-go. It leaks, and it is cobbled together with substandard parts. After heading out to sea, there is a problem with the nuclear reactor and several men must go in for repairs wearing only chemical suits because the warehouse was out of radiation suits. The men receive lethal doses of radiation, but unfortunately the doctor doesn't know anything about radiation sickness...he is only giving them aspirin. Before long radiation begins to permeate the ship. The entire crew is in danger. The officers are of two minds - some want to save the crew at the expense of letting the submarine fall into the hands of the Americans, while others want to save face for the Soviet Union even if it means a lot of men will fall sick or die. As the submarine becomes more and more disabled, as men stumble from the reactor room vomitting and shaking, as the commanding officer repeatedly refuses help from a nearby American destroyer, as the submarines's food supply is deemed too contaminated to eat, the dread of the crew is really palpable. This movie was very suspenseful because I had no idea how it would end. Definitely worth your time
Scattered at times, but a great start to Tyler's big screen career. When this movie came out, I was very much against it. Another man in a fat suit? Didn't we already have a little too much of Eddie Murphy in his second Nutty Professor flick? And Martin Lawrence working the fat suit too? A couple of women friends of mine saw this movie, and I ended up going to see Madea's Family Reunion in the theatre and being very pleasantly surprised. I finally got around to seeing this on DVD and I have to give props to Tyler for having enough vision to take his "chitlin circuit" musicals to the big screen.The hooks draw you in. You immediately care for the black woman wronged. Madea's get mad and get even message from Tyler Perry in his fat suit. Tyler Perry as Joe cracking about Madea's "refrigerator in her behind". There's always a laugh around the corner.What makes this film a little stronger than I expected was that it successfully draws on messages of black family without being aimed at a purely churchgoing audience. Sinners will smile a little bit more at some of their churched relatives. Saints will be moved by the struggles for salvation and forgiveness in the movie.The plot is not always tight. There's a bit of heavyhanded foreshadowing at times and there's a sideplot with the lawyer's crack addict wife that probably adds some unnecessary running time. Still, I give Tyler credit. This is first time out of the box and I think that he learned a lot from this movie in making an even stronger Madea.Tyler's an amazing entrepreneur and a caring playwright who makes a bold move in this movie. Check this one out and strongly consider buying it.4 stars--S
Urban Revenge Western. Evelyn Mercer served as a foster parent for years.  During that time, she only found four children she couldn't place with adoptive parents.  Bobby, Angel, Jerimiah, and Jackie Mercer all lived with Evelyn in her house till they were grown, and she saved them from much harder lives than they would have had.  Bobby is still a hardhead and a fighter.  Angel pulled a stint in the military, but remains a man of violence.  Jerimiah became an upstanding businessman and overextended his grasp.  Jackie was pure rock and roll.  One November night, Evelyn was gunned down in a convenience store.  Her sons come back to Detroit for her funeral and stay for revenge, having to stay one step ahead of the police to get the job done.  While fighting the bad guys, they also have to fight each other and find a way to pull together.Mark Wahlberg (INVINCIBLE, THE ITALIAN JOB) plays Bobby Mercer, putting together one of his street-tough roles that he does well.  Tyrese Gibson (2 FAST 2 FURIOUS, ANNAPOLIS) plays Angel.  Andre Benjamin (Outkast) stars as Jerimiah.  Garrett Hedlund (TROY, FRIDAY NIGHT LIGHTS) plays Jack.  Terrence Howard (IDLEWILD, GET RICH OR DIE TRYIN') plays police detective Green.  John Singleton (2 FAST 2 FURIOUS, BABY BOY, SHAFT, BOYZ IN THE HOOD) directed.Definitely leading with an edgy revenge western feel, FOUR BROTHERS stands up, takes names, and kicks butt from the beginning.  The relationship between the four brothers feels real, not forced, and they seem to have a history together.  The pacing keeps the story moving along and introduces enough twists and turns and oddball characters that the viewer doesn't really know how everything is going to turn out.  The revenge motif will get answered, but perhaps not in the way that's expected.  The Detroit surroundings look real, and the chase through the snow was a great bit even though it was ultimately pretty simple.  Enough of the story was hidden to keep the viewer guessing the whole way through.  Chiwetel Ejiofor stars as Victor Sweet and is one of the hardest and most menacing villains on the screen lately.FOUR BROTHERS definitely isn't family fare.  It's more of a good buddy flick and a guy film.  The violence, swearing, and no-holds-barred intensity might jar some viewers who don't expect it, but viewers looking for an action movie with a little something extra will enjoy this one
CSI: is the best. I love CSI: and anyone who likes CSI: this is a must have. I find watching the DVD's better because you don't have commercials. This DVD set has every CSI: episode from the first season plus a whole bunch of extra material including a music video for Who are you performed by no other than The Who and some behind the sences fotage. So buy this set. Thank
Lords of Discipline. The movie keeps one interested throughout.  It is fast-paced and gets one to think about how we treat other human beings.  The actors are believeable in their characters.  I would highly recommend this movie
Carly Simon - A Moonlight Serenade on the Queen Mary 2. I'm a big Carly Simon fan and was definitely not disappointed. Wish I had been there with a rented tux,and a few bucks, to take it all in
I can't believe some of these negative reviews. What's the matter with some of you people?   This was simply just a fun film to watch.  No seriously intricate story, and no offensive content.  It is truly a latina "babefest", and who wouldn't enjoy that?  Just like the director Linda Mendoza said:  Her intention was to make a film simular to the typical american comedies of the sixties, where everybody looks good all the time, some scene-linking animation thrown in, and some split screen scenes where two people are talking to each other (on the phone) at the same time.  I truly appreciate her intentions on how she made this film.  I hope Linda Mendoza does another film with the same chemistry.Roselyn Sanchez, Sofia Vergara, Jaci Velasquez, Lisa Vidal, and various latina unknowns make this film long-lasting, fun-filled, eye candy!If gorgeous women and slapstick comedy doesn't interest you, then perhaps you should avoid this film.  Maybe you should stick to watching "Star Trek" or watching long-winded, grainy, black & white World War II documentaries or what ever else it is that you enjoy that makes you different from normal people who know how to laugh and enjoy the simple things in life.Films like this promote "libido awareness", and I'm all for that!  You know, I still have a pulse. I'm not dead yet!
All The Kings Men - 1949 VERSION. Our son worked on the 2006 version of All The Kings Men with Sean Penn, Jude Law, Kate Winslet, Patricia Clarkson and Anthony Quinn.  I ordered the 1949 version as a Christmas Gift.  It was interesting to see the differences between two movies made 57 years apart.  I was glad I was still able to get a copy of a 1949 movie through Amazon.com.  The 1949 version had some good points for the time it was made. It is my understanding that Steve Zallion, Director and Screen Play writer of the 2006 movie read the novel by Robert Penn Warren but did not see the 1949 version before writing the screen play or directing the film.  We liked the 2006 version better and didn't think it received enough credit.
Bring on the Odaiko:  One Earth Tour vs. Live at the Acropolis. This CD/DVD concert far surpasses "Live at the Acropolis" in presenting Kodo in their element -- live performance.First of all, it is a complete concert, presented start to finish.  It isn't cut up at crucial moments by interview snippets.It also conveys the intensity of Kodo.  A decade after "Acropolis," "One Earth Tour" shows a more seasoned, serious, and focused Kodo.  Gone is the smiling pageantry of Kodo the folk ensemble.  Kodo is no longer here to win you over to Japanese percussive traditions.  Enter the dumbfounding -- even intimidating -- virtuosity and physicality of an older, wiser, frighteningly intense Kodo channeling hundreds of years of tradition into a thunderous pulse that leaves the viewer/listener speechless
A Landmark from a Genius. Here is a work of poetic and cinematic genius, released in 1957, and now re-released by Criterion in 1999, which, judging by all the reviews on Amazon, still creates awe, wonder, and gratitude in its lucky viewers. Nothing here has become dated because, like all great art, from Homer to Shakespeare to Tolstoy to Joyce and on and on, this work holds up a mirror to life itself. In fact, as time goes by, this movie becomes more precious. In "Nights of Cabiria," we find ourselves in the society of Rome's pimps and prostitutes as they haunt the evening plying their trade. Cabiria is an independent, refusing to fall under the sway of a pimp. As the film unwinds, almost randomly Cabiria's struggles to stay alive and to find some semblance of decency and sincerity in this inchoate world tumble before us like a dream. From the opening scene, where Cabiria, in thrall to love, is tossed into a river by her boyfriend and robbed of 40,000 lira, to the penultimate scene where again she is shocked into despair, we see the crazy juxtapositioning of eternal hope with bitter reality, exquisite beauty with hideous misery, and the joyful music of humanity with the sad tears of lost love. What resonates so truthfully is how terrible people and life can be but how ever-resilient and relentlessly hopeful the human heart remains. This true spiritual message is delivered even as these "sinners" search for a miracle from the Virgin Mary but find nothing but their own futile yearnings for a better life. Fellini, the creator, saw it all.Giulietta Masina delivers an utterly brilliant performance as Cabiria. She embodies Cabiria's comic bravado and loving soul while at the same time giving full expression to her cynicism and despair. This performance is one of the greatest you will ever see on film. So many emotions pass through her in flashes and bursts that it is a wonder to behold. The extra features on the Criterion DVD permit the viewer to have a deeper understanding of Fellini's creative process, although a long interview with Dominique Delouche, Fellini's French assistant, is not as enlightening as I would have liked, nor is the sequence with Dino De Laurentiis. However, it's terrific to watch an excerpt from "The White Sheik," Fellini's first major movie (a flop), where Masina makes a brief appearance as Cabiria in a night-time sequence and, with another prostitute, attempts to comfort a jilted husband. Masina was wonderfully physical as an actress and does a lovely little dance in this scene. Her dancing in this movie too is fantastically comic and joyful, a lovely thing to behold.No question that this movie will endure as long as there are people who are moved by true art. Its message is eternal, its vision rejuvenating.
Loved it. I very much enjoyed this movie.  Unlike some others, I didn't think it was too long, or the English subtitles mysterious, or the Africans shallow.  I particularly liked that for once an African character is central to the story, and more than just decoration.  Sure, he was "just" the cook, but the extent to which the family came to respect, rely, and TRUST him made him part of them.I won't describe the plot, as that has already been done by many reviewers.Having lived in Kenya, I have to say that the European actors did a fine job with the Swahili, considering they were just memorized lines.  Their delivery was natural, with the obvious caveat of the heavy accents.  But even so, they all spoke like they understood what they were saying.I also thought this was a most unusual Holocaust movie and, while ever present, the Holocaust is not bashed over the viewer's head.  It was a good balance.Furthermore, the characters were all pretty complex; the director could easily have fallen into superficial cliche, but did not.  The love between husband and wife is frequently complex and conflicted, and this was illustrated artfully.If you like films about Africa, or complex, real-life type of love stories, or are interested in a virtually unknown aspect of the Haolocaust and WWII, this is your film.
River... I am a teen boy and I can relate to River Phoenix.  He is hot and great in this movie about a sexually frustrated teen. Matthew Perry stars as his "friend". A good teen movie from the 80's. River, you are missed...:
Doris Does It Again. Without the charm of Day,this film would fall flat,however it is not the case with this musical.Doris plays showgirl Ethel 'Dynamite' Jackson,who is mistakenly offered the chance to appear in a cultural show in Paris.(Her  letter was mixed up with Ethel Barrymore's) It is up to a bumbling  Politician to rectify the situation,and he finds her in the show 'It Must  Be Good',and he is smitten with her. She ends up going after all,and they  get married on the boat to Paris,despite his being engaged to his boss'  daughter. The songs include 'April In Paris,'It Must Be Good',and 'Paris  May Oui'
Prison, Football, and Life. THE LONGEST YARD is usually billed as a football comedy, but the movie is actually a drama filled with comic moments centered around a very unique football game.  In 21st Century U.S.A., I think we've forgotten how tough and horrible prisons used to be.  Prisoners back then didn't have the amenities and luxuries that most prisoners have nowadays.  In the 1970s people didn't want to go to prison, especially those who had already been there.  Remembering the historical setting, helps put the original THE LONGEST YARD into perspective.Burt Reynolds stars in the film as Paul "Wrecking" Crewe a former NFL star quarterback who was banned from the game for life after he was caught shaving points.  Crewe is not a high-quality individual and he would not have made a good role model.  He's a very selfish person who views women solely as objects for his personal desires and to sponge money out of.  After a drunken argument with his girlfriend, Crewe goes on a driving rampage where that ends with him assaulting a police officer and wrecking his girlfriend's car, a Mazardi.  He's sentenced to prison where the warden (Eddie Albert) wants Crewe to coach his semi-pro guard football team and help them win the championship.  But Crewe has never been one to keep in line and refuses, besides the guards were going to kill him if he took the job.  Eventually Crewe is put in charge of putting together a group of inmates that are going to play the warden's team in an exhibition game.  The warden's team is expected to slaughter the inmates Mean Machine, but for the inmates all they want to do is play a great game and maybe knock some of the guards around.  As for Crewe, the game becomes a crisis of conscience for him: he's offered parole if he throws the game, but he's gotten to like his teammates and he knows how much it means to them.The movie has a good plot and is well acted.  Reynolds and Albert give fine performances and Bernadette Peters has a small role as a sizzling secretary that freely gives Crewe some favors.As mentioned before, THE LONGEST YARD is often billed as a comedy, but it's not.  It's a serious drama with comical elements laced throughout.  People get beat up and even killed.  Prison, like life, can be a really tough place.  Yet, there's always hope because on the football field, everyone's an equal
A perfect film. Kurosawa's adaptation of King Lear succeeds in every way, and does so brilliantly: the visuals, plot, and score have no equals either individually or taken as a whole.Criterion has done an excellent job at reproducing the vibrant colors of the movie, which are essential.  The plot is based on King Lear, but where it diverges it is an improvement - the final scene has no parallel in King Lear, and is in my opinion the most moving.Unforgetable
Good Collection of Italian Westerns. According to British author Christopher Frayling in his biography of director Sergio Leone, in the wake of the international success of "A Fistful of Dollars" the Italian film industry spawned dozens of "spaghetti" westerns.  I don't know if the collection represented here are the best of the bunch but they are a decent cross-section of the genre.  Though none of these film's approach the masterworks of Leone they, for the most part, distinguish themselves stylistically from Leone's work.  What is also interesting is that Franco Nero is the star of three of these entries but shows range by assaying different character types in each of them."A Bullet for the General"-Tale of Mexican banditos led by Gian Maria Volonte in a robust performance. Events and the arrival of a mysterious American cause Volonte to question his mercenary mindset.  Film has an interesting political bent.  Four stars."Companeros"-Lighthearted story of Swedish gunrunner(Nero) and Mexican mercenary(Tomas Milian) who form an uneasy alliance to free socialist professor(Fernando Rey) from American prison and bring back to Mexico so he can reveal the combination of an impregnable safe containing a fortune.  Film also has a socialist bent but it's not too heavy-handed.  Jack Palance has a creepy turn as an American bounty hunter.  Four stars."Four of the Apocalypse"-This is probably the most enigmatic of the bunch.  Film concerns a circumstantial alliance between a card shark, a pregnant prostitute, a drunk, and a man who claims to commune with the dead set in Utah.  Though the film contains some poignant scenes there are also scenes of gratuitous violence that to me nullify the film's attributes.  Judge for yourself.  Three stars."Keoma"-Moody film about a half-breed gunslinger (Nero) returning from the Civil War to find his town overrun by the plague and controlled by a despot.  Excellent character study and example of Nero's range as an actor.  Four stars."Texas, Adios"-Probably the film most reminiscent stylistically to Leone but the most conventional.  Story concerns Texas lawman (Nero) travelling to Mexico with his brother to apprehend the man who killed his father.  Nero is solid but the story is kind of routine.  Three stars.
What a catch. Alfred Hitchcock made two kinds of movies: bone-chilling thrillers that looked into the dark side of human nature, and witty adventure stories."To Catch A Thief" is a sterling example of the latter kind of movie -- a chic, sleek, golden-tinted caper, full of witty dialogue and solid acting from legendary actors. Despite the taut action scenes, Hitchcock makes it feel almost like a cinematic vacation.Paul Robie (Cary Grant) was "The Cat," the most notorious jewel thief in Europe, before he retired. But now impossible heists -- made in Robie's style -- are popping up all over Cannes, and he's the immediate suspect. Narrowly escaping the police, he enlists a friend to help him clear his name by capturing this new Cat.To do that, he masquerades as an American tourist, and gets to know pretty oil heiress Frances Stevens (Grace Kelly) and her mother. But when the Stevens jewels are stolen, Frances brings the cops down on Robie -- and now he is more desperate than ever to find the Cat, because he suspects it's an old friend...Hitchcock was in fine form with "To Catch a Thief," especially since he had two great actors in the mix. Granted this isn't one of his more insightful or suspenseful movies, but it captures a sense of sly wit and fun instead.If "To Catch A Thief" has a problem, it's that astute viewers will be able to guess who the Cat is after about a half hour, maximum. But fortunately viewers can be distracted by Hitchcock's knack for razor-sharp dialogue ("What do you say?" "My only comment would be highly censorable") and double entendres (during an intimate lunch, Francie asks, "You want a leg or a breast?").It's also gorgeous to behold -- he entire movie is bathed in the golden Riviera sun, with lots of swimming, fast car chases, elaborate costume balls, and ornate hotels. But Hitchcock winds it up with a genuinely tense rooftop chase, complete with wrestling and gunshots.Grant is a bit grizzled (and VERY overtanned) here, but still dapper and charming enough for Robie, a thief with principles and a taste for the good life. Kelly is also quite good as an heiress who is less prim than she appears; John Williams and Jessie Royce Landis have fun supporting roles as a "veddy veddy English" insurance man and a shrewd rich woman."To Catch A Thief" is a warm, sumptuous piece of classic film, with great dialogue and even better acting. Fun, stylish little myster
Reliving an Era of Soul. This DVD will take you back to a time when Love and Romance was serenaded by masters of Soul.Very nostalgic and allows you to sing and jive with the true artists of timeless music.A Good buy
Guess Who Is Coming To  Dinner. A group of well-to-do snobbish and obnoxious professionals have dinner parties every Wednesday to which each of them is required to bring an "idiot" as a guest. The victims have no idea that they are invited merely to be humiliated and their boorish "sponsors" compare their notes later to determine whose "idiot" was the best. Pierre Brochant( Thierry Lhermitte), the smug publisher thinks that he's got a winner in the tax accountant Franois Pignon (Jacques Villeret, sadly passed away in January 2005 - great French Comedian whose performance in "Robert and Robert" I enjoyed very much) who reproduces the famous landmarks with the matchsticks and would talk about them with never ending enthusiasm. Unfortunately for Pierre (but fortunately for us, the viewers) he throws his back just before the dinner and has to rely to Pignon's sincere generosity. The tables are turned and look who is an idiot after all...With the modest running time of 80 minutes, the "Dinner Game" is a delightful and very funny comedy. I would not expect anything else from Francis Veber, the director of Le Jouet, (1976) aka The Toy , La Chvre, (1981) aka Knock On Wood, Les Compres, (1983) ... aka ComDads, and Les Fugitifs, (1986) and the writer for Le Grand blond avec une chaussure noire, (1972) ... aka The Tall Blond Man with One Black Shoe.4.5/5
Just what I ordered. I received the movie on time and in good condition. Realy funny.
Garbo's Gift To Us... In my view Garbo's greatest film, and her most personal. Among my other favorites are Camille, Grand Hotel and Ninotcka, but Queen Christina is her stand-out classic above all others. I have read that she was deeply excited by and involved in this production to an extent unparalled for her, motivated by the Swedish (her homeland) history and the opportunity to play one of history's most enigmatic figures, the queen who "abdicated her throne for love" (though this portrayal is, of course, largely "Hollywoodized"--wonderfully so--you can probably throw most historical accuracy out the window, just sit back and enjoy).Here is every aspect of the legendary Garbo in one film: the breathtakingly beautiful woman, the ambiguous sexuality, the great tragienne, the aloofness, the boyish playfulness, the restless longing to escape any public tableaux or expectations and live her own life by her own terms, all things she had in common with the real Queen Christina. Here also her warm, memorable final pairing with her former real-life amor John Gilbert. Two legendary scenes stand out: Garbo walking about, as if in a daze, memorizing the room in which she and Gilbert spent the night in (a scene almost lost due to censors), and of course the final, unforgettable closeup, the greatest closup in the history of cinema--simply stunning, as is the heartbreaking "goodbye" to the dying Gilbert moments before. Not to be missed scenes also are Garbo running out of the castle into the winter cold and rubbing the snow in her face like a child, and the warm relationship with her elderly male attendant, who dotes on her like a daughter, combing her hair, etc.In life Garbo indeed appeared reclusive and aloof, though I suspect she was simply a very shy and private person who perhaps never fully comprehended what it was we all wanted from her. But here, in Queen Christina actress and woman merge, she opened up for us in a way she had never before and would never again, fully showing us her great strength and acute vulnerability, and the result is spellbinding. A classic forever, Garbo's gift to us all, and we are all the beneficiaries.
The best there is. I used to write Amazon reviews for every video I saw.  I recently stopped doing that because they are unappreciated.  My reviews are very sharp and informative, and then some lunkheads give them the "thumbs down" and I realize I'm writing to unappreciative morons.  So I stopped.  I just wanted to go on record saying that.  And by the way, the David Attenborough series of nature films is amazing, and anyone who gives this series less than five stars is an ingrate with no taste.  This right here is the best of the best
I love this movie today as much as I loved it when I was 10.... I saw this movie for the first time when I was something like 10 years old, and immediately fell in love with Anne Shirley. I have now read everything by L.M. Montgomery that I can get my hands on, and am as big a fan as ever. This movie is a beautiful version of a beautiful book.The first time I saw this movie, my mother made me go to bed while Anne was hanging under the bridge, before Gilbert rescues her... and I didn't finish it for a week because my brother convinced me that Anne drowns. :) I'm glad I finished it anyway and discovered the truth
Best There ever was....Best there ever will be. This three disc set is a must-have for any wrestling fan. The first disc does a great job of telling the story of how he became the hitman and covers the controversy in montreal which forced him to leave wwe as well as his look back on the tragic passing of his brother Owen. The other two discs include most of the hitman's best matches. His match with HBK from wrestlemania 12 was left out probably because bret wanted it left out and maybe since it was a very long match. Some of the matches included are: WM 13 submission match vs. Austin, WM 10 vs. Owen, and his Summerslam '92 match against the British Bulldog. This is a great dvd set that does well with capturing the true essence of why Bret Hart was the Excellence of Execution. I believe this set includes a total of 18 hitman matches which were not only singles matches but also his matches from earlier in his career in tag team action along with Jim the Anvil Niedhart in the Hart Foundation. So this set is just great simply because it is comprehensive in its coverage of Bret's career from early wwe to his days in WCW. Buy this dvd set. YOU WILL NOT BE DISAPPOINTED
Honest Realism. This movie was one of the most interesting and entertaining movies I've viewed in the last couple of years. It is a documentary made of video clips made during the childhood of the narrators. The, now adult, narrators provide explanation for this collection of videos. The wonderful thing is that there seems to be very little censorship of their material. The honesty and openness with which they share their childhood videos is somewhat surprising seeing as most people would be too embarrassed to be so open. The result is a realistic portrayal of childhood in the 1980's. They remind me a lot of kids I knew when I was growing up. But, allow me to repeat myself for the sake of emphasis, the surprising thing isn't so much what the kids do on video, but the fact that these videos wound up being shared with the general public. I see a lot of value in this sort of presentation, but I also fear that some people might find it disturbing. With the increased availability of video equipment, could there be more of this sort of thing in the future
One of a Kind. This is a very entertaining movie, things were very different in Jolsen's era, but the performances and the music still get the toes tapping! Larry Parks really does a very creditable job of portraying the Great Al Jolsen, whose whole raaison d'etre was to please an audience. He really seemed to be alive only when on stage and the movie conveys this message very clearly. Well worth adding to your collection
Escape From L.A. - Criminally underrated cult classic!. Okay, I'll admit it. John Carpenter's "Escape From L.A." is one of my absolute favorite guilty pleasures. Where else can you see Snake riding a tidal wave? Snake shooting hoops in order to save his life? Or even Snake kicking the entire world's butt?In 2000, an earthquake seperated Los Angeles from the U.S. and California. Now those who decide not to follow the rules (No smoking, no drugs, no alcohol, no women - unless you're married - no foul language, no red meat!) are sent there, and are not allowed to return to the U.S. In 2013, the president's daughter Utopia has stolen the doomsday device, and has fled to L.A. It's up to ex-special forces war hero Snake Plissken to recover the doomsday device, as well as the president's daughter within nine hours, or the virus he has been injected with will kill him.The R1 DVD from Paramount features an excellent transfer of the film, but unfortunately, it's non-anamorphic. The film is presented in it's original 2.35:1 widescreen ratio. The DVD also includes a Dolby Digital 5.1 soundtrack, as well as a Dolby Surround 2.0 soundtrack. The only bonus feature on the disc is the theatrical trailer. It'd be nice if Paramount gave us a special edition for EFLA, containing a commentary with John Carpenter and Kurt Russell, as well as the HBO making of featurette, and deleted or extended scenes, if any.In the end: Escape From L.A. is a minor classic that should not be missed by fans of John Carpenter, Kurt Russell, or fans of "Escape From New York"
Living in the Tati World. Jacques Tati's Oscar-winning 1958 masterpiece remains among the most imaginative comedies you're likely to see. Though inspired by the silent classics of Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin, Tati creates his own realm of postwar modernity. In fact, the filmmaker's striking use of color and sound would have a profound influence on Jerry Lewis' early directorial efforts (notably "The Ladies Man"). The Criterion release includes a beautifully remastered print and a 1947 Tati short
a week in the life of a serial killer. Just today I randomly selected a movie, that movie was "Henry".  I had never heard of it before, and I figured that I was in for your average, run-of-the-mill low budget slasher flick.  Though it is low budget, it is by no means your ordinary serial killer movie.  In fact, the gritty film and minimalist effects only adds to the stark realism of this nightmarish character study.Meet Henry, a very quiet and serene man with vacant and staring eyes as well as a calm disposition.  Watch as he goes to work, watch as he hits the bar with his buddy Otis, and watch as he calmly and systematically butchers random people.  This film does not exploit the violence though; it is very frank and direct, treating it as though Henry were doing nothing more than cleaning the dishes or taking a stroll in the park.This movie is a lot of things, and when it was all over, I just had to sit back and take a few breaths, have a cigarette - and try to gauge my reaction(s).  I was surprised to note that while this film is disturbing, it is also pretty funny in some parts, though only funny in the blackest sense of the term.  There is no social commentary in this movie, nor does it provide any closure.The DVD is great, awesome extras including fragmented interviews with the genuine serial killer Henry Lee Lucas, awaiting lethal injection on death row.  Very fascinating
Good Film -- even the guys should like this "chick flick!". Entertaining and fun relationship flick with the outstanding team of Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks.  These two always work great together
A good movie. Creepy atmosphere, great soundtrack, interesting story. A family moves back to a house with old memories. Strange things begin to happen as the woman's son begins to behave strangely. I don't want to go deeper into the story because it will ruin the movie. It is definetely worth watching, especially if you are a fan of Italian Cinema. I would recommend, worthy addition to your horror collection
Gypsy. Bette Midler as always is an outstanding performer and this film is no exception. The performances from the entire cast create an entertaining remake of the original movie.  This version is every bit as good as the film staring Natalie Woods and Rosalind Russell
a true entertainer. This is a most for anyone who enjoys being entertained.Tucker is  without a doubt the best entertainer out there. She performs every song with all she has.This dvd will show just how underated she is.Tanya could cough and sound better than the new so called singers out there. The sad part is they cut out most of Tanyas humorous remarks.
if you can get past james woods' lips.... this movie makes me happy. james woods' lips, however, do not. i read somewhere that dolly parton said that james woods was the best kisser. maybe she was drunk or has a thing for jellyfish. anyhow, this movie is funny and sweet kind of like the kool-aid man
They don't make THEM! like they used to. In addition to what everyone else has posted about this great movie, I just want to add that I originally saw it on some Saturday afternoon Monster Matinee sort of show when I was a kid and it made a huge impact on me. I still can't believe it's just over 90 minutes-- it seemed so epic to my young, impressionable mind, and things just kept getting worse and worse for Our Heroes, that it seemd to be hours long! There are so many great things just tossed off in this movie-- like L.A. being placed under martia law, or the battle against the ants on a cargo ship out at sea-- that would be a whole movie if it was made today, but it gives THEM! a thrilling intensity. Of course, nowadays when I watch it I find the hardest thing to believe is the unquestioned belief that the government is always right..
Second season even funnier than the first!. Little Britain's first season is funny (in the vein of Monty Python) but it's the second season where the series really goes into overdrive. They've weeded out the less funny characters and added several great new ones. The characters are brilliantly portrayed by Lucas and Walliams. If you enjoy British humor, sketch comedy, guys in drag and outrageous costumes, you'll definitely love this DVD.
So Cute!. The item was just what we ordered -- good quality.I had forgotten how cute these two movies are!  We purchased them to watch before our daughter leaves for basic training after joining the military
Very Good!. I saw this movie a few months ago on an import dvd. I do have to say, the movie was great.Brad Renfro plays  Mark ,a rebelling boy, who knows something that he don't have to know. Susan Sarandon plays a lawyer who helps Mark. She did it great. Tommy Lee Johnes plays a Lawyer who want to ask Mark what he saw.You must watch it..
Something for Everyone. This is not a chick flick movie.  This is not a movie for baseball fans.This movie is for everyone.  It has romance, It has sports, It has a great soundtrack.  It makes you laugh.  It makes you cry.  It makes you think.  It is a feel good movie.
Great movie. I enjoyed the movie, and of course movies sometimes are a bit of a let down from the book, but for those who rather just see the movie it does a fine job of telling the story. I read the book before seeing the movie and I thought they did a pretty good job, I do agree that there were some parts missing in the movie that was in the book. Emily Watson did a great job in this movie as well as each actor that played Frank McCourt. So regardless if you read the book or not I think you will enjoy this movie. And as for those, who think this movie is too Hollywood, well if that was the case then Frank's mom would have been played by Julia Roberts, his dad Tom Cruise, his aunt Britney Spears, and Frank would have been played by Will Smith, not to mention all the special affects they would have added to the movie. So I think it's a pretty good movie and recommend it.
Best Beatle Movie Yet. If you liked 'Backbeat' you'll love this one. Filmed at all the actual locations where The Beatles started in Liverpool it's more accurate and revealing than just about anything done on the early years of the Fab Four. John Lennon is shown to be a complicated, brilliant but deeply flawed young man. You see the roots of many of his most famous songs including &quot;Julia&quot; (about his mother), &quot;Strwberry Fields&quot; (about a childhood play place), etc. This should have been released as an independent feature instead of a TV movie. I really loved it
sense of the place where we live !. This movie is the best reggae movie ever made !!!I have seen it since i am kid, and now i owe the DVD !!!This great sensational movie needs to be shared!!!
Great Surf Movie. This is an old favorite from my younger days. It is a movie written by John Millius about a group of young teens growing up in California and surfing. It starts with them in their teen years and deals with their parties, loves, friendship and of course riding the big waves. It is a simpler and nicer time in America in the early 60's. The Beachboys and surf music ruled the airwaves and everybody was tan, hair bleached by the sun, in bikinis and swimming trunks, surf boards, your best girl and late night camp fires on the beach. But then things start to change and the Viet Nam era comes into play. The boys have to make a decision on if they are going to serve, dodge the draft or scheme to come up with a way to get out of it. Also other things are changing. Things are getting more complicated simply because everybody is growing up and has to face more serious issues than when the next keg party is going to be and when the next waves are coming in.Jan Michael Vincent stars and looks like he is cut out of a Michelangelo sculpture. He was the early 70's adonis and he and Willian Katt and Garey Busey round out the cast. They and their friends are a colorful bunch of characters and as they go thru the ups and downs of becoming adults their friendships are tested by time and by adversity.I think this is a really good movie. The surfing footage is also very good and I think most of the guys do their own surfing. The guy that plays 'The Bear' is also very good in his role. I believe Millius wrote this about his own coming of age and surfing so it is dead on accurate and believable. Vincent is outstanding in his performance and you can't take your eyes off of him his charisma is that commanding.
Quirky, Oddly Compelling B Movie from the 80s. I don't know why but "Lost Boys" is oddly compelling.  I think it is really a movie about the corruption of character that may or may not happen to you during your vulnerable adolescent years.  The Jason Patric character, despite his "cool" attitude or perhaps because of it, is easily turned by the head teenage vampire, brilliantly played by Kiefer Sutherland.  The somewhat geeky younger brother, interestingly enough, is impregnable.  It is as if Corey Haim's character is protected by his relationship with Nanook, his ever present pet dog, whose instinctive generosity gives him a real sense of humanity that cannot be swayed by teenage peer pressure.So, the moral of the story is: if you want your children to be safe from vampires, be good to your dog!!
The Title Says It All!. Historic night full of magic and fabulous performances. The title is the best review I can think of, "Lightning In a Bottle.
Worth Buying...A must for Marie Osmond Fans. I felt at times that the movie was not true historicly as far as old west time period behavior,(there were women dressed respecably in the saloon serving drinks as respecable waitress types...and people attending Osmonds performance in the saloon were acting as if it were a modern day show rather than a saloon in the old west and most of the patrons had dates) and I never got lost in the story I was always fully aware that I was watching a Marie Osmond movie. I did like it though, I am a Marie fan and really enjoyed it. The male stars all did a great job. Boxlitener was believable and so were all of the others who played Doc Holiday, etc. Anyway, I did like it and am glad I bought it
THIS BOX SET IS A NO BRAINER !. 5 stars for the box set! 3 stars for "SLEEPAWAY CAMP"! 4 stars for "part 2(UNHAPPY CAMPERS)"! & 3 stars for "part 3 (TEENAGE WASTELAND)"! Slasher fans for the money you can't go wrong here! You got 2 good slasher ficks(part 1 & part 3) & one great slasher flick(part 2) & then you even get some production footage from the 1992 scrapped part 4(THE SERVIVOR) & once you watch this footage you will be so glad they scrapped it! It would have been a total insult to the saga! Anyway if your a sleepaway fan then get this box set
"You eat lunch at 10.  You eat dinner at 2:30.  You eat breakfast the day before.". I saw this movie about 11 years ago when I was 10.  I had forgotten how funny it truely was.  My mother wanted to rent it to let my step brother and sister watch it.  I laughed the whole time.  What the movie is about is 3 guys are fereling bad about there age so one of them sets a trip up.  On the trip they are driving cattle from New Mexico to Colorado.  Along the way many things happen that helps them realize just how strong they are.  I laughed so many times at this movie.  Billy Crystal and Daniel Stern are great.  This is a movie anyone will easly be able to enjoy
Generally Good Rebuttal To Moore. In an attempt to be balanced, I think anyone who watched the frothing Michael Moore fantasy piece on 9/11 ("Fahrenheit 9/11") should watch this as well. There is no doubt that "Celsius 41.11" was made on a much smaller budget, but it is generally effective nonetheless. The film excels in interview segments with thoughtful conservatives (and some moderates) like Michael Medved and Michael Barone, who provide very good verbal position papers on 9/11 and related subjects, like the Patriot Act and the Florida election problems.The film does not resort to tricky editing like the Moore piece, but, rather, uses larger excerpts of speakers to give a more accurate picture of reality. There is no doubt that this is less a piece of entertainment than a political ad for Bush (and therefore against John Kerry.)This material is already somewhat dated now that Bush has been reelected, but if you have seen "Fahrenheit 9/11" you should at least give this a quick look in the interest of fairness. If you were entirely taken in by Moore, you will find some disturbing information here, including many incredible quotes from Michael Moore himself.Normally I would say this is worth three and a half stars, but for attempting to take on the biggest propagandist in Hollywood, I give the movie four.
exceptionally done. The cinematography in this video is exceptional. The history and richness of this area is very powerful. I highly recommend this video for anyone going to visit Cambodia and Vietnam or has interest in the history of this area. Excellent!
Fans of Cowboy Bebop and people new to anime will love this title. This is an excellent series that I think all anime fans will enjoy, in addition I think this is a particularily good series for someone who has only recently developed an interest in anime because it is fairly westernized.  Backed by an all hip hop soundtrack that lends the series a feeling of familiarity for americans (younger ones anyway) the characters use slang and converse in short concise manners, making the story easy to follow.  This allows the series to avoid the long voice-overs that reveal key parts of the plot, something which is common in anime and may turn some younger or newer fans off.  The art is beautiful and the direction of Shinichiro Watanabe is on pace with the rest of his projects, which to say the very least is excellent. Enjoy
A good adaptation of a wonderful book. The film version of the book has some great performances, especially from Michael Caine. It helps that John Irving himself wrote the script. It's a nice, touchy-feely movie but the plot somewhat drags in the middle and the characters become somewhat fuzzy as well. But I enjoyed it very much. It's one of Tobey McGuire's strongest performances pre-Spiderman. Charlize Theron also showed her pre-Oscar dramatic chops here
Cop Drama That Made Cop Figures Human. &quot;The Onion Field&quot; is another one of those gripping cop dramas that makes it puzzling that the film didn't receive a single Academy Award nomination. Based on the true story and scripted by former cop Joseph Wambaugh (who also wrote the book), &quot;The Onion Field&quot; describes the mental breakdown of a cop (portrayed with excellence by John Savage) who witnesses his partner's murder in an onion field in California, the frustrating nature of the justice system and the loopholes it contains. The chilling contrast between Savage's fragile cop and James Woods' disturbing killer is highly intriguing. But most importantly, &quot;The Onion Field&quot; is a film that gives big screen cop figures a human, emotional quality, all filtered here by the high calliber acting and well written script
I AM REBORN IN THIS FILM'S GENIUS. I SAW GOD AND HE SAID "YOU ARE A WONDROUS CREATION". As brilliant as they come. Step aside Charleton Heston. A new dramatic king is in town and his name is Stuart!!!!!!
Terrific Story Line. My 3 teenage sons (17, 15 & 13 yrs.) watched this movie (more than once) and they really enjoyed it (by the way, these guys are real harsh movie critics).  It has a very cool story line, quite a bit of action with a few comical scenes.  However, what was most striking about the movie was to see four brothers of different races really interacting with each other as if they were real blood brothers.  Kudos must definitely go to the actors and the movie's casting team.
Great movie, but transfer is not the best. I love this movie and could watch it many times.  It includes the best part of an earlier Harold Lloyd movie, the football scene from The Freshman.  There is also a wonderful scene where he hangs from a lion off the side of a building.The only thing wrong with this DVD is that the transfer is not the best.  The video and sound quality could be better, but is not horrible like the Milky Way DVD from the same company
The Emporers New Groove-Fabulously Funny!. I love this movie! I have bought two copies now. This movie was a side-splitting comedy when I first saw it in the theater, and still is every time I view it again. The jokes and little jibes throughout are great, never a dull moment! David spade is awesome, as well as "Cronk"-the best! Every time I see this movie again I find another joke thrown in there that I didn't notice the last time. Hilarious!-Defiantly a keeper
Shall We Dance? - Yes!!. Dancing is a passion that you either like or don't like. How many times have you heard people around you say that they love dancing or that they don't like it at all?Next to those two kind of people you have the people that don't know what to think of it yet cause they haven't danced that much in their lives. To those people, who want to see what dancing is about or if you want to be shown what dancing can do to a human being: watch this film.Shall We Dance tells the story of John Clark, a man who takes care of people's wills for a living. He has a nice family and is happy with them, but still, something inside him doesn't feel happy. He misses something. He finally decides to take a look in a dancing school, where he starts following lessons in secret and gets his life changed.Shall We Dance is a great feelgood film that gives a nice warm feeling. First of all, the film has fantastic actors that give fine acting performances. Richard Gere portrais his character in the exact right way. He lets the character show how he feels in situations very clearly and does that realistically with a whole lot of fun. He is charming and does a fine job as the leading role.Next to Gere, there is Jennifer Lopez. If somebody is criticised on her acting skills a lot, it is Lopez. But don't you worry, Lopez does a fantastic job and is part of the feelgood factor. She acts warm, nice and shows the character's emotions in a succesfull way. Well done.The rest of the cast is one big fun group. Susan Sarandon is perfectly choisen as John's wife and does the part with good acting. The film has hilarious supporting roles from Stanley Tucci, Lisa Ann Walter, Bobby Cannavale, Omar Miller and Anita Gillette who all bring the film to a level of great comedy and romantic fun.Technically the film looks professional and perfectly fine. The dancing has been well shot and captured on camera. The editing and the lifting music together sure makes the film swing nicely. The lighting is great, the sets are fun and colorfull to see and the music is on the right track. All these elements together give the film a nice atmosphere that gives you, as the audience, a nice feeling inside. Thats what makes this film powerful in a way: the warm Atmosphere.The comedy is hilarious at some points and the film has some nice jokes. The story may be a bit obvious and predictable, it still is a lot of fun for a night of movie entertainment. Romantic, funny, swinging, even a little drama here and there gives it a nice human touch.A succesful film that lightens up one's spirit and leaves you with a nice big smile on your face.If you love dancing this film is an absolute must see for you. If you love romantic comedies, I would also recommend you this film.If you don't like dancing at all but you love the feeling you get from the movies and the vibe it gives you: just take a look, give it a try and who knows? Maybe you will be linening up in a dancing school only a few days later..."Shall we Dance?""I'd love to!"Enjoy and most importantly: have fun watching this film!
This Is Not An Angelina Movie. Note the sarcasm.  Less then 3 minutes into the movie and I knew this was the movie Angelina Jollie would remake 1,000 times.  Depending on what your taste in movies is you might want to rent this first, but overall it is a good movie and Clive Owen gives a great preformance.  With a shocking ending this movie you grips you from the beginning and never lets go.
Very Sexy. This is an excellent and very sexy, movie. Some have labeled it a "blue" film and it does have some nudity in it. However, to view it as pornography is to miss the point of the film.This is about all that is good and enjoyable in life. Set in the late dark ages, the City of Venice is a place of beauty and pleasures. The Venetians love food, wine, women and song. The story follows a young woman, her heart broken by a love she can not have, as she heads down the path of the courtesan. She learns the life of pleasure and wealth and meanwhile still yearns for the love she was denied.The ending is a little too fairy tale to be true, but the base story is from historical fiction. Many of the scenes are lifted almost directly from various journals of early courtesans that were used to form the novel this is based upon.Very sexy, without being tacky. A great movie all around with excellent acting and direction. The visuals are stunning
Friday. Looking forward to watching this movie.Rated R for pervasive strong language and drug use,and for a brutal fight
Goog Kung-Fu Comedy. I don't like Kung Fu comedies, but this is a good one. The fights are good, only the ending is a silly piece of action
"We're like animals, when we make love...". For anyone who's a fan of The Protg Formerly Known as Vanity, this film is a must!     It also appeals to anyone who believes in the powerful bond between Woman and Gorilla.  And I mean POWERFUL!"Tanya's Island" belongs in the collection of anyone who loves shockingly horrible, yet brilliant, films.   If you liked "Swept Away", but were hoping for a scene where a giant monkey &%@#s a woman.... then this might be the film for you
Classic Swashbuckler. The movie that made Flynn a star.  One of five great pirate movies no collection should be without
Prehisteric Fun!. Loved this as a kid.Love it as an adult.My son thinks its really funny
Moscow Does Not Believe in Tears. This movie shows the classic of Russian history. People interested in Russian culture should definately watch this movie. The plot of the story is really interesting
no where to rent this tape!. No where to find or rent this tape so I bought this tapes for its worthwhile coz i'm studying swordsmanship right now. but of course so differ from at home watching them duel. really easy to say than to do.they probably did so many takes to perfected the film
I Thought This Was a Cute Movie!. I watched the movie Innerspace and I thought it was a cute and funny comedy movie! It stars Dennis Quaid, Meg Ryan and Martin Short and they are all great! Dennis Quaid plays a man who is part of a miniaturization experiment but when he is miniaturized he is accidently injected into the body of a neurotic, hypochondriac grocery store clerk played by Martin Short and when he is pursued by spies he gets from Dennis Quaid's character's girlfriend played by Meg Ryan.
Great concert. If you want to hear good music and have a great meeting with friends, you have to own this one. It is amazing to see Pink Floyd together again, singing comfortably numb, wish you were here etc, or Madonna or Sarah Mclachlan singing Angel. Great concert for a very good reason. How I wish I were there
A Good Retelling of the Trojan War. Troy is a grand sweep of a movie with startling effects and a wortwhile, gripping plot.  Yes, in some areas it "corrects" Homer's version of the Trojan War.  Who knows, it may be more accurate than the Iliad.  In any case, it captures the spirit common to both retellings.The large cast of characters are all developed to a surprising depth.  Both sides of the conflict are fully represented and both receive the viewer's empathy.  There is no clearly defined "bad" side, and no clearly defined "good" side.  Instead there are heroes on both sides,and their stories are well-told.
A jolly good show. Moving, intelligent, realistic, not overly acted (as could quite easily have been the case).About a 20 year old who has gone off the rails to come back onto them again...you see why this has happened, feel sympathy, and just want him to do well when the film ends.A story about hope, in a world with little..
This Movie Flounders On The High Seas!!!. You would think that a movie starring Elizabeth Hurley and Patsy Kensit alone on the high seas with a sea captain would make for an interesting movie right? Sadly this is not the case and this film is just yet another "Dead Calm" wannabee. Patsy gives the captain a very specific sexual invitation via her body language which almost makes this movie worth watching. This movie should appeal to Hormonally Charged 17 year old adolescents for this scene alone. I give this movie 5 stars because the boat is very pretty just like Patsy and Elizabeth
"A day without a wicket, is like a day without sunshine!". "How to Succeed" is an energetic and snappy satire of big business.  As the story opens, J. Pierpont Finch (Robert Morse) is a poor but ambitious window washer; he finds a "how-to" book that can teach him to climb the corporate ladder in no time at all.  Ponty follows the book's advice and advances from the mailroom of the World Wide Wicket Company to become its president, falling in love with secretary Rosemary (Michele Lee) along the way.The movie looks like a staged play, and that's a good thing, since this was such a smash hit on Broadway.   It preserves forever the look of the early sixties with vibrant colors, pillbox hats, and references to Metrecal and Wildroot Cream-Oil.  The unique Robert Morse is the whole show here.  He originated the stage role of Ponty and this movie made him an even bigger star.  He is a great singer and dancer, but it's his irresistible personality and charisma that keep you rooting for him.  Michele Lee is perfect as his leading lady, and Rudy Vallee reprises his stage role as the singing, dancing, and knitting Big Boss. This is a happy, fun movie.Kon
Laugh Out Loud Funny!!!. It's a zany mix-up in this dazzling comedy starring Goldie Hawn and Kurt Russell. This is a riches-to-rags story for anyone who loves practical jokes. Hawn stars as Joanna Stayton, a pampered and self-centered wife of a presumptous yacht owner. With their  boat stuck in port for repairs, Joanna hires carpenter Dean Proffitt (Russell)to redo her closet space. But after the job is complete and Dean asks to be paid, Joanna flat out refuses to him. When Joanna falls overboard and gets a case of amnesia, Dean jumps on the opportunity for a little payback. He tell Joanna that she is his wife and the mother of four wild and unruly boys! So check out this hilarious movie, and be prepared to laugh all the way through it
Underrated Gem. 2005's "Upside of Anger," missed out during the awards season; and it didn't do well at the boxoffice. But don't pass it by. It features a chilling performance by Joan Allen as a boozy abandoned stay-at-home wife (her husband has apparently left for Sweden with his assistant), and a great comeback performance by Kevin Costner as her neighbor, who plays a beer-buzzed ex-baseball player turned radio dj (he's been hired to talk about baseball but he doesn't want to).The scene where Costner first learns Allen's husband has abandoned her is a hoot. He arrives at her door, beercan in hand, to discuss the idea of turning those tulgy woods behind their property into a subdevelopment, and things progress bizarrely on from there, as the ill-matched pair end up making each other comfortable, and finally they're at least embarked on the road to happiness.The supporting cast is great, too. Allen has four daughters, superbly played by (from oldest to youngest) Alicia Witt, Keri Russell ("Felicity"), Erika Christiansen ("Traffic"), and Evan Rachel Wood ("Pretty Persuasion"). Each has a memorable scene or two or three. Director Mike Binder turns up as Kostner's not quite pervy producer. He overdoes the sleazebag bit, but maybe that's the point.Beware! The film begins (and ends) with one of those pseudo-significant voiceover narrations (by Wood) and a funeral scene (in the rain, of course). That might make you roll back your eyes and hit the eject button. But don't do it! There's a quick flashback to three years before, and when the action starts, you begin to realize that you haven't seen all of the characters you're now introduced to among the mourners. And so, with the various crises that develop along the way, you begin to ponder who among the others was being buried.When you find out, it's quite a shock.
No Mercy shows No mercy. No Mercy 2002 was a great pay per view and i believe it is one of the best of 2002. the matches are out of 5 so here they are in order.World Tag Team Championship Match: Chris Jericho & Christian (C)vs. Booker T & Goldust: A good tag team match with a lot of action. Winner: Chris Jericho & Christian 3/5Torrie Wilson vs. Dawn Marie: A match based on Dawn Marie's love for Al Wilson. Not a very good match, but what would you expect. Winner: Torrie Wilson 1/5Rob Van Dam vs. Ric Flair: This Match was good and it really doesn't dissapoint. RVD fans will enjoy it. Winner: Rob Van Dam 3/5WWE Cruiserweight Championship Match: Jamie Noble (C) w/ Nidia vs. Tajiri: An ok cruiserweight match with Noble winning. Winner: Jamie Noble 2/5WWE World Heavyweight and WWE Intercontinental Championship Unification Match: Triple H (WHC) vs. Kane (IC): This match was pretty good but the story line of Katie Vick is just rediculous and stupid and makes wrestling look even more fake and simple. Overall, a good match with Triple H going into his bag of tricks to get the win. 3/5Finals of the Smackdown Tag Team Championship Tournament: Rey Mysterio & Edge vs. Kurt Angle & Chris Beniot: This match and the main event stole the show, but this one had it all. Great action and wrestling skills and finished 3rd for match of the year. No one gives up in this one. Winner: Angle & Beniot 5/5Hell in a Cell for the WWE Championship: Brock Lesnar (C) vs. Undertaker: This Hell in a Cell match is one of the best with tons of blood, action, and powerful moves. This is one of Lesnar's best performances and he deserves to be put in a class with the best wrestlers of all time. A masterpiece. Winner: Brock Lesnar 5/
Modern-Day Poppins. Good fun.  A dysfunctional English family is made whole by a visit from a demented Mary Poppins who sees murder as the best solution to every little domestic ill.While it is not a surprise that Maggie Smith's--the tiresome busybody from 'Room with a View'--worse traits have turned lethal, it is a shock to learn--for those who wondered what became of Scott-Thomas at the end of 'Four Weddings and a Funeral'--that she married the befuddled vicar, Mr. Bean.
1980s Low Budget SF at its Best. The one thing that I loved about this film is that it doesn't take it self too seriously.
Magnificent workout!!. Great workout for intermediate/advanced trainees. Rael is an astounding instructor. The workout is complete and has an overall adequate pace and vitality. The warm-up and cool down parts are well balanced. The presentation of the title menu is excellent as well. Couldn't have asked more from it!! I am extremely happy with this DVD.
Excellence!!. I first saw this movie in 1991 and instantly fell in love, wishing I could go out and dicover something as monumental as the source for the Nile River. The acting in this movie is stupendous, Patrick Bergin as &quot;Richard Burton&quot;, Iain Glen as &quot;John Speke&quot;, and Fiona Shaw as Burton's wife,(I forgot here name in the movie), they all deserve Oscars for their performances. This movie was highly overlooked by hollywood and that is a huge mistake by them, this movie could and should have won best picture honors. The scenery is breathtaking the way it is filmed and the history is potrayed in a fairly accurate light. This movie should be on everybody's top ten list
Zeffirelli's Romeo and Juliet. As a high school English teacher, I show this film every year to my students and they love it. Some even love it more than the Luhrmann version in 1996. What is so helpful is that now it's on DVD-rather than VHS-I no longer have to fast forward and rewind to get to the right part. Plus the wide-screen layout gives more of the picture and the beautiful Verona scenery! This is a must for any English teacher or Shakespeare lover!
And At Last, The Full Spectrum. For those energy-driven, music infected Salsa fans (and now they are legion!) here at last in one convenient packet is the full course of Salsa instruction that is so fine it is dizzying. Having absorbed the technical wonders of the multi-angle technique utilized by the expert DEBDOOT DAS producers and the digiFILM crew (views of each part of the moves and turns and twists of a dance position can be seen from multiple angles which makes understanding the physical motivation for each step completely comprehensible), the viewers who have been following the exciting Gigi and her support person Pedro Curbello lilt us through the intoxicating body mechanics required to enjoy the Salsa can now polish off all the preliminaries with some very sophisticated advanced techniques.Not only do Gigi and Pedro make it all seem easy they also make the music of Fruko y Sus Tesos, Joe Arroyo, and Aris Martinez really sing. The result is infectious entertainment, a set of 3 CDs that alone are refreshing to watch but that also provide the most solid teaching method available - whether in a dance classroom or in your own TV room. This is a wholly successful project and one wonders where Debdoot will take us next - the Tango, perhaps? Highly recommended no matter your prior experience as a dancer! Grady Harp, February 06
For all young at heart aged 2 to 122 years of age. A really exquisite movie that will make you laugh, cry, and keep putting it on again for moreThe movie is about a girls school in Paris and the adventures of 12 adorable little girls, with the cutest and most interesting of all being the plucky flame haired little tyke, with a heart of gold Madeline (Hatty Jones).With adventures taken from the timeless books, including little Madeleine's appendicitis, and her rescue from the water by the golden retriever Genevieve, the centerpiece of the story is the battle of the girls and their loving guardian Miss Clavel (Frances McDormand) to keep their school and their dog, against the cruel plans of Lord Covington (Nigel Hawthorne) and also foiling a thuggish tutor cum kidnapper Leopold (Ben Daniels)This is really beautiful, not only for kids, but for all young at heart aged  2 to 122 years of age.There are just so many wonderful memorable heart-stealing scenes, funny cute and poignant.
for a lost soldier. I must say that i really enjoyed the movie and all, there could have been a little more nudity but other wise a great movie. Have watched it several times now and still feel that I am happy with what i saw on the DVD
The Name of the Rose. One of the better mysteries I've seen in a while
"What's green, hangs on a wall, and whistles?". This story is certainly not new. Stephen King, for instance, had the same premise in his novel The Talisman. It also draws from Mark Twain's The Prince and the Pauper, as well as presenting a peculiar, off-kilter sensibility ala Alice in Wonderland. However, writer Neil Gaiman and artist Dave McKean, big noises in the comic book industry, put their own spin and transforms this movie into a cinematic event.Helena Campbell is going thru growing pains and is quarrelling with her mum. Her family runs the Campbell Family Circus and is thus very occupied, and her parents expect her to hold up her end (Helena juggles), but Helena is at that age when kids start to rebel. When her mum states to her, "You'll be the death of me," Helena replies with, "I wish I was." When her mum falls sick and has to have surgery, Helena is overwrought with guilt. She falls asleep and wakes up in a strange, dreamlike world, where every creature wears a mask.She finds out fairly quickly that there's something wrong with her new surroundings. The Queen of Light (who looks like her mum) has fallen into a deep sleep. A charm, you see, has been taken, causing an imbalance in the kingdom and also strengthening the shadows, who threaten to lay waste to everything. Helena, believing that she is in a dream, nonchalantly sets out to find the charm, the MirrorMask, and save the kingdom, accompanied by a juggling entertainer of dubious character named Valentine and aided by The Very Useful Book. Occasionally, on their journey, when Helena would chance to gaze into an errant window, she would oft see a darker version of herself in the real world.Thru a chain of circumstances fraught equally with bizarreness and peril, Helena, at last, comes to believe that everything about her is real, thus dramatically raising the stakes for her. The gravity of her situation is never more dire than when she is captured and delivered to the Dark Queen, who believes Helena to be her daughter and means to keep her forever. Can Helena and Valentine find the MirrorMask in time to save themselves and the kingdom? Can Helena regain her way to her own world and find out the fate of her mum? And will Valentine end up being a waiter?Let's get the acting and the plot out of the way. The acting is across the board excellent, with several actors portraying dual roles. Young Stephanie Leonidas as Helena and Jason Barry as Valentine are particularly excellent, which is a good thing as they are in most of the scenes. And the plot? Well, as stated earlier, it's not exactly brand new. The fascination lies in the carrying out of the plot. When you have the likes of Gaiman and McKean in control of the story, you know you're in store for some wild inventions of fancy.MirrorMask is something Tim Burton wishes he had made. Even though the first 19 minutes take place in the "real" world, the circus scenes instantly set the baroque and dreamlike nature of the movie. Renowned abstract and surrealist artist (and now first time feature film director) Dave McKean uses his artistic sensibilities to indelibly stamp his mark. From the get-go, as he frames his live action sequences with illustrated doodles, we realize that these are only early harbingers for the more lavish special effects yet to come.When Helena enters the fantasy world, we are immediately treated to surreal, soft-edged landscapes and weird denizens that recall the vivid works of Bosch and Dali. The colorful, stunning, eerie visuals wash over the senses and give one the sensation of having ingested some form of hallucinogen. The imagery really is beautiful, intoxicating stuff. And some of these weirdly put together creatures are oddly endearing. My favorite was the feline-like Sphinx thingamagig who's actually quite bad at riddles. I was also fascinated by the slow spoken, embracing stone giants and felt quite sad at their fates. Meanwhile, Josefine Cronholm's sensual renditions of the Burt Bacharach standard "Close to You" and the closing credits song "If I Apologize" add greatly to the deliriously offbeat mood.The special features include film commentary by Neil Gaiman and Dave McKean, interviews with Gaiman and McKean, the behind the scenes feature "Beginnings - The Genesis of MirrorMask," cast & crew interviews, "Day 16" - a time lapse video of a full day of production, "Flight of the Monkeybirds" - making the Monkeybird sequence, "Giants Development" - about the design and creation of the stone giant sequence, a 20-minute Q & A session from the San Diego Comic Convention, and a poster & cover art gallery.One negative is that Gina McKee, when playing the Queen of Darkness, reminded me a bit too much of Tilda Swinton's the White Witch of Narnia. Another minus is that the film never makes it quite clear if all the weird events actually did happen or if Helena had dreamt everything. Was everything in MirrorMask, then, an allegory? I dunno. I, myself, am not creative or imaginative enough to peel away too many layers from the surface.Surreal. Dazzling. Inventive. I guess the most apt description of the film can be credited to one film executive, who, upon first viewing MirrorMask, informed Gaiman, "That was like Jean Cocteau's Beauty and the Beast, on acid, for kids"
Too sophisticated to just be considered a "kid's film". When I went into this film, I expected to like it.  I vaguely remembered seeing on TV one time and enjoying it.  However, I did expect a few dated elements.  The most obvious of these would be the casting of a Caucasian to play an Asian character.I was right and wrong.  I loved the film.  As for Tony Randall as Dr. Lao, I have to say he does an excellent job.  This is because Dr. Lao is not just a Chinese character, but instead, a timeless shapeshifter, a man of infinite variety and character.  For instance, at the beginning he speaks with a very thick accent which abruptly disappears in another scene.  When a character asks him about that, Dr. Lao just smiles and says "Oh, it comes and goes."  Later on, Lao adopts an Irish brogue or whatever else fits his mood.  Randall also plays six other characters.  My favorite is the fortune teller who has a surprisingly dark character.Rounding out the cast is Barbara Eden, who is absolutely mesmerizing as an uptight librarian who finally has her passion awoken by a brief encounter with a satyr.  While technically a family friendly scene, it is amazingly sensual.The film has a leisurely pace, but it is really enjoyable, full of great moments.  And I will always remember the words of Dr. Lao.Dr. Lao:  "Do you know what wisdom is?"Boy:  "No."Dr. Lao:  "Wise answer.
"Tierra y Libertad!!!" by tarascomichoacan. This movie is probably the best movie made about the revolution!It begins with the story of Emiliano Zapata, a young charro who breaks horses at a huge hacienda in Morelos, Mexico. When the patron sells him and the other Indian workers short, they form a rebellion and create an army in partner with Pancho Villa.Packed with action and suspense, and plenty of horses, guns and chase scenes, you're sure to enjoy!Definately worth your money
Slow Paced Slice of 1970s Americana. The Ice Storm is a startling look at 1973 America and how lost so many people (parents, children, neighbors, etc.) became during this transitional time. The free-love of the 60s spill over into the 30 and 40-somethings of a sleepy Connecticut community and runs smack into the dysfunctional family of Ben and Elena Hood (Kevin Kline and Joan Allen).Ben is having an affair with his neighbors wife, Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver, ALIENS), and the boredom they both feel during their "love making" is palpable. They want something different to happen, but what that "something" is remains unobtainable. And the two's lackadaisical attitudes toward sex, family, and the times seep into their everyday lives; even into their spouses' and children.Ben's wife Elena gets caught shoplifting from the local pharmacy. Janey's husband Jim goes away on long business trips and returns with funks of depression because of what he witnesses going on in his family.The children of Ben and Janey are also settling into this bizarre behavior. Some of them explore sexuality in often strange ways, or run out into storms and play on ice-covered roads. Others blow things up with M80 firecrackers, or smoke pot and drink to numb themselves out.But all of these people's lives will change in an unalterable way during one evening; an ice storm has hit and the cold outside bashes against the cold each character feels inside. Some will live, some will die, and others will never be the same.______________________________________________________________________________The attention to detail on the 70s in director Ang Lee's movie is astounding. The sweater-vest outfits, paneled station wagons, and boxy homes were excellently filmed.You can also feel the dark undercurrent running through the characters' lives: the grayish landscape cinematography against the quiet homes that harbor secrets.The cast was absolutely perfect, too. Kevin Kline (one of my favorite actors), Sigourney Weaver, Joan Allen, Elijah Wood, Tobey Maguire, Katie Holmes, Christina Ricci, and Jamey Sheridan all pull in stunning performances.Having gushed over how well done the movie was, I do have to comment on its pacing. If you thought SIDEWAYS was snail-like, this movie may make you feel as though grass could grow faster.Director Ang Lee has had some serious success in Hollywood as of late (BROKEBACK MOUNTAIN, 2005), but this earlier work is an excellent way to see how he's grown in the intervening years
Can we give 10 stars?. Kieslowski never took the easy way out. Each hour-long film is intricately plotted, beautifully filmed and loosely examines the spirit of the Ten Commandments. But the filmmaker never beats these moral themes on our heads. Kieslowski once said in an interview that he always turns the camera back on himself, but never in an obvious way, and I think this effect is achieved here. Forget the Polish for a moment. Turn down the sound and you would still be able to identify this as Kieslowski's film. They could be authored by no other. My favorite is the underrated tenth installment about coveting your neighbor's goods. On one level, this film is a riotous comedy, paring the co-stars of White together as two brothers who lose their father, but discover his stamp collection . . . only to lose it(and a kidney to boot) to the Poland's stamp mafia. But on another level, it is a profoundly moving film as well. The stamps are a tenuous connection to their father(who they obviously never understood)and to one another. Losing their father's collection, they start one anew and booze it up, enjoying one another company . . . honoring their father's memory . . . and fulfilling one of those universal commandments.
Very Funny. Out of the three John Waters films I've seen (Pink Flamingos, Serial Mom, and this film...In that order), this is definitely my favorite. It's probably Waters most normal film (and even this film has some weird moments);It's got a great cast, the dialogue is funny, and some of the events play like some weird farce on real life. Edward Furlong (Terminator 2) plays Pecker, a young kid who snaps pictures of everything around him. Graffiti'd walls,fat women, girls on a bus, a man getting his hat stolen, pubic hair...You name it, he takes a picture of it. Eventually Pecker's photos get noticed by Rorey (Lili Taylor, 'I Shot Andy Warhol') who puts his photos in a gallery to mass acclaim. Eventually, it takes a toll on Pecker's life and everything spirals out of control...In typical John Waters fashion. The movie's plot is pretty simple, but it's hilarious. Example; Pecker's sister Crissy is a sugar crazed brat. A Child Protective Services worker shows up at the house and prescribes Rittalin, which instantly changes her behavior. The way I'm explaining it doesn't sound very funny at all, but if you've had any experience with ADHD...Then you'll get a laugh out of that. Christina Ricci co-stars as Shelley, Pecker's girlfriend who runs a fascist laundromat. I've always liked Ricci as an actress, but her looks kind of come and go in films. She'll look great in one film and then like crap in another. In the movie "The Ice Storm" which came out around the same time as this, she didn't look that great. Here, she looks awesome. Really hot and she adds some fresh bits of sarcasm to the film as well. Am I the only one who thinks Waters could've splurged on a nude scene here. Anyway, as with all Waters films, this movie will not be enjoyed by everybody. However, this film is done in a different style then the other two films I've mentioned...So even if you have no idea who Waters is, this movie isn't something you run and tell your friends about (Pink Flamingos anybody?). It's damn funny, entertaining, and witty.GRADE: A-
A genuine classic!. This amazed me when it first came out and still has that capability.  The combination of puppets and live action works really well, David Bowie is wonderful, and, all in all, it's a great family film.  When I gave it to my two granddaughters, ages 8 & 4, they watched it wide-eyed and a little bit scared. But then they watched it at least once a day for the next week
excellent. a must have, best indiana jones edition ever, additional disc with Spielberg/Lucas/Ford comments on making the movie is one of the kind and a fun to watch by itself
Good taste?. This is a fun documentary on Helmut Newton. I was at his lecture at the New School and the film gives you the same feel for him and his work. Most of the photos are sexy, he has a wonderful photographic identity, you can always spot his work. The DVD and video (they are not exactly the same) are worth watching for any serious fashion or commercial photographer. This is not a how to do a photo DVD. However, if you pay attention he tells you a lot about how he likes to work. Straight ahead, almost no camera hardware or crew and lots of vision. You know he saw the shot before he took it
Great movie!. I love this movie, AWESOME choreographed fight scenes that are very well filmed, great humor, and how can you say no to a love crazed Brittany Murphy and great martial arts! :
Thank God for a  movie about Thanksgiving. Pieces of April is such a sweet, lovely, and heartfelt movie. Katie Holmes is pitch-perfect as the title character April. This is her best film, she is flawless and unforgettable. She is the dark horse of her family, she has never had a solid relationship with her mother who is now dying of breast cancer. Her mother is played by Patricia Clarkson (oscar-nominated role),her character is cruel, moody, and trying her hardest to make amends with her rebellious daughter. April invites her family to her apartment for a "nice" Thanksgiving dinner, things go array when April discovers her oven is not working. This film is only an 1 hour and 12 minutes long and I think this movie is perfectly fine in length. Pieces of April is a very intelligent indie film, forget about her work on Dawson's Creek, Holmes is a true and talented actress here
Great laughs, especially toward the end... This prize-winning play about a nutty family of eccentrics in the 1930's isn't done on stage much anymore (it is a nightmare to produce properly with typical community theater casts and budgets, and it's dated a lot), but the film version, nearly 70 years old now, is worth seeing. Just as good, but apparently not on DVD yet, is a stage version from about 15 years ago starring Jason Robards. I used to own the video tape of that one, and it was quite well done. However, it's hard to beat Jean Arthur and Jimmy Stewart and Lionel Barrymore, for Pete's sake. As an example of '30's-style comic playwriting and movie-making, you can take "You Can't Take it with You" with you, if you buy this
Interesting Perspective. This documentary discusses the possibilty of life emerging on other planets in the Universe besides Earth. While many people assume that since the Universe is nearly infinite, there are many planets very similar to Earth upon which life may exist. This film calls into question that reasoning and runs down a list of factors that must exist in order for life to form and thrive on a planet. For instance, the presence of liquid water is vital to life, and temperatures conducive to maintaining it are found only in a certain range of distance from a star (not too close and hot and not to far and cold). They list a number of factors and since they supposedly all need to be in place for life to exist, the conclusion is that it is a long shot for life to have formed anywhere else. It is an interesting point of view which seeks to offer the opinion that despite the vastness of the Universe, we may live on the only planet that fosters life.
One of the Best Brit WWII dramas ever filmed!!!!!!!!!!!!. I saw this when it first appeared on American television on 'Masterpiece Theater' when it originally was aired in 1978/79. It was superb. I am watching it again, on a very good DVD player and HD TV. It is still great. If you have seen 'Band of Brothers' you will love this. It sets the standard that was carried forward with BofB. Buy this. Worth every thing.Got a great price too
A swashbuckler's delight. This is an excellent collection of Errol Flynn movies from the Warner Bros. studios.  Flynn was at his best in historical action pieces such as the ones in this collection.  Captain Blood is the movie that made him a star.  This is a real pirate movie.  The Sea Hawk is also one of his best pirate movies.Dodge City and They Died With Their Boots On both show Flynn quite at ease in a western.  Three of these movies have him paired with Olivia de Havilland.  They were a perfect screen couple and a joy to watch.  These are the real deal when it comes to action and adventure movies.  Who needs pirates of the Caribbean when you can sail with Captain Blood to Tortuga or Port Royale.  Better yet, Clean up Dodge City or ride with Custer at the Little Bighorn.  Now that is entertainment.Included in this set is a great bonus dvd about Errol Flynn.  It has many home movies and other great stuff for the fan
NOT ANIME!!!. This is the LIVE ACTION VERSION of the Crying Freeman anime. This is a truly well done masterpeice of a film. Mark Dacasca's potrayed The Freeman perfectly. This by far one of the best if not the best live action adaption of an anime film. But seriously folks, No film is worth 99 dollars. I don't care if it is the film to end all films. They will sooner or later put this on DVD for 20 dollars
Great 80s comedy. This is one of the great 80s comedies; with an excellent cast, well paced plot, and interesting characters. What the characters lack in depth, is made up for with the energy the actors bring to their roles. The repeated nudity is not exactly to my taste, but it doesn't spoil the overall enjoyment of the film.
DSF. I love this work out its my favorite of all my work out videos. I also feel I get so much more out of it then I would on just an outdoor walk. Its easy to do
A HALF DOZEN TANTALIZING TREATS FROM DORIS. Two years ago Warners released "The Doris Day Collection" which quickly became a best seller.  It contained some choice Day films from the 50's and 60's and reacquainted a lot of people with the wide-ranging talents that Doris Day possesses. There was a reason she reigned as the top box-office female star in history, a title she holds to this day. Volume 2 contains 6 more reasons why Doris Day still has that unique ability to make audiences feel warm, content, happy, and very satisfied.Included in this collection is Day's screen debut, 1948's "Romance on the High Seas".  It's a gorgeous technicolor treat - a throwback to an era when movies were designed to entertain and it succeeds gloriously.  Miss Day introduces the classic song, "It's Magic" and while not first-billed, steals the show from Jack Carson (the first of three successive teamings), Janis Paige, S.Z. Sakall and a great cast.  It's a case of mistaken identity, but what is most memorable is the ease with which Miss Day seems to acquit herself on film.  She's a natural - funny, real, and gorgeous. There's a bit of the late Betty Hutton in her performance but ultimately she proves herself to be one of a kind.The rest of the titles each have their high points.  "My Dream is Yours" has lots of grit in this variation of "A Star is Born" with Day's star rising and for good reason. My favorite song is her heartfelt rendition of "I'll String Along With You" - flawless. Other highlights include a sequence in which she and Carson team with Bugs Bunny."I'll See You in My Dreams" is the wonderful bio of lyricist Gus Kahn and contains a trunkload of classic tunes sung perfectly by Day, co-star Danny Thomas and Patrice Wymore in a knockout performance. It has much more grit than the typical biography and Miss Day is exceptionally good as Kahn's wife Grace. Michael Curtiz has directed the film in black and white which seems to make it more serious than many films of this mileau."On Moonlight Bay" (1951) and it's sequel 1953's "By the Light of the Silvery Moon" are like a couple of Currier and Ives pictures brought to life. Warm-hearted and filled with a score of great tunes, they lovingly capture an era that might have been or at least was in memory. Miss Day, co-star Gordon MacRae and "family" - Leon Ames, Rosemary DeCamp, Billy Gray and Mary Wickes, seem like a family.  Loosely based on Tarkington's "Penrod" tales, it had critics carping that it wasn't "Meet Me In St. Louis" and it isn't.  On its own terms it is just as delightful filled with charm and genuine warmth, never forced and never trite.The weakest link in the collection is probably "Lucky Me", the first technicolor musical and subject to critical pans at the time of its release.Miss Day and a fine supporting cast including Bob Cummings, Nancy Walker, Phil Silvers, Eddie Foy Jr and Martha Hyer, give it their all.  The songs may not be memorable but they are energetically rendered and there are enough chuckles sprinkled throughout to keep the film going.One will come away from this 12 hour marathon of Doris Day films feeling extremely good, exhilirated in fact, and possibly wishing that Hollywood still made the kind of feel-good movie that Doris specialized in during her 7 years at Warners. Feeling that way in this day and age is something not to be scoffed at. If someone could bottle that indefinable quality that Doris Day possesses and share it with the world, we'd all benefit.
Hammer Productions- 6 Legendary Classics of Gothic Horror!. The legendary British film studio, Hammer Productions began its climb to the top of the horror film genre with its Technicolor release of  "The Curse of Frankenstein."  Teaming Peter Cushing with Christopher Lee for the first time- the result is pure movie magic and the beginning of what was to become a beautiful friendship. As well as a great time for movie going gothic horror fans as Hammer began churning out one classic after another. This set of Hammer horror includes:"The Curse of Frankenstein" (1957)Baron Victor Von Frankenstein, (Peter Cushing) is in prison for murder and trying to evade the guillotine. While there he tells a priest how he and his mentor, Paul Krempe, (Robert Urquhart) had performed many scientific experiments, eventually leading to the resurrection of a dead body. Due to an accident, that damages the brain intended for Frankenstein's creation, the experiment goes horribly wrong.  Instead of the intelligent being Frankenstein set out to create- a hideous monster (Christopher Lee) rises from the laboratory table!  The baron's obsession and the monster's homicidal nature cause the deaths of several of those around them. Finally the Baron is confronted by an enraged monster about to throw Victor's fiance Elizabeth, (Hazel Court) from the castle parapet.  The DVD release has a clean transfer and the audio is vibrant. Great use of color and the studio sets and costuming are used to full advantage to set the gothic atmosphere to perfection.  The beginning of Hammer's rise to the top of the Horror genre and the first of many classics to come!"Dracula Has Risen From The Grave" (1968)When his castle is exorcised, Dracula  (Christopher Lee) plots his revenge against the Monsignor (Rupert Davies) who performed the rites by attempting to make the Holy man's young niece, Maria (Veronica Carlson) his bride. Great story and very enjoyable performances by the entire cast make this entry in Hammer's `Dracula" series a real treat!"Frankenstein Must Be Destroyed!" (1969)Baron Frankenstein  (Peter Cushing) is once again working with illegal medical experiments. Together with a young doctor, Karl Holst (Simon Ward) and his fiance Anna Spengler (Veronica Carlson) they kidnap the mentally sick Dr. Brandt, (George Pravda) to perform the first brain transplant ever!"Horror of Dracula" (1958)After Jonathan Harker (John Van Eussen) attacks Dracula (Christopher Lee) at his castle, the vampire travels to a nearby city, where he preys on the family of Harker's fiance. The only one who may be able to protect them is Dr. Van Helsing, (Peter Cushing) Harker's friend and fellow-student of vampires, who is determined to destroy Dracula, whatever the cost! The first in Hammer's "Dracula" series and possibly "the best" gothic vampire movie ever made! Lush visuals, great atmospheric music and studio sets, along with outstanding cast performances make this Hammer's crowning jewel of gothic horror!"The Mummy" (1959)Three British archeologists (including Peter Cushing) discover the grave of an important Egyptian female priestess (Yvonne Furneaux) who has died about four millennia ago. But when they open it a bad curse falls on them for having woken up the mighty "Guard of the Grave" (Christopher Lee) who was buried with the priestess.  Hammer once again proved its ability to bring a classic horror story to vibrant life! "The Mummy" is perfectly wonderful in it's story telling, costuming, studio sets, and the cast performances are superb!"Taste the Blood of Dracula" (1970)Three elderly distinguished gentlemen are searching for some excitement in their boring lives and get in contact with one of count Dracula's servants (Ralph Bates).  During a nightly ceremony they restore The Count (Christopher Lee) back to life. The three men kill Dracula's servant, and for revenge the Count makes sure that the gentlemen are killed one by one by their own sons.  An original ideal for Hammer's `Dracula" series makes this one quite enjoyable. Ralph Bates really puts in a fine performance as Dracula's devoted servant- he's so believable!"THE HAMMER HORROR COLLECTION" is a great box containing some of the Production Studios finest. If only a volume 2 or even a volume 3 would have followed!  Hammer Studios truly set the bench mark for the gothic horror genre, and as of yet, no other studio has come close to meeting Hammer's success!
Heroes abound. The Great Escape portrays the heroism of prisoners  never giving into their captors and the pompous honor of Nazi Germany.  The group becomes a monkey wrench at all turns determined to send their adversary to the Russian front.  My only complaint is that it is shown in letterbox format which saps some of the power of the story.  Wasn't this picture worth a full screen format?  But this is probably par for the epics of that era.  The stars had to carry the load and be bigger in life even though you are peeking through a window.  Steve McQueen was a man of epic tales and this one does not fail to deliver.  Even doomed to failure he never gives up.  Resist with every last breath was the motto of the prisoners.  Guile and guts served them well and in the end Germany was defeated even if only in small part by the escapades of the escapees.  Grit abounds through the fiber of every man sworn to serve the Allied forces.  We owe these men a debt we can never repay, but always respect.  It takes courage to put your own well being second behind the cause.  Unfortunately we have seldom triumphed in glory since that time.  This war made sense while successors seemed steeped in politics.  Something a normal person has a hard time understanding.  Let's just hope that global war was put to rest with this one.  We can look back on the Great Escape with admiration and gratitude.  But we can never repay what was sacrificed by these men
Ambitious and Engaging Work From Spielberg. Empire Of the Sun is a different type of war epic that treats the Japanese occcupation of China as seen through the eyes of a young British schoolboy separated from his parents during the evacuation of Shanghai. Christian Bale gives a remarkable performance as a boy who goes from a priviledged existence to a struggle to survive the occupation. John Malkovich is convincing as a coldblooded, hustling American merchant caught up in the Japanese invasion who manipulates Bale's character for his own benefit.The scale and ambition of the film is huge and some of the scenes of the evacuation and bombing are incredibly well done- classic Spielberg.Overall a rewarding film about a part of WWII that has been explored less by Hollywood than the European war.
The spoiled princess's of Manhattan. Uptown Girls starring Brittany Murphy and Dakota Fanning is quite delightful about a rich girl (Murphy) who loses her inheritance and must become one of the normal people - she has to get a real job (gasp!). Donald Faison and Heather Locklear also star. Fanning has never been more than a pain in the rump for this particular role but she is one of the most talented young actress' since Jodie Foster. Murphy has great range as an actress, every role she commits to, she delivers a clean, enerergtic performance as always. The ending is so cute that it's embarrassing. This movie works so well, it's predictable, melodramatic, and formulatic but I defintely enjoyed this feel-good comedy from two gifted actress'
Deeply Inspiring. A very special story that sheds glowing light on the beautiful capacities of the human heart. I found myself deeply inspired to create new paintings while watching this true story unfold. Dael DaelArt.co
All it takes is just a little heart and courage on your part ... Well, this was a random purchase on my part, so I thought I was prepared for anything...even 54 girls hopping in front of a train simultaneously. Interestingly that wasn't the craziest part of the film. A detective story with an almost Rod Serling twist, or a thriller with a detective setting? Either way this was and interesting look at cinema in general and Asian cinema in particular. As long as digital blood doesn't bother you (a growing trend in Japanese film) it's an interesting story that will entertain most audiences and inspire a few interesting conversations. (Seriously, watch this with some friends and see what discussions start up.
Old "skool" kunk fu. This flick is definately amount the top best performance,,Sammo Hung,,,the most impressive monkey style kung fu ever!!  The comedy was greatly choreographed,,,,,and interestingly enough it really was funny!!  The training alone was enough to give this flick a 4 star.  This is the first flick where Leung Kar Yan is really funny,,,I always see him as a serious actor.  The final fight scene was amazing,,,there is nothing like the monkey kung fu, only sammo and Yuen Biao could have pulled this one off!! The monkey kung fu is the most impressive, since crazy horse!
Good documentary on the G.O.A.T. I just finished watching this piece on my all-time favorite rapper 2Pac. It's probably the best documentary I have ever seen except for the beginning. Once 2Pac's former bodyguard, Frank Alexander, begins his version of the year leading up to Pac's death, the whole thing is great. I didn't want to miss one word from this. I felt I had a lot to learn about Tupac's death, and I feel that I have learned quite a bit from &quot;Before I Wake&quot;. Before seeing this, I was 100% positive that 2Pac had faked his death, but seeing this, I'm not so sure anymore. I also believed that Suge Knight had a part in the death of Pac, but everyone (from detectives to bodyguards to journalists) believe that Suge had no part in it. This was a great movie because it explains how Pac felt about things, and some of his responses to adversity (such as the rape charges he faced). Make sure to check this out and Frank Alexander's book &quot;Got Your Back: Protecting Tupac In The World Of Gangsta Rap&quot;
Charming Movie. See title; simply put, it's a charming film.  Loved it - a very successful gift
Charming and filled with fun and laughter. In a world filled with headlines on war and hate, you and your family will enjoy these timeless classics that enthralls people of all ages (including men!). The beautiful poetic Anne captures our imagination and we can see a piece of ourselves in her with every step through her life journeys. Use these beautifully inspiring books to bring your family closer together and grab the attention of your children inspiring them to read other literature. This is a must read for anyone of any age!
A highly original Western comedy... A 1990's Western comedy featuring Mel Gibson, Maverick was a breath of fresh air when first appeared in theaters. The film doesn't take itself so seriously as many films with a Western setting tend to do. Based on the 1950's television series by the same name in which James Garner had a starring role, Maverick is a uniquely clever and entertaining adventure comedy...When Bret Maverick (Mel Gibson) needs $25,000 to enter a winner-take-all poker tournament, he travels through towns en route to the tournament in the hopes of winning every dollar he needs. But he quickly encounters Angel (Alfred Molina), a roughneck poker player in his own right who tries to kill Maverick (his attempt inevitably fails).Along the way, Maverick meets up with Ms. Annabelle Bransford (Jodie Foster) - a slick, conniving poker player who picks Maverick's pocket following a brief romantic encounter. When Maverick catches her, he forces her to wash his shirt as punishment. Shrinking his designer shirt, Annabelle runs off to catch a riverboat with Maverick running after her. After boarding the boat, the two are joined by Marshal Zane Cooper (James Garner) - a kind, retired sheriff famous throughout the West. Cooper's chivalry and hospitality greatly contrast with Maverick's brisk demeanor when it comes to dealing with Ms. Bransford.As the three travel cross country, they face a series of pitfalls such as a dead coach driver who almost runs their coach off the top of a cliff, a showdown with hundreds of Indians, and Maverick's financial dealings with an Archduke from Russia. Separated in the confusion, the three eventually meet again on the Riverboat Lauren Belle, home of the championship poker game hosted by the riverboat's owner Commodore Duvall. Making use of his quick wit, Maverick raises the extra cash he needs to join the poker game (as well as a few thousand extra for Annabelle Bransford). Commodore Duvall puts Marshal Zane Cooper in charge of guarding the $500,000 in entry fees for the tournament in which Angel also happens to be a participant.  But in addition to beating Angel, Maverick faces other obstacles of even greater challenge...Overall, Maverick is great entertainment. The acting is superb on all fronts with standout performances by Mel Gibson, Jodie Foster, and James Garner. Each of the main characters creates a likeable persona. And what makes this movie a must-see (because the plot leaves much to be desired) is the ability of the on-screen characters to create a personal connection with the audience. Several of the scenes in this film are absolutely hilarious, such as the ones with Joseph (Graham Greene). Maverick isn't the type of movie that will win Academy Awards or leave one pondering the fundamental principles of the universe, but it is a whole lot of fun. And if you want to do is laugh, give this movie a try...The DVD Repor
Wonderful!!. I decided to purchased both part 1 and part 2 for my 2 year old who totally loves tractors and am I ever so glad that I did!!  He LOVES his tractor tapes!!!!  He now wants to watch them instead of The Wiggles.
The second half of the "Complete Collection". While this does say it is the complete collection, it is only the second half of it. There is an actual Wolf's Rain Box set available that does contain the entire series. This is not it.This collection contains the last half of the show and is, in my opinion, the greatest set of ending episodes in any anime I have ever seen. As Kiba, Toboe, Hige, Tsume and Cheza continue their search for paradise, getting continuously closer, so too are the nobles and Darcia to attaining paradise for their own means. As the humans Cher, her ex-husband Hubb, and the Wolf hunter Quent also become increasingly entangled between the oppressive nobles and the truth of The Book of the Moon, the setting is set for the most gripping set of episodes I have ever witnessed. By the time the series reaches its climax, an emotional attachment will have been achieved between the viewer and the characters that pulls you into the story and makes you truly feel for all the troubles and heartache they experience. The last half of Wolf's Rain is filled with drama, action, suspense and surprise occurances throughout. There is just no way you can see this show and not be in awe. I highly recommend this collection for anyone who is a fan of great entertainment, anime or not. The story, characterization, and voice work (not to mention the wonderful music provided by Yoko Konno) Wolf's Rain will draw you in regardless. So whether you buy the series in a two part collection or get the full box set elsewhere is up to you. Either way, you won't be disappointed
ABsolutely amazing!!. This is the only ab workout I have ever done, and believe me, I have done alot, where I have actually seen results.  The floor excercises are intermediate to difficult.  Billy does alot of crunch-like exercises in which you must tuck your chin to your chest and keep your shoulders off of the floor.  In other words, you must always keep your abs contracted.  I never knew it, but this is the secret to getting great abs.Further, after doing this workout for several months, I can actually see the muscles in my stomach.  I can't believe I may actually one day have a visible six pack.  I never thought it possible.Another thing I like about this workout is there is about 15 mintues of stand up ab excercises.  These exercises consist of alot of twisting, which slims your waste.  My waste has gone down one whole size from doing these on a regular basis.  Besides the twisting, Billy also does some stand-up ab strenghening excercises which are not as hard on your back as the floor exercises.  If you are a beginner you will find this workout challenging, especially the floor exercises.  But don't give up.  Each time you do this workout you will definitely notice that you have stronger abs and after a month of doing this workout on a regular basis you will definitely see results!!This is by far the best and most effective ab workout I have ever done.
Eat...Drink...Man...Woman... Folks, I have 'skipped' this movie every time that I ran into it on cable, simply due to the fact that I missed the very beginning.  I just don't know why, but today I made an exception and stopped to watch it.  Now, I've got to get my copy so that I, among everyone else, can enjoy this fine film at my leisure.  Ang Lee does it again - and we are better for it.  Five stars!
Warm and lovely Ms. Hope + bossa nova = sublime. Love this from start to finish. Smart, warm, and sublime. Bossa nova is utilized perfectly as Hope Davis (who has never looked lovelier) gives a terrific performance. You just love watching and listening to her here. Can we a get a deluxe edition please
An overlooked gem from Merchant Ivory. This is an early entry from the Merchant Ivory team, and one which was unjustifiably dismissed on its initial release.It's a creative, well filmed and acted period piece set in early Hollywood, loosley based on the Fatty Arbuckle scandal. All the angst, drama, insincerity, drugs and general debauchery is perfectly and vividly captured.The movie features great performances from the entire cast Raquel Welch is execellent, Perry King gorgeous and James Coco tragic.This DVD restores some of the cut footage such as the infamous orgy scene.Another plus is the excellent music score
The Shadow Riders. I truly enjoyed this Louis Lamour film.  I love westerns and was a big fan of John Wayne.  I see Tom Selleck as the closest actor to emulate The Duke in his presence on the screen
Changes in cultural standards. This was  a beautiful film, well-done.  It was interesting in that it was set in New Zealand in a culture that I knew nothing about. The characters were engaging and it was interesting to see the relationships grow. The effect of the grandfather on the grandaughter's life because of his hard and fast interpretation of tribal standards made for an interesting story. I would highly recommend it for your viewing
&quot;Hoss&quot; The Legend. The video speaks for itself. Watch the live performance from 1978 in Nashville. Ol' Waylon shows why he was the &quot;outlaw&quot; and makes you realize that he paved the way for all country singers  today. I wish I could have been there
cut version, btu still good if you don't have all region player, though why you wouldn't get one I don't know. I wish I could answer that but I don't have one myself, I'm just lazy I guess.  But the movie even in the 95 or so minute version is still very good.  It does feel like it was taken straightt form tv, but still one of the best tv movies ever.  Mark dacoscas gets his real starring role in this one.  And you will find out that this guy is a true martial arts master.  His athletic ability is uncomparable to other actors.  He has that somerican looking face, I don't see why he can't do more roles like this, it is sad.Now the movie itself, starts out showing you that you will be seeing at least one super human in this movie.  So the guy from speed(and speed 2), gets taken hoistage sort of just because he is around and has a car.  While the movie never really gets going with a great storyline, it doesn't need to.  The action just absolutely explodes.  And the storyline is good, it's just that it could have been a bit deeper, but the comedy was outstanding.  There is a part where the 2 get pulled over, black guy pulls out his licence, all is good.  The cop asks for dacascas's name and he tells him "Sammo Hung".  I was not expecting that and it had me rolling.    So certainly a 5 for the action and probably a 3.5 for the story.  With a 4 for the acting.  And the music was around a 4 too, very good.Now the concept in this is kind of like a classic kung uf movie, guns, but not really allowed to use them.  In enter the dragon, they were not allowed on the island, in other movies, it can just be an honor thing.  But the reason behind it in this is the fact that dacoscas is a super weapon  in the near future and he has a certain device implanted in his chest and is worth too much money to kill.  So they have to try and shoot him in the legs.  This showcases mark to his full capabilites.  His acrobatics are truly unbelievable for a guy who should be a top notch action star up there with anybody.So I would like to see the version with like 12 extra minutes, but this is good enough for now.  So I got this for like 7 bucks with shipping and I woudl say itr is worth it.  You are not going to find a better american style action movie until unleashed came out.  And jet can't do the crazy jumps and flips mark can, but could definitely woop the shoot out of him.
Awesome!!!!. My 3 and half year old daughter and 18 month old son LOVE this DVD. Plus, being of the early Sesame Street generation, it is fun to hear some of the old classic cartoons..
Very Moving ,and Great acting!. I just saw this on DVD,after never catching it on television. I thought it was a very touching film,and was very pleased with the quality of the actor's performances. It always saddens me to be reminded how so many countries failed to act in ways that could have saved so many lives,such as if they had bombed the railroads and bridges leading to the death camps. Very engrossing film,I was pleased with it
not a great film but i do like it. this is the story of jake graffton a  intruder pilot in the 'nam and how after his co-pilots death he questions what it is he's doing on these missions. he is joined by new co-pilot on a rule breaking flight to earn some "payback". it runs a little to long and the ending is rushed but i still have to say i like this one. enjoy
The Effects of Ignorance. Errol Morris, via The Fog of War, proved that he is one of the most talented documentary filmmakers of our day. This film directly proceeded the McNamera classic but much of his skill at the genre is on display. The interplay of music and camera, and the way in which he captures onscreen the unsuspecting and pathetic Fred Leuchter is artful-this is true even the close-ups of coffee pots and electrical currents emanating from his head during the opening.That viewers feel sympathy for this confused, broken man who is devoid of social skills and social comprehension is an unintended consequence of the vehemence in which the forces of political correctness attacked him. He definitely had no idea as to the way he would be vilified simply by appearing at the Zundel trial. Leuchter, an engineer in deed only, with no scientific academic background whatsoever, conducted a middle school like science experiment at Birchenau and believed, based on some shoddy chemical analysis, that no cyanide gas was used there. The result was that his life was ruined.Personally, as a life long learner who has never been, and will never be, a historical revisionist, the destruction of Fred Leuchter is appalling. I completely believe and know that the holocaust occurred, but am aghast that certain "activists" think they have the right to destroy of the lives of those who disagree with them. Why didn't these brave activists respond to his arguments rather than conduct a campaign of hate? His positions are juvenile. Leuchter knew nothing about chemical tests, history, or society in general. He was an easy mark, but their emotionalizing the issue had the reverse effect. It made people think they had no answers to his arguments. It legitimizes revisionism. By squashing this non-entity they made him a martyr. What they should have done was publish vigorous refutations, instead they made Leuchter appear a champion of free inquiry; which, by the way, he is in comparison to shrieking critics and the Canadian government. This is the way in which political correctness and reckless emotion have damaged our intellects and degraded our culture. Bullying, shaming, and forcing guilt upon others is exactly how you vile personas like Ernst Zundel were created in the first place. Zundel is a reaction to such attempts.
Bizarre & Brilliant - Not Your Typical Anime. I was really surprised by how much I loved Geneon's "requiem from the Darkness." The short 13 episode anime series really is a breath of fresh air in a genre crwoded with Hulking mecha, predictable harem shows and over-the-top comedy. The series is visually a huge treat. The characters still are anime style but they have a slightly angular/ almost punk comic style to them. The backgrounds are very stylized and feature a amazing combination of art styles and CG work.The story itself is a simple tale of young Momosuke attempting to collect local ghost stories for his book "100 stories." Along his way he encounters 3 strangers whose job it is to punish wrong-doers with a fate best befitting their crime. Rather than collect ghost stories Momosuke gets caught up in them and bears witness to some of the darker aspects of life in Edo-Era Japan.The show is violent and features some scary sequences and mature themes but isnt gratuitous in its depictions. Overall the mood is suspenseful with bits of comedy and drama here and there. I recommend the regular verion of this series as oppossed to the boxset. The Boxset has cheap plastic holders (think CD flip book holders) for all 4 DVDs but not the cover art. The boxset is pointless unless you are okay with keeping JUST the DVDs from volumes 2-4 and throwing away the cases and cover art. AT half the price plus with a case to match vols 2-4, the regular version is the way to go.If you are looking for some beautiful and offbeat anime with a plot this is an EXCELLENT place to start. Don't let this quiet release slip by
dvd=Director's. It was a great DVD but he has done much more since then that I hope it is remade for the present
Great set... This is a great set of shows.  The disclaimer is great, saying that it's not a representation of all gay people, however most gay men and women can relate to various characters in the show either as themselves or as friends.  I have straight friends as well who have very much enjoyed watching the show.  Note that this is DEFINITELY for mature audiences only as there is a lot of language, nudity, sexual situations and substance abuse...all the makings for a great drama
Iconic Horror Film. It probably won't terrify you as some other horror films like "The Exorcist" or "Ringu" will, but "Suspiria" is definitely an iconic film that all horror film fans must watch. What make it so effective are the strange atmosphere (i.e., visuals, sounds, etc.) and, of course, the now famous score. It'll easily be one of your favorite films of the genre after seeing it
Saturated colorful fury... In Dreams is an extremely surreal movie shot in beautiful colors and unforgettable imagery. Quite shocking and violent, the scenes will stay with you for days after viewing this. Annette Benning gives a top notch preformance she IS Claire!!!!And Robert Downey Jr. gives a chilling preformance as Vivian, the confused villan.Highly reccomended nail biter...just wait until the climax at the end on the bridge..
The long road. It is great to see Dylan put into perspective of the folk movement that occurred in the late 50's and early 60's that includes so many great names like Pete Seeger, Liam Clancy, Dave Van Ronk and Arlo Guthrie.  Whereas Scorsese built the story of The Band around The Last Waltz concert, here he takes his time, exploring the ins and outs of Dylan's storied early years, showing how this kid from Minnesota exploded onto the folk music scene, able to absorb and assimilate both the music and the social events of the time.  Seeger quickly picked up on this young talent, who like Dylan's obvious musical and social reference, Woody Guthrie, was able to capture the mood of the time.  Scorsese intersperses the documentary with a number of amusing anecdotes, the best delivered by Liam Clancy.  Concert footage is edited, but then there are a number of concert DVD's available of Bob through the years. You won't be disappointed.
Worth the cost. I installed this game and got it running (quite smoothy) a few weeks ago, and I was quite surprised. Firstly, it doesn't even require the original Dawn of War or Winter Assault games to be installed, but to be able to use the five races from those games in multiplayer, to have to install them and provide a cd-key. Secondly, I suspect that they made their graphics more effecient, because it got way prettier, but my computer got no better.Gameplay, though, it somewhat repetitive, with only one game type for every map (occasionally interspaced with freakishly advanced, but fun, maps with sometimes nigh-impossible objectives.) They fiddled with the game balance from the previous games too, so don't look forward to the all-out Lemon Russ assault with Baneblade as the spearhead for the Imperial Guard, or a massive fleets of Prisem Cannons and Warp Spiders as the Eldar. The new units are excellent, though, and the Necrons are a very imposing force on the battlefield, with an HQ that can teleport and move around, and is covered in guns.Even with only one game type in the campagin mode, I still find this to be an exiting and origenal stratagy game, and even inside the limitation of the objectives, there are still suprises around the corners.(Also, there is a world of differance between Easy and Normal, so don't get mad because you cannot seem to ever lose.
As advertised. Everyone who is a football fan talks about this movie and with every right. The movie, albeit an older classic, is definitely a CLASSIC!!
Hilarious Movie. I love 9 to 5.  It is truly a classic.  The pairing of Jane Fonda, Lilly Tomlin, and Dolly Parton is genius.  This movie keeps me laughing the whole time
Leon~The director's cut of "The Professional" answers questions and comes clean about Mathilda and Leon... The original version of Luc Besson's first American film was blazing with firefight action, the creepy stylings of Gary Oldman as Stansfield, the ingenuous flirtation of a young Natalie Portman, an excellent matter-of-fact view of 'the really real world', and a hint of a suggestion of an allusion to the very real romantic entanglement of a 13 year old orphan and a 40 year old hit man. This version actually deals with the relationship between Mathilda and Leon, contextualizes it with his history (and immigration catalyst) and the realistic and legitimate development of their relationship through the juxtaposition of their respectively damaged mental, physical and emotional states of maturity. Further, it deals with their professional relationship as well as making sense out of the abrupt hints that define Tony and Mathilda's dealings with one another. For those who 'got it' in the original, this fleshes out all of the details you were forced to fabricate and or assume; for those that didn't, this is what the film was meant to be. Send your copy of the theatrical release back to the studio with a nasty letter about artistic integrity and scrotal stalwartness and pick up a copy of the real film today
Blind Fury - Eye Opening Sleeper Hit!. Rutger Hauer did a superb job in all areas of the movie, and I applaud him for his acting efforts in this film, as well as his other acting stints.I enjoyed the movie, it had great continuity, a good film score, and the acting was at times funny and also very serious. I highly recommend this film to any Rutger Hauer fans, as well asthose who enjoy action adventure/martial arts & sword flix
Truly Wonderful!. One of the finest movies I have ever seen! It must have beenso hard to make! Dudley Moore MAKES it!!
Burn It with the Banchee Woman!. I recently bought The Step wich came with Cathe Frederick's Basic Step. After mastering that, I felt I should move on to a more intermediate video and after a little online shopping, decided to purchase this video.You'll definitely get your heartrate up doing the 16 minute step workout, so make sure to have a bottle of water close by! The 2nd 10 minute session will slow it down a bit, but your legs will kill you in the end if your legs aren't really strong yet. The 3rd 10 minute session felt more like a cool down for me than anything else. It was really nice to lie down and stretch my leg muscles. The butt crunches were quite welcomed as well.The propulsion moves are not that intriguing. I find them to be hard on the knees and they do not benefit your heart rate or fitness aptitude.Kathy herself is a good instructer. I could follow her directions very well. However, I call her Banchee Woman because she does these tribal calls when she gets really excited about the exercises. It's kind of embarrassing sometimes! And she also has a man on her team that gives you really alluring looks during the workout. That's kind of creepy.I have a few complaints as well other than the music being a bit annoying-- Kathy's arm movements. She wants you to do these "strong arm" movements, but they are extremely hard to incorporate with the stepping. You'll find yourself tripping over your feet while you try to wave your arms around in the patterns she suggests.Nonetheless, the DVD does what it says - it gives you toned thighs and buns after a dozen or so run-throughs. And that, to me, is the most important part
INTO THE WEST. This is a DVD I have purcharsed before and it was a hit with my son and grandson so I bought them there own copy. Service and shipment time very good.
TZ as zeitgeist of the times. As others have already commented on the technical features of the set and the individual episodes, I just wanted to make a few comments on the series as a whole and perhaps how it was influenced by the cultural milieu of the time.It was the drab 50s and then turbulent 60s, and the Cold War, with its threat of possible nuclear annihilation, was in full swing. Perhaps that explains the pervasive film noir ambience and dark mood that often hangs like a pall over many of the episodes. Although the characters are drawn from all levels of society and from all walks of life--from two-bit criminals to the rich and famous--many are just various and sundry low-lifes, riff-raff, criminals, and grifters. And then there are the simply down and out--the bored or emotionally overwrought, middle-aged and overstressed, desperate housewives, the dyspeptic, dispossessed, or depressed, and your average guy just down on his luck.Almost every human emotion or character flaw or neurosis is explored: loneliness, depression, euphoria, greed, obsession, gambling addiction, hypochrondria, the lust for power, the fear of death, feelings of inferiority, failure, and inadequacy, feelings of ugliness and beauty, the stress of modern life, the old and unwanted, the young and neglected, the dispirited but still hopeful, the dispirited who have abandoned all hope, the highly successful who find their success and fame empty and meaningless, the losers who find their failures just as galling and damning, the boredom of a comfortable marriage, the boredom of the single and lovelorn, the boredom of a respectable middle-class existence, the boredom of grinding poverty, the desire to live forever, and on and on. Modern civilization and its discontents (or more like 20th-century America and its malcontents) seem to march by in all their false and meretricious glory. If this was the dull and malaise-ridden 50s and early 60s, one can only wonder what Serling would make of our frenetic and divided and paranoid post-9/11 world.One funny aspect of the episodes is how unflatteringly writers themselves are portrayed. The episodes starring Keenan Wynn (in the first season) as a America's most famous (but philandering) playwright and Richard Haydn in the second season as a snobbish, effete, arrogant, spiteful, and verbally abusive wine and food writer with a short temper and a sharp wit and tongue, don't exactly portray writers in a positive light. :-)In fact, overall, the series is notable for how many unsympathetic, unprepossessing, and even despicable characaters where often in the lead roles. :-)So all in all, a truly unique piece of Americana from a long lost era whose themes and stories have held up better than I expected
Devil's Arithmetic. The movie Devil's Arithmetic is really a great movie. It's really great for the whole family. Teachers - this movie does not have violence, it is absolutely great for students all ages
The Intricacies of the Cultural Revolution in China. Sijie Dai's semi autobiographical novel BALZAC AND THE LITTLE CHINESE SEAMSTRESS is one of those little miracles of a film that lingers in the mind and heart long after the credits are over.  Sijie Dai wrote the screenplay, cast the film and directed his story about the changes that occurred in Communist China in such a way that the full spectrum of 'revolution' is appreciated without polarizing the audience.The time is 1971 and the city bourgeois children are sent to the rural areas for re-education in to the mindset of Socialism and the glory of Chairman Mao.  Among these are two young boys - Luo (Kun Chen), son of a dentist and a scholar who loves to read, and Ma (Ye Liu) who also loves learning and is an able violinist.  The boys arrive in the picturesque but illiterate commune run by the Chief (Shuangbao Wang) who takes away all of their city possessions except for Ma's violin (Ma and Luo convince the Chief that the music of Mozart is in honor of Chairman Mao!).  The boys adjust to the rigors of hard labor, mix with the rural folk and the other boys being reeducated - Four Eyes (Hong Wei Wang) secretly hides classic books and is befriended by the boys - as well as the venerated Old Tailor (Zhijun Cong) and his delightful granddaughter Little Chinese Seamstress (Xun Zhou).  The boys bond with her and read to her, her favorite author being Balzac who reminds her of her dreams of the world beyond her Phoenix mountain.  The admixture of the city people with the peasants is beautifully realized as they become one group but retain their own inherited dreams.  Luo falls in love with the Little Chinese Seamstress (and so does Ma) and the three experience the beauty of nature and music and literature until circumstances force their separation.  We then see what happens to the trio twenty years later and the secrets of their time together have major impact on their lives.Dai draws profoundly moving performances from his cast, especially the central trio, and his story is enhanced by the spectacular cinematography by Jean-Marie Dreujon and the especially fine musical score by Pujian Wang who composes music in the idiomatic Chinese vein and blends it with a lot of Mozart and other Western composers creating a memorable score.  Few of us understand the changes in philosophy that accompanied the Chinese Communist Cultural Revolution and this story and film offer an enchanting view of how the human spirit can survive almost any obstacle when it is married to friends, to literature and to music.  Highly Recommended.  Grady Harp, June 06
Gotta Dance!. That's Entertainment is sort of a documentary for classic musicals. It is basically a bunch of clips from famous musicals like Singin' in the Rain, Seven Brides for Seven Brothers, Wizard of Oz, Gigi and other films with musical sequences like Broadway Melody of 1938, Born to Dance, Suzy, and Going Hollywood.The montages are narrated by some of the most famous film and musical staples including Jimmy Stewart, Mickey Rooney, Debbie Reynolds, Fred Astaire, Bing Crosby, and Liza Minelli.Basically, That's Entertainment is a celebration of musicals and their stars, but you don't have to be a fan of musicals to enjoy this film. Some of these sequences are truly amazing and stand on their own as superb pieces of film-making, even if they don't impress you in the films they come from.
Great Family Movie. 76 out of 100. The Neverending Story is a great fantasy movie that is wonderful for seven year olds, and seven year olds at heart. While at times some of the special effects are dated, the story itself stands the test of time.The Neverending Story is a story about a small boy named Bastian who loses his mother and is told by his father to "deal with his pain" and grow up past the need for all his escapist fantasy books. Having read everything from Tarzan to the Lord of the Rings, Bastian discovers a book called the Neverending Story, and finds his way into the most fascinating ride of his life.The creatures and fantasy beings in the story are incredibly unique and fun to watch. We really liked the Rock Biter, and the Swamps of Sadness.The Neverending Story shares many wonderful endearing qualities with films such as the Wizard of Oz and Jumanji. If you are looking for a pure, simple and exciting escape, and a great movie for all ages, you can't go wrong owning this DVD. This is one our family bought.Total Score (out of 100) = 7640 (out of 50). Enjoyment. A rating based on my overall enjoyment of the film.6 (out of 10). Acting. How good was the acting?8 (out of 10). Immersion. Did the movie suck me into the story?9 (out of 10). Intangibles. Special effects. Movie pace. Is the movie forgettable, or something you will talk about and remember for weeks? Years?8 (out of 10). Must see. Is this movie worth seeing/renting?5 (out of 10). Must buy. Is this movie a must buy/purchase
Charmed Fan. I love charmed so there will be no bad rating from me. I just can't wait to buy all of them
worth every cent!!!. AWESOME!!!!no better Dolls film! get it NOW. see ny when it was still fun and exciting!!! see 14th street with the Academy of Music and Automat!!! see Jimmy Page's girl ( literally ) Lori Maddox tell David he is her fave!!!! see Johnny Thunders!!!ps---i loved Eyewitness News' Joel Siegel (sp?) reviewing the dolls mercer shows for nyc television. pretty funny. commentaries are good too and mr. manitoba ( who did a great job singing for the mc5 here last year ) says something quite pithy about the heartbreakers. dig it!!!!
good musical. lot of good songs--enjoyed it very much--can't beat Liza singing "Have Yourself a Merry Christmas
Clifford is transformed. Clifford is transformed into a television series fom a book and they did a grand job at it. I love Clifford's Birthday I watch that all the time.  The animation is great and everybody is likeable.  I recommend this show
Review of "A Christmas Carol". We viewed the video, "A Christmas Carol" and the video is of fine quality
This movie was creative and enjoyable. An amazing movie!!!. I like the idea of them bringing dinosaurs back to life. If I could bring dinosaurs back to life, I would not let them eat anybody!!!
John Wayne again!. One of the good John Wayne/Maureen O'Hara movies. Any of their fans will like this one
one of the best movies of recent times. This great raw movie introduced the world to a major new talent - the director innarutu... His unmistakeable style is felt frame by frame - and has delighted audiences in his equally searing features 21 grams and most recently babel.. But it is this dog eat dog world film 'amorres perros'that will be remembered years from now.. The films central metaphor - the dog - is is tied with love  -love is indeed a biyatch (sorry for the cheap comic use of the word).. and is used in a way a metaphor should be used in film - it is direct yet underplayed (if that makes any sense).. this is a harsh and real movie.. it forces you into its world from the very first shot very direct and very relevant for our times.
Fun 007 Spoof!. This is not one the best stories you will ever find in a Chan movie but it has some of the best and funniest moments i have ever seen in his movies the classic ladder scene is my second favorite fight scene ever made ,the first being a tie betwenn the axe gang and final fights in drunken mast II, also the underwater kung-fu is great there are also some funny 007ish moments like the whole snow mobile ski scene also the fsb agents so in all this is a good fun movie
War Propaganda. Excellent job by Hichcock to meet government's requirement for a war propaganda film.  The story line goes way beyond you enemy - me kill
WOW THIS DVD IS REAL GOOD!. I just recieved my copy today and i already watched this DVD 4 times. Its for anyone that loves REAL hip hop music. This a definate must have for any true Bone fan it has exclusive music and performances with ALL of Bone (Bizzy included) You get to see them in the studio recording and performing live and just hanging out this really puts you behind the harmony. thanks Thugline for this GREAT DVD
A delightful history of old Hollywood. Dan Sonney and Dave Friedman were, in their own way, as much pioneers of our film industry as were Griffith and de Mille, and they were a lot more entertaining.  Hilarious in their matter-of-fact recalling of producing and marketing exploitation films, they point the way to today's far more notorious producers of so-called indie films.  This affectionate and good humored bit of Americana is indipensable for anyone who has ever watched a movie or a TV sitcom
Instant DVD collection. Over the course of three years, Warners has risen to the top of big studios when it comes to their treatment of vault titles. It seems like every month I've another Warners boxset coming in the mail. I'm still watching the Garbo collection.  If you haven't had a chance to delight in not only their fine transfers, but amazing bonus shorts, this is it.
SUPERB LOOK AT THE EMPTINESS AND MADNESS OF STOLEN LOVE. Written by playwright Noel Coward, directed by David Lean, starring Celia Johnson and Trevor Howard, and set to the impassioned music of Rachmaninoff's Concerto No. 2, this is a story about two people living quietly dull lives, married to equally dull spouses, who suddenly find someone interesting to share a brief encounter with. This masterful film shows how hungry normal, ordinary people are for the feeling that life is exciting, and that there is someone who finds them interesting to share it with. The normal avenue for such a relationship would have been their own spouses; but they are unable to find it there, somehow. So they find it one day, accidentally, illicitly, secretly, dishonestly, soul wrenchingly in a stranger. Now these quietly dull souls become quietly desperate souls, as they realize that stolen love comes with a price, and that what had promised to bring them boundless happiness is instead bringing them more sorrow than they have ever known before.I found many parallels in this movie with other quietly desperate people that I know: friends of mine who have tried to find happiness illicitly, secretly, dishonestly in work, sex, alcohol, drugs, co-dependent relationships, etc. I think this movie has a powerful message for our times. It is not about a love relationship that was doomed because of a stricter social and moral code than we have today; it is about the emptiness and madness of stolen love of any kind. I love the way the film ends, with repentance, forgiveness and reconciliation. This film is a timeless gem.Waitsel Smit
Great Husband/Wife film!. This is a great movie that both my husband and i can watch together!enough said
john wayne gives the  marines air support. typical world war two aviation yarn starring the duke as the tough as nails squadron commander. good supporting cast. a plus for the film is the fact that its shot in color, a rarity for this type of film at the time. if you like john wayne and ww2, you'll like flying leatherneck
A touching Comedy. I can honestly say that this is my favorite comedy. It has high levels of laughter and some extreme touching moments. Just Friends will make you laugh tears and cry them also. This movie includes the hotty Ryan Reynolds,Amy Smart, Anna Faris, and Chris Klein
James Hansen, You missed the whole point of the movie!. James, you wrote: "Ben is weak, immature, a stalker, lazy, has bad taste in women and at 21 is unable to tell his parents no when they ask him to wear a scuba suit for their family friends. Wow! Revolutionary film-making...not!"   Yes, Ben was weak, immature, and had bad taste in women. His learning to overcome his weakness, immaturity, bad taste in women, and then defy his family and Elaine's family was his coming of age story.  That WAS the point of the movie.  It went right over your head!  The acting was dead on and the subject matter was shocker when it came out!  How could you not love this movie?  Maybe you need to grow up a little to see the value.  Watch it again in a few years.  I think you will change your low opinion of this great classic movie over time.
"Looks like its going to be one of those days Jerry". Three O'clock High is one of the best 80's teen films there was.  Unfortunately, it didn't seem to attain the instant cult status that other films of similar theme like "Fast Times at Ridgemont High" and "Ferris Bueller's day off" did.Nearly 20 years after its release, Three O'clock High is still a film that is classic in every aspect of 1980's high school antics on the big screen.  With big hair, colorful clothes and an instrumental soundtrack from Tangerine Dream, the film takes us back to the day Jerry Mitchell met Buddy Revell.Buddy Revell (played by Richard Tyson, who in film would later go on to be a pilot in "Black Hawk Down", a sinister villain in "Kindergarten Cop" and an intense Detective in "There's Something about Mary") is a new kid in school.  The problem is, he's a problem child.  He's big, mean and has been known to go ballistic when people touch him.  Revell arrives at this new high school amid a swarm of urban legends and hallway gossip that strike fear into the student body.  Jerry Mitchell is a kid who works at the school bookstore, has an occult obsessed girlfriend who is more wannabe than weird, and a friend who works on the school paper with him.  The friend is in charge of finding someone to to interview Buddy to find out more about him.  Through an accidental meeting in the bathroom, Jerry conveys the papers intentions to Buddy, which by now has held a sneer so long he is being compared to Charles Manson.  Jerry makes the mistake of patting Buddy on the shoulder, and the rest is history:  Buddy informs Jerry to meet him at 3:00pm so that they can fight.  The problem?  Buddy looks like a large axe murder while Jerry resembles more of a kid who is on his way to becoming an accountant or something.The rest of the day plays out in a series of bizarre events that are wrapped up in some high school fact as well as teenage spoof reel.  Jerry goes through a variety of antics to get out of the fight, and in the process slowly turns his own good image into one of trouble.  By noon the entire school not only knows of the fight, but also is taking bets on how long Jerry will last.  It appears Jerry is doomed, and as he continues to try and do everything he can to change things, the acts only backfire to keep him within the walls of his high school till the sound of the final bell.  The movie does an excellent job in the execution of the overall filming, as it does many quick zoom shots as well as odd angles to add to the uniqueness of the overall experience we see as Jerry goes about his day.The film is nostalgic but not too cheesy on the time period of the 80's, which is easy to scoff at now.  The attention of the film is centered on the characters and the storyline a bit more than others of its genre.  From the school disciplinarian resembling a Prison Warden to the constant guilt trips the principal plays on Jerry about his permanent record being marred, its idealisms and humor are easily recognizable.  Tyson is superb as the scary, imposing bully type student while Casey Siemasziko does a great job portraying the small, pale student named Jerry Mitchell, who despite having a bad day, ends up finding out what its all about to stand up for yourself.  A classic 80's film that never, ever got the credit it deserved
What a wonderful documentary!!!. This film is a must-see for any dancer.  The clips used to showcase different types of dancing in film are creatively woven together and the commentary is very informative.  Many famous scenes from the old MGM  musicals to the water spray scene in Flashdance are used to illustrate how  diversified dancing in films can be.  For ballet dancers, there is a  portion devoted solely to ballet in films which is hosted by Mikhail  Baryshnikov.  Scenes of Rudolph Nureyev leaping through the air compliment  this section as well as scenes from various ballets.  Liza Minelli hosts  the Broadway inspirational portion which is shorter in length.  I only saw  this film once but I feel that it is a must-own selection for any dancer
Real life. I bought this because of Liv Tyler and Jennifer Connelly, and ended up liking the movie more than I thought I would
This may not be sparkling original, but it's well executed. There are many movies about sports, some very good, some really bad and this one falls into the very good category. "Goal!" is the typical sports movie about an exceptionally talented young amateur who is given a chance to shine among the professionals and win the heart of the girl he loves. However, "Goal!" works this premise and makes it fresh and entertaining. Director Danny Cannon had complete support by FIFA and Newcastle United and it shows, he has created some of the most realist and remarkable football scenes in film.Kuno Becker is very good as Santiago, although at times he is overshadowed by other members of the cast. It seems as if he lacked some presence on screen. However, he is still young, and certainly will improve with the years. Alessandro Nivola steals the movie with his performance as Gavin, a notorious football star whose convoluted public life begins to take its toll in his performance in the field.Cannon's approach to the story may seem clichd, but the movie is never boring nor tiresome. Sure, he follows every rule in "Sport Movies Handbook" but he does it with care, good eye and love for the sport. Just like sport movies should be done. The movie flows smoothly between remarkable football scenes and Santiago's struggle with his own personal demons. While at times it seems that both Cannon and Becker are more comfortable in sports scenes, the movie's dose of drama is well handled and completes an enjoyable experience. Even though it's frankly predictable most of the time, it transmits passion, emotions and a love for the game that few movies do. That's why "Goal!" can be considered a successful and important film. It is the first film about football soccer that transmits the emotions that have made the sport to be the most popular sport in the world. And that's got to be worth something.It may not be a perfect sports film; however, "Goal!" is the beginning of an adventure, and hopefully, of a new way to make football movies. This initial film of what is called the "Goal! Trilogy" delivers high energy entertainment for fans and non-fans of the sport.
white and black argument. Okay the film is well made because it attacks the interracial argument from many perspectives. Black Men, Black Woman, White Woman, White Man. The only thing I found unsettling is why can't the two just be attracted to each other. Why do they have to be attracted to each other because of the color of their skin. I guess the film allows to draw whatever conclusion we want but the issue is sticky. And I guess because the issue is sticky the film is also sticky.All I'm saying is why does their have to be something psychologically screwed up with Wesley Snipes is the film saying that there is? Ask these questions watching the film.
Magic of the Rainbow. My girls loved this dvd, and some of their friends also enjoyed it.  I would recommend this to anyone with girls who love barbie in general
Excellent movie. I have to admit that I cried like a baby at the end of this movie. This was probably one of the most amazing movies I have ever seen. I would recommend it to anyone, even if you aren't really that into history.
You Da Man, Stan!. Try to do the impossible and ignore efluvia like Flea, et al - and politically incorrect as it must seem to say this, Stevie Wonder's set is...Uuummm. Still: despite the recent, rather-embarassing-for-all-parties-concerned, "New Barbarians" thing, Stanley Clarke is THE HEIR APPARENT to Jaco. I KNOW: I'M a fairly excellent bass player myself, and, with the possible exception of Victor Wooten, Stanley Clarke is now the finest bass player alive. There it is: DEAL with it
"you don't asign him,you turn him lose". i like clint eastwood just like i like john wayne. two sides of the same coin i guess.this is a great collection and i am happy to have it in my collection.1.dirty harry= the first and still best finds harry up against a crazy who works the system as he kills and does other bad people. 5 stars2. magnum force=harry is after killers who ARE cops. good movie but harry and the killers aren't that far from each other. 4 stars.3.the enforcer=this one ties with sudden impact with me as the least of the movies. 3 stars4.sudden impact= clint looks tired and not into making this one, the only dirty harry movie he directed. 3 stars5. the dead pool=clint has a glint in this last dirty harry movie. he has a good time and it makes this one a great way to say goodbye to harry with
Nourishing The Celtic Roots In All Of Us. `Celtic Roots Festival, Vol. 3 is the third of three DVD's containing engaging live performances by marvelously gifted Celtic musicians and singers gathered in the Canadian town of Goderich. The festivities take place in what appears to be a large restaurant or sorts on a rather small stage beautifully decorated to awaken the Irish muse in all of us. A large Celtic cross, a rock wall, a standing stone or two and an assortment of  brush and barren branches create the perfect atmosphere for what we are about to hear.Contents:Daybreak: Fast Legs  /  A Traveller's Tale  /  Mending WallBrian Pickell Band: The Hiccup Jig-Burnt River-Dancing Squirrels  /  Muriel's Waltz-Sourgrass And Granite  /  My Father's Desk  /  Coming HomeGearoid O'Hallmhurain And Patrick Ourceau: Dumphy's Hornpipe-Chief O'Neil's Favourite  /  The Old Bush-Spike Island Lassies  /  I Buried My Wife And Danced On Top Of Her-Will You Come Along With Me?  /  Miss McClouds-The Lady's PantalettesProvidence: Dooney Rock-The Fly In The Porter  /  Smugglin' The Tin  /  Providence Reel-Roscommon Reel-Fred Finn's  /  Muiris O'ConnleainLike the previous two DVD's, this is an absolutely wonderful production. The cameras are as close to the performers as possible providing an intimate feel to the evening. You almost feel as though you're on-stage with them, truly a magical listening and viewing experience. Don't forget to buy vol. 1 & 2 as well
Loved this movie!. You'll either love it or hate it!  I saw it in theaters with a friend years ago and giggled and giggled.  The laughs build throughout the movie and I still quote one-liners from it.  My poor friend, however, hated it
You want boredom? Rent "Gerry.". Some of the diaries of the German troops heading east to the attack on Russia seem to elicit not so much a fear of the Russian Army as being thunderstruck by the vastness of Russia.The immensity of the country comes across in this purely Russian movie about two boys reunited with their father after a hiatus of 12 years. Since the boys, Ivan and Andrei, are so young, they have no independant memory of him and are forced to run to a secret hiding place where they have ferreted away a photograph of him. Both nod affirmatively: 'It's him.'One of our weaknesses as Americans, whether we travel to foreign countries or read foreign books or see foreign movies, is that we expect to see the USA in a foreign tongue. When we don't, we criticise the effort because in our minds, it doesn't measure up. 'It just ain't normal, Gladys!'So one thing this film isn't is that it isn't American. We don't know what the father was up to. We don't know why he came back. Millions and millions of sons and daughters grew up in that sad, anonymous, fungible childhood that was eastern europe after Communism. And in some families men returned and in some, other men returned. There wasn't any "Leave it to Beaver" and there weren't any "Waltons."Beautifully filmed we see the boys taken on a painful and lengthy journey and in a manner of speaking, the journey represents their passage from adolescence to something else, not adulthood but something just before that.It's beautiful and worth the effort. But it ain't Rocky. 5 stars. Larry Scantlebury
wow. i loved this movie it is great funny the animation war great great for every on
Destined for Failure. Despite many of the reviews, I think this is quite a nice piece. It is a sad love story based upon the first love of Ernest Hemmingway.Chris O'Donnell plays the young Hemmingway as a young American adventurer seeking excitement in northern Italy during the end of the first world war as a corpsman. He would rather be a soldier but he is too young and did not make it through the physical so he signs up for the Red Cross. While seeking excitement up on the battle line when he is supposed to be serving coffee behind the lines, he distinguishes himself by heroism as the trench is overrun and is wounded in the process. That brings him to a hospital where he meets the nurse who enraptures him.Sandra Bullock plays the nurse. She is competent, caring and considers herself too old for the young Hemmingway. Still, she is attracted to him and fights a losing battle against his "charm". Meanwhile, just about everyone else wants her attentions as well. She finds herself being torn in differing directions by her heart on the one hand and her intellect on the other.What makes this film difficult is that Sandra's character of the nurse is a very likeable person. O'Donnell's Hemmingway manages to be likeable as well except when his arrogance and vanity get in the way; I'm talking about Hemmingway's, not O'Donnell's. You get through this film thinking that she is just too good for him and that he doesn't deserve her. You also get a bit angry at her treatment of him at some points.Love stories have to have a bit of conflict to make them interesting. This one has more than it's share. For that reason, the romance seems to be one destined for failure.
great summerslam. the hardcore was awesome.the tlc was awesome.the oter matches are ok.but its worth the mone
Awsome anime. Some notes before i begin:I've collected WHR in seperate DVDs, not the full collection, so im not sure what this particular set includes. However, i got the following with the first DVD/box in the set:Shot Glass (little beer drinking glass is what i think they're for, the anime has alot to do with a certain bar/resturant called Harry's.)Witch Hunter Robin T-shirtCD Soundtrack (note: there are 2 seperate soundtracks as i found out later on).Anyway, the anime is very well written, but like alot of different animes, it may be confusing at first, but once you get the hang of whats going on, the story flows really well. Things will start to clear up and "story holes" will begin to be filled in by the 4th DVD. If you like horror related animes, this one is deffinutly for you. I also do not recommend this for kids 12 and under, it may give them nightmares.Hope this helps you
A Stunning and Memorable Movie. Set in Argentina during Rosas' dictatorship, Camila, directed by Luisa Bemberg, manages to make forbidden love seem like the ultimate sacrifice.  Bemberg is a master of melodrama forcing us to focus on the romance between a beautiful Irish girl and a handsome Jesuit priest and forget that this love story is about sacrilege and indiscretion.Based on the true story of Camila O'Gorman, the first woman in the history of Argentina to be executed.  The cinematography is beautiful and the music is subtle.  This movie works on so many levels. I'd hate to give away any of the incredible plot, but as a love story this has no comparison.As a historical film we see Rosas as a ruthless dictator who got away with murder becuase the upper class looked away. Even though Camila came from the elite, and the priest was well connected, rules were not made to be broken.  I'd hate to give away any of the incredible plot.  Whether you're a fan of the romance genre  or not, don't miss this memorable movie.
"I'm not a human being. I walk in eternity.". Sometimes "Doctor Who" succeeds as a show by taking itself very seriously, as with the classic "Genesis of the Daleks." And then sometimes it makes itself dear to our hearts just by presenting us with a good, fun, straightforward science-fiction adventure. Intelligently written, well-acted, finely crafted, and clever in ways no other TV series can be, of course, but blissfully free of moral dilemmas and explorations into humanity's heart of darkness. As you may have guessed, "Pyramids of Mars" is a particularly fine example of "Doctor Who" in this latter mode. It's a thrilling, suspenseful tale of good vs. evil--Here we have Sutekh, an extraordinarily powerful extraterrestrial, imprisoned within the Martian Pyramids ages ago by his fellow beings because of his unhealthy impulse to blot out all life but his own; now, in 1911, he has a chance to break free again because of a British archaeologist's blunder, and it's up to the Doctor and Sarah to outwit him and save the cosmos from a premature entropy. It's as simple as that, folks.Simple, but not simplistic. As usual, this show demonstrates its alchemical knack for turning lead into gold, for taking standard plotlines and hackneyed themes and bringing them marvelously to life, making them interesting and clever ("regenerating" them, if you will). Nowhere is this more evident than in the overall motif of this storyline, for what could be more tired and cliche than an old "Curse of the Mummy" type horror film? And yet it really works, intriguingly translated into a science fiction idiom--the mummies are robots, the Egyptian god is a powerful extraterrestrial, demonic possession is some sort of telepathic mind control, magic powers are telekinesis, burial urns are force field generators, the secret passwords and magic spells to get into the heart of the pyramid are mathematical puzzles and logical riddles, and so on and so forth. Granted, some of this is delightfully inspired technobabble rather than hard science per se, but it still relocates the story out of the realm of the supernatural (which most of us don't take seriously anymore) into a natural, secular one we tend to find plausible if only speculatively so. And yet the writers get playful with this relocation a little bit, too, slyly hinting at a certain experiential wisdom in the old fears: at the very beginning, the modern, rational British archaeologist rushes in to his doom while his Egyptian diggers run away in a panic like "superstitious savages" (as he snaps at their fleeing backs, famous last words)--at the end of the day, they're the ones who'll go home to dinner, which sure beats becoming a telepathically animated corpse, generally speaking.The Doctor's character also shows a lot of complexity in this story, and after getting overly cozy with him over the years we are pointedly reminded that he is not an Earthling and doesn't necessarily share our priorities, nor our natural reactions and attitudes. Tom Baker always gets credit for his delightfully wacky, oddball rendition of the Doctor, and rightfully so. It's indeed one of the joys of the program. But one shouldn't let that obscure his ability to get across a wide range of other emotions with great subtlety, from a cantankerous temper and dash of arrogance almost worthy of Hartnell's Doctor to pained humiliation as he's forced to kneel before the villain, from very real anger and fury at well-intentioned but misguided actions putting them all in danger to a strong and solid sense of moral backbone. And he excels at making the Doctor alien without alienating us.Anyway, I had always assumed that the title of this storyline referred to the pyramid-like formations found on the Martian landscape around the Cydonia region, about which there's been so much speculation over the years. What a neat touch, I thought. When I double-checked, though, I found that these objects were not photographed by Viking I until July of 1976, about half a year after "Pyramids of Mars" originally aired in November, 1975. Now that's spooky
Two myths meet within a century old anthropological myth. What a challenge ! To take two characters like Aliens and Predators to invent a new story that could make them meet is more than a challenge. It is unimaginable. Each one has to be better than what they were before and yet both together have to be even more dramatic and formidable than each one may have ever been. Then you have to keep the human beings as the real center of the film, those who are really going to transfer their fear onto us, the audience. The situation has to be believable and has to allow no single minute of respite or lack of tension. The film-makers behind this adventure have revisited their good old mythology books and ransacked the backshop of the store known as  The Old Curiosity Shop . So we revisit pyramid civilizations (three : Aztec, Egyptian and Cambodian) and the great myth of all times : the Antarctica from which all these pryramid civilizations are supposed to have come from. Then they revisited all the stories that are ranting and raving about some space visitors who would have taught the animals of the homo erectus species how to become homo sapiens. The general idea is that the space-visitors are the Predators, that the aliens are prisoners in a pyramid two thousand feet under the ice of the Antarctica and that every one hundred years some young predators are sent on earth to hunt these aliens in the pyramid. Of course some human beings have to accept to be the sacrificial victims from whom the aliens are going to be born, for the hunt. Easy since these human beings of old are not yet homo sapiens but only homo erectus. That's what we are told happened on October 10, 1904 and is going to happen again on October 10, 2004. Unluckily some crazy human beings get in the way of the hunt. In a way that was lucky since these human beings set the whole machinery of the pyramid to work and they become the sacrificial victims who will carry the aliens to life. Of course things are not going to go exactly the way it was planned by the predators. The result is absolutely perfect. The human beings are going to be reluctant and resisting victims and one will manage to go beyond simple hostility and disgust and help the predators, hence saving the world and the human race. The details are to be discovered in the film itself which is spectacular. It reveals the vanity of human beings who get into an adventure without even knowing what it is all about and without any proper preparation. All those vain people who believe in money, guns, science or whatever will get to the end of their vanity and the only survivor will be the one who was best prepared and also least vain, so little vain that for her the enemy of my enemy is my friend. This is a dangerous principle that led many people into unbearably absurd situations with incalculably lethal and uncontrollable consequences. But at times it is safe to believe it and it is safe to practice it. Though when the first round is finished my enemy who is the enemy of my enemy and has been my friend in an alliance to defeat this common enemy goes back to his basic definition and becomes my enemy again and the war goes on for one more round. The film-makers decided not to go in that direction but to genetically cross the alien and the predator for a sequel some day in a few years that will be tried and tested first as a comic book, I guess. The DVD has numerous and very interesting extra resources which are quite welcome.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University of Paris Dauphine & University of Paris 1 Pantheon Sorbonn
Great Video. Great video and we especially loved the Rugrats episode. It was a great treat b/c we did not know beforehand that it was on the video. It made it watchable for everyone over 2 in our house
feel good movie. The acting was very good for the main cast and the movie while predictable was very enjoyable to watch.  I would buy this on DVD. Some of the scenes were actually laugh out loud funny
Big. A fun movie for all ages!  Tom Hanks is a thirteen year old boy that is small for his age and can't wait to grow up.  At a carnival Tom makes that wish to be big and wakes up the next morning a grown up.  This hilarious movie is about how he lives as a grown up and see if it is better being BI
A great movie. Freddy and Claire have many interesting scenes together.  From being on a plane together, to falling in love in college, the comedy never ends.  Freddie is the tag-along friend as Claire has many boyfriends.  Biggs thinks that he's using claire as a &quot;fake girlfriend&quot;.  I don't want to reveal too much, but it's a good comedy and u should check it out
30 Years in the Making ...  but Well Worth the Wait. With the acquisition of my first genuine employment, 1980 afforded me the opportunity to purchase a few items I had desired.  One of those items was "Permanent Waves", Rush's 7th studio album.  And a Rush fan was born.  It was a bit funny to have been born, as well as, have spent the first 13 and a half years of my life in Canada, and never to have heard of Rush.  I guess I owe that to my parents, avid listeners of the current pop/disco sensation (I still have nightmares of KC and the Sunshine Band).  It took a move to St. Louis in 1979 to enlighten my appreciation for the prog rock movement of the 70's (THANK YOU KSHE 95).  But I digress...  R30 is the finest recorded concert DVD I have ever watched.  The fact it is of one of my favorite bands and was very affordable has restored my faith in the music industry.  Or at least a segment of it.  After witnessing the finest Rush performance last year, I prayed they would put it on DVD for the fans.  Rush in Rio was a decent effort, but lacked the touch of a true director.  Enter the French dudes, Pierre and Francois Lamoureux.  The lighting, camera angles, everything gave the show a feel of actually being there.  One particular shot during Xanadu or Working Man (it's early, my memory hasn't quite kicked in), shows Geddy, from behind, jamming while peering out at the audience, who were showered in a silhouetted light.  At that point, I knew this DVD was at the top of my list.  Maybe it's just the fact I'm a huge Rush fan or that I have an affinity for cinema in general, but if you are a fan of this music genre do yourself a favor and order this DVD set soon. Oh, I didn't mention over 2 hours of extras and the whole concert on CD, as well. Just get it ..
A Stunning Murder Mystery!. Even though I only saw the First and Third parts of &quot;A Certain Justice&quot; it compelled me to watch with eager glance and pounding heart; I was completely spellbound by Danglishs detective ability to solve  such a compelling MYSTERY! on PBS MYSTERY
Incredibly Funny. Fans of Lange almost know what to expect - the lovable loser who smokes too much, drinks too much, and eats to much, but still has a smoking hot girlfriend and a cast of wacky friends. While this movie falls into cliche at times ( the token black player, the cantankerous old coach ) the laughs are what makes it worthwhile. This is a REALLY funny film. Thankfully devoid of irony, highbrow pretention, and things that make the hipsters go "hmmmm" while fiddling with their soul patches and sipping  mojitos, this is all-American working class comedy at its best.
Astonishing Expressionist British silent. Other than the films of Hitchcock, there was little to distinguish the early British cinema until the films of Powell and Pressberger, but this gorgeous thriller from 1929 is a clear exception to this rule. Heavily influenced by German Expressionism, PICCADILLY is based on an Arnold Bennett story and is told as a kind of murder mystery in reverse (you know something bad's going to happen, but you're not sure to who and by whom until the end when one of the characters is murdered by another). The milieu is the very modern Jazz Age world of a Piccadilly nightclub, where a pair of dancer headliners, Vic and Mabel, are fighting over Mabel's affair with the club's owner, Valentine, and a Chinese girl from Limehouse, Sho Sho, works in the scullery dreaming of dancing onstage. The film has been reissued because of the much overdue renewal of interest in the great Anna May Wing, who plays the fascinating Sho Sho (her performance deserves comparison with Louise Brooks's in a similar role of the same year in THE CANARY MURDER CASE), but the film is of great interest because of its stunning cinematography and direction, shown to great effect on this beautifully restored print. The director and cameramen made spectacular use of lighting, depth of field, and mise-en-scene, to give the nightclub and Sho Sho's and Val's apartments amazingly dense texture and brilliance. There are shots that almost stop your heart with their beauty, such as one of light bouncing off the facets of an old glass doorknob. The script is also very astute in terms of its handling of racial tensions, and there's a remarkable sequence when Val and Sho Sho go to a divey dance club where a white woman is banished for dancing with a black man, with chilling implications for the budding romance between Val and Sho Sho. The DVD contains as an extra a panel discussion of Anna May Wong's career among several Asian-American actors and scholars: it looked to be very interesteing, but the miking in this extra is so horrible that the comments are almost inaudible
CAREBEARS MOVIE. KEEPS MY DAUGHTER OCCUPIED FOR HOURS SHE JUST LOVES CAREBEARS AND I LIKE THAT I CAN PASS SOMETHING GOOD FROM MY GENERATION ON TO HE
Wow!. Charlton Heston is a handsome, troubled man who has his brother send him a mate. He has a beautiful home in the jungle and I guess is too busy to find his own. Are there any women in the jungle? Not any like Spitfire, Eleanor Parker, which shocks him with her beauty and personality. She is also shocked with his masculine body and good looks. There are times when you would like to smack him around, but then... The romance is definately there, he tries to protect her from ... well you'll see. It's romantic in an animal-like way. The ending is great! I love the action and the Romance!
Thank you for this movie. Let me start by saying two things: this is an outstanding movie ! However if you are having trouble with a cynical satire about smoking, guns and alcohol this movie might result offensive to you. I personally liked it very much but it is definitely not suitable for anybody due to its topic (cigarettes) and its way of story-telling (satire). I guess you either love this movie or you hate - black and white: no shades of grey.Aaron Eckhart who plays Nick Naylor (the voice of Big Tobacco) delivers an outstanding performance. He paints an accurate picture of a lobbyist's work and to what length one might be going. With today's influence of major lobbing firms in campaign financing and daily work in DC this satire does get you worrying. Nick Naylor is the true master of all spin masters. The writers have done a quality job with the script for this movie.Towards the middle the movie does loose a bit of its steam however the finish is a perfect 10 with cell-phones "entering the stage". YES, you should see this film. YES, you should keep in mind that it's a satire and last but not least: OH YES, you will be entertained
Not for any one under 18-Great. If your under 18 I dont want you to watch it. Because it is only for 18 year olds to watch. There are a ton of crude stunts pulled off by the crew. They watch some Beavers in the shower room. The Gym teacher finds out how the women teacher is calledLassie for. Ms. Balbraker goes looking for the perpitrator of the shower scene. The Boys get let dry at the Fun house and at Porky's bar. Then they pull a stunt on Porky. If you love teenage fun and lots of references to sex and a lot of acts.Acting-10 out of 10Story-7 out of 10Direction-9 out of 10Entertainment-10 out of 1
Better than Blade Runner. Lets keep this short. I'm not writing a novel, just giving my opinion. First off, this movie was very enjoyable. Keeping you on the edge of your seat from start to finish. There wasn't one slow or dull moment which is always a plus for sci fi movies. It was filled with intense action along with a solid story. There were a few twists thrown in too. Overall, I'd recommend Impostor to any sc fi buff who loves futuristic elements, society, lifestyles and my favorite, gadgets
The living dead man!. A highly effective morality thriller during which a boring man, with a boring job, living in a boring little town, learns that excitement comes at a steep price. Frank Bigelow is a tax accountant feeling suffocated by his uninspiring circumstances and closed in by a long term relationship. Looking for a dose of escapism, he heads out to San Francisco for excitement and the opportunity to get laid by carefree young women. His quiet sober life and wholesome girlfriend are contrasted with wild drunken parties accompanied by Jazz. Not coincidentally, it is at a swinging jazz club that he accidentally drinks some poison tainted booze. The clincher? This poison is lethal and there is no known antidote. He has become a living dead man. In a city full of people he is isolated and alone, wishing for nothing more than his old boring life. A terrific film
Unmissable. There's nothing I can add in my review about the plot or story of "In the Mood for Love" that hasn't already been covered, so I will keep this brief.Wong Kar-Wai's "In the Mood for Love" is a remarkable piece of work - sensuous but not showy, restrained but highly intriguing, and satisfyingly unresolved.  I dare anyone who considers themselves a film connoisseur to watch this and not be impressed.  Every shot is expertly framed, every color and costume choice agonized over, every piece of music is nothing short of appropriate.  The performances by Tony Leung and Maggie Cheung and are superb and often, more is said with a lingering expression than dialogue could ever convey.  Their chemistry isn't just realistic; it's electric.Now to be perfectly clear, not everyone will like this movie.  It simply lacks the comforting elements that make the usual Hollywood tripe palatable to the masses.  But, for those who would rather savor Hangar One than down Smirnoff, this one's for you.  This is no mere film - it is art.  It is what lesser movies aspire to be when they grow up
The Pythons still got it!. I was very pleased to view this documentary and other various programs on this 2 disc set. First off it includes BRAND NEW sketches with all of the cast except for Eric Idle, who although does not appear in the sketches, he does appear at the end of the mock interview sequence (which only lasts about 1 minute). It also would have been nice to see Graham Chapman but of course that was impossible. Most of the new sketches are good except the timing on the jokes was not quite as sharp or quick. Even Carol Cleveland appears and she still looks great. There is a rare 10 minute short film made in 1971 celebrating the Mayday Festival that was lost for years. A Pythonland tour with Michael Palin covering some the original areas where the classic Python sketches were filmed is also a plus. But the big attraction is a Monty Python episode that was made specifically for a German audeince. It was 1 of only 2 ever made. Very Rare Indeed! It is the second show of the two shows. The first show is not included although there is a clip of it in the bonus features are of the dvd
Masterpiece into Masterpiece. Harper Lee's classic novel on acceptance and intolerance was beautifully transformed into a classic film with a performance that placed Gregory Peck permanently in the film pantheon. Additionally the film has Horton Foote's observant script, Elmer Bernstein's finest score and a supporting cast (Brock Peters, Phiip Alford, as examples) all of whom mesh well.  There is, in addition, the glowing Mary Badham as Scout, really the central focus in both book and film, giving what became the performance of a lifetime. If there is anything amiss, it is that the always-excellent Kim Stanley is the uncredited narrator (Scout as a grown up). The film deserves its reputation and has endured the test of time
The classic coming-of age-in-the-60's flick. Great tunes, but mediocre video quality-but who cares? A classic
Murphy's Romance - Great Movie - Great Actors. I enjoyed this movie when it first came out, and I am very happy to be able to get it on DVD.  Sally Field And James Garner star in this 1980's May-December romance.  Sally's character is a 33 year old single mother of a 12 year old boy who moves from California to a small town in Arizona.  James Garner is her love interest. Both Sally and James are great actors, which is one reason why I loved this movie.  I also enjoy the setting - a dusty small town where she tries to make a go of a horse boarding/training business on her rented property.  I grew up in a small town and also with horses.  The ex-husband of Sally's character is the movie's antagonist. His immaturity, lack of ambition, and other undesirable traits make Murphy (James Garner) that much more appealing. I was about 13 when I first saw this movie, and now I am 32 and love it even more. There's a lot of truth in this movie.  In my life, older men have been much like Murphy - wiser, more grounded, all in all a much better catch than a young, flighty man - like the ex-husband. All in all, a great film. Wish they still made them like this - simple, with a great story, and good humor.  When you have a good story, you don't need all of the "extras" like special effects, lots of explicit sex, etc.  A good movie for the whole family.
Enjoyed this one!. This was a great DVD but I totally enjoy his other later 2 DVD's better. This just lacked some of the dynamics that his later work had. If you are a Yanni fan you still would enjoy this DVD. Thank
Suddenly, my favorite. This is the most complex movie rendering of Carroll's classic, and one of the stranger ones. It's a 1966 BBC production in black and white, and done on a shoestring budget. As a result, there's just about nothing in the way of special effects - and certainly no animal-shaped costumes for the dormouse, white rabbit, and all the others. Instead, the characters simply dress in a deliberately over-done Victorian style, probably put together by raiding the stock BBC costume closet.But what characters! Peter Sellers (who played in other Alice movies as well) is the King of Hearts, Peter Cook is the Mad Hatter, Leo McKern is the Duchess(!), and that's just the start of this star-driven production. Ravi Shankar composed the music and performs much of it, giving an other-worldly sense that fits Carroll's dreamscape perfectly. It's a kind of dream continually on the edge of nightmare without ever quite crossing the line, the same feeling you get when watching "The Prisoner" TV series.But Alice truly makes the story. Ann-Marie Mallik, in what may be her only acting role, was the perfect choice. She moves through the dream with all the reserve you'd expect of a browbeaten Victorian child, but with all the presence and a little insolence of a woman-child entering her teens. Although she's more observer than participant in most scenes, she conveys a quiet sense of being fully engaged in it all.This isn't a disneyfied, silly production for children. Nor is it a surreal exaggeration like Jan Svankmajer's (which I also enjoyed). It's a serious and baffling work. In that sense, it's more true to Dodgson's original work than any other Alice I've seen. This one has my highest recommendation.//wiredweir
The Jungle Book. A true delight for the whole family. Sabu is a remarkable talent for his age and the overall quality of the film (including excellent colour quality & detail) made it most enjoyable when sharing it with our grandchildren (ages 11 & 15) who reacted with delight from beginning to end. Considering the digital age was a couple generations away, it is a remarkable product of cinematography at its best. I would highly recommend it for any generation to enjoy.
Great Film For Great Music. This dvd is awesome! My favorite thing most of all about the Directions dvd is that there is large variety of filming styles for each song that is different from the last song. Every music video is highly creative and entertaining.Buy Directions immediatly if you are a fan of death cab's music or great film. Also, If you enjoyed this dvd, I would also highly recomend the Smashing Pumpkins greatest hits dvd, which is also a dvd of really creative music video interpretations.The bonus short film on Directions is called "Jealousy Rides With Me", the song itself can only be found on the import version of the Plans c.d.
Diamonds are forever!!. I ordered this package because of Captain Hornblower and The Three Musketeers, two films that have really marked my childhood memories. I haven't had the chance to see the rest of the films so this package was an excellent chance to do so and also get the two other films that I only possess in worn-out VHS copies.I have already watched Captain Hornblower and it was as if it was brand new. The quality and sound are of high quality, the colours are better and I also loved the fact that I had the english subtitles available (I always wanted to figure out the "Fire as your guns bare" phrase).The price is not a bargain only if you compare it with other available box-sets but I would pay even more for this one
A Classic!!!. This movie is one of the best movie out there.Patrick and Jennifer made these characters seem real.The last dance that they did is undescribable.
ha ha ha. We have all the available seasons, and they're great and funny. Buy them all
Good variety of brief workouts. The thing I like most about the Caribbean Workout series is that the segments are 20-25 minutes each.  I hate to exercise, but I can talk myself into 25 minutes at a time.  This DVD contains 3 different workouts that are varied enough to prevent boredom and allow the viewer to choose just one or a combination.  If you want to do more than one, you don't have to do two aerobics sessions; you can do a cardio (aerobics/kickboxing) and a muscle conditioning (chi ball) or strength and flexibility (Pilates).  If variety isn't enough, the setting is beautiful, so, even if I am stuck in my living room, I can at least see the sandy, sun-drenched beaches of Barbados and take my mind off the yucky exercise
Just Magnificent...unreal. Not a question...this is simply the greatest film director of this age.  This is one of his very finest films to date (2007).  What he does is a portray realism, contemporary realism, even if you don't get it yet.  Jaa is spectacular as the consumate Zen artist...I am so addicted to Tarantino's films that I can hardly speak about em.  He is the first American film director to bridge the gap into fantastic art cimema and with a hefty price to pay and with a hugely important bounty -- as possibly recognized as the greatest Am film director of all time?  Pretty big?  Yep, I truely believe this, and I am a film scholar & published author.  Violence?  No, not considering the circumstances of violence occurring in this country at this time and the loss of great bloodlines and families to a hidden agenda of DNA problems.  He is the only director speaking the truth...IF you can discern the fabric in these films.  They truely are magnificent.  JB
How many ways can you say funny?. I don't care what you think of Paris & Nicole...when you take them out of their element and place them on a farm with us 'common folk' and give them respocibilty and a job you are bound to get the show of a life time.  This show (in all of it's seasons) is the funniest thing that TV has ever been blessed with.  This is the first season and from the very start it was a hit.  If only I could get paid to fail at everything.  No that would be hot!  ANyways, this is a guilty pleasure, much like Justin Timberlake.  It's something you enjoy but keep secret.  Well the secret is out, Paris and Nicole (especially Nicole) are hilarious and worth every minute.  Sit back, watch and enjoy...I know I will
Little seen drama with wonderful pace , acting and plot. If you like a good drama , then you will enjoy this .I'm extremely glad to see an actor the caliber of Philip Baker Hall starring in a film .The film's plot reveals the characters to us in its own time .The other actors rise to Philip's level , as if sensing that they can't let their game slip .I've always liked that seedy side of gambling and its related employees and hangers-on and the film explores that world .Watching this film with Martin Scorcese's CASINO would be a nice double feature .HARD EIGHT is a wonderful film and I encourage you to see it , expecially this version as it has the director commentary , which will add to the whole experience
WILL POWER. I like will smith films i think they are gerat.I like the bit when deans dog spray painted.porshie the dog is funny .
Walk on the Moon. Wonderful movie. Just like it was in the 60'd when everyone kind of went crazy. I think she should have gone with Walker
Just ok.... No, totally not a porn video. You won't see the man's pubic area. It is just a video that gives you ideas if you are bored w/ that one position you are always having.I somehow feel strange when I see one guy having sex on a coffee table w/ the woman. His leg rubbed again the table and it is not hurting?? Some positions are hard. Creative? just ok. Gives me new ideas? well.... i don't remember, not really that impressive. I guess I know most of the positions.
Easy to see why Jayne's daughter is an Emmy winner. Ignore the glitz, Jayne Mansfield like Marilyn Monroe beneath the hype is a great actress.  Fun to watch.  And The Girl Can't Help It is one of the best rock 'n roll movies of the fifties.  I first saw this film fifty years ago and then just the other night.  My wife and I loved it.  Buyer's tip.  It is much much cheaper to buy the collection set that has this film, Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter, and The Sheriff of Fractured Jaw.  It is over priced to buy it as a single
Well done. John Goodman's role is so realistic that I thought I was seeing the Babe many times! He is outstanding in his role as Babe Ruth. Hollywoood liberties, sure ...... but an excellent story and a look at an Baseball hero ........... A must for baseball fans.
A fun romp with a cartoon from my childhood. The cartoon: This is the first season from the syndicated cartoon that ran from around 1985 to 1988, and then was picked up by Nickelodeon (where I remember watching it as a kid). It was produced by DiC, and the animation was farmed to famous anime company Tokyo Movie Shinsha. While it's not movie quality, the animation is definitely several cuts above the quality level of TV cartoons on average. Heathcliff is voiced by cartoon legend Mel Blanc, and there are several other familiar animation voices in the cast. I personally have fond memories of watching this cartoon as a kid, but overall I think it's held up well.The DVD: This is a four disc set made by Shout Factory with 24 episodes total. The full episodes are there, with the intro, commercial bumpers, one Heathcliff and one Catillac Cats segment per episode, the obligatory 80s morality segment at the end where Heathcliff gives a blurb about caring for your pets, then the closing. The episodes are arranged in chronological order by the date they aired. The pilot is on here too, though for some reason it was #18 in rotation. There are extras on discs 1-3, the first one being the most interesting by far. It's an interview with the current Heathcliff cartoonist. Heathcliff's creator George Gately retired in 1999 and passed away two years later, leaving his nephew Peter Gallagher to continue the comic. Peter discusses the history of the comic and gives a short tutorial on how to draw Heathcliff. On disc #2, there is a strip gallery with one comic from each year up until 2005. Disk #3 has the last segment, the promo clips that were used to sell the show to independant stations. IMHO this is the worst out of all the extras, since it just has clips from cartoons that are already on the discs, sans voices.My only beef with this DVD is the extras, in that there's not much on the show other than the clips of cartoons you'll watch on the discs, and absolutely nothing on the Catillac Cats. While Mel Blanc and Stan Jones have passed away, there are people who worked on the show still working in the animation business. Hopefully there will be more on the show itself if they release future seasons. I also noticed a short hitch in the sound, but it was during one of the commercial bumpers so you don't really miss anything. My gripes basically boil down to nitpicks, and I recommend it, especially if you watched it as a kid.9.5 out of 10 dumped garbage cans
whimsical little comedy. This can sometimes be found in ntsc dvd format on ebay.  Themovie (in which Hugh Griffith steals many of the scenes) isabout how some of the people of Titfield buy up and run a smallbranch railroad line to prevent the intended governmentclosure.  Men from a competing bus line do their best tosabotage the operation of the branch line, including destroyingthe line's only engine at a crucial time--the night before thegovernment certification on the branch line.  The line operatorsresort to taking the Titfield Thunderbolt from a museum andusing that engine to get certification for the line.  Inreality, the Titfield Thunderbolt is actually the 0-4-2 Lion,built in 1838--so there are wonderful scenes of this workingantique in beautiful condition chugging along on its 10-mile(or so) journey down the tracks--no special effects needed here!The comedy is whimsical, not slapstick, and most of the actingis excellent.  Hugh Griffith (who may be best known for hisrole in Tom Jones) plays the engine driver, and from time totime blasts away with his shotgun from the engine, slams on thebrakes, and trots out to retrieve a rabbit or pheasant.  Goodfun all around!
Striking Film. Kanal focuses on a small group of Polish resistance fighters during the Warsaw uprising of 1944.  Intended to last for a few days and to enable the Soviet Army to enter Warsaw, the uprising lasted for weeks while the Red Army did little to assist the Poles and was eventually crushed by the Germans.  This film is based on an actual episode of the uprising, the escape from encirclement of a significant number of resistance fighters by fleeing through the sewers of Warsaw.  Wajda follows a company of fighters into the sewers and explores their disparate fates.  In Wajda's hands, this episode becomes a metaphor for the whole Polish experience in WWII; brutal, valiant, deadly, profoundly humiliating but characterized by an unceasing pursuit of hope.  With fine cinematography and excellent acting, this is a gripping film.
Oh, those randy Mexicans!. A translation of the title of this movie into English would yield something like "And Your Mother Too," which would echo a phrase often used in so-called "mother talk" or "wolfing."  (If you're gonna wolf, you better wolf fast/ 'cause your old lady's got a face like a bulldog's Ask me no questions and I'll tell you no lies...)Having been brought up in the United States and having attended the public schools I am no stranger to the phenomenon of teenaged boys being teenaged boys, having been there and done that myself, including the hazy, sunny obligatory motor trip to Tijuana and points south.  But what struck me while watching this fascinating film was how very like the guys I went to school with are Tenoch and Julio.  In fact I was a little reminded of the song "Me and Julio Down by the Schoolyard" by Paul Simon.  Not much would have to be changed to see this as an American movie about young people in America near the end of the 20th century.But this is about Mexico and it takes place in Mexico and even though Julio and Tenoch rag on "Team America" there is no doubt that their lives and the styles they copy and take as their own are enormously influenced by American culture, for better or for worse.Gael Garcia Bernal who previously starred in Alejandro Gonzalez Inarritu's Amores perros (2000) plays Julio, who is from a middle class family.  Diego Luna plays his friend Tenoch (named after Tenochtitlan, Aztec founder of Mexico City) who is the son of a prominent Mexican politician.  Both boys live the kind of lives of plenty and privilege that the average Mexican can only dream about.  And so there is a certain decadent and hedonistic quality to the way they embrace life.  But what director Alfonso Cuaron captures with these boys and their adventure to an imaginary beach with an older woman is the zest of youth that throws itself wildly and madly into sex, drugs and the search for experience and the fulfillment of youthful urges.  What they learn from Luisa (Maribel Verdu) is something most young men really lust after, that is, how to please a woman sexually--well, at least they experience a first course.Cuaron shows us teenaged boys as teenaged boys are: raunchy, randy, irreverent, and as a old army sergeant used to say, "young and dumb and full of..." you-know-what.  Well, not dumb.  Both boys are sharp and quick to learn about life, and as the movie ends and they go their separate ways, we know that both will go on to college and make a good life for themselves.  In this sense this is a coming of age movie with Lusia as mentor to the boys.Looking at the movie a little more deeply we have to ask, why does Lusia go on the trip with Tenoch and Julio, and why does she let herself go, so to speak?  We learn that her husband has cheated on her (again, by the way) and had the temerity to call her up immediately after the fact and confess.  Later we learn that she has an even more compelling reason to indulge herself in a youthful fling.  (But of course you should see the movie to find out what that is.)The sense of freedom and naturalness that Cuaron captures, not only in the area of human sexuality, but in the spirit of a vast country moving from a largely agrarian society to an industrial one, and the bewilderment that such rapid change makes people feel, is made especially vivid by the focus on the young, since they are the ones moving the fastest.  (Of course this focus doesn't hurt at the box office, since young people make up the bulk of viewers, in Mexico as elsewhere.)  However, despite what some reviewers have suggested, this movie addresses Mexican poverty in only a token way.  This is a movie about privileged Mexicans who could, as I intimated above, pass for Americans or Europeans with only a minor cultural shift.Be forewarned that the sexuality shown here is about as graphic as any you'll see this side of an X rating, which is okay with me.  Certainly it is better than the usual violence that Hollywood serves up.  In fact I hope this movie triggers a change in the movie industry away from the belief that you have to titillate the mass audience with violence in order to be successful.  Sex will do just fine.Bottom line: a vital, vivid romp that will delight especially the young.  Clearly this is not a movie for prudes or social conservatives--and that's an understatement
Finally it is on DVD. This is a great classic John Wayne movie. I am very happy it is on DVD no
Forceful film and message. It's hard for me to see things in life in anything other than a red  state vs. blue state way (also of course, pro vs. anti-Israel).  Because of this, I may be hypersensitive to the films of people whom I may personally and passionately disagree with (paging Steven Seagal and your anti-American/CIA conspiracy theories).  Mr. Soderbergh is someone whose politics I certainly don't agree with, but he has done an incredible job with this powerful film.Inevitably, when I watch this movie (today, 4.23.06, was at least the fourth time), I sob.  Maybe it's the overall message regarding our "war on drugs."  Probably though, it is the scene of this powerful judge trawling the projects looking for his strung out daughter, desperate and powerless.  When he finally saves her under the weight of a "john", she just looks up at her father and smiles--comfortable and at peace, if only momentarily.Perhaps the other factor affecting me so much is the point I believe Mr. Soderbergh makes so well:  that we may all be a little guilty in the war on drugs.  This includes the enablers, the family members who turn a blind eye, and all of us who could do more to help others.  Michael Douglas makes this point so well when he strays from his prepared remarks while being introduced as the President's new point man to lead the fight against drugs.As a film, the cinematogrpahy in this movie is without match, in my view.  Mr. Soderbergh does not seem obsessed with a "West Wing" like agenda of "it takes a village" socialism/leftism/Hillary/Bubba/Michael Moore/Howard Dean/Kerry & Edwards to solve the world's problems in this film.  Some of the MoveOn.org/Kedwards/Michael Moore/MSM/Daily Kos voters may be disappointed in this aspect of it, but smart people will remember that everyone from enviromental whack job Al Gore to GWB, have battled in the struggle with drug addiction and alcoholism.A wonderful and though-provoking film
"We don't burn books in this country.". "Horns and Halos" is a fascinating story behind a book that became so controversial, its publisher, St Martin's Press issued a recall a few days after the publication date, and promptly burned all of the copies. The name of the book is "Fortunate Son" a biography of George W. Bush. The book's author, J.H.Hatfield had a few other star biographies under his belt (Ewan McGregor and Patrick Stewart) and also authored an unauthorized guide of X-Files when he pitched the book successfully to St. Martin's Press. "Fortunate Son" was supposed to be one of those glitzy tribute bios, but it turned into something much more, and what happened to the book, and J.H.Hatfield is the meat of this riveting documentary.Hatfield added an afterword to the book, which he claimed was at St. Martin's insistence. The afterword included a juicy acknowledgment by three unspecified sources about Bush's alleged cocaine addiction. Hatfield insisted that he didn't want to add this info, but did so when the publisher pressed the issue. Immediately after publication, Hatfield's sordid past--which included a murder-for-hire scheme came to light, and the dirt on Hatfield--combined with the segment on Bush's alleged cocaine use led to the books' recall and destruction.Enter Soft Skull Press, a tiny independent press who then republished the book and tried to distribute it. A great deal of the film follows the trials and tribulations of the rogue founder of Soft Skull Press, the intrepid, idealistic Sander Hicks as he and J.H.Hatfield attempt to re-launch the book. Hicks and Hatfield attended book conventions, and even appeared on 60 Minutes to try and promote the book. The two men form an unlikely sometimes-difficult bond. There's Hatfield with his glum, fatalistic realisation that he's "dead meat", and then there's Hicks, who refuses to give up. Unfortunately, the content of the book faded behind its controversy and the author's past. And even when Hatfield revealed his sources, nothing could salvage the situation.The film "Horns and Halos" is a two-disc set. One disc is the film, and the other disc is devoted to extras including: protests at Bush's inauguration, band White Collar Crime in performance, 11 deleted scenes, director's commentary, interviews with Hatfield, protest coverage, KCET coverage of the documentary, and an interview with Sander Hicks. If you are interested in reading more of the story (the 60 minutes transcript, for example), Sander Hicks has a website (sanderhicks.com).  Hicks no longer works for Soft Skull Press and is now--amongst other things--working on a bio of Karl Rove--displacedhuma
Great cast=Great movie!. I was bored one night so I flipped on HBO and found out this movie was on. So I watched it and now I have up in the pentheon of movie greats. My favorite character is Jackson because he's cool and someone that most of us guys can relate to. He is also responsible and consciensous and the man that everyone can count on. His parents count on him despite their divorce, his sister counts on him even though she just graduated, and his friends count on him because they have problems and they know Jack always has their backs. But what happens when Jackson runs into a serious problem of his own which is finding out his girlfriend Denise dated his father? And who does he turn to when he breaks up with Denise and later regrets it? The answer is his three friends Derrick, Brian, and Terry. Together they set out to help one another with the problems they encounter such as Derrick's impending divorce from his wife, Brian's bad luck with women and his family crisis, and Terry's reservations about marriage along with what Jackson has to deal with. They are known as "The Brothers", four close friends who stick with each other and help each other out through thick and thin. Morris Chestnut and others shine in this feel good story about love, happiness, and all that other s***.
Great songs, audio & video quality great, but... Ok, what you get is, 2 seperate, great performances: 1 with band, 1 with Weller on acoustic quitar. Great songs, great audio & video quality, but...the first performance with the band has sooooo many quick video editing cuts that you end up just getting pissed off that you can't focus on ANYTHING... The guy who edited this great performance should be taken to the desert and shot in the head, or at least never get another gig again. It's like an eight year-old got behind the editing machine and just cut-cut-cut-cut-cut.... what an idiot! It's virtually un-watchable to me becuase I get so pissed off at the relentless quick-edits between close-ups of performers and shots of the audience... A complete waste...The second performance is MUCH better from that standpoint. The first guy could learn alot from whom-ever edited this great performance. You actually get to focus on the performer- incredible - who would-of thought that that's what we're paying for...If you can tolerate never focusing on anything in the first performance, get it... Like I say, great performances, great audio & video "quality"..
thanks for the fast forward button. I have yet to see a good movie musical. They have the most abysmal stories. I would rather they just show 90min. of the featured singers.I enjoyed all the singers but Sonny James & Merle Haggard are the standouts. I use the fast forward & only stop at the musical numbers. Well worth the purchase price. Not as good as "Las vegas Hillbillies"
A Time to Kill. One of the best movies I've seen.  Everybody does a great job in portraying this sensitive material in a very real and gutsy way.  I've seen this movie three times, I think, and each time have found it not only entertaining, but reminding that, as a society, we still have a lot of work to do on healing our human need for hatred and fear
I was in this movie and attended the NY premiere; it's GOOD! And cute!. I was an extra in this movie "MUSIC AND LYRICS", and we filmed it at Nassau Coliseum last summer 2006! I attended the New York premiere on February 12, 2007, Monday night, at the Ziegfeld Theatre, and was able to view the movie with the cast and director, whom I was able to converse with after the movie ended (He is a very nice guy!; he also did "Two Weeks Notice"). It was filmed at ADVENTURELAND amusement park here in Farmingdale (where I live), Long Island, New York, where it lasts 5 minutes in the movie and Hugh Grant sings!  This is a cute movie, and it is good, and I am not saying that because I am in it.  Hugh Grant and Drew Barrymore make a good couple, and Grant's never been better!  I cannot see anyone else playing that role!  The inside of Nassau Coliseum is supposed to be the inside of Madison Square Garden in New York City, when the concert of Cora takes place, near the end of the movie; they did film outside Madison Square Garden though.  (I heard Drew is nice; she visited Target next door to Adventureland when they were filming)   They filmed 5 days at Nassau Coliseum (spent 14 hours at the Coliseum on the last day of filming), and the concert scene is only on screen for 10 minutes.  I love the music!  Bought CD when first came out on CD for $25!  2 1/2 months for the movie to go from theatre to DVD is very fast (February 14 to May 8th)!  And when the movie comes out on DVD, I will buy it the first day!  Anyone who has not seen it, see it!  And like the rest of the people who wrote here, I also agree with them, and what they wrote on amazon.  I, too, cannot get enough of the music (LOVE THE MUSIC!  And I hope next year, it is nominated for Best Music and Best Songs at the next Academy Awards IF Hollywood remembers this movie!), and will definitely see the movie again and again, when I buy it!   (I am writing under LIZ, I am Liz' former husband)   Thanks for reading!  ENJOY!
Sad and almost true... This film was so close to being awesome and yet I didn't quite like the ending as much as I could have. What I don''t like about this film is how films are so insistent on giving us a happy ending regardless of how much reality has to be suspended. For the entire film the main character is taken advantage of, used, stood up and beaten down time and time again. And yet at the end of the movie, somehow his love interest sees the error of her ways and comes running back to him. I completely disapprove of that. If this were real life, after she had drained every drop of anything good she could possibly get from him, she would come back and steal his kidney(s) and then run off with his boss to live unhappily for the rest of her life and wonder why she is so unhappy. That is what would happen if this were real life.That being said, I did like this movie. A lot.Jack Lemmon is a likeable character named Baxter; he loans his apartment out to people in his office so that they can pursue their romantic intentions away from the prying eyes of their wives. This of course leads to complications when he loans the apartment out to the director of his company Mr. Sheldrake (Fred McMurray) and his mistress (what Baxter does not realize is that Mr. Sheldrake's mistress is in fact his own love interest Miss Kubelik (Shirley MacLaine)).The characters in this film are very real. Miss Kubelik is a woman who has been taken advantage of by Mr. Sheldrake many times before, and yet she keeps making the same mistake over and over. Mr. Sheldrake is a conniving man who cheats on his wife, has so many mistresses that he can't even keep them straight, and gives his lady friend a $100 bill for her Christmas present; yet he is the man who is the director of the company. Then there is Baxter who falls in love with a girl that stands him up and treats him, by all accounts, very poorly; yet he can't help but fall in love with her. These are all themes that rings as true today as I am sure they did back in 1960
hilarious. I was not sure I would like this one. Modern TV series have not been all to my taste recently. However this story of a small-time criminal who discovers Karma and who decides to go on a mission to right all the wrongs he has made is actually pretty good. The episodes are really funny and even if the humor is adult it is also done with a cute sweet touch that is heart-warming. Really recommended
"unique" Baywatch episode... I used to have a lot of Baywatch's from tv taped on some videos but this is the only one i have now,and it's the actual video as represented here. It's a unique episode in which it's the only one in Baywatch history that features my three favorite blonds on the same episode...that being Pamela Anderson,Nicole Eggert and Erika Eleniak. You see,Erika's last show was this one and it happened to be Pamela's first.This is also Nicole's debut episode. So,thats a little Baywatch trivia i guess. Anyhow,decent story with awesome scenery as it takes place away from the beach (mostly) and is set somewhere on the Sacramento river. It'll make you wanna go camping watching this. The only sour parts of the show for me was Hobie constantly singing that gold miners song (you wanna strangle him after the 2nd time) and the fact that Erika (Shauni) cut her hair at some point and has it short. It should be long like Pamela's!
I don't often review stuff... But I felt I really wanted to for this collection. I, like several other people apparently had previously bought seasons 1 through 10 as they came out, and was rather annoyed upon finding this collection. However I managed to sell off my individual seasons and purchase the set. I was not disappointed. It's really nicely packaged and including the original movie is a nice incentive as well. I love DVD extras so I'm anxious to see those as well. All in all, if you can afford it, it's definitely worth it.
FUNNY DVD. GREAT COMEDY.  I SAW THIS ON TV AND HAD TO BUY IT.  YOU CAN BUY HIS OTHER DVD IN STORES NOW FOR ONLY $5!
Unexpected Gem. This turned out to have been written by the author who wrote The Graduate.  It is a funny movie and Colin Firth is great as always, Heather Graham was at times annoying and I kept thinking she's too young.  Minnie Driver was ok and in an unexpected comic turn.  However, Frank Collison and Mary Steenburgen absolutely  steal the movie - they are so funny and their comic timing is impeccable.  Even the man in my life laughed at some of the antics Firth & Graham got up to especially the driving scene.  It's clever and very witty
Jackie Chan in all his glory. While the dubbing may be a little annoying, I still love this movie. The fight scenes are great and the movie is pretty funny at times. Driving motorcycles over cars will always be cool in my book. Don't expect the deepest movie in the world, but do expect a quality martial arts film
Fools rush in. DVD newcomer "Fort Apache" (1948) looks great, with minimal wear on its crisp black-and-white images (from original nitrate elements) and bugle-brisk audio. The film, ironically, finds Henry Fonda playing the maddeningly hawkish cavalry commander against John Wayne's humanistic officer willing to risk all for peace and justice.The (single) DVD has no documentary on the exciting and heartfelt film, a shame. It does include a 15-minute piece on Monument Valley, covering Ford's significant and seemingly beneficial role in the Indian reservation's history. The Navajo, paid good wages for their appearances, called him "Giant Soldier." "I've kissed more babies than a politician," Ford said."Part of his vision of the world was that we're all very small in the scheme of things," film historian Joseph McBride says. "I think (Monument Valley) gives a dimension of moral seriousness to his work that was intensified as he went along."[...
a true classic in every way.... This is a classic flick in every way!  It has some not so great acting, and a little cheesyness here & there, but all in all it has several scary moments.  The funniest thing to me, tho, is at the opening, the zombie that attacks then chases Barbara is moving pretty quickly, then when it shows him arrive at the house later, he slowly turns to look at the other zombies, THEN he starts swaying and moving really slowly & stiffly! It's like he probably thought, "oh yea, I'm a zombie, I guess I better stiffen up!"  Try to notice that the next time you watch this classic.  I bet when this came out in 1968, it was considered horrible & shocking!
Amazing. I just ordered this on dvd, my video version of this has been around for years and is getting worn out.  Rose McGowan does a great job in this movie, you feel sorry for her character even though she's offing everybody around her.  This movie is much more raw than Jawbreaker; not up to The Doom Generation but still a lot of fun
Great Memories. I of course watched this stuff as a kid and it brings back memories to watch it now
monk land. it was  very entertaining.  i watched each show twice!  it makesme want to buy season 2
HOOYAH! THIS IS THE MOTHER LODE. Freddie Francis, Terence Fisher, Phil Leaky and all the crew! What more could you possibly want?  Are you a Hammer Fan?  Get this video, buy the popcorn, and enjoy yourself to the max! It's a technicolor orgy, and a fiendish festival.  You will thank yourself for purchasing this collection many times over
Beautiful in its Sweetness. This is a film that makes one have hope for humanity.  It tells the story of a boy and his mother in Scotland.  Frankie is constantly writing letters to his father, the only thing is that he's not actually writing them to his father, but to a post office box where his mother collects them and writes back.  A problem with this arrangement is when the boat his father is supposedly working on comes into port, leaving the mother with a rather large problem: tell the boy the truth or break his heart.  She decides to do neither and hire someone to pose has Frankie's father.I picked this movie up on a whim, because it looked interesting.  Boy, was I right.  This has turned out to be one of my favorite movies.  It has this air of innocence about it that leaves the viewer with sense of well being.  I'm not sure if I can really explain how this movie makes me feel, I think it is something that simply has to be experienced.
This Movie is About Something. I bought this movie for my mother.  She used to have this album & would play it when I was younger.  So I thought this movie would be a nice trip down memory lane for her.  She loved it!  I especially liked the commentary by the stars of the movie, telling what went on in their heads while the movie was being made.  I think this movie is a good buy for anyone wanting to know a little more about the Black experience during this time
fantastic pilates mix!. this is the third mtv fitness dvd i have purchased and is by far my favorite.  the power yoga is really hard and one of my favorite fitness dvd's i own.  the thing i like best about this one is the breakdown of the upper and lower body workouts.  i haven't tried the 10 minute full body workout but am glad that i always have that option.i work out, do weights, and yoga a 4-5 times a week and this was really hard for me the first time around.  i just finished my second workout today and still couldn't finish all the reps in few of the exercises.  being in pretty good shape, it's hard to find a dvd that is challenging enough to make me sore and feel like i worked hard.  if you're like me you will love this dvd!abs are a main focus throughout both workouts so be prepared for that.  since pilates is all about the core that makes sense, but my core was really talking to me after only 15 mns!  i opt to do the upper and lower sections back to back so my next day can just be cardio.  be ready to be sore after the very first time use it!kristin is a really good instructor and doesn't annoy me like so many others out there.  the only thing i can say is that she is super advanced so be prepared to look at the beginning or intermediate people on the dvd.  i am totally pumped about this dvd because she incorporates moves i've never seen before which is refreshing.  bikini season here i come!
Beavis and Butthead ...what more can I say?. Beavis & Butthead are one if not the greatest thing to happen to your lives. Even though people are whineing that the episodes arn't in order and some episodes have some cuts, who really cares? These are great episodea and everyone should check out this set
Reading the Compass. "The Medium" instantly became my favorite show on television in 2005.  I usually am fascinated by shows with elements of the paranormal, which tuned me in.  However, it is the realism of the family relationship that is most fascinating.  Patricia Arquette who was in "Ed Wood" with Johnny Depp plays Alison DuBois.  Her Emmy win for Best Actress in a drama attests to her standing within the industry, but the on-screen chemistry with Jake Weber who was in "Meet Joe Black" and plays her husband Joe is riveting.  They fight, spat, try to mask conflict in front of their kids, juggle an impossible number of real-life tasks, and have layers of humor and romance that make this seem like a real family that loves each other and deals with the unusual circumstances of Alison's psychic ability.  I found after watching the initial show that when the reruns would show, I still wanted to watch them over episodes of CSI Miami that I had not seen.   When I bought the DVD, I was hoping there might have been an episode I'd missed, but I'd seen them all between NBC & Lifetime reruns several times.  I'm impressed by how entrancing each episode is and the quality of the writing.  Alison's dreams are like clues that she struggles to fit together.  What impresses me about Alison is that she sincerely struggles to do the right thing.  In a world of violence, it's often hard to be clear which way the moral compass points.  In the episode "In Sickness & Adultery" her tip places her on the witness stand with an unethical hostile prosecutor that seeks to embarrass her.  As she comes back that he cheated to pass his law exams and is cheating on his wife, she finds that her best defense is the truth.  The two older daughters are also jewels.  Maria Lark as Bridget often has my entire family in stitches with her offbeat humor like shouting at her mom who wakes screaming from a bad dream, "Mom, please stop doing that!"  Sofia Vassilieva as the older Aerial keeps the arguments at the breakfast table bouncing.  David Cubitt who plays the reoccurring role of Detective Lee Scanlon also achieves amazing chemistry with Arquette.  Miguel Sandoval as the district attorney Manuel Duvalos has such a focused calmness that he centers the crime portion of the show.  (Perhaps we will sometime see more about his family.)  While it's hard to pick my favorite first season episode, the complex plot of "A Priest, A Doctor & Medium Walk into an Execution Chamber" is a jewel, with the police chasing a ghost who apparently has just committed murder.  The DVD commentaries and introduction to the real-life Alison DuBois really give excellent background for fans of the show.  This is one show that reaches the level of art for me.  Its excellence will make it memorable for a long time & this DVD collection a valuable addition to an entertainment collection.  Bravo
Entertaining gay themed detective story. After seeing years upon years of detective shows, like "The Thin Man" , "Peter Gun", "Burke's Law" , "Columbo" or "CSI", it is very interesting to see a very gay interpretation of this genre.Chad Allen holds the center of attention as he tries to sort out the murder of his client, a journalist who specializes in 'outing' celebrities, priests, and politicians. Chad is supported in his work by a sophisticated and handsome life-partner, played by Sebastian Spence. This couple discusses the odds and ends of the detective's case over nightclub dancing and frequent martinis. Their clever banter and deliberation reminded me of Nick and Nora Charles in the "Thin Man" series.Because Chad Allen conducts most of the investigation and engages in most of the action without his partner, he reminded me of the old "Peter Gun" type of detective, getting beat up by thugs, rounded up by the police, and shot at periodically as he gets closer to the "truth".The client, played very well by Jack Wetherall (the superb uncle with AIDS in Queer as Folk), is on multiple hit-lists due to his ability to collect information on the man-on-man sexual activities of local politicians, Catholic priests, and entertainment celebrities.  I found it interesting that the character played by Wetherall was regarded extremely poorly by Allen and his crowd. Politicians who vote against gay-rights legislation yet enjoy a hidden gay sex life should be exposed, in my opinion. Thus I sympathized with the character played by Wetherall.The theme of pedophile priests was also present but not really as well developed as the 'outing' aspect of the story.If there is any weakness, it is a screenplay whereby all the gay suspects spill their nelly beans when Chad Allen says "boo". Like in "Perry Mason", the suspects tell-all when the least bit of pressure is applied. One fellow secretly films all the sexual adventures in his hotel and sells the dirt on his clientele, yet he gives Allen all the information he needs when Allen threatens to smash a porcelain desk elephant.There is much masculine eye-candy in the film also. Woody Jeffreys plays Jack Wetherall's handsome young lover while muscle bound porno star Matthew Rush plays a porno star (go figure!) and provides the only full frontal nudity in the film.Overall it is a fun film, a gay satire on all the pseudo-sophisticated detective stories we watched as kids.
Sometimes, the truth and the reason are not in the same table!. Many people tend to forget this memorable performance of Streep, who made, to my mind, her fourth best artistic achievement after Sophie 's decision, Ironweed and Silkwood in that order.Powerful drama based on a true story around a woman judged unfairly as the murder of her own child when in reality was a wild dog the true guilty of this awful personal tragedy. Magnificent directorial effort of Schepisi backstage.
Bad Moon. If you're expecting to grab onto the edge of your seat, this won't be it for the jaded horror enthusiasts,  but for the upper-tier novices, it's worth buying. The script and filming are good and start out with a fun legal "left-hook" to a door-to-door guy out to make a buck by suing someone if he has to, and it plays as a mini-drama-side-car to the main theme for a bit. The setting is out in the wilderness where a small family consisting of a woman, her son and the family dog (105 lb. German Shepard named Thor) resides. Thor plays a lead role moments later in the film as the caretaker to the family when he notices something is not quite right after he meets the woman's brother, who contacted them from a campsite not far from where they live after law enforcement came into his area in response to some campers found murdered. He moves near them, and an inner dialog begins to grow between the woman's brother and Thor, for the dog knows he recognizes his kin, and the struggle between family safety and kinship between all unfolds
Insanely violent prequel to "Pulp Fiction". Spawned from the bizarre mind of Quentin Tarantino "True Romance" continues his line of ultra violent, outlandish movies starting with "Resevoir Dogs".Christian Slater playing Clarence Worley, a comic book store employee is set up with a new to the profession call girl Alabama played by a very sexy Patricia Arquette as a birthday present.  They quickly get married and Slater wants to sever her ties with her scarfaced and dreadlocked pimp Drexl Spivey played by Gary Oldman.  He proceeds to gun him down and inadvertantly takes a suitcase filled with millions worth of cocaine thinking it was Arquette's clothes.Amazed at his good fortune they plan to go to L.A. to sell the coke and live happily ever after.  Unfortunately the organized crime owners of the drugs led by Mafia don Vincenzo Coccotti played by the always peculiar Christopher Walken have other plans.The film with a terrific cast including Dennis Hopper, James Gandolfini, Val Kilmer, Brad Pitt, Samuel L. Jackson and others proceeds frantically culminating in a furious gun battle in a Beverly Hills hotel.  Narcotic detectives, Mafia hitmen, Hollywood bodyguards and Slater and his crew all shoot it out in a bloody finale which proves that love conquers all
A solid noir, thanks to Otto Preminger's direction and Joseph LaShelle's cinematography. There's a hole as big as Carlsbad Caverns right in the middle of the plot. What is so surprising is that, thanks to Otto Preminger's skill and that of his cinematographer, Joseph LaShelle, how the story is told more than makes up for it. Here's the set-up. A police detective with a well-earned reputation for beating up low-lifes tracks down a suspect in a murder. The guy is drunk and the cop is impatient. One thing leads to another and the guy stands up and smacks the cop on the chin. While the cop is picking himself up, the guy reaches for a whiskey bottle and starts to bring it down on the cop's head. The cop blocks that swing, then punches the guy hard, and I mean hard, right in the chest, then connects just as hard with the guy's chin. The guy goes down and doesn't get up. He's dead. So now we're off on a plot-line where the cop's hatred of crooks, which is based on some family issues, suddenly has him hiding the corpse. Wouldn't you know it, the corpse is found...and an aggressive young precinct head decides that the man responsible is the father of a girl the detective starts to fall for. And while this is going on, the detective hasn't stopped his obsessive search for the crook he thinks is really behind the original murder, a sneering mobster with a fondness for nasal inhalers.Wait, now. Any cop who hit and accidently killed a guy in self defense would instantly have a wall of blue thrown protectively around him, no matter how hard a case he might be. Every resource would be used to see that the cop was exonerated. I know, I know, this is a movie, but Detective Mark Dixon's (Dana Andrews) reaction is so excessive that it becomes nothing more than a glaring plot device. And, in my view, that undermines the tension of the movie.Another thing that doesn't help is that both Dana Andrews and Gene Tierney (as Margaret Taylor, who becomes Dixon's love interest) are, in my opinion, not compelling actors. Andrews had a great voice but, to my way of thinking, a somewhat wooden face and a stolid acting style. Sometimes he was effective, sometimes not. Tierney is, as usual, gorgeous to look at, but she is no actress. She seems to spend all her time in this movie either being noble toward the man Dixon accidently killed, or noble and loving toward her father, or noble and loving toward Dixon. I'm fairly well convinced that her performance in Leave Her to Heaven, a first-rate acting job, was some mysterious and happy accident.Some critics have made much of the apparent moral ambiguity in Mark Dixon's character. I don't quite see it that way. Yes, he hates crooks for reasons a psychoanalyst could help him deal with. When given a semi-legal chance to rough them up, he does. But there is no moral ambiguity in his character. He may be an angry man, but he has friends. He doesn't need to agonize about spending his savings to help another person; he just does it. Dixon is a man with problems, but moral ambiguity isn't one of them.Because of all this, what's important in this movie is how Preminger and LaShelle go about telling the story, not the story itself. They do terrific jobs. The feel of the movie captures Dixon's anger, his short fuse, his loneliness. The movie looks gritty, dark and authentic. Small details add a lot to the sense of reality. When we walk into Dixon's small apartment we can see just a quick glimpse of an icebox behind a screen. Even in 1950 there were a lot of iceboxes still around. The bar where Dixon's partner orders a scotch and water looks like any number of old, dark downtown bars. Margaret Taylor's apartment is tiny. There's no bedroom, just a single bed next to the wall as you walk in. And the movie has faces, actors you sort of recognize who look right for their parts...Tom Tully as Margaret's father, Bert Freed as his partner, Ruth Donnelly as Gladys, the owner of a small Italian restaurant, Karl Malden as the new precinct captain, Neville Brand as one of the goons; even Gary Merrill who overacts a little looks the part as Tommy Scalise, the mobster. Brand, in particular, looks like a man you never want to irritate.I enjoyed the movie because it was so well put together. That hole in the plot, however, kept me from getting very involved with the story-line. The DVD transfer looks just fine. The major extra is a commentary by Eddie Muller, identified as a film noir historian. I didn't listen to the commentary but Muller has gotten good notices for his noir work
Puzzel pieces placed:  Howard Zinn- a very important person. I first became aware of Howard Zinn when a client left a copy of his "A People's History of the United States" as a reference for a paper I was helping him write: I was astounded and moved. I got my own copy of the history and "The Zinn Papers." I saw that last few minutes of "Howard Zinn: You Can't Be Neutral on a Moving Train" on the Sundance Network and getting it became paramount. The video made me remember Zinn: this white guy that was part of the Civil Rights and Anti Vietnam War movements. The pieces of the puzzle were placed. Howard Zinn is more important to America than has been acknowledged. His history is essential. To me he equals Franz Fanon in explaining how people really make history, and how badly history has been taught in U.S. schools, and how badly we have been led. Zinn qualifies as a philosopher. Zinn's history will scare many who have bought into white supremacy history. Serious history buffs should have his video and his history. It's a wonderful reference and a truth that must be told
An Excellent Political Thriller From John Frankenheimer. President Jordan Lyman: All right, Colonel. Let's sum it up, shall we? You're suggesting what?Colonel Martin "Jiggs" Casey: I'm not sure, Mr. President: just some possibilities, what we call "capabilities" in military intelligence...President Lyman: You got something against the English language, Colonel?Colonel Casey: No, sir.President Lyman: Then speak it plainly, if you will.Colonel Casey: I'm suggesting, Mr. President, there's a military plot to take over the government. This may occur some time this coming Sunday.And we're off on one of the best political thrillers Hollywood has made. Jiggs Casey (Kirk Douglas) works at the Pentagon as an aide to the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, General James Mattoon Scott (Burt Lancaster). The president, Lyman Jordan (Frederic March) is planning to implement a nuclear disarmament treaty with the Soviets. A large number of the military and not a few politicians are deeply opposed, believing that the treaty will effectively lead to unilateral disarmament by the U.S. A few senior military officers, led by General Scott, plan to do something about it. Casey discovers secret activities leading to Scott that could suggest a military take over of the government. He reluctantly goes to the president with his suspicions. The movie details the struggles of the president and a close circle of his advisors, men he can trust including Casey, to verify the existence of the plot and then to checkmate Scott.John Frankenheimer, who also directed The Manchurian Candidate with Sinatra, knows how to put together a movie that crackles with energy and tension. Jordan sends his close friend, Senator Raymond Clark (Edmond O'Brien) to the Nevada desert to try to locate a hidden military base where soldiers are being trained to seize communications and energy centers. He sends his press secretary, Paul Girard (Martin Balsam) to the Mediterranean to get a sworn statement from a wily admiral admitting the plot. He has Jiggs Casey continue to work for Scott while looking for any evidence that can implicate Scott directly in the plot, an assignment Casey hates. All these threads weave back and forth until there is enough for Jordan to confront Scott directly...and Scott doesn't back down. The conclusion centers on a televised press conference where, given vital evidence at the last minute, Jordan announces that he's requesting the resignation of Scott and most of the other joint chiefs, speaks of the role of the military to bring honest opinions to the table, but when a decision is made, to support it. He talks about the Constitution. It's a dramatic and effective moment.The movie was written by Rod Serling. He has Lyman Jordan a couple of times almost slip over into preaching...but not quite. Jordan speaks for decency and the rule of law under the Constitution. Serling does a first rate job.And so do the actors. March plays the president as an honest but realistic politician, determined to do the right thing regardless of how unpopular it might make him. Lancaster, in my view, has one of his great roles as General Scott. He's dynamic and absolutely sure of himself. Watch Lancaster as he testifies before a senate committee on the treaty. His face is stern and he is absolutely attentive, but he barely suppresses his contempt for the treaty, for the process and for the senators. All the while a finger is impatiently tapping on the table. Douglas is Douglas, sincere and intense. He does a good job. Part of what makes this movie work is how effective the secondary characters are. O'Brien and Balsam are first rate and so are George Macready as a crusty, cynical and trusted advisor and Whit Bissell as an opportunistic Senator. They're all good.This is a fine movie that is just as involving to watch now as it was when it came out. The DVD transfer is very good
Must See For Carey Fans. This is Carey at his best. This movie is hilarious and the special features are awesome
13 Going on 30. It is a fun movie -- I saw it in the theatre and really loved the scene when they dance to "Thriller" -- I enjoy watching that scene over and over!
Excellent HD Picture quality-Great Movie!. I owned this movie in full screen on VHS. The quality of the transfer of "Apollo 13" with the wide screen and the incredible clearity 0f HD that was never possible before, makes this movie a true cinematic experience. One of Tom Hanks' best movies!.Since we're revewing here the HD version, I own a new Samsung 61" HDTV and the Toshiba HD-A1 ($399 from Amazon). An incredible improvement over my 1998 60" Standard Sony TV. If you have the right setup, it is the true home theater dream that we all hoped for since the dawn of home video back in the late 70's or early 80's. Be sure you use the HDMI cable or at least component connection.The audio track is also Great! With the right Dolby Digital/Plus 5.1 receiver/Speaker/Placement.Also, lots of Extras on the NTSC US version, including interviews with Hanks and some of the real astronauts
Ode To Ric Flair, Great Celebrity, Great DVD Set. The living legend Ric Flair is represented very well here on 3 DVD's that highlight his career from AWA to present. I'm also reading Ric's book and for the price I picked it up used it's a GREAT purchase to go along with this set. I'm enjoying this DVD set and can highly recommend it to his fans.Below is the reason why I got this DVD, and my brief personal meeting with The Nature Boy. I stand by those words and I'm now one of his biggest fans, as a Wrestler and as a Celebrity. Wooooooooo!!!!Am I into wrestling?, well no. Have I watched it before?, yes many times, often when getting pretty drunk buzzed and I find it very entertaining at times (when I have not seen it for a while). Did I like Ric Flair when I would watch him, I don't think so, he was the cheater so I always went for the "good" guy like the Hulkster (you had to love his character (Flair's) before the match though, The Nature Boy would crack me up). But let me tell you why I really like Ric Flair now. In the late fall of 2004 Ric Flair came to the Middle East along with some other wrestlers (David Benoit, and some wrestling babes), and did a signing and picture event for the troops at the base I was at. I had JUST got back from Iraq (the base he came to and I was at than was in Qatar, not a shooting zone like Iraq), and fortunately we were allowed 2 beers a day there. Before the signing, Ric really said some stuff that impressed me, calling out the lefties in this country that would sacrifice the efforts being made in the Middle East to gain politically, he called it like it was and is! Well, after the pics (which I've got a great one with Ric),Ric and David hung out for some beers and amazingly most of the crowed had left and I got to hang out with these guys! They were really down to earth and I really got the sense that they were fully supportive of the troops, not like the crap you hear from these protestors that "support" the troops but hate the mission. Well, that's my real memory of Ric Flair and he's #1 in my book from now on! Just like Ann Margaret is loved by thousands of Vietnam War Vets, Ric Flair I'm sure gained some followers who are Iraqi Freedom Vets like me. Wooooooo
Daniel Knauf - PLEASE write a book or screenplay to finish the story!. Everyone - do yourselves a favor and immediately purchase Seasons 1 and 2 of Carnivale.  This is one of the few chances in life to see true genius in writing, directing and acting.  If I ran HBO, or had the money to do it myself, I would bring all the cast & crew together to do several more seasons.  At the very least, I would create a feature film to try to finish the story.  Yes, the fight between light and dark can never be "finished", but it was a travesty that HBO ended this series when it did instead of allowing one more season to bring things to some sort of conclusion.  I would imagine that everyone connected to the creation of this show is richer for having been involved with it, as are the viewers who devoured every episode.  It will make you think, it will make you dream and it will make you wish more episodes would be created.  Kudos to all the talented people involved, and boy, do we miss all of you
An Excellent Tribute. Many people are scared away by foreign films, myself included. Often they come off as "art for the sake of art," but not in a positive way like with MGM. Cinema Paradiso is not a typical foreign film at all, or even a typical film. It is a wonderful tribute to movies and does an excellent job of incorporating history into the story.Salvatore (Jacques Perrin) is a big shot, a film maker who has not visited his hometown or seen his family in thirty years. He gets a call telling him that his childhood friend and mentor Alfredo has died. The news makes him think of his childhood and the beginning of his interest in films. Salvatore (Salvatore Cascio), "Toto," visits the Cinema constantly to bother Alfredo (Philippe Noiret) and to ask him questions about projecting films. Toto's mother does not like him going to the Cinema; she thinks her boy is bad and doesn't want the flammable film to come home with him. It is impossible to part the boy from his curiosity, and eventually Alfredo gives in and teaches Toto how to run the projector. Soon, Salvatore grows up into a teenager (Marco Leonardi) and falls in love with a blue-eyed girl (Agnese Nano). But his love for movies never wans.This movie can touch any movie lover, especially those interested in the history of film. So much is included here. There are posters of stars like Clark Gable, Ingrid Bergman, Joan Crawford, Erich von Stroheim, Buster Keaton, and Marilyn Monroe. There is progress with film going from highly flammable material to a more advanced flame repellant. There are double features and newsreels and censorship. Most importantly, one can see the community that film creates; it brings people together. None of this is done blatantly and none of it is overly sentimental. What makes this movie stand above others like it is its sense of realism despite the heavily sentimental story.
Authentic Pilates. It is a pleasure performing these authentic pilates movements with Catherine as my guide.It is very soothing to listen to her as she guides your breathing and movement every step of the way.Her directions are easy to follow,clear and concise.The DVD is set in a beautiful english garden, which adds to the serenity.Catherine is obviously at home in front of the camera, with a one on one intimacy that makes me feel that she istalking to me alone.She is a master at her craft.I love the interactive aspect of this DVD.Once I absorbed the insightful Key Principals of the Method,I could skip directly to any desired exercise segment, or play the entire program.The copy on the screen reinforces the training,and sophisticated segment transitions enhance the viewing experince.I appreciate that this is a DVD that I can grow into, starting out with the basics and adding weights and other movements that Catherine talks about, once I've mastered the basics.
GOOD!. I must say that this is one of those good films that you can really appreciate when you're in the right frame of mind.The story is interesting...a ex-nazi working as a night porter discovering his long lost love from a concentration camp and when i say long lost love i don't mean that in a conventional way. They manage to reunite and give each other what they've longed for in so long. But of course there are obstacles.....as always.Charlotte Rampling has become one of my all time favorite actress. I have seen her before in Francois Ozon's films but this one cemented my admiration in the woman. The scene where she's singing in German with the nazi uniform is just classic in my book.Check it out
Really Good DVD. I don't normally take the time to write reviews, but this dvd deserves it!  My nine year old taught herself to knit from this dvd without my help!  I'm so impressed.... with this dvd!  If she can do that, anyone can.  And so, I did.  I had almost given up trying to learn from dvd's because I bought a couple of others from here on Amazon (my mother taught me that if you don't have anything nice to say, don't say anything at all, so I won't name them!) and they were so bad I threw them in the trash.Everything is so clear and easy on this dvd and the lessons are perfect. My daughter is knitting herself a "blanket" for our Yorkie (really just a big square, but she's happy!), and I've started a scarf.  We're both knitting along great, and there seems to be a lot more on this dvd waiting for us to learn, and I can't wait until we get there!I really recommend this dvd.  It's rare for me to be so wowed by something to write a review, but this dvd is so great. Don't take any chances, buy this dvd and you're sure to be knitting as quickly as we were
Fantastic. I have always liked Murder She Wrote with Anglia Lansbury. So I have enjoyed these DVD's. Down the line I will get some more of them
Very Entertaining. Nicely done! The Chieftans: Down the Old Plank Road - The Nashville Sessions has just the right mix of &quot;guests&quot; and provides an entertaining concert. A smattering of interviews and a real nice mix of music make this a must buy for those interested in Celtic &amp; Bluegrass music
I LOVE this movie!. There isn't much to say about it except that it is all around great.  Kiefer Sutherland plays a hard cop who has to begin to believe in the paranormal in order to solve a mystery.  The acting is cheesey, as are the special effects, but for some reason this is one of my favorite movies.  Anyone who likes any of the following should check it out:  ghost stories, the x-files/the outer limits, psychic stories, kiefer sutherland
"ha ha ha, you didn't say the magic word, ha ha ha...". I read the book in middle school and watched the movie shortly afterwards.  A few of the characters were switched around, but I was so impressed with the adaptation. A thriller that still makes me nervous and jumpy - the kids in the kitchen scene and when Mr. Arnold's arm drops on Ellie's shoulder as she's trying to turn the generator back on, for example. There have been countless lines I've memorized and quoted at appropriate and innapropriate times, due to my obsession.And after watching it more than 25 times, I've come to appreciate it more. Great cast - Sam Neil is my favorite. Richard Attenborough is a little too cute and nice, but I liked his white clothing, the hat, and the amber cane. Wayne Knight was incredible as Nedry, the slob. He's as likeable as ever, though somewhat the villain. I always hate it when he dies. Jeff Goldblum fit the description of Ian Malcom from Crichton's novel well. Crichton sparked my interest in Chaos Theory, sometimes called The Butterfly Effect. I am a firm believer in it. And of course, in the novel and film, Malcolm was right. "Life finds a way..."(In Chaos Theory, the system is very sensitive to small changes in external conditions, and "random" --unpredictable-- events result from the "normal" equation/setup, because there is never a fixed set of outcomes; the system is unpredictable because of its complexity. Hammond thought his system was without error, that he was in complete control. He believed that the dinosaurs would fail to reproduce because all were engineered to be female, but he was wrong - the dinosaurs evolved because of the replacement amphibian DNA that was used to fill in the gaps in the dinosaur DNA. This DNA gave the dinosaurs the ability to change sex in order to reproduce, "survive," in a single-sex environment. And it turned out that Hammond was wrong about many other equations - things are not as black and white as he thought, and it is problematic to predict long-term behavior of his animals.)Love the scene where the lawyer is eaten while sitting on the toilet.We watched the Mr. DNA segment in a high school biology class. I've always thought it explained the process very well for something that is complicated (though I found Mr. Hammond's live speaking lines to be unrealistic...was he really planning to be there for each tour?).The kids were kind of annoying. I didn't notice this until I was a little older, but Lex ("I prefer to be called a hacker") uses Silicon Graphics' 3D file system navigator to turn power back on in the park. Their logo is on the monitor. If only UNIX were as popular as Windows is now...Anyway, the soundtrack was classic - it was the first CD I bought, back in the mid-90s.  Tonya Harding skated to the theme at the 1994 Olympics, or some other competition. I only liked her because of her excellent music choice
Spocks World. Hundreds of diplomats are aboard the Enterprise enroute to a secret location called Babel.  Sarek and Amanda arrive by shuttle and receive an ambassador greeting by all the Enterprise senior officers.  Sarek and Amanda are Spock's parents from Vulcan.  Sarek seems disguisted with Spock.  Sarek is disguised by Spock human element, never expression or show love or a mind melt with his son.  Sareks family has massive Vulcan land ownership and significant class prestige and status among the Vulcan elite and ruling class.  Sarek's voice is heard through out Vulcan and the federation.  Sarek refuses Kirks offer for Spock to tour guide them around the enterprise and asks for a different guide.Amanda chastises Spock telling him, "I would have thought after all this time with humans you would learn to smile.  You still haven't learned to smile".  Amanda express resent for Spocks long absence indicating it has been 4 years since the last visit.  Kirk learns from Amanda that Sarek disagreed with Spocks decision to join Starfleet instead of the Vulcan Science Academy; Spock disguarded the family tradition and the Vulcan way; Sarek believed Spock decision was illogical; Sarek correctly criticized Spock for choosing peace through force; Sarek accessed the Federation as an organization involved with numerous acts of force, conflict, and secret military activity through out the Federation; Sarek desired for Spock to learn the Ambassador discipline and gain influence through family power, relationship, and wealth; Sarek believe Spock should learn and practice the traditions of the his fathers.  Amanda tells McCoy that Spock as a child had a pet called a Sehlat, "fat teddy bear".  Spock tells McCoy that Vulcan teddy bears are alive and have six inch fangs."Journey to Babel centered on the counsel issues surrounding admission of the planet, Coridan into the federation.  The issues for admission were important to Vulcan and required the retired 102 years old Sarek to handle Vulcan's position at the conference.   Previously, Sarek had openly and publicly debated Gav, the Tellerite and won the argument.  Vulcan indirectly accused the Tellerites and Orions of illegally smuggling dilithium crystals; Vulcan wanted federation law and order to govern trade; and the Federation represented the best balance of power in favor of the Vulcans.Sarek privately chastise Amanda for embarrassing Spock. Amanda replies back to Sarek, "I thought you did not approve of StarFleet", "you do respect Starfleet" and "you are proud of your son".  Sarek is logically stating that a Starfleet officer should be shown respect and personal differences, do not justify disrespect.  Amanda wishful thinking will not lead Sarek into action that will show any emotion or affection toward his son. Spock is alone in the World with only his friends on the Enterprise.The Enterprise detects a scout ship and Kirk wants Spock's opinion, to which, Spock replies, "I shall need more data from my estimate".  The alien scout ship can travel at warp ten allowing it to avoid any of the enterprise weaponry.Gav threatens Sarek, after Sarek discloses that Vulcan will vote for admission of Coridan into the Federation.  Sarek tells Gav that "threats are illogical" and "payment is often expensive".  Later, Gav is found murdered with a broken neck and Sarek is the prime suspect.  Spock explains that Sarek would need a reason to kill and if the reason were compelling that Sarek was very capable of killing.  Spock describes the method of killing as Tal-Shay, pressure applied mercifully, to a specific spot on the neck vertebrae rendering the victim, dead instantly.Kirk charges Sarek as being a prime suspect. Sarek collapsed with heart value failure.  Sarek explains that he has had three heart value failures and at the time of the murder, he was in private mediation and experiencing heart value failure, on the 3rd level of the observation deck.  McCoy recommends cryogenic open heart surgery, but the procedure will require vast amounts of T negative Vulcan blood.  Spock has the rare blood type and agrees to use an experimental drug that will double his blood production capability.  McCoy express reserve because he has never performed a surgery on a Vulcan and the drug could damage Spocks spleen and liver.An imposer Andorian (Orion) attacks Kirk near his quarters and punctures his left lung in a knife fight.  Spocks tells Thelev that the attack was illogical because the Andorians profit in no way by the attack   Thelev argues the Andorians are using an act of passion for gain and the Andorians want to murder the 100 delegates.Spock now refuses to assist in the operation because his duty requires command of the enterprise and the duty can not be relinquish for personal reasons.  Amanda says "your duty is your father", "nothing is as important as your father life", "your not really Vulcan" and after the boys had ridicule Spock, Amanda tells Spock, "the human part cried", "I cried too", "There must be some part of me in you".  Spock does not budge.  Amanda tells him, "if you do not save your father, I will hate you for the rest of your life".  Spock says, "I can not".Kirk appears on the bridge and tricks Spock into thinking is fit for duty; Spock is ordered to report too sickbay for the operation; Kirk destroys the Orion ship; Kirk transfers command to Scotty;  and Sarek, Spock, and Kirk are together at Sickbay.   Spock asks Sarek why he married Amanda and Sarek replies, "It seemed logical at the time".  Kirk wants to continue daily duties but McCoy tells him to lie down and be quiet.  Spock tells the group that he has never seen McCoy happier and McCoy says, "I finally to the last word".
Riding Behind Enemy Lines. Undoubtedly John Ford is one of the greatest film directors of all times. He had a special knack to imprint a galloping rhythm to his movies, most adequate virtue for making "The Horse Soldiers" (1959).The film based on Harold Sinclair's historical novel of the same title recounts the foray of a Union's Brigade into Confederate territory.In command of this column is Col. Marlowe and attached to his staff is regimental surgeon Maj. Kendall. Both men are strong headed and will clash since the very begging of the raid.To add some more stress into the picture the detachment has to carry an unwilling and hostile Southern Lady.The film contains some wonderful and emotive actions scenes. To be noted the charge of the Rebs into the town controlled by Marlowe's troop and the Military Academy's child-soldiers marching in line with unflinching decision.The numerous cavalcades underlined by joyous marching songs are a pleasure to see.John Wayne and William Holden put into action all their charisma and acting experience to flesh the two main characters. Constance Towers as Miss Hannah Hunter of Greenbriar display a very good acting piece; starting as a Country Lady trying to deceive her enemies and ending as a compromised acting nurse to the soldiers around her.The rest of the cast is great in their supporting roles. Special mention is deserved by Hoot Gibson in his picturesque Sgt. Brown.It is a great film to be enjoyed by general public and a special treat for Ford's fans as me.Reviewed by Max Yofre
Purchase-Worthy Rockyesque, Coming-of-Age, Commedic Drama... SAINT RALPH is the perfect movie to have on hand for entertaining houseguests or cheering someone up, since most folks haven't already seen it, it's uplifting, and it has wide appeal (sports, coming-of-age, dramatic storyline, funny).  Much of this movie's humor is that of misunderstanding.  Ralph, a 9th grader, gets a lot wrong, perhaps since he has so little guidance, with his war hero father dead, his hospitalized Mom entering a coma, and living unsupervised at home by faking to the Headmaster that he's staying with grandparents.  Plus, he's got more typical 14-year-old problems, as he's the object of ridicule by classmates and can't control his hormones.  After a little pool incident, the Headmaster attempts to resolve Ralph's horny "energy surplus" problem by sentencing him to the cross-country team.  After his coach says, "let's go, 180 days left til the Boston Marathon," Ralph asks about running it, and the coach says he was kidding, that anyone from the team winning it would be "a miracle to rival the loaves and fishes."  Having taken literally a nurses statement that it'd take a miracle for his mom to recover, scrawny, smoker Ralph then sets out to win the Boston miracle, in defiance of opposition from the Headmaster.  Ralph gets misguided (and comedic) instruction from out-of-date books about how to train and from a fellow student (and aspiring nun/crush-interest) on the requirements for producing a miracle.  Despite the Catholic setting, this is not a religious movie, and secularists could easily point out that Ralph's theology is all confused and the movie's about hard work and good intentions, while a believers might see it as picturing God's responsiveness to sincere, crying hearts, even if our theology's not all formulated rightly.  Artistically, the movie is wonderful as well, the acting impeccable and music fitting.  Ebert & Roeper were right in applying what's usually a cliche, "beautiful gem."  Won awards from Toronto, Palm Springs, and Seatle.  (Brief poolhouse backside nudity, some taking of Lord's name in vain.  Neither gratuitous.
Pure Comic Gold!!!. All you haters out there need to go back to your "Red Neck Round-Up" & "Blue Collar Comedy" cause this stuff is gonna go way over your head.  Anyone who's watching a comedian, and waiting for their catch phrase("You might be...", "Tater Salad", & "Get 'Er Done") need look else where.  This DVD had me rolling from beginning to end and anyone with a sharp ear will be too.  Chappelle's comedy is more than just "Dick & Fart" jokes, his comedy actually has substance and all these haters need to like I said before tune into the WB to get their laughs, Daves way to smart for them. Show respect where respect is due
ZOMBIES INVADE THE UK!!!. I admit, I am a "johnny-come-lately" (to drag out a very old expression) in the whole "zombie" phenom, and I hope the ignorance of my comments don't offend all the loyal, hardcore zombie loyalists out there - but lately, the world is being over-run by zombies, so it has become something we all need to take seriously.  Of course, I saw all the earlier movies as they came out, so I'm not totally ignorant, but my tastes run in all directions (usually at the same time) so I would watch them, and then move on to the next movie.  It's become very clear that many people latched on to these movies, and then went on to devote their entire lives to this genre - which is fine, for them.  "Shaun of the Dead" is one of those movies that I watch, but I don't really form a complete opinion, so I'll watch it again, and again, and again...and you know what?  I really, really like it!  It IS funny - NOT in the way I have been accustomed to viewing humor, and not really in the British/Monty Python/Fawlty Towers/Young Ones kind of way that I have acquired a taste for over the years.  The humor IS dry and it is very much "tongue-in-cheek", but it is also a little more sophisticated and intelligent than the "Dead Polly Parrot" sketch (which is STILL very funny).  I've read that this movie was put together and intended as an "homage" to the American father of the zombie movement - George Romero (I hope I got that right).  The people who get hung up on gore and can't get past it, will criticize this as being just another one of those "bloody, senseless, body count movies" - to me, that is just being very small minded.  This is a movie, those are special effects, NO ONE really dies in these movies - if they can grasp that, we can move on.  To me it becomes - what NEW twist can we come up with, what NEW method of dispatching someone?  The more elaborate, the grossest, the most shocking, the most original - that is what takes the prize, and that is where the humor comes in.  No one is laughing over death and destruction - this is zombie movie mayhem and the object is to come up with something never before seen, so the audience will freak out in the delight that comes with being caught by surprise.  This movie is a very respectable British entry into the zombie genre - with it's own twist.  I'm sure it will take it's place with all the other recent movies - "Day of the Dead", "Land of the Dead", "28 Days" - to name a few.  As I said, I'm a newcomer as a serious viewer of these movies, but as I begin to appreciate them and their unique humor, I am also adding them to my collection.  Thanks for taking the time to read
Fun filled and light hearted. Bend It Like Beckham was a very enjoyable movie to watch. It was inspirational and heart-warming for young girls with a dream in showing that you can be anything that you want if you work hard enough. Jonathan Rhys Meyers was great in the role of the coach. Parminder Nagra showed a wide range in her acting abilities, considering this is one of her first films. Keira Knightley sparkled in her role as a tomboy with a homophobic mother, bringing just the right amount of humor to the film.It was an all around sweet, yet touching film examining the influence of culture in a young girl's life. The film poked fun at the proper life of a young Indian girl growing up in a traditional household without getting too serious. The costumes were rich in color and the soccer scenes were well filmed without looking fake.All around, Bend It Like Beckham was an enjoyable and sweet romantic comedy. It's definitely worth the watch.
Masterpiece of the 80's!. This is one of my favorite 80's movie!  Not only does it have the two infamous "Coreys" but the plot keeps me intrigued still to this day!
Rise and Fall of Death Row. While I already knew quite a lot about Death Row records before buying this, I was interested in watching this documentary after reading good reviews on it.  While there are no huge revelations included here, it is a fascinating insight into the notorious hip-hop label, that was running rap music in the early to mid 90's.  Most of the main players are interviwed here, Dre, Snoop, Suge and Harry-O.  It charts their massive rise after releasing The Chronic and then Doggystyle the next year and then where it all started to go wrong, when Suge Knight started to bask in his new found fame.  Some of the accounts show exactly how ruthless Suge was, though i suspect there are even more untold stories involving him.  The seocnd half of the dvd deals mainly with Tupac, and then how Death Row completely fell apart, with Dre leaving and then Pac's death.  If you have any interest in the hip-hop industry i would urge you to buy this, the only criticisms i have are that there are no interviws with David Kenner (Death Row Lawyer) or anyone at Interscope Records like Jimmy Iovine, though im not surprised they were unavailable to comment.  An excellent documentary
A RIVETING PERFORMANCE BY TOM HANKS... Russell Crowe is, without a doubt, very good in "Gladiator", but Tom Hanks in "Cast Away" is superb. It is in this film, that one finds the actor whose performance was truly Oscar worthy. Those who voted Crowe over Hanks as the year's recipient of the best actor Oscar had their heads in the sand, as Hanks gives a performance that I do not think that even he can equal.This film is like a play in three acts. What life was like before being cast away. What life was like as a castaway. What life was like after being cast away. After having seen the film, the title of the movie is somewhat ambiguous, upon reflection. It could easily refer to the status of Hanks' character during either the middle or ending sequence of the film. I leave it to the viewer to decide this conundrum.Hanks flawlessly plays the role of Chuck Noland (Was there a pun intended here?), a highly energized, time obsessed, systems engineer for Federal Express. On Christmas Eve, he makes a last minute decision to board a flight and escort some packages on a run to their destination. He pops the question to his girlfriend Kelly, played by Helen Hunt, and presents her with an engagement ring just seconds before he boards his ill fated flight. What then happens on that flight is no secret. Suffice to say that it is a wonderfully filmed disaster scene that is sure to strike terror in even the most blase of travelers.The second part of the movie is the crux of the film. For nearly an hour, Hanks is the only living human being on film. He totally carries the day and sustains the film with the power of his performance. We watch as he survives the rigors of his days and copes with the solitude that comes with being marooned on a deserted island for four years, sustained by a photograph of his fiancee, Kelly. Hanks captivates the viewer with his sense of joy and wonder as he creates fire. We watch as his loneliness drives him to invent a friend, Wilson, out of a volleyball that washes ashore. Hanks' performance is such that the viewer mourns the eventual loss of Wilson and experiences the poignancy of that moment when Hanks and Wilson are irrevocably parted.The third part with the film has to do with his being rescued. Having withstood four years as a survivalist on the island, Hanks' character decides that no life is better than the life that he was leading. Making a raft, he makes for the open seas, taking his chances. He is rescued, but after four years the life he left behind has all but disappeared. Kelly has moved on with her life, and he, in effect, has been cast away. It is here that the picture falters somewhat, as there is no happy ending and the film ends somewhat unresolved. Still, it is an excellent film, and Hanks' performance is definitely award calibre
Classic Crawford with fabulous special features. This boxed set is a must for any true Crawford fan.  Aside from the obvious merit of the films chosen for inclusion in this collection, the documentary entitled, &quot;Joan Crawford: the Ultimate Movie Star&quot; is itself worth the price of the boxed set.  This is a balanced and fair analysis of Joan Crawford the person, the actress, the mother, and ultimately, the image.  It is indisputable that Ms. Crawford's daughter's tell-all book, &quot;Mommie Dearest&quot; has irretrievably damaged Joan Crawford's reputation, possibly deservedly so.  Child abusers are not generally to be looked up to or admired in any way.  And yet, despite her obvious and significant parenting deficits, she played a major role in the evolution of Hollywood movies, and her movies remain by and large, highly entertaining.  This boxed set provides high quality entertainment created by a woman who truly personified the &quot;movie star&quot;, and who should at the very least be remembered for her drive and talent.  She had a most enviable career, in possibly the most competitive field imaginable.  As can be seen from the documentary included in this boxed set, this is a fact that even Ms. Crawford's children acknowledge
Another Great Psychological Western With Robert Mitchum. Robert Mitchum helped to introduce the psychological western in the landmark film Pursued. In Track of the Cat, he continued to chart new territory for what was already a well-worn genre in 1954.Track of The Cat, set on Mount Ranier, features Mitchum as the forceful head of a very disfunctional family in the waning days of the 1800's. Mitchum is the middle child, but runs roughshod over his gentle older brother, played by William Hopper (Paul Drake of TV's Perry Mason), and his younger, unconfidant brother, played by 50's heartthrob Tab Hunter. The rest of the family is a spinsterish sister, played by Teresa Wright, (who was in Pursued with Mitchum), and overbearing mother and alcoholic father, played by Beulah Bondi and Philip Tonge.When a mountain lion begins to attach their cattle, Mitchum and Hooper start out on a lion hunt. Back home, Hunter is trying to navigate an uneasy visit by his girfriend, who is welcomed by half the family and disliked by the other half. Much drama and tragedy ensues.The predominant use of black and white by director William Wellman is very effective, but it would have been wasted without such a great cast. Everyone is excellent, particularly Mitchum, Bondi, and Tonge, who played comic relief with great effect.This is a great film long overdue on DVD
Shadow Government's Greatest Hits. Get this, 9/11:Press for Truth and Aaron Russo's Freedom to Fascism and you'll have the three most informative documentaries of the year. Then get Webster Tarpley's Synthetic Terror book, the 9/11 Timeline by Paul Thompson, and everything by David Ray Griffin.Don't get with the program- get away from it!
&#1055;&#1088;&#1086;&#1089;&#1084;&#1086;&#1090;&#1088;&#1077;&#1085;&#1080;&#1077; K-19. For those who don't know russian the title of this was (&#1055;&#1088;&#1086;&#1089;&#1084;&#1086;&#1090;&#1088;&#1077;&#1085;&#1080;&#1077; K-19 - Review of K-19, thought I'd be funny there)This movie is not so much a combat movie it's a what happened movie. The flagship of the Russian Navy though not quite ready for sea gets put underway with 2 Captians, yea that kinda don't go over so well. They have a reactor accident and it seperates the men from the boys. It is quite a gripping movie though. This is also one that needs to be bought not just rented
Parker Stevenson?. You would think the person reviewing the Simon & Simon DVD would get the names of the  stars correct.  It was Jameson Parker who played A.J., not Parker Stevenson.
OUTSTANDING!!!!!!!!!. I sat down to watch this with not much in the way of expectations   and was I ever surprised!!!!!!  No slow spots, beautiful filming and outrageously wonderful music along with a fine script.  I've watched it 3 times since and feel that there is still a lot more to be appreciated that I'm missing. I can't wait to get the book and to read it.  A must see for any Polanski or Depp fan
Hilarious Film!. I have been waiting for this DVD to come out for a very long time!  It is a hilarious movie based on a true story about the creation of the Bradley war tank.  It shows how the promotion system in the military used to push for new war products to be used, even if they were not acceptable for use, and the struggle of one man to do the right thing.  You will not stop laughing while watching this movie!
Romance, action, laughs and Egypt. What more can you want?. Call me crazy (most do, anyway), but I absolutely adore this series. The first is your classic adventure flick, of course, with all the romance, action and comedy that entails. The second, and my personal favorite, delves much further into the story and cranks up the character development for practically every major character (I even cried for Imhotep at one point. Yeah... you don't want to get me started on that subject). Since I'm such a sucker for that sort of thing, you can bet I was captivated. Scorpion King, while not exactly mind-blowing, is cool for backstory on a previously sketchy character and pure actiony fun. Plus, Mathayus kicks butt in high style. :DThe box set itself is really quite durable, though it might not look it at first glance. An interesting choice, making it out of cardboard like that, but it works nicely. As for the extras and such, I love running through these. Having been fascinated with the ancient country from early childhood, the Egyptology lessons are nothing that I didn't already know, but they make me grin all the same. All in all, there are some lovely goodies in this set, especially the music videos for TMR and SK.Mind you, I already own the lot of them on VHS (despite the fact that they're in another state with my grandmother while I'm at college), but we all know what happens to those things after so many viewings. So yeah, I didn't think getting one of my favorite series for the price of one new release was such a bad thing.ps: The guys, particularly Brendan and Oded, are great eye candy. The Rock and Arnold add their own flavor of "hot," too, which is nothing to complain about for this female. A purely superficial thought, I know, and not something I generally pay too much attention to... but frankly, it's true
It sure is more than just a "romantic comedy". Well, the movie's plot aside, the sheer performance quality of Hugh Grant and Drew Barrymore would be enough to justify watching it. Grant's character, who financially was the less fortunate half of a famous 80's WHAM!-like band, lives off his 80's fame as a happy has-been. He hasn't written any worthwhile tunes in years. But one day he realizes that he is "dead". Barrymore's character is quite a talented "would be" writer, who has lost faith in herself. She has been taken advantage of in her personal life. These two people of very different backgrounds and interests are brought together by a twist of fate ("which makes life worth while") to write a new song in three days and get their lives back on track. To me, this movie is like a fairy tale, which should happen to everyone once in a life time, maybe twice. Enjoy it
A Wonderful and Unique Love story. I saw this movie at a (small) girls camp. Of course, we all fell deeply in love with Ray by the end of the movie.This is not only a beautiful and unique love story, different from your typical Pride and Prejudice type romance (don't get me wrong--Pride and Prejudice is one of my absolute favorite stories of all time, this story is just different in a very good way) but there are many other lessons, not just those of ture love and happily ever after. Some of the lessons in this film might be: acceptance of others, acceptance of self, forgiveness, and (of course) that you don't have to be similar to a person to love them--you can love anyone, if you want to.I'm not sure I would like to show this movie to very young children, although there is no bad language or suggestive scenes, etc. There are some things parents wouldn't want very young children to see or that they wouldn't understand, such as (*SPOILERS*) the Japanese Internment is discussed in some detail, Livvy is sent to live with Ray so she doesn't have a child out of wedlock, etc. Don't get me wrong, it is a wonderful and wholesome film, just watch it with older kids who would understand these kind of things.
Great Performance. This is a wonderfully talented group. And a very enjoyable show to watch. The only reason I gave it four instead of five stars is because I went to see them and it has much more of an effect in person. But the show also involves a great entertainmen
my view. I thought it was a very good movie, kept me guessing at times. I didn't have to guess about Rebecca DeMornay and her sex scenes. I thought everyone's acting was very good except the dork who got shot in the beginning and &quot;Rebecca&quot; kept flashing back to from time to time. Found out that he's Rebecca's real life husband and he must be the kind of guy who likes watching his wife in action with other men,or maybe he's her pimp,or maybe he's a momma's boy,whatever I can see his pride when he shows his kids what mom does to pay the bills. I think Ms.DeMornay is a great actress when she doesn't sell herself short, but when your somebody's &quot;sugar mommy&quot; a girl has to do what she has to do. Put your arm around him and tell him he's your hero and maybe he'll feel better
Jamaica. This is a good movie (7/10) included in the 1000 Best Movies on DVD by Peter Travers. It is an old movie, from 1973, shot in Jamaica with a very low budget, so what you see is "the raw real thing" (New Statesman). Jimmy Cliff gives an amazing performance of the song "The Harder They Come", and just for that the movie is worth watching. Then there is a story of drug dealers, this and that, but what I liked about the movie is the Jamaican flavor. The scenes at the church and the ones at the studio are, bu far, the best of the movie. There is also a dialogue between Jimmy Cliff and his girlfriend about being a dreamer that can't be missed! This 30th Anniversary Edition comes with a great documentary "Hard Road to Travel" where we are told about how hard this movie was to do, post production stories, etc. There is also a Dolby Digital 5.1 audio channel (and the mono original one, for the purists), and an interview with Perry Henzell, the pioneer of Jamaican cinema. There alse also very interesting trailers of other Xenon movies.If you like Reggae music, this is a must. Also recommended for any popular music fan, and to any independent cinema fan. You should get the Soundtrack as well, but if you do, go for the DeLuxe (2 CD's) edition! Again, 4 stars, 7/10
Quality and sound are superb. The quality of the picture and sound were excellent.  It was almost like being there or like seeing it for thefirst time.  I am in my third viewing I like it so well
Always an excellent choice. If you miss good cartoons, try this series. You won't be disappointed.The third season branches out to give Batman's sidekicks a little more screen time and, for the most part, this is an good thing. I wish Batgirl appeared in more episodes, as the commentary seems to imply. She only appears in one of the first episodes and then, again, in the last episode. The DVD is well put together. The commentary seems a little tired...one gets the feeling that they ran out of interesting things to say. The cartoon is super though. We'll definitely invest in season 4
Classic Romance. This is a classic romance story, along the same lines as Dr. Zhivago.  Basically, you have two people who are in love.  But circumstances and events that are larger than they are keep them apart.  Ash and Anjeuli love one another, and yet, the choices they make keep them apart.  Not only their choices, but also the customs and traditions of the times continually stand in the way of them being together.The romance is only given a short amount of screen time, however.  There is no shortage of action and adventure.  This is a period full of war and conflict after all.  The conflict between the British and the Emir of Afghanistan, as well as the political manipulations happening in the court of the Maharajah continually serve to spice up the plot.Ash, played by a young Ben Cross, is an officer in the British army.  And Anjeuli, played by a young Amy Irving, is an Indian princess.  Ash was assigned to accompany the Princesses Anjeuli and Sushila to Bhitor.  The Princesses are to marry the ruler of Bhitor, and Ash has been assigned to command the escort party.  Ash and Anjeuli fall in love during the journey.  Anjeuli chooses to go through with the marriage and stays with her husband.  Meanwhile, Ash has been assigned to Afghanistan to help the British establish their presence in that part of the world.Without spoiling the story for you any further, let me recommend this movie to you.  If you liked Dr. Zhivago, you will like this movie.  If you liked A Passage to India, you will love this movie.  I would also like to add that this is one of Amy Irving's best performance, in my opinion.  Ben Cross, Sir John Gielgud, and Omar Sharif make up the rest of the excellent cast
Run-of-the-mill film-noir production. Humphrey Bogart in a fairly routine film-noir murder mystery set on the Gulf Coast. Bogey's army buddy, about to receive the Congressional Medal of Honor, suddenly disappears and then turns up murdered. Bogey investigates and finds out the guy was involved in a murder and apparent underworld coverup, though Bogart is convinved he's innocent.Of course there's a doll in the middle of it all - Lizabeth Scott, who's acting is not much to rave about - and sure enough she's the real murderer who's allowed Bogey's buddy to take the rap. Bogart falls for her, of course, but at the end is ready to turn her in (honor over love any day), but she dies in a preposterous car crash before he gets the chance. The script is pretty weak and most of the actors seem to be just going through the motions, though Bogey is very good
Entertaining Southern Soap Opera. This is a very entertaining melodrama.  Paul Newman is incredibly handsome as a charismatic drifter and  Joanne Woodward is perfect as a repressed yet spunky schoolteacher.  Orson Welles plays Woodward's father in a manner that brings Boss Hogg to mind.  His fake Southern accent, though, is so tough to understand it is fortunate that this film is close captioned.  Lee Remick is lovely as a brainless Southern belle but Tony Francioso seems miscast as Welles's despised weakling son. Angela Lansbury is also at hand and does a passing Southern accent for a British gal.  The ending is not at all what I expected but I'm sure it pleased 1950's movie audiences.  An AMC channel "Back Story" is included with Newman, Lansbury and Woodward sharing their memories of making the film
Very enjoyable!. This brought back old memories from days when they used to have good Christmas specials on TV.  I enjoyed it very much - the quality is good and the old songs are great
Great romantic comedy. She's All That is a very funny movie.  It stars Freddie prince Jr. and Rachel Leigh Cook.  They are comic geniuses.  The story is about a guy who made a bet with his friends about making any girl that they want into homecoming queen. They give Rachel a hot makeover.  The plan was going smoothly until he found out that he is falling in love with her himself!  Find out how he makes her into the queen and have a relationship at the same time.  Overall- a great movie
Bleak, harrowing, depressing, tragic.... dignifying nonetheless. Andrzej Wajda's "Kanal" is a true cinematographic masterpiece both in substance and in form.In substance, for it tells the truth of the Warsaw Uprising of 1944 to the degree perhaps unmatched before and since. If the complexity of the event itself were not enough challenge, Andrzej Wajda tells this story in an unambiguous opposition to the official "truth" as maintained by the communist authorities then in power. And this is what impresses me most. For we must remember that Wajda created this film in 1956/1957 in Poland under the communist rule and Soviet domination. Although by then the worst of the Stalinist excesses were the matter of past and Poland - briefly - enjoyed considerable liberalization and ease of censorship, the essence of the political system with its Party control of all aspects of public life was still very much intact.And the official interpretation of the Warsaw Uprising was anything but positive. This was the subject best left in complete silence as non-event. Obviously, it could not have been erased from the collective memory; the ruins of Warsaw, the tens of thousands of dead (more than a quarter million Varsovians perished to be exact), and those who survived were all too conscious witnesses to the harrowing tragedy that occurred just twelve years prior. But to censure, criticize, condemn, to denounce, and to deplore - yes, they very much could do it. And they did. According to the official interpretation, thus, the Home Army was not the largest and bravest underground resistance movement of patriots fighting the Nazi occupiers. They were Nazi collaborators, they were anti-socialist fanatics and renegades hostile to the Red Army, Soviet Union and everything that was deemed progressive and just. The invectives and persecutions went on. The Home Army resistance fighters were "the enemies of the people".Andrzej Wajda portrays the soldiers of the Home Army as normal people, "just like us", who had their dreams, wanted to live their lives in peace, longed for love and fun... But they were also patriots, they were courageous and they fought for the right cause. They failed and Wajda also shows why. Not bluntly - that was impossible - he uses metaphors and symbols. But he leaves no doubt what was the Polish predicament. One of the final scenes is very telling: two of the soldiers, Caravel and Daisy, separated from the rest of the group, after long trek trough the sewers finally reach the end of the tunnel. They can see the river and the other bank where freedom (and the Red Army) awaits them... only to realize that the exit is barred. There is no freedom at the end. This episode is a metaphor for the whole Polish experience during World War II. After being "liberated" from the bloody German oppression, Poland has fallen to the Soviet domination."Kanal" is equally a masterpiece in form. Nothing is overplayed, the actors play in a very controlled, yet natural way, tempo of the film is consistent, photography very realistic, light contrasting exactly the way it must have been in reality, the music adequately illustrative.While praising the film for its mastery, I cannot say the same about the disc itself. Poor picture and sound transfer, as if the publisher was unaware of the technological achievements of the last decade and on top of that practically no additional features. This film virtually screams for the director's commentary and interviews with other, still alive, creators of the film. Without it much of the symbolism may be lost on the American viewer not necessarily well versed in the history of contemporary Poland. For these reasons, I think, the Criterion's box-set edition of all three War classics (also "Generation" and "Ashes and Diamonds") would be likely a better choice.
I love this film. Definitely one of the best from David DeCoteau.  From the beginning I knew I would enjoy this film.  Opening credits are nice with each actor featured with his name, nice.  All nice looking too. Story about a private boys school and voodoo.  Sexy, different kind of thriller.  Nice change of pace from the usual girls, women in distress film
10 STARS Worth!. Females arise and take heed to Shirley! I keep passing my tape around, I'm so glad its coming out on DVD
Excellent, Fun Feel good movie.. Terrific music too. This is a Excellent Movie with terrific music. Disney got Phil Collins to do the music for this one too. Tarzan and all his friends are little in this one and they are just adorable. The kids will love it. And I don't mind having it on a million time.... As my little ones love to watch it again and again..
Great. The DVD was delivered quickly, and in great condition. I have watched it several times, and it has worked perfect everytime
Best Movie Of 1980!. Hands down a comedy classic.  The star power in this movie is ridiculous.  They take over the movie in ther own fashion, and you not only forget the plot, the story, and the theme caddy you are supposed to follow.  Tha amazing part?  You don't even care!  You laugh, and quote the lines for days!  Caddyshack is one of the best movies to be put on DVD.  I wish there were more features!
Good, but some weak  points... This DVD in my opinion was pretty good in the sense that it portrays Che Guevara as the man who he really was but I found that certain key acts of his life that were being explained in this DVD lacked the proper explenations and just leaves you wondering or wanting to further investigate the truth...Que Paso Aqui
One of the First and still best television docu-dramas!. In the fall of 1974 I gathered with others at a friends house with the intention of going out for the evening. By chance, a commercial announced that "The Missiles of October", one of television's first attempts at a docu-drama (the other being The Andersonville Trial) was about to come on. We decided to wait 'a few minutes' to see some of it. Three hours later we were still in our chairs with our coats on. Silence pervaded the room as the drama unfurled and there was an overwhelming sense of "you are there" that kept us riveted to the story. Looking back now I realize that this was one of the greatest stage productions ever made on what then had been somewhat of a mystery to the average American, namely, what had actually transpired during the thirteen days of intense struggle of October of 1962, when the world was on the edge of nuclear Armageddon. This work is very intellectual, superbly written and gripping in dramatic scenes. It is important to remember that this was shown during an era of STRONG anti-military feeling. The country was winding down from Vietnam and to see a positive resolvency of a possible global catastrophe by politicians concerning an incident in '62 from when we were only children reminded us of what America CAN accomplish when sane men seek safe ways out of conflict. There is a LOT of good acting. The scenes are cleverly done, shifting between Washington and Moscow with tid-bits of B&W 'events in the world' film thrown in. We get to see "inside" the exec committees of both the White House and Kremlin and how they plot strategy. Attempts to duplicate the success of this stage drama failed miserably. "Pueblo" in 1976 did not capture the tension and mystique and television has simply never been able to repeat what I now believe was a dramatic miracle of production on screen. WELL RECOMMENDED.
May not be perfect, but my [...] is finally learning to talk. I agree with most of the other reviewers regarding MOM OF MANY MUNCHKINS review. She was way too critical! For hating the dvd so much, she has it memorized. She is correct about the "uh" sound, but my son has started talking so much since we got this dvd from our local library. He has even started saying complete sentances! Brainy Baby may not be perfect, but they are obviously doing something right. He also watches it from beginning to end without getting bored, and even giggles when the babies giggle. It is very cute! I think they did a great job. We have to remember that this video was made for babies and toddlers, not grown up adults
Great Sequel. Nicholson is as cool as ever in this sequel to Chinatown. Great film noir style
Nuts (1987). Barbra Streisand has been one of the most talented female singers in this world, with releasing a slew of successful albums. It wasn't until 1968, when Barbra decided to get her hands on acting career to back up her singing career, when she starred in the film adapted version of the Broadway classic, "Funny Girl", where she played the lead role of Fanny Brice. After Funny Girl, Barbra took the lead role of many other films, such as "The Way We Were", "Funny Lady", "Yentl", "The Main Event", "On A Clear Day You Can See Forever", "Hello Dolly", and many others. But in 1987, Barbra landed herself the lead role no one will ever forget. That role, ladies and gentlemen, was Claudia Draper for the film, "Nuts".Claudia Draper (played by Barbra Streisand) is an expensive hooker, who is arrested for the murder of one of her clients (played by Leslie Nielson). What the courts and police don't know is that what Claudia has done was not first-degree manslaughter; it was clearly self-defense. Claudia and her date have already had sex with each other, but her date wanted a bit more. After refusing, he became rather aggressive, attacking Claudia. Strangling her, Claudia picks up a piece of glass and kills her date, in self-defense. Her mother, Rose Kirk (played by Maureen Stapleton), and her stepfather, Arthur Kirk (played by Karl Malden), along with two psychiatrists, as well as the police have considered her to be incompetent, especially for attending the trial, forcing her to stay in an institution. Defending Claudia is Aaron Levinsky (played by the brilliant and outstanding Richard Dreyfuss). During the preliminary hearing, Claudia's stepfather has revealed a devastating secret to his wife, as well as, the court. His deepest secret is the perfect explanation to why Claudia has terrible temper, as to also why her childhood was so terrible.I have seen a pretty good share of Barbra's films, but as far as I'm concerned, her role as Claudia Draper is her highest and most brilliant. Whether you enjoy her music more, or her acting more, you cannot deny that this film is her absolute best. If you have not seen this film, then I suggest to you strongly that you see this film and watch Barbra Streisand in her most serious and touching role ever
Samurai Champloo & Kung Faux are good to go!. Homo-sez-wut? - ( Not this )...I will buy every dvd that ever comes out from Samurai Champloo or Kung Faux because these TV shows kick u-no-wut?  -Butt! - That's right. - I said it. - homoz
"Rich and Creamy... Just how I like it!". Before LOTR and King Kong, Peter Jackson was making big independent splatter films such as "Bad Taste" and "Meet The Feebles". "Dead Alive" (or in New Zealand "Braindead") is one of them, and it's a classic.STORY: Lionel meets the lovely Paquita one day. Lionel gets to know her and they go on a date to the zoo. While they're at the zoo, Lionel's overprotective mother spies on them, and before you know it, she gets bitten by a rat monkey! She grows worse evrey day, starts to collapse, and turns into a zombie. she bites people, and they turn into zombies too! Then, Lionel's fat and obnoxious cousin books a party at Lionel's house. Before you know it, all the guests become Dead-Alive. Now, It's up to Lionel to stop this from happening to New Zealand!THOUGHTS: GO-RY! An excellent film. Funny too! My favorite part was when Lionel walks the baby in the park.OVERALL: Buy this if you love gore
BA D BOYS. A TRUE MOVIE OF PRISON LIFE!!!!!NOTHING FAKE ABOUT SURVIVAL BEHIND THE WALLS OF INCARCMENT...UNLIKE MANY PRISON MOVIES THIS ONE TELLS ALL AND SHOWS ALL...GREAT MOVIE TO SHOW YOUNG ADULTS THAT TAKE SOCIETY FOR GRANTED AS WELL AS THIER FREEDOM
Classic Movie, Recieved in a Timely Fashion. It was exactly what I wanted, and it arrived quickly
Cute. It's not spectacular and there are better Disney movies that deal with the same issues yet resulting in some more laughs BUT this film is not to be disgarded.  With a spectacular breakthrough performance by Anne Hathaway as Mia, a young socially retarded young girl who find out she is actually the heir to the throne of Genosha she of course freaks...I mean, she's already weird enough, now add a tiera.  Her grandmother, the spectacular Julie Andrews, is trying to make her presentable enough for the Genoshian ball where she will announce Mia as the new Princess.  But will she make it that far?  With her newfound popularity Mia is faced with problems she never had before.  She used to be invisable...now she has jealous rivals at her school and kocks now striving to get a taste of her...you know, because she's famous.  She's now being used and thats not something she likes.  This film, while not wonderful, surely has it's moments and while they may be spaced apart, they are still wonderful moments
One word:  Amazing. I was beyond stoked when I found that Broken Saints had come to DVD.  One can go on and on about the amount of work that has obviously gone into it, but more importantly is the overall message, which I wouldn't dare ruin or try to sully with my limited vocabulary.Something like this can have a major effect on you, and I recommend it highly
The good guy wins!. Holiday Inn was a good movie because Fred Astaire doesn't get the girl!  Bing Crosby excells at being a "nice guy" and almost loses the girl.  I liked the dancing and singing in this movie with really neat clothes from the 40's.  I would recommend this movie to other kids
Foul Play  -  still loads of fun. The film Foul Play with Goldie Hawn and Chevy Chase from the 70s are still loads of fun , and still  grips you right from the beginning untill the hilarious end. Goldie Hawn with her huge innocent eyes sparkles and the late Rachel Roberts creates a sinister character , Dudley Moore as the sex starved conductor , Stanley is outstanding. The car chase through San Francisco is hair raising . A definitive must hav
The Ultimate Scarface "FINALLY". This movie is excellent. Based on the subject matter(which is of a violent nature) it's certainly not for everyone, but I certainly believe it to be one of Al Pacinos finest performances and it is a classic as far as crime movies are concerned. I have waited a long time to purchase this DVD because I knew it would eventually be given the "royal" treatment, and I am happy to say that I was not dissappointed. The video transfer is very good and the audio upgrade is excellent. The DVD also has many extra features, although the counting of the F word feature was not necessary and actually detracts from the classic quality of this DVD. Otherwise I am very happy indeed.
I liked it almost as much as the First and third. 4 1/2 star. This was another good movie. I rented it with part one. There is no Porky in this movie. Ill keep it short. Pee Wee is in his moms play with his friends and the Reverend wants to shut down Shakespeare. Later on they even give a hard time to the local KKK chapter and catch that the reverend is as much a perv.Acting-10 out of 10Direction-8 out of 10Story-9 out of 10Entertainment-10 out of 10Writing-8 out of 1
Can't watch it enough!. I don't know why, but I love this movie. It's very very entertaining, which is the reason I watch movies. Lots of suspense, love the special effects when the bomb goes off, and I'm a die hard Morgan Freeman fan anyway.
Perfection. This DVD is obviously homoerotic, tasteful, artistic, and reveals the comfort level these men have regarding their sexuality and nudity.  This comes recommended for anyone who is interested in the perfection of the male form
Oedipus. I first watched this movie in a class. A professor showed this movie and talked about Oedipus complex. I am not sure about this concept in it but sure enough this is an excellent movie
Patrk71. We enjoy listiening and watching this DVD on our HDTV. We play this when have friends over with the volume low and find them humming or singing along
Get ready to bust a gut... What more can a fan boy do when you include David Bowie and Iggy Pop into an already amazing series.  If it wasn't for Hank and Dean I wouldn't know what to do.  Johnny Quest or the Hardy Boy's have nothing on this devastating duo of wit and finesse
Amazing Hula epic. I don't need to tell more about the story from Pelehonuamea, Hi'iakaikapoliopele and Lohi'au. If you want an imagination what traditional (Kahiko) Hula can be, dive an hour in this film. The scenes are great and its made with lots of knowledge and respect for the hawaiian culture. It is supplemented by an interview with Pualani Kanaka'ole Kanahele, the Kumu Hula (Hula master). Highly recommanded to everyone who is interested in dancing, foreign cultures and Hawaiiana. The complete texts of all chants are found in the book "Holo Mai Pele". A great Mahalo to the film makers
Dark Thriller and Character Study from New German Cinema. "The American Friend" was the first cinematic adaptation of Patricia Highsmith's novel "Ripley's Game", the third book in her Ripley series, written for the screen and directed by Wim Wenders. The film can be viewed simply as neo-noir or as an allegory of the American economic conquest of Europe, which was held in distaste by many authors of New German Cinema. It imparts an unmistakable sense of time -the 1970s- and of its artistic philosophy, but Wenders blurs the distinctions between Hamburg, Paris, and New York by focusing on their industrialism. "The American Friend" may be more interesting as political cinema than as a thriller, but it is also more dated. Wenders wittily cast seven directors to play his villains, starting with Dennis Hopper as sociopath Tom Ripley.Tom Ripley (Dennis Hopper) is an American dealer in counterfeit artwork living in Hamburg, West Germany. His fateful introduction to art restorer Jonathan Zimmerman (Bruno Ganz) at an auction for a forged painting sets a bizarre series of events in motion. Raoul Minot (Gerard Blain), an associate of Ripley's, asks Ripley to settle an old debt by killing a man for him. Ripley is reluctant to do the job himself, so he suggests Zimmerman, who is suffering from a serious blood disease. Minot promises Jonathan 250,000 deutschmarks to kill a man in the Paris subway, insisting that Jonathan has little time to live anyway, and this would allow him to leave his family well cared-for. Jonathan is shocked by the proposition but somehow seduced by it into a violent and chaotic world."Ripley's Game" retained its name in a second movie adaptation in 2002 that aspired only to be a psychological thriller. "The American Friend" is more successful than "Ripley's Game", but the two films have completely different narrative focus. "The American Friend" tends toward character study. It's about Jonathan, portrayed by the superb and meticulous Bruno Ganz as a regular guy whose introversion conceals a morbid angst. Why does Jonathan want to believe that he is dying? Why does he trust a murderous stranger with obvious ulterior motives? Why does he willingly plunge his life into chaos and terror? Those are the questions at the heart of "The American Friend". The later film "Ripley's Game" marginalized the wiling victim in favor of the more forceful and colorful characters of Tom Ripley and his nefarious acquaintance.In "Ripley's Game", Tom Ripley is an outright sophisticate, played seductively by John Malkovich. Tom Ripley of "The American Friend" vacillates strangely and inexplicably between sophisticate and coarse, ugly American. Where "Ripley's Game" has sharp, articulate dialogue, "The American Friend" has improvisation and eccentric behavior. Though some of his antics are undoubtedly intended as metaphor, Ripley's character is incoherent, making him the weak link in this film. But "The American Friend" is much stronger film noir than "Ripley's Game", in spite of its freestyle dialogue, because Jonathan Zimmerman is a true noir protagonist, and his plight is this film's focus. In English and German with English subtitles.The DVD (Anchor Bay 2003): There are 36 minutes of deleted scenes with optional commentary by Wim Wenders, a theatrical trailer (3 min), and text bios with selective filmographies for Wim Wenders, Bruno Ganz, and Dennis Hopper. There is a feature commentary by writer/director Wim Wenders and actor Dennis Hopper. Wenders talks about actors, lighting, the cinematography of Robby Muller, locations, some technical details, and the film's reception. Hopper comments on Wender's directing style, and both men recall the spontaneity of the performances and rewrites. They do not discuss characters, story, or themes. I had trouble accessing the audio commentary. After selecting the commentary, I could only get it to play with the film by going to the scene selection menu and starting at scene 2. I may have a defective disc, but if you have trouble, try using the scene selection menu.
Great French Flick. There are two kinds of french films, poignent ones and wacky ones. This one is the former. It's sweet, with goodn dialogue and excellent acting by Berry. The interesting music also adds to the movie
Terrific Commentary - a keeper. This is a terrific movie with a terrific director's commentary on DVD.  Excellent cast, including John Houseman's first acting gig.I'm not sure how much of the movie works without the commentary - the film takes place in the "near future" a few years after it was made in 1963 - Frankenheimer's commentary makes it clear what props (like the videoconferencing) would have seemed futuristic at the time.The film is fascinating on many levels.  For example, I can imagine why Richard Nixon would think that recording all Oval Office conversations would be a good idea, if he had seen this film (which I imagine he had).Many similarities in direction and photography to The (original) Manchurian Candidate, which is also an excellent DVD
OUTLANDER,this is slashing horror. When I saw this movie I was blown away.It was sad that ALL the adults died,but the weirdest thing is that the signs to gatlin are every where they confuse a couple that are lost on a trip across the country when they stumble onto these children that hail to a demon in the corn when the kids get to old they are sorry,can't tellyou have to see the movie.
Great for beginners/ out of shape people like me!. This is a great into. to exercise if you're out of shape.  If you're in shape go for the System 17!  This one is great for those of us who haven't been doing what we should have to keep ourselves fit.  A great starting place and something to build on so you don't get discouraged and quit.  I could do these right away without having my kids laugh at me (or show me they could do it and I couldn't:))
Better than I remembered. I've been recently purchasing a number of the shows I enjoyed when I was younger. Some of them are not as enjoyable as I remembered them. This however, is more so. I don't think I truly appreciated how funny Schultz was in my younger years. He really shines in nearly every episode. The entire cast does a great job.Ironically, many of the cast members spent time in concentration camps or lost family in concentration camps during World War II. (Schultz, Klink, LeBeau)
Looks amazing in high-def!. I love this movie, and watching it on Blu-ray on my new Sony 1080p TV was phenomenal! The scene with the needles made me cringe, had to look away for a minute.  Anyways, glad I chose Blu-ray over HD-DVD, since this title isn't available on the lame HD-DVD format
Great Movie, but they do not mention this is a sequel. I am lucky I saw the first movie in this series or it would not have been as funny or interesting.  The first movie is meet the parents.  It helps make things more understandable and fun.  Very funny experience of an ultra conservative family and an ultra libral crazy and wild family meeting.  Everything that could go wrong did.  The fockers are more than libral they are very wild in all ways possible
A love story that doesn't get old. I just want to start by saying that I LOVE this movie!It's the story of a regular bloke (Hugh Grant) who meets a movie star (Julia Roberts) in his travel book shop in beautiful Notting Hill, and then bumps into her again on a street corner minutes later, covering her in orange juice. Thus begins the romance between the two.It has all the elements of a great love story.  The setting is perfectly chosen, Notting Hill is beautiful and seems like a little corner of heaven.I'm a huge fan of Julia Roberts, and she shines in this movie.  Hugh Grant is also great, and the two fit together, I completely believed they'd work as a couple.  And the rest of the cast is just as perfect.Everything fits together, including the music, which makes the movie even more enjoyable and gives it a whole new level emotion-wise.And yet as predictable as the ending is, it doesn't bring down the movie at all.  The script doesn't border corny-ness, and it has a good pace, so it doesn't run slow at all.It's a true gem, and I enjoyed every minute of it.  If you're into romantic movies, than this one is a must-have.  You'll want to watch it over and over again... I know I have and haven't gotten tired of watching it
Mark Twain lives in Hal Holbrook. In 1967 when Hal Holbrook portrayed Mark Twain in the CBS TV special, "Mark Twain Tonight" I thought Samuel Clemens' death had again been mistaken. Holbrook's impersonation of Twain was so real I couldn't help but think he was still amongst us. Naturally when I discovered the telecast was captured on DVD I knew I just had to see it again. And guess what? Mark Twain hasn't aged a day over 70. He still looks and sounds just as good as he did then.Holbrook segues one passage after another from Twain's writings ("Roughing It", "Huckleberry Finn", "The Golden Arm" and others) as though telling us the story of his life.Of course, if you want to play specific sections from the show, the DVD is indexed for your personal preference. Whether you listen to Holbrook's 90-minute monologue uninterrupted or exerts from the show, you'll easily be charmed by Twain's humour and wit until you almost swear it is Twain himself on stage
Great Ab If your just getting started. All firm videos are great.. This Ab sculpt is no different. IF you have been working out for a while it may seem easy plus there are other ab workouts from the firm that you can go with for more of a challenge I am a Firm believer.
EXCELENTE. Una maravilla para disfrutar con amigos en una reunion y recordar momentos especiales, gran imagen y excelente calidad de sonido, el concierto es muy reciente
A classic film about fear. "The Tingler" (1959 - 82 minutes - B&W), is a classic of horror andscience fiction produced and directed by the remarkable master WilliamCastle, who was known for setting tricks in the cinema rooms in fiftiesand sixties in order to interact the audience with the film. (In "TheTigler", Castle placed an equipment, the "Percepto", inside the cinemaarmchairs so that, when the audience shouts during the movie, they felta shock).In this masterpiece, Vincent Price is Dr. Warren Chapin, an obstinatedoctor of legal medicine who discovers that fear causes the "tinglereffect" with the growth of a parasitic creature near the vertebralcolumn. Chapin could isolate and remove the creature of a deaf and dumbwoman (the actress Judith Evelyn) but the "thing" escapes and runs awayto a full cinema. A way to defeat the creature is to shout loud.According to John Waters, of the "Film Comment", the film shows thefirst citation of LSD of the cinema. The writer Robb White had heardabout the lisergic acid from Aldous Huxley, he went to the UCLA to trythe drug in himself (before it became illegal) and then he introducedthe drug in the story
Stunning Remaster of Beautiful Films. I just received this box set and popped three of the titles in to see how they looked. I was astounded at the beautiful color and crystal clear picture, especially since the last time I saw Romance on the High Seas (on TCM last November) the color was faded and the image was dull. It's clear that a lot of hard work went in to the remastering of "Romance", "My Dream is Yours" and "Lucky Me", especially considering that "Lucky" is an early Cinemascope title, which usually means grainy images, but not here. I haven't looked at the other titles in the set yet, but I imagine that they are just as beautiful. I also love the cartoons and shorts, all released in the same year as the main feature. It's a "Night at the Movies" like Warner Home Video used to do in the '80's. The only thing I'd like to see in future releases is trailers for other films of the same period.Kudos to George Feltenstein and the gang at Warner Home Video for a superb release
Voodoo Academy. Voodoo Academy is a fun movie. It dosent take itself serioussly and its very funny. A boy named Christopher Sawyer enrolls in a bible college and the head mistress accepts him and he soon meets his roomates and the reverend and strange things start to happen. At night the boys start having ( nightmares) which look more like they are having wet dreams and they go off to the head mistres's room/Christopher cant figure out whats going on at first but he has his suspicions and soon figures out what is going on-the head mistress is trying to turn them into voodoo dolls to chanel satan. This movie is hilarious and gay men and women/maybe even straight men will like this. The boys are gorgeous and 2 of them have been in previous or more recent films lately. The reverend and the boy in the cofession booth  is a really good scene and the nightmare scenes. I especially liked the sarcastic blond kid, he was really funny. I recomend this film for a laugh or anyone who likes boys in boxer briefs or anyone who just likes a funny movie
radio fictions. You can pick this video up, new, for about two bucks. Its like getting a novel for a dime and thats fitting since this is a film set during a time when novels were a dime (and cokes a nickle). This film will make you feel like you are in another time and in another place. I suppose that price tag is proof that this film doesn't get much respect but that lack of respect, that underdog independence that marks so many of Altman's films, is just part of their appeal. I can see why this film is kind of a lost classic, because THIEVES LIKE US takes place in a time and place that you don't want to be in. In the rural Mississippi of the 1930's people don't have many options, everyone's just scraping by. The only glimpse of glamour in this world is provided by the radio. The radio is simultaneously the thing that describes the world and also transforms the world it describes by making everything ordinary seem sensational and larger-than-life. It almost seems that since nothing ever happens in this backwards Mississippi world crime like radio is just a way of relieving the tedium.  Many of the radio programs involve dynamic capers and crime stoppers and when the three thieves read about themselves in the newspapers its almost like they have transcended their mundane surroundings and have become part of that glamourous radio world. Of course we can see that they haven't. And of course the Shadow knows it too.The three thieves are just ordinary guys (no Clyde Barrow among them). In fact they are each almost painfully plain and they all seem to know it and this is part of their rebellion against not just authority but against life itself. Bowie (played by Altman staple Keith Carradine)is the only one of the three who has any imagination; but his imagination is awash in youth and vague dreams of romance and of playing pro baseball. He was convicted of killing a man when only in his teens but its like nothing ever seems to bring this dreamy kid with his head in the clouds to earth. After he escapes from prison he gets separated from the other two and spends the night beneath a bridge cuddled up with a dog. Its his boyish ordinariness and innocence (despite what hes done) that gains and keeps our attention. When he meets Keechy he seems oblivious to the fact that she is the very embodiment of depression era squalor, all he sees is romance. And its to the sound of radio programs that these two consummate their union. With the equally hopeless and equally dreamy Keechy its like he's finally encountered someone who allows him, even encourages him, to dream. But we know there is too great a distance between the dream and the reality and that the two will eventually prove to be incommensurate.This is a movie about a younger America (c. 1930's) but its an America that feels old before its time. Its a depression era crime story that takes place around drug stores and gas stations and musty hotel rooms. Its about an America without hope. The radio programming is a constant reminder of the contrast between "America" the self-aggrandizing propaganda machine and "America" the fallen, corrupted, and squalid realm of broken dreams.  The whole film--from prison escape to final showdown with the law-- feels muddy. The divide between what we hear on the radio and what we see with our eyes puts a constant strain on us. We know that the thieves must perceive it as well and this is why we end up rooting for them; we want something in reality to equal the fiction.THIEVES LIKE US provides a strange contrast with THE LONG GOODBYE which is about another 1930's archetype (detective Phillip Marlowe) adrift in an always sunny 1970's California. I think the 1930's attract Altman because they mark the end of that organic America, the America that existed before the crass commercialization of the American soul was complete. Altman characters (Keith Carradine in Thieves Like Us and Nashville, Elliot Gould in Long Goodbye) are anachronisms; they each are possessed by a kind of nostalgia for a simpler time, and, for a while anyway, they seem to be capable of living in a cocoon world of their own making, but whether they realize it or not they are caught up in the same web of corruption that snares everyone.Between THIEVES LIKE US and THE LONG GOODBYE I would say I prefer the latter but these two films should be viewed together. The one seems to lead to the other and both lead to NASHVILLE.
AWESOME. GREAT LAST SEASON OF ANGEL!!! WE SEE SOME CHARACTERS GO AND NEW CHARACTERS APPEAR!!!! GREAT FIGHTING SCENES!! GREAT EPISODES!!!THE FIGHT CONTINUES...... SHOULD BE A SEASON 6!!!!!!
Fun for those crazy kids. Wow. When this first came out, I thought it was the funniest thing since the Marx Brothers. I saw it again a few weeks ago, and I'm puzzled: it just wasn't the same. Maybe seeing it once was enough, maybe times have changed, and of course there's the possibility that I got older over the years. It's anybody's guess. For me, the jokes were nonstop, but I'd already heard them all. Anyhoo, it is a must-see film.
love this movie!. I love this movie!  The classic romance, the modern-day dilemmas, great quotes like "It's the dead guy!!" And, of course, all the flying scenes!  Mel Gibson, Jamie Lee Curtis and Elijah Wood are favorites of our family and did not disappoint in this wonderful film
Walk away the pounds for abs. I enjoyed the pace of the exercise and never felt bored with the exercise after doing it for a week
So Tempting The Demon. Ugetsu was not as haunting as I had expected. This film is similar to the Japanese cultural time when civil war was abound and a general feel of unrest was in the country.  Demons were believed to live among the people.Two men aspire to become rich by hard work and provide for their families.  Many can imagine the troubles they encounter while they try to attain their goals.  However, one man is not so interested in the business and the other is tempted and becomes lost for some time.Without giving away the story, Ugetsu is about appriciating what you have daily, while you have it, before it's gone.  In the end, you can't always get it back.I'm not sure what is more stricking about the ending in this film... The ghosts, reality, or the levels at which someone will try to attain something only to discover what they had is gone.Definately worth watching but, not suggested for those looking for bloodsoaked J-Horror.Unfortunately the word haunting which is used repeatedly when referencing this film doesn't seem appropriate.  Haunting applies to atmosphere. It falls short of haunting.  The film is interesting and it has Japanese atmposhere but lacked the hauting  I feel others refer. I feel It plays like a B&W film from the dated era it was from and does so with Class unlike any other film
Sam Elliot at his usual. My interest in Tihlman arises from his connection with Louis L'Amour.  He is supposed to have taught the young Louis and his elder brother how to use a six gun.I was disappointed that the film only focussed on the last six to twelve months of Tihlmans life.  That said the story and production are such that this is a DVD worthy of getting
La bellisima Signora Wardh. A number of years ago, I joined with some film buff co-workers to put together a list of the most beautiful women to have ever graced the cinema screen.  While I no longer have the list, I can still remember some of those names - Sophia Loren, Gene Tierney, Julie Christie, Merle Oberon, Vivien Leigh, Lana Turner and so on.  However, I have since realized that there is one name woefully absent that I didn't know of back then and had never even heard of until a few short weeks ago.  The name?  Edwige Fenech - and it was to see her that I chose to watch "The Strange Vice of Mrs. Wardh."Besides being new to Ms. Fenech, I was also new to the genre of giallo.  I've enjoyed B-movies in the past - particularly the Hammer films from Britain - but I was unfamiliar with such Italian films, and I think "Mrs. Wardh" was a great introduction.  A serial killer is going around slashing beautiful young women to death in Vienna, where Julie Wardh and her absentee husband have just arrived to live.  Before long she's involved with her friend's cousin Goerge, and then the killer's after her. Is she a random victim or is the killer a former lover who's been threatening her?Director Sergio Martino does a great job bringing together all of these elements into a suspenseful package, beautifully filming it on location in Vienna and in Spain.  (One of the major scenes was filmed on the grounds of Schoenbrunn Palace.)  Ernesto Gastaldi provided a script with some nice twists and turns, and Nora Orlandi's beautiful score with a wordless chorus is among the most beautiful and haunting that I've ever heard.As for Edwige Fenech - well, what can I say that hasn't already been said?  This woman is a knockout (and cute, too!).  Not only should she be on that list I wrote about, but she should be toward the top of it!  I am definitely looking forward to seeing more of her work. It's a shame that she never rose out of doing genre films so more of the world could get to know her.  (On the other hand, if she did she'd probably have done fewer genre films with their "revealing" tendencies...LOL)  I think she did a good job here, as did the rest of the cast, notably George Hilton as her new lover and Ivan Rassimov being especially creepy as the old one, Jean.The image is presented in a widescreen 2.35:1 ratio, enhanced for widescreen sets, and the picture looks great.  Who'd have imagined that a foreign genre film from the 1970s could look this good?  Italian and English soundtracks are provided - I chose the Italian to get the proper feel of the film, though a few times I had to go back as the subtitles went by too fast. (The other drawback was that I spent a lot of time reading the subtitles instead of looking at Edwige's face, so I think I'll have to watch it again in English!)No Shame Films has also included a quite interesting documentary about the films, featuring Sergio Martino (director), Luciano Martino (producer), Ernesto Gastaldi (writer) plus George Hilton and Edwige Fenech.  As some other writers have noted, Edwige still looks great and seems to enjoy talking about the old days.  My other favorite here is Gastaldi, who is just having a ball during his interview.  You look at these people now and they are all middle aged, but as Edwige notes, they were all basically kids when they made these films.  There's also a clip of director Martino at the Venice Film Festival, the film's original trailer and a gallery of posters and stills.  As with No Shame releases, an informative 8-page booklet is included.In short,  "The Strange Vice of Mrs. Wardh" is a solid thriller and (as far as I can tell) a very good introduction to the films of Edwige Fenech and Sergio Martino, as well as for gialli in general.  I hope No Shame Films will continue to release them - I'm glad that they'll be releasing a couple of Edwige's Italian sex comedies next week.  And please - how about somebody out there making good DVD releases of some of those German films Edwige made before moving to Italy??
An all-around well-done movie!. This review is for the Warner Brothers DVD released in 2005.The setting is during the Depression in New Orleans, mostly in the French Quarter.   Eric Stoner also known as "The Cincinnati Kid" (Steve McQueen) is a very formidable stud poker player.  He has a girlfriend named Christian (Tuesday Weld) and a longtime buddy named Shooter (Karl Malden).  Shooter has a very attractive girlfriend named Melba Nile (Ann-Margaret).  The movie is setup for a big showdown with poker legend Lancy Howard (Edward G. Robinson), who comes to New Orleans to play the "The Kid".  Stoner's relationships with Christian, Shooter and Melba add a dynamic to the film that makes it more than just a "pure" poker movie.There's a lot to like about this film.  The color cinematography is superb and the props and setting for the French Quarter are a feast for the eyes (one major gaff however was a shot of a diesel train engine).  In a fantastic opening scene, we see a Dixieland band playing a funeral march and then quickly changing the music to an upbeat jazz song with plenty of street dancing. The movie itself was masterfully crafted and the characters were unique and original.  There are quite a few strong performances including great acting by Edward G. Robinson, Karl Malden and Rip Torn.  I think the thing the made this movie work is that it was not about winning or losing for the sake of money.  The central issues were winning for prestige and notoriety and making someone lose to destroy their ego.  The ending is gutsy and I'll just leave it at that.  My only critical comment of the film is that the onscreen relationship between McQueen and Weld lacked chemistry.   But overall it's an extremely entertaining movie.As for the DVD, it's a beautiful and flawless widescreen color presentation.  The audio is excellent.  There are a few worthwhile bonuses including commentary by director Norman Jewison and scene-specific analysis by poker commentators Phil Gordon and Dave Foley.Movie: A-DVD Quality:
A remarkably believable and touching film!. Terms of Endearment captivates me with the believable relationship of mother and daughter as brilliantly portrayed byShirley MacLaine and Debra Winger.  It covers approximately 30 years of the turbulent yet loving relationship between mom Aurora and daughter Emma.  They have their differences; yet the love between them is always so obvious.  It's also refreshing how they seem to be able to talk about anything with each other, even their sex lives.I've seen this movie several times, and everytime I cry at the end.  In spite of the death, the movie ends on a positive note, giving us the feeling that life is going on and everything is going to be okay.The budding relationship between Aurora and her neighbor (also brilliantly portrayed by Jack Nicholson) creates a plot-within-a-plot that is very entertaining and provides some comic relief from the sadness of the relationship between Emma and her husband and children.The most interesting aspect is that Emma gets so bent out of shape when she finds out that her husband has been cheating on her, when she has been cheating on him as well.  Somehow though we sympathize with Emma and her gentle lover (played by the very talented John Lithgow).  We feel like they belong together and somehow their relationship doesn't seem wrong.If you are in the mood for a movie that is entertaining and gut-wrenching at the same time, this is a perfect choice
Several great performances elevate this film over minor problems with the plot. This review is for the 2004 Warner Brothers DVD.The movie 'Stage Fright' opens with Jonathan Cooper (Richard Todd) and Eve Gill (Jane Wyman) fleeing London in a car.  As they are driving off eluding the police, Jonathon tells Eve of the mess that he's in.  His story in a nutshell is that a famous actress named Charlotte Inwood (Marlene Dietrich) killed her husband in their home and splattered blood on her dress and came to Jonathon's apartment for help.  Jonathon explains that he ended up going back to the murder scene to get Charlotte a clean dress but was seen, thus making him the primary suspect.  From this point on Eve does a number of things to protect and exonerate him including working as an operative so that she can find evidence to convict Charlotte of the murder.The film uses some shameless chicanery to misdirect the audience.  To avoid spoiling the plot, my problem wasn't so much that a subterfuge was used, but that it carried on this charade for just about the entire movie (until the final few minutes of the film).  But that wasn't the biggest flaw for me.  My bigger problem with the film is that its obvious that Jonathan is grossly infatuated or in love with Charlotte, and this becomes crystal clear to Eve, yet she still does everything possible to help him get out of this mess.  Another significant problem is that Eve, who lives in London and has British parents speaks with an American accent except when she's a spy.But in spite of these problems, Marlene Dietrich gives a mesmerizing performance that's truly Oscar-worthy.  Even beyond her radiant beauty, she exudes confidence and poise in every scene she's in.  Alastair Sim, who plays Eve's father in a supporting role, gives a very witty and extremely entertaining  performance.  If you get past the American accent, Jane Wyman does a decent job too.  The movie is still very entertaining and fun to watch - again mainly due to Marlene Dietrich.The B&W picture quality of this DVD is sharp but the presentation is marred by specs of film deterioration throughout the film.  Sadly, a severe vertical scratch appearing for at least 6 or 7 seconds severely distracts the final scene of the movie. The sound was good for a film this old. The only worthwhile bonus on the DVD is a short commentary about the film `Stage Fright'.Movie: B+DVD Quality:
Interesting Character Study. I admit to liking films which develop interesting characters, which are both believable and make for a worthwhile story."You Can Count On Me" fit the bill. I am becoming a Mark Ruffalo fan. To me, it was he who stole the show in this film, even though others in the film were very good, and they, too, are to be commended.
One of my favorite shows. The second season of Law & Order: SVU differs from the first as not as much time is spent on the detective's families.  Ice-T and Stephanie March debut in the first episode of the season as Det. Fin Tutuola and ADA Alex Cabot, respectively.  Michelle Hurd leaves the show shortly into the season as her character quits after being relegated to desk duty since being accused of having sex with a suspect.  The show really hit its stride in this season.  Seemingly everyone is involved with every episode, as opposed to today where Fin and Richard Belzer's Det. Munch do very little.  Late in the season, B.D. Wong debuts as psychiatrist Dr. Huang.  His character is a bit darker (for lack of a better word) in earlier episodes.  Overall, this is a great season for the show and I highly recommend this set
Grippingly Thought Provoking. Nick presents as honest a look at Lee, the person, as we'll ever see in media. He treats her with genuine concern, and she reponds with warmth and respect. However, the instant he touches on a subject offensive to her (especially her mother) rage  flares.The term "serial killer" usually means someone who stalks an intended victim and premeditates killing. Lee appears too volatile to premeditate ANYTHING. She seems controlled by her immediate emotions, which fluctuate moment to moment. This leads one to believe she shot when she felt threatened, then took the money, and felt all kinds of reactions afterward. That she was mentally unstable is no surprise, considering the vile abuses she endured, beginning in childhood.Since she got no proper care or medical attention back then, when desperately needed, she should have finally had a chance for it in a mental hospital instead of death row. Her wanting to be executed showed even more mental harm got done in prison.She had no "dream team" defending her, and was put to death. It seems a wrong sentence, and doesn't bring back the men who picked her up for their own reasons
Original Poetic. This is not a film for everyone! I would call it director's film. Original, complex, mind challanging and cinematographically beautiful
Cool Stuff!. Bit the bullet and went ahead and got this. I'd already seen Advent Children but didn't own it. I'm glad I got this because it's got great extra features such as interviews and Last Order. I really like the extra features but I don't think I'd get this if I already owned Advent Children DVD but if you don't got the original and you still want the DVD like I did, Get This. Cool Stuff
Classic performance, surprisingly good audio. The Jazz Icons series does a great service by preserving for us an important part of American musical heritage. I've been a Basie fan for a long time, and had the opportunity to see the band perform a couple of times with the Count at the helm, so I may be biased, but I think the Basie DVD is the best one of the series that I've seen so far. It features some of the Count's legendary sidemen. To name just a few: Frank Wess and Frank Foster in the sax section, Thad Jones and Snooky Young on trumpet, Sonny Payne on drums, and of course, Freddie Green on guitar.Sonny Payne is on top of his game and is a delight to watch throughout the performance. Eric Dixon displays his big, warm tenor sax sound on a gorgeous interpretation of "You Are Too Beautiful." Other tunes feature impressive solo work from Wess, Foster, and Sonny Cohn on trumpet.Any downside to this performance will be determined by personal taste. For example, the surprisingly up-tempo rendition of "Old Man River" is great, but Payne's drum solo is long and may try the patience of some listeners. Also, vocalist Irene Reid belts out her tunes with power and conviction, apparently trying to emulate the sound (and even the look) of Ella Fitzgerald, but she will not please everyone. By her third selection, I was getting tired of hearing her repeatedly shout in the same high-impact register instead of getting inventive with the melody.For a 1962 Swedish Television recording, this session is remarkably well preserved and restored. It's in black & white, and the lighting is a bit off in some scenes, but the sound is great all the way. This is a collector's item that will be enjoyed over and over
THIS VERSION IS VERY CLOSE TO ORIGINAL BOOK. LON CHANEY WAS AN EXCELLENT PHANTOM AND MARY PHILBIN HAD THE CHRISTINE FEEL OF STRENGTH AND COURAGE.  I HEARD THE ORIGINAL ENDING WAS CLOSER TO THE BOOK BUT THEY CHANGED IT FOR SOME REASON, TOO BAD, I WOULD'VE ENJOYED THAT. :-
Underrated and Overlooked. I honestly have to say that this movie gets better every time I watch it.  Is the plot unrealistic? Sure.  Are the characters over the top? Absolutely.  Is everything I mentioned intended to be that way? YES!  This is a story about inspiration and dreams, corporate corruption, power hungy executives, hardnosed reporters and the fact that some people actually have a heart if you look hard enough.  If you did not enjoy this movie then I recommend you look at it one more time.  These are stereotype characters, parodies of reality.  The naieve rube, the conniving businessman, the "anything for a story" reporter, and a little bit of sand, to make the experience more enjoyable
WOAH WAH WEE WAH.....I LIKE!!!!. I show new film at my uncle Dubat's house and my young cousin dance  for us.  Before she no like bang bang, but after I show her new Dirty Salsa DVD she like bang bang very much!! We have dance competition in my county and my neighbor was so jealous he beat his donkey!  I recommend Quick and Dirty Salsa very much it will bring you much hot sexy time!! Please watch this movie film or I will be excute!Bing bang bing bang boom!!!!
The Facts of 9/11 "Propaganda" only to Enemies of Good. Of all the many many documentaries recounting the despicable acts of mass murder committed in the name of Allah on that day, this is by far the most comprehensive and the most unflinching.  Because of this, those whose mindsets side more with that of the terrorists will find this factual documentary somewhat distressing in its raw recitation of events.  And perhaps none more so than "Caesar" in his review of Sept. 17, 2006.  If only he found at least as troubling the carnage, bloodshed, and destruction deliberately perpetrated by his Islamic buddies against civilian populations.  But, more on this in a bit.As regards this extraordinary video, from the perspectives of air traffic controllers, FAA officials, NORAD and NEADS, the air crews and passengers on board each of the four doomed flights, to the testimonies of the witnesses, participants, firefighters, and all the heroes on and near Ground Zero, this is the singular documentary that takes you minute by minute through the hell deliberately planned and perpetrated by those whose religion had them believing that the execution of such hellish bloodshed granted them virgin-laden heaven.  (and no... this is not the "propaganda" or view of the documentary, but instead my own conclusions drawn on many years of personal investigation of Islam).Anyone who, like "Caesar" here, could watch this fully factual account and then call such a splendid documentary "goody-goody propaganda" "try(ing) to portray the US as good guys being hit by the bad guys..." reveals instead either their rabid religious fanaticism or otherwise their own anti-American hatred for so apparently condoning such ghastly blood-soaked horrors as the acts of "good guys" retaliating against "bad guys."While "Caesar" (how telling a nickname) attempts to school us ignorant Americans on our country's past political-policy foibles, yet he fails to mention the billions in financial and economic aid we have given the Islamic nations, the millions in military equipment and technical advisory assistance provided them as they struggled against invading Soviet forces and/or other foreign enemies attempting to annex and rule over sovereign Islamic nations, the ousting from Kuwait of the brutal armed forces of an Islamic fascist dictator who had invaded and then "enjoyed" weeks of the metaphoric and all too literal raping in this tiny Islamic nation while openly looting, terrorizing, butchering, torturing, and murdering its citizens while none of its Islamic neighbors lifted so much as a finger to intervene, but instead begged the United Nations and the U.S. to solve their problems for them... which we did!  And these are just a tiny listing of the far greater acts we have done for the cause of justice and good, and all of it on Islam's behalf.  And yet, 9/11 is only the latest and greatest terrorist massacre by which we continue to be repaid by the bloodthirsty religion of Islam for all we have done and continue to do on its behalf."Caesar" also glaringly omits and all too conveniently ignores radical Islam's blood-soaked history and their on-going policy of religiously motivated bomb blasts, hijackings, kidnappings, tortures, rapes, gang rapes, female circumcisions, sawing and/or hacking off people's limbs and heads, mutilations, and always... mass murder after mass murder after yet more mass murder all perpetrated against civilian populations worldwide, including those of their own religion, and all thanks to Islam's foundational tenets of blood lust that makes all such horrors not only acceptable but actually laudable, eternally rewardable, and thus... forever inevitable.True, all religions have their radicals and fanatics.  But none deliberately attract, nurture, and encourage terrorist fanatics more than does Islam.  And none preaches genocide against the entire Jewish race/nation and all non-Islamic "infidels" in the name of God more than does Islam.  And it is how this video accurately documents for the entire world only this latest and greatest mass butchery in the name of Allah that probably motivates "Caesar" most to attempt such blatant anti-U.S. propagandizing here.  And for those who would disagree, I challenge "Caesar" or anyone else to provide us any reliable evidence of even a single factual error in this documentary.What I think "Caesar" fears most is that such a powerful documentary as this might add to the growing world view that despite the constant rhetoric of Islam as a religion of "peace," the ever-escalating terrorist acts of its leaders and constituents in the name of Islamic religion reveal the exact opposite to be the true case.  Maybe it's just me, but I'm thinking any religion that so encourages its hormone-driven young men to blow themselves up with as many "infidels" as they can so as to spend eternity in orgiastic sex with 72 virgins deserves to be fully prosecuted, at the very least on charges of "conspiracy to commit (mass) murder"!And one thought that just hit me:  If more and more Islamics continue to either commit or condone such bloodshed and with the full approval of their Islamic leaders, which god are they truly honoring and emulating:  Allah -- the Creator of Life; or instead, Iblis (Satan), the Destroyer of it?  By their fruits are they known, after all.And on the question of whom and what Islamics most worship and adore, permit me to close this review as also does this wonderful documentary, by quoting one of Islam's most renowned clerics:"We love death.  The U.S. loves Life.  That is the big difference between us."    -- Osama bin Laden
the 1st movie in the sega. this movie is based on the book with the same tittle and its a remake of the movie manhunter which i might add the have different ending so it leaves me very dizzy. so i guess i'll have to read the book before watching them both. but this is better then the remake and not as good as the remake but i like this one better i think. the acting is alot better in this one plus a bigger budget helps too. but all in all its worth watching. can be thrilling at times but. when really need a really good pre sequel about lector. you know what i mean?i want a background and i wan to see his killings and his lifethis is not really about his life so dont think it is
Great demonstration. How can an IMAX presentation in HDTV + 5.1 sound be ? Just great.And when its about sea, sun, dolphins, narrated by the warm voice of P.B. and sung by Sting, its more than this.Either to entertain children or stun friends, this one is just perfect, like all the Mc Gillivray Freeman series..
Not as good as US but Very Close. It seems Americans enjoy the US version more and Brits to British.The US has more depth and hilariousness but the British version is the original and is also very fantastic. Buy Both and Watch Both Often.
Classic, but only amongst sub movies. This show depicts JW being handed what he least wants, to be left ashore during wartime to solve a technical problem with torpedos -- something that really happened.There is much of the standard John Wayne character in  the movie -- he's strong and larger than life, even when he faces a  ruggedly handsome younger man who is vying for the same woman.  John Wayne  is, of course, the hero, and that's OK.The best part about the movie,  however, doesn't have anything to do with subs.  The best part is the  showdown between two nurses when one tells the other how things really are,  and to quit whining about things (I paraphrase, badly).Nevertheless,  this movie is a great option for a free Saturday afternoon.Addendum...I just read (3/2006) the non-fiction book "The Terrible Hours" by Maas, and found many similarities between Swede Momsen of that book and JW's character in this movie.  While Operation Pacific doesn't do more than mention in passing that JW's character was involved in diving on a sunken sub before WWII, that and the work he does on solving the torpedo problems plaguing WWII fleet subs is enough to make the connection between JW and Swede Momsen.  If you like this movie, you'll probably also like the book "The Terrible Hours.
Ocean's Eleven. One's attention is immediately drawn to this movie for its many famous stars such as George Clooney, Matt Damon, Brad Pitt, and Julia Roberts. It is a bit odd storyline from the beginning that Daniel Ocean, played by George Clooney, risked robbing the casino for love and revenge. However, I liked how they planned the whole thing out carefully and how the movie proceeded speedy. I liked the part when Rusty, played by Brad Pitt, calls Terry Benedict, played by Andy Garcia, and tells him that they are robbing his casino. And yet, Benedict wasn't able to get anything, neither the money nor his woman. Also, I liked how it let Tess, played by Julia Roberts, know Benedict preferred money to her. I thought it would have been better if the casino heist weren't so perfectly planned and that there were some critical moments or tensions. Though I now know there is a sequel of this movie, "Ocean's Twelve", when I first watched this movie I predicted that there would be another one. Because at the end two of Benedict's staffs follow where Ocean and Rusty were going. All-in-all this was a hilarious and well-acted movie overall
Excellent workout. This is a great work out!  You can really work up a sweat and it's low impact on the knees
Great material for kids. My son likes it so much, I think it is a great stuf
Invitation to a Gunfighter. Yul Brynner will always be remembered for his great parts.  However, this particular movie he plays exceptionally well portraying the greed and pathetic apathy of how some people viewed the dollar bill.  I believe this  reveals Yul to how he saw greed in the world
buddy. great kids movies. i'd recomend it to anyone with kids. it shows selflessness, love and compasion
World's Finest. If you're a Superman fan you must own this. Great animated series although not quite to the standards of the Batman series. This volume does contain the three parter 'World's Finest' though, (pre-released as 'The Batman-Superman movie') which is among the best either series has to offer. Bonus Features are thin on the ground, unfortunately, but this boxset remains a great release. The animated menus are beautifully done, the vocal talent are superb (especially Dana Delaney as Lois Lane and Clancy Brown's Lex Luthor) and the series' opening credits are a work of art. Buy it
A Must Have For Pantera Fans. This DVD f***ing rules! I agree this is best to watch when you're getting ready for a long night of heavy drinking. You get to see another side of Pantera, and learn that these guys are just a bunch of dudes who like to party hard and have a good time. By far my favorite DVD.
Alice in--British Production. A work of art...Carol Marsh was Beautiful and talented.   Brings back fond memories.....I was in  the seventh grade when I  saw it in the theater..
A high point in early British cinema. This film is an outstanding item among Alexander Korda's almost single-handed efforts beginning in the 1930s to transform British cinema from an industry dominated by worthless "quota quickies" to a first-class competitor in world cinema. Korda had a prominent hand in such great classics as The Private Life of Henry VIII, The Scarlet Pimpernel, The Four Feathers, The Thief of Baghdad, and many others; this level of greatness is akin, for example, to what a company like Pixar is doing with animation in movies such as Toy Story today. The best of the Korda films are nothing if not imperishable classics. And Rembrandt ranks right at the top among them. The power of the film lies primarily in Mr. Laughton's priceless performance, which is a great waggish role and yet is remarkably subtle in both gently comic and touchingly tragic ways. The exchanges with Roger Livesey as "beggar Saul," with Elsa Lanchester as Hendrickje Stoffels, and with the worthies who stirred up scandal after Rembrandt used a commission to portray them in a less than idealized light, are lively parts of the spirited whole that this film represents. And, though the film has sad elements, the overriding portrayal is of an indomitable spirit who, in his eccentric way, triumphs over adversity and mediocrity to leave a cherished legacy of his artistry for the world. Truly, this is one of the greats among films, and certainly among biographical ones. Viewers will love this film for the depth of its powerful central characterization surrounded by outstanding talents in all departments. Highly recommended
i wanna get sumthin clear. ok so everyone is saying in Tommy Dreamer's match with Brian Lee that at the end of the match he get choked slammed through up to 6 tables, well just so everyone knows that a exageration its only 3 MAYBE 4 because you hear Joey Styles say (OH MY GOD  THATS 3 TABLES STACKED UP) and then you see someone get another table, but you never see them but it ontop the other ones.so yeah, just wanted to get that out of the way. Good dvd, i think they couldve replaced sum matches with sum really crazy ones. where are all those crazy tables on fire?? THERE IS ONLY ONE MATCH WITH JUST ONE TABLE ON FIRE!!! (not including extras
House Of  Wax. Thanks to Amazon, I have been reunited with an old favorite. I am a newcomer to ordering on line and Amazon is great. The quality of the DVD was spectacular ans so is Amazon's service from placing the order through receiving the merchandise. I have no hesitation and am excitedly awaiting another DVD order.
House Calls. Delightful romantic comedy benefits from a top-notch script (by Max Shulman and Julius Epstein-co-writer of "Casablanca"!), and the unexpected chemistry between lovable schlump Matthau and starchy Jackson, who are both fabulous. Affirming once again that true love will triumph over casual sex, "Calls" is a charming, clever romance, with plenty of laughs and heart. Matthau fans should flock to this.
Edited Version of Series. I have been a fan of Are Your Being Served for years, and jumped at the chance to get the dvds when I saw them available.  For those that are old enough to recall seeing the originals, beware that the set being offered is not the original unedited version.  The box says "uncut" but that is simply not true.  All of the shows on this dvd set are the later edited versions which allow for more commercials.  While they are still very funny, I am disheartened at not being able to see scenes and quips that I expect and remember from when I first viewed the originally released series.
When things go wrong and one is in harm's way. This is a chilly saga of an American sub captain plagued by failure-prone weapons and an ocean full of Japanese to fight.  They find the reason the torpedoes didn't work and put back to sea, this time, to take good care of the nasty business at hand. One scene that brings the cost of war home is that the Thunderfish loaned another sub a movie, &quot;Washington Slept Here.&quot;  Sometime later, they find wreckage of an American sub, and the movie tells them who is at the bottom of the ocean. The Thunderfish strikes back at the sub that got their friends, showing how dangerous it was out there and what courage it took to fight this war. The climax scene shows them in a Japanese-controlled harbor, with a waiting task force.  They fire their new and deadly torpedoes, and radio back to Cincpac about the taskforce and its location.  They run for cover, and barely survive massive retaliation: the outcome is in doubt until the last, as it was for many other submariners. A moving, poignant, and bittersweet tale that stresses the fact that nothing ever comes for free, even in war
A rare suspense film of subtlety and depth. The Deep End is one of my top ten favourite films of 2001. This moody, suspenseful and very intelligent suspense drama about a mother who finds herself in a terrifying situation with a couple of blackmailers is told with great subtletly and superb style.Criticised by some as being logic free, I dont disagree that some plot turns are flawed (eg anyone disposing of a body would not do so in such shallow water. Why did the blackmailers presume that the main character could come up with $50,000.00 in less than 24 hours? etc)but the taut, effortless direction, inspired casting, elegant cinematography and surprising emotional depth make The Deep End a superior and absorbing tale with characters who are truly complex and interesting to watch.The terrific performances only enhance the enjoyment as Tilda Swinton gives a masterly, fresh portrayal as Margaret Hall,  a good, dedicated mother who will do anything for her children and Goran Visnijic who adds a real humanity to his role of Alex Spera, a initially cold hearted blackmailer whose conscious starts to kick in when he fully realises what he is doing to Margaret and her family. Supporting actors are also solid and Raymond Barry is convincingly menacing in his two scenes as Spera's more vicious crime partner.Oh, and Lake Tahoe looks absolutely stunning, a unique and extremely effective backdrop for this film' story. Excellent.
Go For the "Gold". I loved the wonderful productions and awesome talent in "Lord of the Dance" and "Feet of Flames." These shows and "Gold" contain some of the greatest dancing and musical talent that I have ever seen. "Gold" includes an inspirational interview with Michael Flatley that reveals how he turned his impossible dream into a reality.
Consuming. Exact acting made the the character of woman being portrayed as strong and can take care of her self.  The scene with the woman in the window, then being subjected could have been more lengthy, along with other women, whom the attacker should have been with, with more sexy swear words. Although we all probably wanted to hear the REAL Asia Argento's voice!!
A movie worth watching!. Definitely a great romantic comedy, Mickey Blue Eyes, brings to the screen the story of an Englishman working at an auction house in NYC who proposes to his girlfriend of three months only to find out that her family is part of the mob.  Things become a bit more complicated when he believes that he can handle the situation...Hugh Grant, Jeanne Tripplehorn, James Caan, and the rest of the cast, have outdone themselves with their performances, which are exceptional to say the least.  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows! Very well written and very well presented, the movie is without a doubt guaranteed to provide more than just a few laughs, not to mention a few tears.The setting, the plot, the dialogues, the humor, and the music are all wonderful!In short, Mickey Blue Eyes is a movie worth watching and even though it is not quite as good as Nine Months or Notting Hill, it is definitely a keeper! 4 Stars
DBZ-Vol.7:Destruction. DBZ has been called the greastest action cartoon of all time.  I must agree.   The movies consist of the adventures of Goku and his friends as they try to save the Earth.  They have supe -human powers to help them.  In  Vol 7 the fight to save Earth from the evil Sayians begins.   It doesn't  look good for the Earthlins.  Goku, where are you
great acting from a pretty boy. a wonderful job from Mr Power.  First impression make mewant more of his films. Blondell also very unusua
Memento (Limited Edition) DVD. This is a great DVD for all collections even if the movie stank which it did not.  The package is worth the coin.
Great DVD. My 2 year old loves Clifford and this DVD is adorable.  It is a long DVD which is great for a long car ride.  I recommend it
Halarious. National Lampoon's Loaded Weapon 1 is one of the funniest movies ever made.  I watched last night for the first time in years and i still laughed out load.
Essential Blur. This DVD was released in 2000 to coincide with the release of Blur's best-of compilation.  This DVD includes all of their videos from 1991-1999.  While there are no extras, which kind of stinks, the videos themselves are fabulous, from awesome ones like Song 2, The Universal, Parklie, For Tomorrow, Beetlebum, Coffee and TV, and Charmless Man, to the dreaful video for Country House, they're all here.  My other major gripe is that the video for Music Is My Radar, which was Blur's 2000 one-off single, isn't included even though the track was included on the Best of album...the song is even used as the menu music on this DVD!  Blur's three 2003 videos are available on the CD singles, so Music Is My Radar is the only Blur video not available!  Anyway, if you love Blur, buy this DVD
Jumpin Jack Flash. If you love Whoopi Goldberg and I do, you will love this movie
Bresson's return to greatness. L'argent is not only the last film of Robert Bresson, it is also one of his greatest achievements. Especially when compared to some of his efforts of the 70's (like 'Lancelot of the Lake) this film shows a return to the genius that one associates with the director of 'Diary of a Country Priest', 'a man escaped', 'Au Hazard Balthazar', etc. The film brilliantly illustrates how one negative event leads to a succession of other events, gradually leading to the greatest of human folly. This pescimistic look at human nature, while it turns some people off, shows a realistic and yet stylized view of life - it is the cycle of Karma (one could say). Bresson emphasizes the smallest details in his films - and turns us on to the very essence of experience
Surface Charm Masks a Cold Heart. I first saw this movie in the sixties, when its expose of Rome's decadent jet set still had some shock value.  Four decades later, when the mating habits of movie stars are endlessly dissected across the globe, the trials and tribulations of the sweet life feel numbingly familiar.What's left is the story of Marcello, (Marcello Mastroianni) a gossip columnist, and what happens to him during a series of loosely structured night wanderings.  Trailing Marcello through Rome, we learn his character and discern his fate.  He aspired once to be an intellectual, and idealizes his friend Steiner, imagining that Steiner's life is the perfect blend of serious purpose and family warmth.  What happens to Steiner provides the movie's only true emotional shock. Marcello's traveling salesman father shows up unexpectedly in Rome.  Marcello wants him to stay longer so they can get to know each other better.  But, after a raucous evening on the town, the old man bolts once again.  We see the source of Marcello emotional guardedness.This guardedness affects his romantic relationships.  There's Emma, his steady girlfriend, who wants a commitment that he's unwilling to provide.  He dallies instead with movie stars, such as Sylvia (Anita Ekberg, whose zaftig charms show us how much standards of cinematic beauty have changed over forty years.)  His most interesting relationship is with Maddelena (Anouk Aimee) a decadent aristocrat.  There's definitely chemistry between them, but neither of them can put aside their party masks long enough to explore it.  His most moving encounter is with a young girl from the country, a waitress at a seaside resort.  The jaded Marcello is drawn to her innocence and optimism, because it takes him back to his younger self, a fresh arrival to the big city.  At the movie's end, after a debauched night, he sees this girl on the beach at dawn, standing on the other side of a channel.  She shouts to him, and gestures, but the wind snatches away her words.  He can't connect to her.  Shrugging, he turns back to his bleary-eyed troupe of nightlifers.This is a rich movie, and its energetic inventions keep you hooked, even though it's almost three hours long.  As you would expect from one of the cinema's world masters, there's a lot of artful filmmaking here - innovative night photography, a playful musical score by the brilliant Nino Rota, arresting visuals, such as the opening shot of a statue of Jesus being airlifted by helicopter over the city.  Many of Fellini's major preoccupations are on display as well.  His nostalgia for the simple, natural life of the country is played out in Marcello's interactions with the young waitress.  The carnival that is Italian Catholicism is brought hilariously to life when two young children claim to have visions of the Virgin Mary as a way of jerking the chains of their elders.  The adults, desperate for a miracle, swarm to the site.  Marcello and the paparazzi could care less, as long as there's enough spectacle to squeeze out a story or visual.  And the pretensions of urban intellectuals are wittily skewered during a party scene at Steiner's where bombastic people talk past each other in several languages.Some of the most appealing aspects of Fellini's movies aren't all that evident in La Dolce Vita.  His warmth towards his characters, for instance.  The starlets, aristocrats and tabloid journalists that Marcello runs with aren't very likable.  Without his easy charm, this would be a cold movie indeed.  Also, Fellini is the best there is at using cinematic imagery to create a dreamlike flow to his stories.  But this movie is full of abrupt, even awkward transitions, as though Fellini, following Marcello through the warren of Rome's streets, keeps hitting dead ends which force him to back up in order to go forward.Although Fellini's starting to move away from his neorealistic roots in La Dolce Vita, he doesn't move very far.  When he finally returned to those roots, he made Amarcord, an amazing fusion of realism and surrealism.  For me, it's Fellini's best movie, and perhaps one of the greatest movies ever made.  La Dolce Vita isn't as good as Amarcord, and much of its shock value has been diluted by time, but it's worth seeing for Mastroianni's seemingly effortless virtuosity and for the privilege of watching a great director capture the passing parade.
The "Joshua Tour" Movie. While the album contains some tracks that are not present in this movie which document to 'capture the moment of the making of an album' as stated by the band members, while the band goes on with their American tour in support for their epic album THE JOSHUA TREE Lp- the movie did succeed in capturing the essence of the band in that period, if that is indeed the purpose for the making of this flick (and to cash in some profit at the same time, matter-o'factly, of course). Consisting of behind-the-scenes backstage interviews, sessions, rehearsals, and concert footages - this documentary feature also contain certain portions that are not included in the companion 2 Lp set:* `Exit' (live) = A fine better rendition of the song from THE JOSHUA TREE, which wind totally hacked nearly to a completely pointlessly passable track when it appeared in its studio version due to the production rendered by Daniel Lanois and Brian Eno. In this live rendition- the essence of the song is very well audibly felt as a bluesy track, which segued into the song 'G.L.O.R.I.A.' - not their track from their 1981 sophomore album OCTOBER, but rather by their fellow countrymen veteran recording artists Van Morrison & The Chieftains.* `Where the Streets Have No Name' = the very track that's used for its movie trailer (included on the dvd) where the band is seen entering the stage (and the first shot to bring the concert footages in colour) presented in slow motion for the trailer; and also there's the live rendition of their chart topper `With Or Without You'; plus their epic ballad from the same JOSHUA TREE album `Running To Stand Still', and a great heavier rock live rendition of 'In God's Country' against it's atmospherical country-ish studio version which appeared in the said album.* A performance of their song 'Mlk' and 'Bad' from their 1984 lp THE UNFORGETTABLE FIRE, that didn't level in any way close to their classic performance of the song that appeared in their 1985 4- tracked ep (consisting of a pair of studio outakes and one of the couple live tracks from the said album), WIDE AWAKE IN AMERICA - that rather turned as a curio when Bono perhaps on an absent-minded impromptu impulse sang a pair of ROLLING STONE songs by the end of it - seguing to 'Ruby Tuesday', (which went quite incoherently to the theme of the song), and most peculiarly ' Sympathy For the Devil' - that seem to tell the song 'Bad' is rather spoken under the perspective of the so-called virtue-istic sentiments by no other than Satan himself! Perhaps just an incidental quirk, or perhaps an intentional pun of sorts coming out from Bono- who years after donned the McPhisto-devil alter ego persona of his against the Fly, who stands to symbolize egotistic arrogance in its persona, being that Bono had the knack for 'tourrette' psyche, flaunting whatever criticism or comment that's thrown the band; which I guess is also the responsible driving factor for U2 to turn techno-pop, almost to a point that's as scary to sound nearly a lot like the pop music of Michael Jackson.However, on the RATTLE AND HUM lp, there's that track called `God part 2' - an antithesis for John Lennon's track which appeared on his 1970 debut album PLASTIC ONO BAND - a song which state that Lennon only believes in himself and his wife Yoko Ono against NOT believing anything or anyone else - whence the U2 song went to state "I don't believe the Devil, I don't believe his book... I believe in love."* 'Sunday Bloody Sunday' = When I first saw this then, I got a little peeved rather than blown away when they played this perennial track o'theirs - seeing that Bono appeared to've tried to force himself in trying to move the audiences with his anger-filled rhetoric regarding the revolution on their homeland of Ireland. Bono did stated however before the segment is shown that they almost never did included this said segment in the film- thinking that many are not likely to comprehend or relate to the grievances that they are expressing regarding the Irish's plight about Ireland's political struggles; which is followed up by their performance of 'Pride (In The Name Of Love)' that wrapped up the flick- with the song 'All I Want Is You' playing in the background as the end credit rolls up.The portion for `The Star Spangled Banner' which opened up their performance of `Bullet the Blue Sky' actually happens to be the very same Jimi Hendrix rendition that appeared in WOODSTOCK - quite a bit of a feat that's not different from what peeved George Harrison regarding the band in filming their video for `Where The Streets Have No Name' on top of a roof, as its been done before; in this case Hendrix's performance of the American anthem's been used on the opening for Neil Young's great concert movie RUST NEVER SLEEPS. The movie, although containing a number of tracks that appeared as well from its lp companion did have some of those tracks as different versions to those that appeared in the album- such as `Angel of Harlem', `Love Rescue Me' and ` Desire', which are live studio sessions, that on the latter the band lengthened the refrain of the song stamping some pun about traveling-preachers (which also went as the same case from a line on the narration portions of their performance for `Bullet the Blue Sky'); and the full live rendition of `I Still Haven't Found What I'm Looking For' (which is on the album) only appeared here as a segment, wherein the song is being practiced by the band with the gospel choir on a small community chapel (with tolerant looks on the faces of the Christian choir- perhaps seeing that there's no real Christian message in the song).Overall, although some had dismissed this whole documentary movie feature as merely a whole lotta nothing but some "pRattle and Hum-bug" from U2 -- it's quite one of the finest music films about a band ever filmed.No flags are waved.RATE: 8 out of 10
Vastly superior to its pathetic predecessor. Steven Speilberg actually made a good monster/animal attack movie for once.On another note, Nick, a character who appears in this movie, was the character most people wanted to make a return in 'Jurassic Park IV'... which was supposed to be released last year. Regardless, it's already confirmed that Nick won't be returning
LINDA DARNELL AND A GREAT SCRIPT !. The CRISP dialogue and UNBELIEVEABLE performance of LINDA DARNELL makes "A LETTER TO THREE WIVES" a must-see motion picture.LINDAS' scenes,with film boyfriend\husband , Paul Douglas sizzle! Add excellant performances by Thelma Ritter [always],Kirk Douglas,Ann Sothern,and as LINDAS' mother Coonie Gilcrist, and you have sure-fire can't miss entertainment.LINDA DARNELL, in my view, was a badly mishandled actress.Foz greatly misused her and MAUREEN O'HARA
Classic Laughs!. Great Praice for 10 classics and lots of laughs! If you are a Jerry fan, you will really enjoy these movies! (especally "Family Jewels", Priceless!
"God Bless  And The Devil Too". The rain beats down on a dark, dreary Greek harbor town as a young, well educated English writer (Alan Bates) climbs about a weathered freighter sailing for Crete. Basil (Bates) is making his first voyage to his ancestoral home, he has inherited some property and a mine that he hopes to re-open.Shortly after boarding Basil is approached by an enigmatic, grizzled looking Greek named Zorba (Anthony Quinn). With intense, flashing eyes and the intimidating smile of a madman Zorba looks into the face of the bewildered Englishman and boldly states, "I like you, take me with you." Surprisingly Basil agrees, thus beginning a most unconventional friendship and a journey of self-discovery the likes of which has seldom be captured on film.From the first sighting of Zorba peeking through the rain drenched window on the ship you become distinctly aware of the presence of a unique and magical personality.  A personality embodying the soul and wisdom of the ages. Priest, confessor, shaman, guru, enlightened master, friend and follow traveller. Reminiscent of the Greek God Pan, Zorba laughs, sings and dances through all the joys and tragedies of life viewing everything as a necessary part of the process of living. As Zorba tells his young friend and pupil, "Life is trouble, only death is not."Zorba works his magic from beginning to end and will enchant the viewer long after he leaves us dancing with Basil on the barren sandy beaches of Crete against the backdrop of the beautiful Mediterranean.Adapted from the novel of the same name by Nikos Kazantzakis and released in '64 'Zorba the Greek' truly captures the existential landscape of the 20th century and Anthony Quinn and Alan Bates deliver the performances of a lifetime. Add to the mixture the stark but inviting scenery of the island of Crete and an intoxicating soundtrack of traditional Greek music and you have one of the greatest motion pictures of all-time. Truly a masterpiece! OPA!
Watching since the 1980.s. I have been watching this series since the 1980's when I first was able to get PBS.  I have been watching ever since and have probably seen every episode a few hundred times (maybe not that many but close!!) and have not gotten tired of them. It is usually on around ll:00 pm (when it is back on TV in my area) and is the last show I watch before I turn off the light next to my bed. With this complete collection, I can watch it any time of the day or night and as many episodes I want to watch at one time
Acceptable but not great. A somewhat unfortunate showing less than we would expect from Charlton Heston.   The picture quality is not great and the acting could be much better considering the cast.  It is alright as far as adaptations of Shakespeare go but one would hope for better
Imagination Triumphant. Fanny and Alexander is a feast of a film, bursting with characters, ideas and emotions.  In it, Bergman celebrates sensation, imagination and the power of illusion, pitting them against his lifelong anxieties about religion and the difficulty of human connection.Set in the early years of the twentieth century, the movie tracks the fortunes of an upper-middle-class Swedish family, headed by the widow Helena Ekdahl.  We first meet the Ekdahls at the exuberant Christmas feast that opens the film. Her son Gustav is a restraunteur, a lusty, sentimental man who loves his wife and paws the maids.  Karl, a professor is the weak son, drunk, chronically in debt, and abusive towards his German wife.  The oldest son, Oskar, manages the family theater in which his young wife Emilie is one of the actresses.  While rehearsing Hamlet one winter day, Oskar falls ill, and soon dies.Emilie is left with two young children, ten-year- old Alexander and Fanny, eight.  Bereaved Emilie, still in search of her identity outside the theater, falls under the hypnotic influence of Bishop Vergerus, a handsome, charismatic Lutheran minister whose charming exterior masks a cruel fanaticism.  He proposes marriage, and, in a casual but chilling aside, requests that Emilie and the children bring nothing from their former lives when they move in with him.  Emilie and the children transfer from the gay, affectionate Ekdahl world to the spare, rigid Vergerus household.The Bishop takes a special dislike to Alexander, who lives for long stretches in worlds of his own making.  We learn that the Bishop's first wife and two children drowned in the river that races past the house.  Alexander tells a maid that he saw the ghost of the first wife, who told him that the Bishop locked them up and that she and the children drowned while trying to escape him.  The maid informs on the boy. Enraged, the Bishop torments Alexander psychologically, applies a carpet beater to his backside, then locks him up for the night in the attic.  Although disturbing to watch, the sequence brilliantly brings to life one of the movie's major themes.  Alexander may have lied about the facts, but in using his imagination to rearrange the facts he reveals a larger truth.  The Bishop does in fact seek to imprison and control the souls of those around him.The second half of the movie deals with Emilie's struggle to free herself and her children from the Bishop.  As part of this struggle, Alexander is led deeper into the realms of magic and the supernatural.  Unlike some of Bergman's earlier, bleaker works, Fanny and Alexander allows the life-denying rigidity of Vergerus to be subsumed by the warmth and humanity of the Ekdahls.  At a lavish family banquet, Alexander's uncle Gustav makes a speech extolling the virtues of living in the "little world" by which he seems to mean both the theater and the secular world of everyday human interaction.  Bergman uses Gustav to state a decided bias toward small, made-made illusions over grand theistic ones.This bare bones summary of the three hour theatrical release (a five hour version aired on Swedish televison) cannot do justice to the movie's teeming richness.  Everything Bergman learned in forty years of film and theater directing is brought to a triumphant apotheosis.  The sets, particularly Helena Ekdahl's apartment and summer house, are lavish; the period costumes are colorful and elaborate; Sven Nyquist's camera moves fluidly from sweeping long shots to lingering close ups.  The enormous cast is superb.  Gunn Walgren's mobile features summon up the soul of Helena Ekdahl, and Bergman veteran Erland Josephson imbues family friend Isak Jacobi with mystery and warmth.  The movie's most mesmerizing performance is Jan Malmsjo as Vergerus; his abrupt shifts from charm to cruelty will make your skin crawl.References to Shakespeare's Hamlet are peppered throughout the movie.  In its balance, richness, humanity and dazzling theatrical skill, Fanny and Alexander reaches the Bard's exalted level
Delightful. This is one of my all-time favourite movies.  It is silly, romantic, cute and just fun to watch.  Shirley McLaine was fantastic, as was Brendan Fraser.  This is definitely one of those films when on a rainy day you can just forget about your problems, you can sit down and enjoy.  It reminds us about the power of fate, family and friendship
Love him or hate him, this movie rocks. I've been a Howard Stern fan for about 10 years, and now that he's on sirius he's the best he's been in 5 years. Now that I have listened to him on Sirius, and I hear the people on regular radio try to immitate him, there is just no comparison. Stern is the most entertaining personality, at least in the portland area, period.and as for stern being a failure..well, he brought 4 million subscribers to Sirius Sattalite Radio in less than 2 years and Sirius is expected to reach close to 6.5 million subscribers by the end of 07. Sirius, before signing on Stern, had less than 1 million.As for this movie though, even if you're not a fan of Howard Stern, the movie is still hilarious and truly entertaining. I gave the movie three stars because the end left y ou hanging
The best live metal/rock band ever!. I never liked Machine Head before I bought this DVD.  It was a gift for my husband who loves them.  Since watching this, I now understand why.  They are the most amazing live metal/rock band in the world.  If you listen to the CD and then watch the DVD, you can't tell any difference between the two other than the thousands of screaming fans.  I have so much respect for all of them as musicians and performance artists.  Aside from the live footage, the extra material is also awesome.  You'll see the band tell their story in their own words.  There are also a couple music videos included.  Overall it is definantly worth every penny
The Quintessential Jazz Concert DVD. The concert starts out with Jack de Johnette coming out on stage and beginning the concert with a drum solo. Jack de Johnette is quite the legend in terms of jazz drumming, and he has been a top name in that area for at least the past twenty years. Along with Billy Cobham and Dave Weckyl, Jack de Johnette is one of the top jazz drummers of today. He can really groove! His solo that begins the concert is flamboyant yet reserved, patterned within what appears to be chaos, and it swings quite well.After about three minutes of playing, he is joined by Dave Holland on the "upright", or acoustic bass. I don't know much about Dave Holland, but have heard the name before.He performs superb "walking bass" lines on the upright bass, and he and the drummer really form the backbone of the rhythm section here, and they swing quite well together.Then Herbie Hancock comes out on stage, and gets down to "business" on his grand piano. Herbie Hancock has always been a favorite of mine, from the early days of his pioneer fusion band in the 1970s (the "head hunters"), to his days of fame with the "rockit" band in the 1980s, Herbie Hancock has shown a wide range in his varied career.Here in this concert, he returns to his traditional jazz roots, and plays really excellently.Then it's Metheny's turn. Pat comes out on stage and picks up his electric guitar, and begins to play as the three back him up. Metheny plays with flamboyance and full of jazz authority and sophistication here. The whole quartet now sounds excellent and they shift from sheer improvisation to a written tune, and Metheny changes guitars, and also the sound of the guitar changes. Pat likes to play this one electric guitar, I think it is called the synclavier guitar, and it sounds like an off-tune trumpet. To some, a guitar should sound like a guitar, but Metheny seems to like this guitar sound, as he uses it quite a lot.I actually like it too, and Pat whales away in up and down jazz riffs that seem to come out of nowhere, sound fantastic, and live up to the complete jazz improvisation that he does best.The whole concert on DVD is about one hour and forty minutes, and the DVD will cost you about $20. It may seem a little pricey for a concert DVD, but the whole production is great. The sound quality is superb, the camera angles and aspects during the concert are superb. When one of the artists does a solo, you can see and hear him clearly. Also, the concert was recorded in 1990, a full fifteen years ago. Each of these respective musicians is arguably at the height of their abilities here, and it really shows.There are about six tunes that the quartet plays, at least one tune being composed by that respective artist.One cool thing about jazz is that none of these musicians are in the same `regular' band. But, you'd never know that by this concert. They play so well together, and are so tight in their performance, it's great. They have that wonderful ability that all great musicians have, and jazz musicians in particular, that is great communication. Pat can look at Herbie and they seem to read each other's minds. Some people don't understand jazz, and think it is just chaos. If they only had a chance to see and hear this concert, it all makes sense.So, all in all, I highly recommend this concert DVD to any lover of jazz music, and in particular to the fans of the respective artists, Metheny, de Johnette, Holland and Hancock.A delight
Teaching me softly. French pedagogy differs from American, so American viewers should not expect an American classroom with a French accent when they watch "To Be and To Have" ("Etre et Avoir").  Despite the differences of style and language, however, the film is powerful because it taps into the reservoir of universal experience.Adults sometimes idealize childhood.  Maybe they really did have perfect lives as youth, but more likely their memories are short.  "To Be and To Have" recaptures not just the innocence and sponteneity of childhood that we idealize, but also the uncertainty, the need to be accepted and understood, the need and sometimes difficulty of understanding, the influence of family, the importance of a wise and caring teacher or guide.The children are positively endearing, and very individual.  Some are stars; others struggle.  George Lopez, the instructor, is soft-spoken and reaches his students' minds through their hearts as well as intellect.  One of the things that struck me early on in the film was how effectvely he reached through to his students with his quiet wisdom and steady hand at the tiller.The quality of the cinematography and editing are also excellent and support the film beautifully.(I would give this movie 4.5 stars, if the option were available.) Highly recommended
*Love this movie!. Many people would think I would be messed up in the head, but I saw this movie Black circle boys years ago. I wanted to own it, and they no longer carried it in the stores to rent, like they did at one point. I went on Amazon, and my boyfriend bought it for me when I found it. I thought I was the only one to see it, and I wasn't. My boyfriend's friend saw it years ago. Eric Mabius is so hott to me, and so is Kyle. I enjoy watching it. I don't believe in all that satan stuff, and I think it cruel what they do, but all in all I love it!
This is a great "quickie". This is a great "quickie" video for when I only have 20 or 30 minutes to do a work-out.  I have lots of longer videos, but very few short videos that actually use my stability ball. This is great for in the morning or a quick pick me up after work!  Be sure to combine segments to get a good workout!
AMAZING MOVIE!!!!. THIS MOVIE IS SO AMAZING! IT REALLY MADE ME APPRECIATE THE MEN AND WOMEN WHO SACRAFICE THEIR LIVES TO HELP THE COMMUNITY. THIS MOVIE WILL MAKE YOU LAUGH, AND IT WILL MAKE YOU CRY. I HIGHLY RECCOMEND THIS MOVIE TO EVERYONE. IT WILL DEFINITELY CHANGE YOU FOR THE BETTER.
the man who cryed. This was a great history movie, and in excelent condition at arrival, thank yo
Black Dog is one of the best. When i watched Black Dog for the first time i thought is was one of the best movies i had ever seen. Now that i have seen it i watch it over and over again. What makes the movie so great is that it has awsome soundtrack to go along with it. From Randy Travis singing "My Worst Fear" and Rhett Akins singing Eddie Rabbits "Driving My Life Away". I would recomend that everyone watch this movie at least once in your life. I would expecially recomend it if you are a truck driver your-self. It is so easy to comprehend with what they go through. Even if you arnt a truck driver your-self it gives yo a little respect of what they have to go through(just hopefully not so much drama) with dealing being away from the ones that you love, for just doing the job that they choose to do
Cheap Trick Makes You Feel Good Down Under!. Cheap Trick is one of America's greatest contributions to pop culture. They've never stopped touring or recording, and as great as their records are, this band really has to be seen live to be appreciated. Go see them as soon as you can. In the meantime, the fabulous songs and the band's ever-bigger-than-life image overcome the relatively poor video and inconsistent audio production on this DVD (although the editing is not bad--you do get to see pretty much what you want to see when you want to see it.) The boys are playing hard here in support of the Lap Of Luxury release, whose hits "Don't Be Cruel" and "The Flame" put them back on top where they always belonged. "On Top Of The World", the 2nd song of the set, drives up into the starfield with 5 giant Bun E. Carlos snare thwaps as Robin Zander rears back for one of the all-time great codas. These guys deliver on so many levels, and it's great to see them performing songs you may not have seen them do in a while ("Big Eyes" and "Clock Strikes Ten" in particular), along with the core list of big U.S. hits, big elsewhere hits, small hits, near-hits, album favorites, and shoulda-been-hits-how-could-they-not-have-been. Zander is astounding, as usual, and it's really cool to hear him talk in the short clips of the band hanging out in Sidney, and compare his seemingly normal speaking voice to the roaring and endlessly diverse controlled juggernaut of his singing voice. Although "Never Had A Lot To Lose" sounds like it was recorded on a microcassette, after repeated listenings I've decided it may very well be Zander's vocal monitor mix recorded straight from the mixing board. Although the sound quality is jarringly inferior to the other songs, in a way it's pretty interesting because Zander is loud in the mix, with no reverb or delay effects, so you really hear every little thing, presumably the same way he hears it on stage--for example, on the bridge when he sings 'not 'til daylight', you hear his vocal cords break into harmonics, something you'd never be able to hear normally. Rick Nielsen is at his goofy finest, tossing flatpicks, brow sweat, and a guitar wall of mastered mayhem. Tom Petersson, inventor of the 12-string bass, doubles the height of that guitar wall by generating more tones than a color wheel, while simultaneously anchoring the songs tightly to Carlos' elegant but playful foundation. The "Silver" and "Music For Hangovers" DVD's are superior productions overall, but this one is a very good '80's snapshot of a magical band--an absolute must-have for true fans
Two Great Stars. Stockard Channing and Julia Stiles are great together and theydo an excellent job in this film.  It keeps you glued to thescreen.  This is one of my favorites
Mediocre slasher flick held together by Jamie Lee Curtis. What could have been your average slasher flick with a particularly amateur cast, is held together by the wit, charm, and charisma by Jamie Lee Curtis. The familiar face of Leslie Nielson (one of his last dramatic roles before his transition to comedy) doesn't hurt either. This Canadian-made horror, with its glazed cinematography used to good effect, tells the story of a childhood accident that comes back to haunt the surviving group of friends nearly 10 years later at their Senior Prom. While the film is not altogether original (many elements of previous horror films are all-too-obvious here), it is nonetheless enjoyable slasher flick entertainment. Decent performances make this a nice effort
Master OF The Rare LASERDISCs Movies. I am MOLLY RINGWALD's Fan,I have two  Laserdisc OF FOR KEEPS 1988 [ NEW ] And Used,I love it much thats why I bought it on DVD TOO,You won't regret it :
I think it's great movie. Am i alone in thinking it's cool movie? Maybe not whole 5 stars, but still very nice, hilarious and relaxing. Very nice actors: Nicole Kidman and Bette Midler makes this movie very funny.But really they could have done a much deeper version of this film and it would have been fantastic. Matthew Broderick wasn't a convincing husband for Nicole Kidman - he doesn't look any older than when he was in Ferris Bueller's Day Off! Funny twist at the end, glad we watched it, Bette Midler was funny as ever.We enjoyed having a night in watching a fun film.
Blue Max movie review. This is an excellent movie.  Well produced, good music, good action, good scenery - all around excellent
Your "All Access Pass" Into Hilary's Life!!. This DVD is a really good one, but I enjoyed The Girl Can Rock a bit better. Still, this DVD is a must have for ANY Hilary Duff fan. It's awesome!There's so much to see in this DVD. It's about an hour long. There are three music videos, So Yesterday, Why Not, and I Can't Wait. Behind the scenes includes making of the So Yesterday video, making of the Why Not video, making of Metamorphosis the album, and making of Sessions@AOL. For the performances, there's Sessions@AOL which has performances of So Yesterday and Little Voice. Hilary also tells about the meanings of those songs. Performances also has the making of Sessions@AOL which is also included in behind the scenes. There are a few cool bonus features too. There's Hilary Duff's biography which is a few pages long, in the studio with Hilary, and a Hilary photo gallery that includes home videos of Hil when she was little. The pics are sooo cute!! And, also, there's a special letter from Hil to you inside!! Enjoy
Criterion at it's best. One of the greatest Italian films, gets the Criterion treatment. Still an amazing piece of work by De Sica. Neo realism at it's purist. The Criterion DVD has a clean, stunning print ( if any you have seen previous offerings, you will know what I mean ).Many extras are included, making this a must buy for all fans of early Italian films
MASTERS OF THE UNIVERSE. EXCELLENT PRODUCT And VERY RELIABLE SALESMAN, SINCE IT GIVES IN TIME And IT FORM
Excellent final season for Richard Thomas. With the exception of a few guest spots, this was Richard Thomas' final season as John-Boy. Stand out episodes include:The Vigil - Mary Ellen makes a wrong diagnosis that puts Grandma near death.The Baptism - Olivia struggles to get John and her kids baptized during a revival.The Firestorm - John-Boy causes panic when he publishes parts of Hitler's Mein Kampf in his newspaper.The Wedding - Mary Ellen goes through personal changes leading up to her wedding.The Cloudburst - John-Boy crosses a line with Grandpa when he sells his meadow to a developer.The Pony Cart - the best episode of the season IMO. Aunt Martha Corrine comes to visit the family and upsets everyone. But she's hiding a secret.The Best Christmas - Olivia desperately wants the family to be together because she feels that this will be the last Christmas that the whole family will be together.The Inferno - John-Boy travels to NJ and witnesses the Hindenburg disaster.The Long Night - While visiting Esther in the hospital, Grandpa causes a disturbance and is banned from the hospital. Heartbreaking episode.The Achievement - Grab your hankies. John-Boy travels to New York to check on the status of his novel and discovers it's time to leave home
Skull Smasher. "Eye of the Killer" is an excellent small movie.  Kiefer Sutherland is police detective Mickey Hayden in a self-destructive mode since the breakup of his marriage.  He chases an albino wino who runs out of a convenience store with his Jack Daniels into a vacant warehouse.  Hayden falls through a second-story floor and hits his head which starts him receiving psychic visions of the victims through the eyes of the killer.  He meets a parapsychologist, Dr. Vera Swann, played by Polly Walker.  Romantic sparks eventually fly between the two, allowing Hayden to start to get over his divorce.  He lost his wife to police detective John Hatter played by Gary Hudson who seems to meddle in the investigation, eventually pointing toward his guilt.  Henry Czerny who was the thief opposite Harrison Ford in "Clear & Present Danger" and has done "Pink Panther" and "The Exorcism of Emily Rose" plays Harvey, a psychic that attaches himself to Mickey Hayden in a gay bar.  Hayden frequents the gay bar because it's a place for a straight guy to be alone.  With his partner Ray Coombs played by Ronn Sarosiak, they seek to find the serial killer supposedly responsible for a string of murders.  All of the murders eventually are solved and improbably point at the owner of a newspaper who was trying to capitalize on the Jabberwocky serial case to heighten the value of her newspaper so it could be profitably sold.  Loren Petersen plays the hapless Alice who we see fall down the stairs several times and get her skull smashed.  This little drama that was originally an HBO movie works pretty well as a nouveau film noir.  Enjoy!
Hideous!!!!!!!!. This story from Full Moon Pictures is about some little creatures who are made of, and are born in toxic waste. Killing starts and terror begins. Rated R for nudity, violence, and language
Raw and Uncut. This documentary by far is one of the best I've ever seen. It gives you true footage of the harsh reality of life in the hood. Very interesting and well documented. FROM CALI, TO NEW ORLEANS, ATL, NYC, GRINDIN, GUN PLAY, BANGIN AND HEAD BUSSIN IS IN EFFECT
A perfect time-saving workout. I am always looking to streamline my fitness workout and this DVD, I find, is absolutely the best in helping me  not only stay fit, but healthy, relaxed & energized. I love this style of yoga for combining strength, movement, flexibility, breath work and having a sort of aerobic effect on the body. Great Multitasking! I've kept it up for 3 weeks & now I'm in my 4th week & still going... Truly a workout for everyone!!! And its tough if you can get through all the 5 Tibetan exercises
A timeless love story. I saw this movie in the 1986 theatrical re-release and subsequently on DVD. I can readily attest that it does not age! I'm not even a dog person myself, but the plot is not about dogs per say, but the life adventures that a young cocker spaniel named Lady has.Living with owners named Darling and Jim Dear, Lady apparently leads a pretty good life. Assuming that every dog leads the good life she and her friends enjoy, she is later shocked to meet Tramp, who lives on the streets. However, she soon realizes that he has a good heart beneath that rough exterior.She needs his help when crusty old Aunt Sarah comes to mind the house--and the newborn baby. Initially not understanding that Lady feels protective towards the baby, she also selectively ignores the damage which her two Siamese cats were actually responsible for doing to that very elaborate Victorian house.Amazingly, Aunt Sarah presumes that Lady was responsible for wrecking the house--and attempts to muzzle her up!Like any streetwise character, Tramp has lots of connections and solutions to any problem which pops up. However, he does not come across as an annoying know-it-all who you would want to quickly get rid of. Tramp is instead somebody whom we are supposed to both identify and then want to hang out with in rough environments. Lady had 'gentle' friends named Jock and Trusty, but they can't help out in a world also outside of their own.Of course, the spaghetti dinner scene remains one of the most enduring of all time--it made a VERY profound impact on me well before I was even old enough to myself consider dating. I imagined that I would eventually share a romantic dinner of my own with my own "Mr. right".However, Tramp's decision to go after the rat in the nursery also remains a powerful scene. He then felt no loyalty to anybody in that family other than Lady, but saved the baby anyway! Tramp proved that class is not a matter of breeding but what you do with your self!Despite his earlier professed discomfort with collars, Tramp ultimately gets adopted by the Darlings. Therefore, he and Lady do in fact live happily ever after.
John LeCarre, BBC at Their Best. "Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy,"the 1979 British Broadcasting Company's 6-part television serial is, of course, based on the masterful novel, of the same name, by British spymeister John LeCarre.  The novel, itself, was the first of LeCarre's Smiley-Karla trilogy, that ends with "Smiley's People."And, as the beneficiary of a first-class production by the BBC, "Tinker" achieves masterpiece status itself.  The series, adapted by the talented Arthur Hopcraft for the screen,  follows LeCarre's complex novel rather closely, giving us the intriguing plot developments,the well-rounded characters, and the witty dialogue.  Furthermore, the BBC hired some of the best available actors for the many principal roles, and surrounded them with all the extras, the cars, and the location shooting any viewer could wish.The plot concerns George Smiley, forcibly retired, along with a number of his good-guy friends, from Britain's spy service, called "the circus" by Le Carre.  It is realized that there may be, within the spy service, a mole: a term created by leCarre himself to describe a person recruited in the past, and worked into a sensitive position, before being awakened to start reporting on his surroundings.  To, in this case, Smiley's opposite number, the feared Karla, chief of the ruthless Russian spy machine.  As it is realized that there is such a person working, and he is responsible for an unthinkably large amount of damage, including the deaths of several spy networks, and the dismissals of Smiley and friends, Smiley is drafted to locate him. But Smiley must work in secret, with only limited help from the official circus.Alec Guiness plays Smiley with an instinctive understanding of the character that has seldom been bettered.  He is, as mentioned previously, surrounded by some of the best actors available: Bernard Hepton as Tobe Esterhase, chief of the go-to boys; Ian Richardson as the mysterious Bill Haydon, Ian Bannen as the victimized Jim Prideaux, Alexander Knox as Control.  Also Michael Jayston as Peter Guillam, Smiley's protege; Anthony Bate as Oliver Lacon, seasoned bureaucratic infighter; George Sewell as Inspector Mendel; Terence Rigby, and Michael Aldredge.  There's only one casting mis-step; Hywell Bennett as Ricky Tarr, the spy whose unthinking love affair, with a pretty Soviet agent, begins the unraveling of the circus's dark secret.  Bennett, who was the pretty-boy flavor of the month back then, simply cannot hold the screen with all these heavyweights.It requires some patience, and full attention, to follow this intelligent series, that sometimes moves too slowly for American tastes, but those efforts are surely rewarded.  This series is John LeCarre, and the BBC, at their best. However, you might want to be sure you can watch it on successive nights, rather than as it was originally shown, on a weekly basis: it's a lot easier on the memory that way.
PERFECT ROMANCE. the movie sends chills and hots all over you, and tears will not be surprising...the painter and the girl and bussave are entangled in a search for self-expression and freedom that comes with the final release which is the probably death of the girl. the very deep and true meaning of search is beautifully expressed by long walks and no talk, most especially among the painter and the girl.go for it and feel the dark pull of passion and violence
excellent choice. Im so glad I purchased this for my kids. They don't make these great cartoons anymore. My kids love i
Easy viewing. I  have been watching Bewitched when I am doing the ironing in the afternoons and have thoroughly enjoyed it.  I first watched the series when livng in England, they played the re-runs when I was a child.  I loved it then and was curious to see if at the age of 28 I would still find it as enjoyable.  I am pleased to say I did enjoy it just as much, perhaps more.  I had forgotten how much fun the story lines are and how well scripted and acted the whole thing is.  The whole 60's housewife thing is hilarious and the 60's sets are a real treat.  The other thing that is wonderful is that you can watch it with anyone,this is good clean entertainment.  In my opinion the box set is great value.  There is literally hours of entertainment in there, perfect for a rainy afternoon. This is easy viewing at it's best
Great family viewing. Hart to Hart!  Great family viewing, spectacular scenery, great relationships of the characters involved.  Our family especially enjoys looking for the clues to solve the crimes.  Everyone can do this without undue graffic violence, obscenities or blatant sex getting mixed into the scenes. If you enjoy mysteries try Hart to Hart, Diagnosis Murder or Murder She Wrote just to name a few
great comedy. I love the way the episodes come off like a cheesy 80's comedy only to provide a surprising amount of disgusting and somewhat offensive humor.  That's what makes That's My Bush so great.  The theme song is something *very* close to a show like Alf or Night Court, or some other 80's show.  But when the show actually begins, and the storyline and characters arrive, you quickly realize this is certainly not a rip-off of some cheesy 80's show.The actors that are supposed to look like George Bush and Laura are pretty decent, though not the best lookalikes I have seen.  The guy who imitates George Bush occasionally on the Jay Leno show would have fit the part better, in my opinion.  Still, this Bush is a pretty good pick.I think the best thing about That's My Bush is how there's actually stories surrounding all the characters, and it's not just your typical "Bush is dumb" jokes (which is the kind of humor most people are known for when it comes to insulting President Bush).  Don't get me wrong, Bush is portrayed as a dummy more often than not, but it's NOT the only thing the storylines focus on.I love the Dick Cheney and Barbara Bush characters.  Dick acts just like his first name, and Barbara is a super "b-word" when it comes to trying to accept Laura as George's wife.  It makes you wonder if Barbara and Laura really DO get along in real life.  George Bush's character can be dumb sometimes, but not ALL the time.The writers do a great job mixing in other characters so not all the attention centers around Bush.  There's also a cheesy laugh track in between all the jokes to again make the show feel like we've warped back to the 80's.A great, catchy theme song with jazzy instruments suits a very good, overlooked, and short-lived comedy show.
Quirky connecting. As I started watching this film, I was almost prepared to dismiss it as another indie film with little plot and cutsey, quirky characters. This one, however, grew on me as it went on. Me and You and Everyone We Know,  written, directed and starring Miranda July, has a truly distinctive style. I've seen it twice, and actually liked it better the second time, always a good recommendation for a film. The mediocre ones --the vast majority-- do not stand up to multiple viewings, at least for me. I think what makes it work is that it  is not merely straining to be offbeat and original for the sake of it, but truly has a voice and style of its own. The film follows the awkwardly blossoming romance between Christine (July), a performance artist who makes a living by running a taxi service for the elderly and Richard (John Hawkes), a recently separated shoe salesman. Richard has two children who engage in some romantic and sexual explorations of their own. This aspect of the film might make some viewers uncomfortable, but demonstrates July's  willingness to explore issues not often dealt with in most films.There are scenes and dialogue in this film that are unlikely to occur in real life. For example, when Christine and Richard meet outside of the mall where he works, they immediately fall into a poetic conversation about how the street names symbolize a timeline in their imaginary love affair. These two characters have barely met, and are unlikely to engage in such a conversation. Yet, taken as a whole, the film has a slightly surrealistic bent, so you are best off not watching it with realistic expectations. There is a consistent idiosyncratic rhythm to this film, as well as a warmth that does not descend into sentimentality. Overall, Me and You and Everyone We Know is about how lonely people connect or fail to connect in modern society. This is a familiar theme for films to take on, but this one does it in a way that reaches the viewer in an original way that is alternately sad, funny and uplifting
Beautiful quality and we love Keanu!!. Ok so who cannot love this movie!??  Well a few, but we loved it and that may have to do with the fact that we love Keanu Reeves.  The HD DVD disc is really cool and the menus are sweet as well.  Like another reviewer mentioned there wasn't any sex scenes.  Surprised at first but though maybe it was time that every movie doesn't have gratuitous sex scenes.  If you watch the extras you will see alternate endings which were cool.  You also get to see a scene where their was supposed sex with the girl with the tail.  You won't know she has a tail LOL until you see that deleted scene.Downside is that the extra scenes are in bad quality, seem that they came straight from the reel.  Again, loved the plot and would love to see him reprise the role.  Gotta love Gabriel and the Devil
Truly Superb. I must say that this is without a shout of a doubt the funniest animated film EVER. South Park is the brain child of comedy geniuses Matt Stone & Trey Parker, unlike the series this is 10 times funnier. The subtitle of the film describes it perfectly because it is just a longer episode of South Park but completely uncensored.I think it is fair to not only label this an animated film but to also label it a musical as it does contain some of the catchiest tunes you're ever likely to hear. With every South Park episode this film ends with a moral to the story so you will have to watch the entire movie through to understand the moral.This is nothing short of genius comedy and just a great movie to enjoy but be warned this isnt exactly a kids movie as for every third sentence the F word is used.10/10 = Genui
Awesome!. Okay, so it's not Schindler's List, but if you like American Pie or Porky's, this is a funny movie with a lot of laughs
Great for kids or adults. This movie was a cute movie for the whole family. I would suggest it to add to your holiday collection
Alice in Woody-Land. I bought this film after seeing it many times over the years. It's a wonderful take on Alice in Wonderland, Woody Allen style. Fine acting, the usual glammny NYC scenes, and a fantasy any woman can relate to
Moving and inspiring, not matter what the final verdict was... I've heard a lot good and a lot bad about this film.  I don't think anyone can deny the power in Denzel's brilliant performance, but as far as the accuracy of the film is concerned, it's been judged harshly for it.  I personally don't know the truth behind this mans conviction, his innocence and his quilt, only he knows, but the portrait painted by this film portrays Rubin `The Hurricane' Carter as a victim of a corrupt system.  To me it's a very moving film, regardless if it's true or not, and in the eyes of the actors involved it truly grips and draws you into this mans fight for freedom.  Denzel delivers his finest performance here; a well deserved Oscar nomination, and proves that he is a very talented actor.  I am a fan of Denzel, although I've made my concern very clear (the fact that Denzel at times seems to only excel when playing these types of characters), and I feel he shines here.  Despite the constant criticism, I feel this is a must-see film, if not for the emotional, albeit somewhat fictionalized (or assumed is a better word since no one really knows), story then for the brilliant acting on the part of everyone involved.  Dan Hedeya does a great job as the crooked (fictional) detective who makes it his life goal to punish Rubin for a crime he committed as a child (a crime that should never have been considered a crime) and Vicellous Reon Shannon does wonderfully as Lesra, the young man who not only fights for Rubin's freedom but helps Rubin to regain the hope and life he once had.  Like I said, very heartwarming and touching, and regardless of whether or not Rubin was guilty or innocent, the basic story of his fight for survival and the love and support he received from Lesra and his companions is true and that act of human love and spirit is a joy to see
Karas - The Prophecy. One the best I have seen in a from manga sine Blood
A Great Gospel Film. I heard about this version of the life of Christ, but had never seen it.  It is a striking black and white telling of the Gospel of Matthew.  It is beautifully filmed (there are a few problems with subtitles, but you can follow the story just fine) movie, and very true to Matthew's gospel.  As a pastor and a Christian, I highly recommend this moving video
Cronenberg's top notch film of King's novel gets even better with deluxe DVD, extras. First the important stuff out of the way. If you've seen this movie you know what it's about and already have probably owned it on DVD. So what's different here? Well the transfer is a marked improvement with a sharp looking anamorphic higher definition transfer of the film. It'll look extremely good on 16x9 widescreen TV's and even on more conventional (although not quite with as much a difference)TV's. The previous edition of the film was practically bare bones. This edition lacks a commentary from David Cronenberg (which is a pity as he's always entertaining in his commentary tracks) but comes with four terrific featurettes. The first "Memories from The Dead Zone" features new interviews with Cronenberg, King expert Douglas Winter, film editor Ronald Sanders and actress Brooke Adams. discussing how they got involved in the film and when they realized what a terrific film they were truly making. "The Look of The Dead Zone" focuses on the cinematographer by Mark Irwin and features an interview with him. "Visions and Horror From The Dead Zone" again has many participants from the original production and "The Politics of The Dead Zone" also features a vintage interview with Sheen discussing the film. Unfortunately Christopher Walken is curiously MIA but everyone else does make up for the actor's absence with insightful comments on the film and why it continues to resonate. I don't think the TV series would have taken off as well as it did if Cronenberg and Boam hadn't made such a terrific movie in the first place.The film looks good and while there are some mild digital artifacts that occasionally mar the picture the film hasn't ever looked this good on home video. Definitely worth the upgrade for that by itself.What follows are two paragraphs about the making of the film and the plot but if you've seen it you probably know this stuff and can skip the rest.After doing "Videodrome" David Cronenberg was looking for a film where he didn't have to write the project. He was exhausted from the involvement of that cult classic. When he met the late Debra Hill (via their mutual friend and Hill's long time collaborator John Carpenter) the late Jeffrey Boam ("Indiana Jones and The Last Crusade", co-creator/writer/producer of "The Adventures of Brisco County Jr.") had penned a terrific script that perfectly captured the feeling of King's book (Cronenberg comments in one of the extras that the best way to "remain faithful to the book is to betray it...because you're dealing with two completely different mediums" and one can see his point).The late Michael Kamen's wonderful score sounds terrific here (I would have loved an isolated score to appreciate the music that much more but perhaps in the next incarnation of the film). The cold, icy look of the film is nicely realized in this sharp looking transfer. The film does show its age but looks quite good overall.Highly recommended.**Spoilers ahead**Johnny Smith (Walken) seems to have it all--he loves teaching the kids at his school and is engaged to be married to another teacher (Adams). The future dims for Smith when he's in a horrible car accident and a subsequent coma for 5 years. The world has moved on but Johnny hasn't. When he awakens from his coma he finds he has the ability of "second sight", i.e., he can see the possible future and past just by touching people or items they've handled. The police pull him into an investigation of a serial killer and he gains a bit of fame from it but that second sight shows him a potential disaster-- Greg Stillson (Martin Sheen in a terrific polar opposite performance to his later one as the President in "The West Wing"). Stillson isn't just dangerous but evil. Smith sees that Stillson will initiate a nuclear holocaust. Johnny knows he's the only one that can stop him.
good film. I hadn't seen this film in years&I was reminded of how well the acting&Direction was in this Project.Jeremy Irons was on point He truly made the film with His strong performance from start to finish.it was a real cliff hanger&treat
My 2yr old LOVES it!. I originally saw this series being aired on HBO.  I recorded it on my cable box in my bedroom and would played it for my tough napping 1 1/2year old.  She is now 2 and her request every time she naps is for the baby movie!  The minute it goes on she is delighted blurting out the names of the animals shown in the video, along with identifying the art in one clip called "the kiss" as mommies and daddies.  I love the way it takes fine and mordern art and brings it to life with the classical music that I myself have learned to appreciate. I feel as is she is a step ahead of where I was ay by her age. By time this 30 minute video has ended my toddler has been lulled to sleep.  If you have a music, art, and dance saavy toddler that is hard to put down for a nap this might be the key for you too.
Nothing Brings A Family Together Like Death. The wonderful thing about cable TV is that it can get away with a lot more than primetime television. Most people know this from watching such things as THE SOPRANOS. Sex, drugs, gore. Nothing is "too much" for them.And SIX FEET UNDER follows this example but by focusing on the Fisher family, a truly messed up group of undertakers who own/operate a funeral home in southern California.Each episode opens with the death of someone, and this sets up the premise for that week's show.The very first episode starts with the death of the Fisher patriarch, Nathanial Fisher (Richard Jenkins, RUMOR HAS IT). He's driving home a new hearse when it is struck by a bus, killing him instantly. He leaves behind his wife Ruth (Frances Conroy, THE AVIATOR), his eldest son David (Michael C. Hall, PAYCHECK), his younger son Nate (Peter Krause, THE TRUMAN SHOW), and high school daughter Claire (Lauren Ambrose, PARTY OF FIVE TV series). This was a very effective way to get "into" the Fisher family from a viewer's standpoint. Nothing pulls a family together like the death of one of its closest members. Although they were coming together anyway for Christmas, the Fisher's are now forced to deal with each other on a very tight level. David has been working at the funeral home all his life and feels that his life may have been wasted. He also has to deal with his homosexuality and his inability to "come out of the closet" to his family and friends. His love for officer Keith Charles (Mathew St. Patrick, REUNION TV series) is felt throughout the series, and is on and off thanks to David's psychological hurdles. Matriarch Ruth comes out to the family on her own as she tells them about an affair she'd been having for some time with a hairdresser (male); this comes out during the viewing of her husband as he awaits internment.  Younger son Nate gets news of his father's death while having sex with a stranger (Rachel Griffiths, VERY ANNIE MARY) in an airport maintenance closet. We soon learn that her name is Brenda and with her comes an entirely new set of baggage for Nate in the form of love and a relationship he never thought possible. And finally we get young daughter Claire, a highschooler who learns of her father's death immediately after trying crystal meth for the first time.What made the show initially entertaining and oh-so-watchable, is the effects of death on all the characters. They deal with everyone else's grief better than their own, as they are distant from it; it's a business. But as the series rolls on, Nate learns that they are here to do more than business. The dead visit the family in ethereal form, teaching them very tough lessons (from how to stand up for yourself, to dealing with a SIDS death). Even the family's father Nathaniel, who started out dead in the beginning episode, turns up at crossroads and tries to help them deal with difficulties.The series starts out with a bang and keeps going for the first several episodes. Most viewers will be glued to their TV's, wondering what's going to happen next; a tribute to writer/director Alan Ball. But toward the latter half of the first season the series goes a bit astray. The initial enjoyment of watching how death affects the family is swapped for a more soap opera style plot that delves into how the characters effect other characters. Although this isn't horrible, it isn't as gripping as the show's initial premise. Gone are the dead's visitations (mostly), as are the quirky commercials for hearse sales and corpse foundation putty.But even with these issues there's still a certain pull that the series has thanks to some strong writing and the deadly subject matter. The big question, though, is is it worth going on to season two
Sharpe's Challenge. This DVD completes my Sharpe set.  I have the paperbacks and dvds for the entire set.  I also have joined the Sharpe's fan club in the UK
It's funny precisely because it's so incredibly ridiculous. Gilligan's Island has often been an object of ridicule for both professional critics and self-annointed intellectuals alike, most of whom point out the various implausibilities in the show (i.e., the Professor is an "idiot" because he can cause nuclear fission using coconuts but can't build a raft, the unliklihood of the Howells taking a "three hour tour" on an obviously inexpensive charter boat, let alone taking along three season's worth of wardrobe and costumes with them, ad nauseum), but chances are these same critics have also seen many -- if not all -- the show's episodes, and have enjoyed at least a few guilty laughs for their trouble.One of the reasons why Gilligan's Island is such a great show (it is the most re-run show in the history of television, and that INCLUDES I Love Lucy) is precisely because it is so wacky, nonsensical, and flat-out ridiculous.In Gilligan's Island -- The Complete First Season, viewers are treated to 34 original episodes, uncut, including the rare pilot episode that contains three castmembers not included in the actual show as seen on television. The episodes are in black and white, but this doesn't detract from the fun.The complete list and brief synopsis of each episode have already been written by other reviewers so I won't waste your bandwith in repeating them, however I will say one thing: seeing these episodes brings back many fond memories for me, and I didn't even realize how much of a fan of the show I was until I watched this 3-DVD set.I remember coming home from school in eigth grade each day and seeing Gilligan's Island on TV, and that was over ten years ago. I hadn't seen an episode of Gilligan's Island in the intervening years until I bought the DVD set. It's amazing, but I -- and probably countless other people -- could actually remember everything about the episodes, and my memory comes flooding back with the viewing of each one, right down to the manner in which a character pronounces certain words, and the way the Skipper cries out "Aeuph!" whenever Gilligan accidently hits his captain in the breadbasket, or inadvertantly drops something on his vulnerable feet, or the way Tina Louise's mouth twitches in an oddly fascinating way when her picture is shown on the program's opening credits.Gilligan's Island is one of those shows that you can watch today and enjoy, even if you've never seen it, as long as you don't expect it to make sense or follow any logic. It's one of those show's you can LOVE if your viewing of that show is connected to fond memories of your own past -- as for me, it includes summer vacation, playing Sega Genesis, playing nerf football with my best friends Howie and Art, and watching Gilligan's Island.My friend Art has since become a lawyer, and Garth became an architect. I teach in a middle school. We all grow up, but Gilligan stays with us all along the way. It's wise to pick this set up, especially if you're a fan of the show, because it's one way you can relive and continue to live a pleasant part of your own history
Worth watching over. Edmond O'Brien has a reputation for being so cautious that some of the crew thinks that equates to chicken. James Garner (Lt. Ken Braden) is about to test that caution with his life. Lt. Braden has a mission that is bordering on endangering the SUB. The bulk of the movie is the stress and interaction between the commander and LT and the crew that thinks the commander is chicken. You may have heard the story before but this is a very good version
Franois Truffaut -- Best director of all time. In every way, shape, and form of moviemaking, Truffaut is the best. Best French director, best director, PERIOD! I wish Criterion would release all his films in bundled sets like this one.This set includes what I feel is one of his best films, Stolen Kisses, which along with Jules and Jim (which is getting a Criterion release) and Day for Night (now out of print), round out my 3 best Truffaut.Here is a breakdown of the Doinel movies in order of my preference:Stolen Kisses: A truly original gem of a film, which can stand alone from the other 2 adult Doinel movies the best. Funny, intimate, beautifully filmed and acted. The scene in which he repeats his name "Antoine Doinel" over and over again is my favorite. Wooing women and muddling through a young man's life has never been captured better.Bed and Board: Nice to see Doinel again, this time in a crisis over his marriage vs. a mistress. A nice view of this part of Doinel's life. Hard for Antoine to go through, but easy and fun for us to watch!Antoine and Collette: A brilliant short film on the frustrations of teen love.The 400 Blows: Original, daring, and brilliantly directed by Truffaut. It's just not as attention grabbing to me as his later stuff.  A good start, but Truffaut was just warming up.Love on the Run: The least of this bunch, but by no means a bad film. Very nice to see all the characters in Doinel's life return. A nice way to end the series.This will be a must have for any Truffaut fan's collection, or any movie lover's for that matter
Just Plain Funny. I am a science fiction fan and I like some horror movies. That's NOT why I like this film. If you want unrelenting gore and true science fiction you probably should look elsewhere. But if you like unusual genre combinations you should appreciate this one.  Objecting to the mix of the mafia and vampirism means that you've just missed the point entirely. I found the mix hilarious. The movie requires that you just suspend judgement, and enjoy the unfolding of the what if proposition: What if the Godfather had been bitten by a female Dracula? The fact that the screenwriter thought to ASK that question cracks me up. What is more serious and harrowing than a mafia film? To me comedy is about the surprise element, the ability to turn generally serious matters and turn them on their head. If you can allow for that, you'll be on your way to seeing how and why this film succeeds.
Finally a solid feature film about snowboarding. In terms of story and content, this is probably the strongest film ever made about snowboarding. Gorgeous photography and a really solid storyboard made this film a real motion picture rather than a collection of montages like you see so many other boarding films. Unfortunately this film lacks the real jaw-dropping moments you really need in a film of this caliber. This film has one or two, but needs more to really sustain the interest level. Terje Haakonsen was spectacular as always, though, and any film blessed with his participation is almost always sublime.On a side note, I was a little disappointed in Shaun White's performance in this film. It seemed as though his heart was not really in the big back-country experience and that he would have rather stayed at home in the park. As a big fan of his riding, I was hoping to see more of his awesome freestyle ability translate to the open terrain. I was surprised to see him board with his freestyle binding setup (wide centered stance) rather than something more conducive to powder riding. I think the film crew noticed the lack on enthusiasm and actually showed him the least of all the five riders in the actual boarding scenes (they showed plenty of his interviews).Overall though, I'd strongly recommend this film to any snowboarder who is truly interested in the sport
I just want to tell everyone... When this movie came out and I saw it at the movietheater---You know the scene in the car where Tine finally gets enough and hit him back? Everyone in the theater started yelling and screaming, clapping their hands!! It was awesome and I will never forget it!
We could learn something from these Good Neighbors!. Viewing this delightful comedy more than three decades after its production, I detected immediately one aspect of its allure that would be unique indeed in the western world today: Not the unusual plot, nor the charming yet well-developed characters---but the fact that, as different as they and their lifestyles were, Tom and Barbara and Gerry and Margo remained not only friends, but close friends.It speaks volumes, perhaps unintentionally, that they learnt from each other, even as they argued and fought (literally) over the fence. Today's producers would see this as sappy or unrealistic, and give us the humor without the heart: The Good's and the Ledbetter's would be friends at the beginning, but then be moving away and/or divorcing by the end of the series (or perhaps trying a bit of wife-swapping).Thankfully, these very diverse personalities were drawn together not by similarities in their tastes and values, but by location and circumstance, and grew to value each other as a result. In a society where we don't even know the names of those who live next-door, we could all benefit by trying to follow the unconscious example of these Good Neighbors!
Forgotten Talk Show Host. Dick Cavett was a popular talk show host in the 1970s. His name has faded away through the years, but looking back on this DVD collection, one can see that his charm and personality have not faded through the changes in time. Although his guest were often classic stars, his interviews with them remain fresh and exciting to modern audiences. Here we have his vibrant and lovable style opposite such famous names as Woody Allen, Jack Benny, Bill Cosby, George Burns, The Smothers Brothers, and Jerry Lewis.Some of the standout interviews deserve some note. There are two appearances by the wacky and opinionated Groucho Marx, a man who agrees to sing some of the classic songs and reflect on his life in show business. As with many classic stars, he expresses distaste with "modern" film and feels that their shock value makes them trashy. He sports a silly golf cap with three round characters on top, a true testament to his outlandish personality.It is evident in Mel Brooks' appearance that the man loves to perform. It does not take much convincing to get him to get up and make a fool of himself. His bit on the show is rather short, but it is far from forgettable. At the end, he begins to get into an arguement with a censor which one wishes would have had more time.Lucille Ball is interviewed. Her episode is peppered with film clips ranging from an early appearance in Roman Scandals to a bit in I Love Lucy. For such a beloved comic star, she seems a bit haughty and short with Cavett, an easy going interviewer.Cavett was thrilled when Bob Hope appeared on the program. Hope was his idol as a young boy which is obvious by the way he is interviewed. Even for those who are not big Hope fans, it is hard not to enjoy this appearance. He is compliant, fun, informative, and interesting.Perhaps the most fun interview is that with Carol Burnett. She and Cavett seem to be similar in their love for classic films, sense of humor, and overall personality. Their similarities make them an excellent team to watch whether they are singing songs or engaging in small talk.Cavett opens each episode with a bit of commentary. It makes them all the more interesting to watch
an astounding vision. This is an incredibly conceived animation. I'm intirgued by how it has been dubbed into english, there are lots of blank spaces in the dialogue and stillness in the image that I'm guessing might come from a more involved Japanese original. The effect is that sometimes the pace looses dynamism, All in all though its an astounding vision and what really mkes it is the depth of the surround sound track, alongside some really great drawing of course
A classic - fun from start to finish. This is one of my favorite movies and really proves what a versatile actor Johnny Depp is. You must understand that this movie is making fun of those cheesy Elvis-type 50's musicals and the steroetypes that were always featured. It totally succeeds on that level - no one takes themselves seriously in this movie and everyone seems to be having a blast. Plus, the musical numbers are very enjoyable and Johnny Depp is always wonderful to look at!! I love this movie and even my children enjoy watching the dance sequences (this being a John Waters' movie, it does have some moments not for the kiddies). This is one of the movies you can watch over and over and I have done so since seeing it back when I was a teenager when it first came out. I am so glad it is now on DVD and the bonus features, especially the "making of" featurette, are quite entertaining. This movie makes me smile each time I see it and Johnny is just amazing!
Intensity. I saw this at the Theaters after having gone to the concert and it was amazing. Weed is everywhere, ladies are dying to get with every rap artist in sight. It is like watchin a huge party.  I would like nothing more than to sit down with some Cobra and watch this documentary
I like this yoga video tape. I bought this tape about 9 months ago. I had been doing Yoga and Pilates for about 2 years using Denise Austin videos and dvds.  This summer I joined a national gym and did Yoga and Pilates several times a week. Her tapes prepared me well for my hour long Yoga and Pilates clases.  I discontinued my gym membership 6 months later due to cost and feel very confident that I will continue my level of exercise using her tapes and DVDs. This tape has many of the Yoga exercises that we were doing in class. I do not feel this tape is best used by a person new to Yoga due to the pace.This tape is only 30 minutes long so the pace is pretty fast.I feel this tape is better used by someone who has been Yoga for a period of time. Good tape and good exercises.
One of The Most Important Movies You'll Ever See. Some 10-15 years from now, this movie, along with some others, such as TerrorStorm and Loose Change, will be considered classics, which gave birth to the movement that ignited the New American Revolution. Then, your compatriots, and of course, your children, will ask you, where were you, and what did you do during that crucial time in order to save your country, to support the true American patriots like Aaron Russo and Alex Jones? Will you have an answer? Will you be honest with yourself?How do I know this? Simple. Because we are living in a surreal world that is based on a monumental lie everywhere: in politics, economy, mass media, culture, you name it. And of course, historically, all lies ultimately fell apart. The above-mentioned movies are eye-openers as they expose different aspects of these interconnected lies and pose an inevitable question of what to do next? Now, it is up to you, folks, whether you prefer to distant yourself from the big lie, to live with it, or to demolish it, shred it into pieces, in the name of the future of your country, your children, the humanity, if you will. The "Freedom to Fascism" goes straight to the heart of the problem as it exposes its driving force, the engine of the new world order machine. Hats off to Aaron Russo for his bravery and courage!Don't be hypocritical. It's not just about non-paying taxes. It's about American Liberty that has been sold to and is being raped by a private bank cartel, in a violation of the very Constitution of this country, as the worst insult to its Founding Fathers. Don't trust this movie if you wish and do your own unbiased research. I bet you will soon realize that the Liberty ends once you allow accepting out of thin air-created, backed by nothing (but a promise of corrupt bankers) paper "money" for your hard work.Freedom is expensive; you have to deserve it, and you have to fight for it, just like your Forefathers did. But the clash is inevitable, because there will be more than plenty of us willing to sacrifice whatever it takes for the noble cause of Freedom; because the instinct of Freedom (if it is present) is the most powerful of human instincts. Watch this movie, draw your own conclusions, and make up your mind: it might be crucial for the outcome of the upcoming clash
Your Angel of Death Awaits: THE BATMAN Legend Reinterpreted. The animated Batman series of the `90s was an excellent series, and this movie makes for a great companion piece. Judging by the format of this movie, it wouldn't have been possible for the animated series to tell this story for two reasons. First, the violence in this story was too extreme for the TV show - Batman bleeds fairly often, and people are actually MURDERED. I was a HUGE fan of the show when I was a kid, and I loved this movie, but back then I was really surprised by the degree of violence in it. I had expected it to be as tame as the TV show. Regardless, the violence in this movie isn't anything that kids aren't exposed to on a daily basis. But it is rated PG for a reason, and `parental guidance' means that parents should watch this movie with their younger children the first time they see it - just in case the parent needs to explain and/or clarify some of the events in this film to their kids. Second, even if the violence was toned down, this storyline couldn't properly be told if it was simply divided into three episodes for the TV series. The typical episode of the TV series wouldn't be able to handle all the flashback sequences - the TV series was more interested in fast-paced storylines. And the flashback sequences REALLY slow down the pace of this movie. But am I complaining? Of course not. The quality of this movie would suffer greatly without all those slow-paced flashback sequences. So it was necessary that an animated movie tell this story.Shirley Walker's brooding background music is perfect for this movie - she outclasses every other composer who ever worked on a Batman film. During the opening credits, Walker's title theme is powerful as we see a red sky over a darkened Gotham City, and pass by the towering and foreboding skyscrapers. Her music is especially poignant during many of the flashback sequences, and during the scene when the old World Fair site is completely obliterated. And how about during the last scene in the movie when it shows Batman in deep reflection right before the Bat Signal flashes across the heavens?The Phantasm is awesome - Batman must find out why he has marked Gotham's biggest mob bosses for death. No one really gets a good look at the Phantasm, and a lot of witnesses mistake him for The Batman. So Batman isn't framed for murder - it's an interesting case of mistaken identity.Everyone says the Joker steals the show. He certainly is great, but I think this is Batman's movie - they didn't repeat the mistake of Burton's Batman movies. I really like how the Joker is an old-time gangster in this movie, especially since he's deranged and looks freakish. With the black trenchcoat and fedora he's classy and menacing. The film explores his own shadowy past as well.In various flashback sequences, we see Bruce Wayne's first attempts at being a vigilante. He is sucessful in some respects, but not in others. I'm assuming it's a lot harder to beat up thugs when they aren't afraid of you. He must find a way to strike fear in criminals as soon as they lay eyes on him. The other big problem is his inability to focus during his scuffles with criminals - but it's presumably difficult to put yourself in harm's way when you have loved ones to worry about at home. Since we all know that Wayne becomes Batman, it's obvious that these two problems are eventually resolved.My favorite part of the movie is when Bruce Wayne first hears that his fiancee has left him forever, then it cuts to the scene where he's trying on the Batman costume for the first time. A silhouetted Wayne pauses to stare at the mask, contemplating the deep significance that it will have on his life. After he dons the mask, Walker's music erupts in dramatic fashion as the terrifying spectacle of The Dark Knight steps out of the shadows, setting off to begin his unending crusade against evil. Indeed, the sight of Batman coldly narrowing his eyes at Alfred (and the look of awe on Alfred's face) makes this one of my favorite scenes in movie history.One of the most touching scenes is when Batman is on a skyscraper in the rain, watching his former fiancee eating at a restaurant (it sounds sick, but it's not). Walker's music, and the expression of longing on Batman's face as he reflects on his past, is moving. Then Batman's nostalgia is interrupted by a police helicopter - knowing he is a wanted man, Batman is forced to flee before being spotted. So the scene ends on a sentimental note. At the same time the end of this scene is really cool - the way Batman is so stealthy that he can completely disappear from sight (and without a sound) when your attention is diverted for a millisecond.Most action fans will be disappointed that it's not all action from start to finish, but the action scenes in this movie are very impressive. Batman's raid at a casino was done with lightening speed and efficency. I especially liked how Batman flips a heavy table on one gunman, then afterwards he stomps on the table (and thus the gunman) for good measure. In another scene Batman sights the Phantasm while in the Batwing (which is a really cool jet airplane - the noise it makes as it flies would terrify any evildoer). A chase ensues. But the Phantasm escapes, and to make matters worse the police sight Batman. This leads to one of the coolest chase scenes you'll ever see. The fight with the Joker in a miniture city is excellently done - it seems to have been inspired by the Godzilla movies. Yes, this is one of my very favorite movies - I almost enjoy it as much as Batman Begins. Buy this DVD, and the soundtrack too
A Must Have For Party of Five Fans. If you loved Party of Five then, you'll love Part of Five now!  Many hours of viewing here, with a couple of funny & interesting commentaries by Matthew Fox, Lacey Chabert and Scott Wolf.  What else can I say, buy it now!!!
Better than I expected!. `Calendar Girls' is fresh and witty and quite funny.  It's actually much better than I was expecting it to be.  I absolutely love Helen Mirren who just loses herself in every role, and here, in this comedy it's no exception.  As Chris, Mirren plays the rebellious fiftysomething housewife who causes quite a stir in her little community.  When her best friend's husband dies of leukemia she devises a plan to raise money for the hospital where he died, to help furnish the waiting room making it more comfortable for the grieving family.  The plan is for their annual calendar (they belong to NWI or National Women's Institute).  Every year they do a calendar, usually with flowers and churches and such, but this year Chris suggests doing a nude calendar, starring of course the women belonging to the NWI (all in their fifties or older), in order to cause a stir and sell more calendars (most likely out of pure curiosity).  At first her idea is baulked at but eventually it's allowed and they raise more money then they could have dreamed...and they become more famous then they would have expected...but with fame comes a price, and that price may be their friendship.  Julie Walters is wonderful as the grieving Annie, but it's Mirren who steals the show and breathes so much life into this cute, funny and smart little film
Incredibly Moving. I originally saw this IMAX movie in Hawaii, at the Polynesian Cultural Center 3 years ago...and bought the soundtrack, always hoping to get the DVD.  Much to my amazement, the movie was included for my PC as one of the features for Windows XP.  Anyway, the music, narration, and footage is breathtaking, I left the IMAX theatre feeling physically off-balance because of the motion of the seas and the ocean, and so moved by the magic of it all that I was teary-eyed the rest of the day.  I ended up at Sunset Beach on Oahu's NOrth Shore that evening watching the sunset and had the beach to myself. It is one of those days that you will never forget in your lifetime, it is still so vivid, and watching this DVD brings every cell in me back to The Living Sea and the beaches of Hawaii.  Absolutely moving and breathtaking...even when watching on the small screen vs. the IMAX screen.  You will not be disappointed
One of the most impressive films ever made. Faust is just an incredible accomplishment in the art of silent cinema, one of the most ambitious and masterfully directed films of any era.  If you've never seen a silent film and wonder if one could even keep your attention, Faust is the film to watch.  Far too many classic early films were either lost or came to us in relatively poor condition, but this digitally mastered version of Faust is remarkably clear and free of white outs.  I'm sure it looks better now that it did when it was released over eight decades ago.  Don't go thinking we're only talking about characters standing around conversing, either; F. W. Murnau packed all kinds of incredible special effects into this magnificent piece of filmmaking.You all know Faust - that fellow who made a deal with the devil.  The story goes back as far as the fifteenth century, with Johann Wolfgang von Goethe penning the definitive version in the early nineteenth century.  Murnau's Faust differs somewhat from the original two-part drama written by Goethe, supplanting rationalism with mysticism (no one did mysticism better than early German filmmakers).  This approach, among other things, allows Murnau to open the film with nothing less than jaw-dropping visuals and effects.  The story is heralded by the grim image of the apocalyptic horsemen thundering through the clouds, leading us to a confrontation between Mephisto (Satan) and an archangel over the control of the Earth.  A wager is proposed, with dominion over the Earth set to depend upon the fate of one man's soul.  That man is, of course, Faust, a good man targeted for evil temptation by the cursed one.  Knowing he could not tempt Faust directly, Mephisto uses his own compassion against him.  As a devastating plague is unleashed among Faust's fellow citizens, Mephisto casts his dark shadow over the landscape quite literally, as we see him hovering over the entire village.  That, to me, is one of the most memorable and iconographic cinematic sights I've ever seen.As his friends and neighbors beg Faust (Gosta Ekman) to save them from the plague, his unanswered prayers bring him to the point of despair.  He actually summons Mephisto himself (in another incredible special effects-laden scene).  After some deliberation, Mephisto (Emil Jannings) convinces Faust to sign a pact for one day only, and that proves to be an offer Faust can't refuse.  A little later, though, Mephisto brings in the big guns - the promise of restored youth.  Extending the contract from one day to eternity is basically just a formality at this point.  All of his new powers don't truly satisfy Faust, though, and so he sets his sights on a lovely, pure maiden by the name of Gretchen (Camilla Horn).  The whole mood of the film changes at this point, with the art of wooing temporarily displacing the clouds of doom hanging over the first half of the film - but this is only a prelude to true tragedy.  As Daniel Johnston says, "Don't play cards with Satan, he'll deal you an awful hand," and that is exactly what happens here.  It gets pretty darned depressing, really, making it hard for the viewer to see how Faust can possibly redeem himself for all of the misery he has caused.  Murnau doesn't pull any punches when it comes to establishing the central theme of the story.Thanks to earlier successes such as Nosferatu and The Last Laugh, Murnau had complete control over the making of Faust.  Something of a perfectionist, Murnau made sure that every aspect of every single shot met with his satisfaction.  It's obvious that the man was a genius, as even the contrast of light and shadow reinforces the central motif of the story he is telling.  The special effects seem years and years ahead of their time.  Even the makeup is remarkably well-done (I would never have guessed that Gosta Ekman played both the old and young versions of Faust, as the older version looks genuinely old).  And the acting?  Top-notch, all the way.  Ekman is superb, Emil Jannings becomes the very personification of Mephisto, and an inexperienced Camilla Horn is simply enchanting as Gretchen.  (The role of Gretchen was actually written for Lillian Gish, but she bowed out because Murnau refused her demand to have her own personal cameraman shoot the film.)  The musical score, composed and conducted by Timothy Brock, is a wonderful counterpart to the film, as well.In virtually every way possible, F.W. Murnau's Faust is nothing less than a cinematic masterpiece
Passionate & Sensuous. From the first time our leading characters' eyes meet, you can feel the temperature rise in the room.  Not your average, sappy "love conquers all" type of love story; this film shows the courage it takes to help love conquer
Two's a Company, THree's a Crowd . Sex Crimes 101 . Film Noir at it's Best. Lies, Betrayal, Deception, Sexual Eroticism. All through the movie You dont know who to cheer for, THe Cop, The Dirty Teacher, The Trailer Trash Chic, The Funny Lawyer, THe School Tramp, The Tramp's MOther, THe Cop's Partner, The Tramp's Mother Cuban LOver. You dont know who is who and what is up or down.  ONe big Dirty Camp of a Movie..to describe it with only one word it would be....... YUMMY
worth it. The Red Violin is such a good movie. The storyline is good as we as then cinematography, though it does slow down when it gets to the chinese part of the movie and to the american part (the movie is separated into different time periods..each separated by a tarot card
NOTHING LIKE LIVE EDWIN. If you sort of like Edwin McCain, get this DVD, watch him live, and you will fall in love. He has such passion for his music that can only be seen, and felt during live performances. His amazing voice, is just as amazing live, and he and his band, can JAM!! The energy is high, and its a great time!I had the priviledge of meeting him, and blubbered like an idiot, but he is just as cool a guy as he seems. He really appreciates his fan base, and understands how important it is for us to see him live. Im glad that finally, I can share with my friends who have never see Edwin live, what an amazing artist he really is!!!!
ILLUMINATING LOOK AT THE BAND, FANS & PA. The Grateful Dead movie came out in 1977 but consists of footage shot during an October 1974 series of concerts at the Winterland, the last to use the "wall of Sound" system, and the shows preceeded  a break from touring but by the time it came out, they had already resumed performing. It is as much about the fans, the sound crew, the "wall of sound" PA, and promoter Bill Graham as about the band. When I saw it back when it came out and a couple times at local high school auditoriums over the next few years, I was always left with the feeling that it was a little short on uninterupted concert footage. The film tries to cover so much ground the music performances suffer. The other place I felt it was lacking was the sound mix. This new DVD release basically fixes my two main gripes about the original release. It has a second bonus disc of extra song performances, and it has been remixed- it now sounds alot better (but for those who want the original mix, you can play it that way too for the  movie portion). There is also some extra interview footage. The transfer of the film has been well done. The dead always had good people working for them, whether it was Betty Cantor, Dan Healy, Steve Parish or Ron Wickersham- and now Jeffrey Norman and David Lemeieux, the keepers of the vault. They have done some excellent work with this release and "The Closing of Winterland" DVD....both come from a period many consider to be their best. Now we can have our own virtual Dead concert. If you like this DVD, I'd also recommend the 5 CD "Movie soundtrack" set which is one of the best audio releases
Just Watched What Is Now One Of My Favorite Movies. My Brother and I just watched what is now one of our favorite movies of all time. The movie was playing on HBO, and something told me it would be a great. My Brother was busy so I paused the DVD recorder, and waited until we could watch it together. What a wonderful movie made in the days when Actors/Actresses didn't need to rely on Special Effects and Nudity to make a movie which held you like a Hitchcock Thriller. Not to imply it was Hitchockian, only that it comes up to the standards Hitchcock always held, with his choice of cast, direction (not by him here), cinematography and, filming locations. I can't understand how anyone reviewing this movie could give it anything less than 5 stars. Everyone else here, with a positive review, has done such a fine job with their descriptions, there is no need for me to write another. I will definately purchase the DVD. Anyone wishing to watch and enjoy a wonderful movie made when Hollywood was at it's best should also purchase it. You can't go wrong, even if the price was several times higher.
AH VALMONT. I loved this film, it really is such fun to watch Close and Malkovich give career performances.  I am so perplexed as to how Glenn Close did not win best actress for this movie, she is absolutely fantastic, one of the best performances I have ever seen by an actress, Jody Foster won that year for The Accused, go figure. The acting is top notch across the board, with the exception of Keanu Reeves, but at least he looks good.  Malkovich looks like he is having so much fun with Valont and his peculiar quirks really work here, it is the perfect movie for this actor.  The ending is so well done and the last shot of Close is perfect.  The setting is stunning, the movie perfectly captures Ancient Regime France and the inner sanctum of the nobility.  All the debauchary and malicious gossip, is on grand display here and you can't take your eyes off of it.  Really a great movie.
My band was in this dang thing... Filming this was a lot of fun for us. I was the guy with the soup can around his neck like the hippie hitler from The Producers by Mel Brooks. So much of the story was simply taken from real stuff that had happened in early LA punk days. The whole story about crashing the funeral was about us all being thrown out of the cemetary while they were burying our friend Kristie who'd overdosed on loads. The squats, the rip-offs, the broken homes--Penelope got most of that stuff right. Bummer that they did a pan and scan. Cheapass R. Corman.One last funny bit--I was using Mike (TSOL)'s amp but some kid knocked it off the top of the stack so we never got a second take that would've shown more than just Stevo. And that's why you can't hear any bass during TSOL's set. The amp was putting out about 20% after the tumble
Awesome Advanced Step Workout!. This is a great step workout for people who love complex step choreography. There is a fast-paced warm-up followed by 7 combinations. Seasun then proceeds with a cool-down, core work, and finally a stretch. As far as cueing goes, Seasun is OK. She is not perfect, but I found it fairly easy to follow along even on my first run-through. There is not an excessive amount of TIFTing (taking it from the top).I found this workout to be challenging but doable. I like workouts that engage my brain as well as my body and this definitely fits into that category. If you are at an intermediate/advanced fitness level and enjoy intricate step choreography, you will like this workout.
!!!!Great Box set!!!!. If you are a classic samurai film and Kurosawa fan owning this set is a must
The Best!. Steve Martin's "King Tut" skit had escaped me for 30 years, grateful for the DVD so I could finally enjoy the entire spectacle.Now if I could find the skit with Rosie Grier as a doctor operating on a patient with several other celebrities (could it have been the Ed Sullivan Show or am I just senile?) to Sir Paul McCartney's "Oh, My, My!
What won't kill you, makes you stronger - But be warned - you may already own this. Due to sneaky repackaging, this is an old workout with a new cover, so you may already have it.  However, this is tough and effective.  Done a couple of times a week along with their cardio workout and you'll be in shape in no time.  This killed the first couple of times, but now it's getting better and I am seeing results.  I love the set, the music and the instructor is great.  It's motivating and challenging, but worth the effort.  Get this if you want a tighter butt and if you want your thighs a little leaner.  You'll be glad you did
A Solid Performance By Ms.Jennifer  Beals!!!. This movie is about a Parole Officer played by Jennifer Beals who falls in love with one of her ex cons . This does not sound like a very original storyline but this movie is enhanced and redeemed by a very believable and solid performance by Jennifer Beals. Sadly we do not see enough of her in movies these days which is a real shame because I think she is one very talented , underrated actress. Bravo Ms. Beals!!! (And she is pretty HOT too!!!
Well-made, with a deep spiritual sense. It is great to smell the fragrance of Christ in such contemporary persons, especially in a world full of other strange fragrances. The movie is really well-made, I enjoyed it several times.
Absolutely hilarious, but you'll either love it or hate it. When I first saw this movie on the shelf at the local video store, I had quite a bit of trepidation.  And yet, I rented it.  Now I own the DVD, and I can't count the number of times I've seen it.  No, it's not an original concept, and no, it's not Animal House.  I don't think they're really trying to be another Animal House, though, even if they give quite a few nods to that movie.What this movie is, is something light and comedic that you can sit back and enjoy.  The comedy is crude at times but well done, from the play on relationships to a dildo fencing match.As I said, you'll either love it or hate it.  If you're the type of person who has to think about any movie you see, you should probably move on to a movie that takes itself more seriously, because this one does nothing of the sort.  If you're looking for Animal House, try searching under "Animal House".  Just a suggestion.Beyond the mere comedy of the movie, they do actually have some messages hidden underneath, and we're not talking boxers or briefs.  It's a common theme about gender perceptions, peer pressure and self-esteem.  So maybe there's something to think about after all
Lightness and the Dark Side. After reading that Sven Nykvist had just died I decided to look at Fanny and Alexander again after 23 years.  He was the cinematographer of this film and was very interested in capturing light and darkness.  This film is a quarter of a century old.  Our digital ideas of film cinematography certainly have changed as well as our morals. I was just so carried away by the wonderful story of a delightfully unconventional and, by today's standards, disfunctional family of philanderers as contrasted to an extrodinarily harsh fundamentalist Protestant family and as contrasted to a family of almost magical Jews.  I don't believe this film could be remade today and it is a pity that our moral culture has changed so.
A Classic Western Starring Randolph Scott!!. Lt. Jeff Travis was a spy for renegade rebel William Clark Quantrell - who had torched and looted his way to a fortune. Now he's a wanted man - dodging his past loke so many bullets in THE STRANGER WORE A GUN. Travis arrives in Prescott, Arizona just as the law is leaving, and he finds the ex capital strangled by wholesale lawlessness. Holding the tightest grip is Confederate loyalist Jules Maurette. Maurette also rode with Quantrell - and takes credit for having once saved Travis' life. Stealing yankee gold is legitmate business to him - and with Travis' help as a spy, he hopes to &quot;divert&quot; pounds of it being shipped through Prescott aboard the Conroy Stage &amp; Freight Company. With Lifelong flame Josie pulling his holster toward California and with the stage owner's daughter pushing his heart toward justice, Travis rides the narrow gold-route to a surprising depot. A Gold-meets-gun tale of wild west intrigue starring Randolph Scott and Claire Trevor
Surprisingly good. Cat o' Nine Tails is generally considered second-tier Argento.  In fact, Argento himself isn't too jazzed on it.  But I find it to be an excellent Hitchcock-inspired suspense film.  Yeah, it lacks the stylized, highly imaginative visuals of his later films, but that's not to say it lacks filmmaking verve and invention.  Far from it.  A must-have if you're an Argento fan, but I suspect it would have more appeal to a general audience than most of his films
Blast from the past!. Watching these episodes was like stepping into a time machine and I greatly enjoyed the nostalgia. The quality of the film is much better than I would have expected.If you remember the originals, watching these again can be a lot of fun. Although I think, to be perfectly honest, the main value is in the memories. I don't see how they would interest viewers for whom the show isn't part of their own past.
What the Italian family is all about. (My copy is a Region 2, European version). A masterpiece by Italian director Lucino Visconti. Intense, emotional, realistic, passionate, dramatic story of an Italian family from the poor south (Lucania) who immigrates to the northern city of Napoli.A 3-hour film that, alternatively, focuses on each one of the sons of the 'mamma'. If "Il Gattopardo" was the drama of the aristocratic Italian family from the south, this one corresponds to the poor family also from the south. Both are cinematic gems, worthy of being included among the best in film history. Although a long film, its intensity never diminishes. Every shot is full of emotion and meaningful and beautiful.The only thing that disappointed me a little was the way it ended, the last half-hour. It's more of an open ending, no conclusion.One of the most gorgeous films in b/w that I've seen. Italy to the bones.
DVD format. This DVD is only available now in 1.33 full-screen, but as I understand it, this actually gives you MORE visual data than the theatrical version as the film was apparently originally shot in full-screen and then had the top and bottom of the screen lopped-off in theatrical rectangular shape -- and was presumably shot with this intention. As such, the full-screen version is as good or better than what we'd get from a widescreen format. (The same is true for certain other films).At any rate, the movie itself is one of those rarefied things that's so good it tends to escape hype --- or even adequate attention. The drama is understated and River Phoenix is as gulp-inducing as ever.Sad, sad, sad..
X-Files: The Non-Connoisseur, But Developing Fan Perspective. Credentials and Summary: I originally saw a few episodes from the later seasons, and some earlier ones in re-run; we are now buying them season by season (finished #1) to enjoy from the start.  Recommended for those who like SF/Mystery/Suspense genre, with only a few minor concerns for the discerning, teen-age and older family audience.  Bit too spooky for young kids and the more sensitive adults.  Thought provoking, if at times absurd, for all.  Certainly outshines virtually all other material on TV (faint praise?), and is much better to be watched straight through, without commercials and without waiting for each new season.Season One:I had only seen two episodes before (# 10, 21).  Didn't realize virtually all themes and main characters present in first season.  Conspiracy and aliens, science/skepticism vs. "believers" (The Truth Is Out There), Smoking Man and Assist. Director Skinner, The Lone Gunmen, Deep Throat, family issues of Scully and Mulder and even a pre-Krycek appearance by Nicholas Lea.  The battle over the X-Files themselves is introduced in episode one and they get closed for the first time in the last episode.Package:  We have the thin DVD set.  Quality is just fine.  We get more than enough just watching the episodes; I can't see spending a lot more for the extras in other versions.Episode Summaries (with Themes):X-cellent1) The X-Files: Pilot (Intro, Conspiracy, Aliens) - Does well to sum it all up: Fox "Spooky" Mulder, Dana "The Skeptic Scientist" Scully , aliens, sinister government agents, typical plot (unexplained paranormal mystery, Fox sees it, Dana misses it, government covers it up).2) Deep Throat (Conspiracy, Aliens) - Our favorite agents working against the government to find alien spacecraft.  A secret government insider contact is first introduced, nicknamed Deep Throat.  Features appearance by Buffy's werewolf ally.3) Squeeze (Tooms, Creature) - Eugene Tooms' Gumby-like ability threatens every 30 years.  Mulder's (poor) reputation for paranormal explanations is first exhibited.4) Conduit (Alien, Character History) - Related alien abductions detected via boy who acts as conduit for their continuing communications.10) Fallen Angel (Conspiracy, Aliens) - Mulder almost exposes cover-up of UFO crash.  Max Fenig appears as a UFO enthusiast, and the first of various X-Files followers.11) Eve (Urban Legend, Techno phobia) - Twin girls poison loved ones and fight to stay ahead of Mulder and Scully.  Super-human clones gone wild?13) Beyond the Sea (Paranormal, Character History) - Death Row psychic knows where the serial killer is and what Dana's recently deceased father is thinking.16) Young at Heart (Techno phobia) - Can Mulder's former nemesis really be stalking him, even tho' dead?  Must be a genetic experiment gone horribly right.  Connected to Mulder's first case, which went horribly wrong.17) E.B.E. (Alien, Conspiracy) - Deep Throat knows where the Extraterrestrial Biological Entity is; Mulder and Scully follow the clues, and the package, all the way to the empty containment facility. The Lone Gunmen (hackers and conspiracy theorists named for the official theory behind JFK assassination) help track the package.21) Tooms (Tooms, Creature) - Tooms, released on parole, puts the squeeze on Mulder.  Excellent scenes before judge and police investigators.22) Born Again (Paranormal) - Mulder and Scully investigate link between young girl and string of murdered police.24) The Erlenmeyer Flask (Alien, Conspiracy) - Alien viruses are being cloned, but Mulder and Scully lose the virus, the clone, the inside contact, and the key to the office.X Marks The Spot5) The Jersey Devil (Urban Legend, Relationship) - Mulder's reputation within F.B.I. really is spooky and so is Scully's date.  Wild man of the woods plot is cover for developing status of team within agency and the status of the X-Files.6) Shadows (Paranormal) - Fox and Dana investigate revenge minded poltergeist.7) Ghost in the Machine (Conspiracy, Urban Legend) - Our agents investigate killer computer.  DoD wants the software!  Sub-plot with Mulder's former partner.8) Ice (Alien) - X-Files version of The Thing/Who Goes There? [SF fans?]. FBI sends our agents to investigate parasitic alien life form at remote Alaskan research station.  Features appearance by future Desperate Housewife and C.T.U. agent.14) Genderbender (Alien, Paranormal, Religion) - Gender changing murderer hiding out with religious sect is sent searching for a new sanctuary planet by the FBI.  Agent Krycek makes brief appearance, apparently on a special, top-secret assignment.15) Lazarus (Paranormal) - Dana`s turn with the ex, as co-agent who gets possessed by spirit of criminal.19) Shapes (Urban Legend, Occult) - Mulder and Scully search for wolf/man Indian legend.20) Darkness Falls (Paranormal) - Mulder and Scully avoid being cocooned by ancient insects released by unsuspecting loggers in the deep forest.23) Roland (Paranormal, Techno phobia) - Mulder and Scully suspect autistic Roland in murders of aerospace scientists.  A favorite of wind tunnel engineers.  Roland later joins Bosnian rebels seeking revenge on Jack Bauer.X-Out9) Space (Alien) - Mulder suspects Martian spirit is behind Space Shuttle sabotage.  An alien thread not further pursued, and overall lower production values than typical.12) Fire (Paranormal, Relationship) - Fox helps former British girlfriend investigate pyrokinetic man stalking the aristocracy.  Early lame attempt to start developing Fox/Dana relationship.18) Miracle Man (Paranormal, Religion) - Our agents investigate healing ministry, when more seem to be dying than living.  A bit stereotypically paranoid.- - - - - - - - - - - -
Fabulous for artistic development. I recently bought this DVD for my 2 yr old. She absolutelyloves it.  The music is wonderful. Since she has been watchingit, we have seen her interest(and ability) in drawing growconsiderably. I recommend this Dvd wholeheartedly
Shocking because it's true... If you love crime dramas,especially the one's based on true stories,then "The FBI Murders" is the film for you.Despite it's low-budget "Made-for-TV" trappings...I consider this to be just as powerful as the Al Pacino/Robert DeNiro thriller "Heat".For those of you who don't remember, "In the line of duty" was a series of TV movies profiling the couragous and sometimes harrowing true tales of law enforcement officers and their bravery under fire.Over the years,the quality of these hard-hitting dramas have lost their luster...But the "FBI Murders" stands out as one of the best in the crime genre.This particular movie centers on two Vietnam vets (David Soul and Michael Gross) who use their military training to pull off a string of violent,commando-style,bank and armored car robberies from the Fall of 1985 to the Spring of 1986 in Florida to support their families,mistresses,and lavish lifestyle after their series of hair-brained "get rich quick" schemes fall through.Their lightning-quick strikes and disappearances has left the police,and even the FBI's elite robbery task force,one fatal step behind.Like the film "Heat",which I referenced earlier,the film focuses on the personal lives of the robbers and the agents.Michael Gross turns in a chilling character that is a far cry from his "sensitive dad" persona of "Family Ties".Gross's character is a scary psychopath who may or may not have been behind the brutal murder of his first wife and who is certainly abusive to his current wife and children despite his aura of Christian respectability.David Soul on the other hand is the opitamy of the "slow burning fuse".He's cold,calculating,and throughly dangerous.On the FBI side,the focus is on the lead investigator in the robberies played by Ronny Cox.He's a straight arrow veteran who has no wife and kids...he's married to the FBI.What's worse is he's having to break in a hot-shot kid (Bruce Greenwood in an early role) as his new partner.The rest of the FBI unit is the picture of the "brotherhood of lawmen" cliche.They kid around with one another,they even have affectionate names and a few of them have interesting personal stories.For instance,when the head of the department (the actor's name escapes me, unfortunately) learns that a civilian who followed the bandits after one of their heists,traces the killers into the agent's neighborhood,the agent grow afraid that his family could end up victims and begins prowling the area for their getaway car.Another agent grapples with trying to make his young son understand that he doesn't go around getting into gunfights like the TV Cop Shows portray.As the tension builds around these personal stories....the robbers are getting more and more desperate.And the agents are getting more and more determaned.And that climaxes into what has now been called one of the FBI's bloodiest shoot-outs.For high tension and high drama...this movie delivers.
Meaty Entertainment. Though short of classic status, "Prime Cut" has alot to recommend it.  Director Michael Ritchie has a sharp eye for Middle-America ambience and stages some good action set pieces.  Lee Marvin is in classic tough guy form as Devlin, the bagman sent by the Chicago bosses to collect a debt from sleazy Mary Ann(Gene Hackman), whose Kansas City meat plant is a front for a more lucrative trade in white slavery and narcotics.  Hackman, in what is in essence an extended cameo, makes a colorful impression here.  Sissy Spacek, as a girl entrapped in Hackman's operation, isn't really given much to do in her film debut but is easy on the eyes in a fresh-faced kind of way.  The film breezes by at an economical 86 minutes.  Interesting casting here with Gregory Walcott("Plan 9 from Outer Space" infamy) as Hackman's brother and Eddie Egan(the real-life inspiration for Popeye Doyle of "The French Connection" fame) as a Chicago mob boss
HILARIOUS!!. This show is one of the best in awhile. Then again, HBO is superior. Jeremy Piven, who plays Ari Gold in the series, will keep you laughing. Definitely a must see. If you like Curb Your Enthusiasm you will like Entourage. (even though Curb is my favorite of the two I still love Entourage!
Where have all the French subtitles/audio gone?. Since these are Region 1 DVDs -- USA and Canada -- the official languages are English and French, so both audio and subtitles should be provided in both languages.  Subtitles help people with hearing difficulties, and help all when actors don't speak clearly or aren't recorded well.Spanish is a good third choice.[BTW, it would be nice if subtitle authors were required to be proficient in the source and destination languages.  Ideally, they would have access to the script.  Also, they should not make common, elementary English errors: its vs. it's, maybe vs. may be, everyday vs. every day, a lot (not alot), till or until (not 'til or til), Internet (not internet), could've or could have (not could of), OK or okay or even O.K. (not Ok or ok), for a while (not for awhile), I used to (not I use to), omitting the second delimiter of parenthetical information, hyphenating two words (a-b) when they mean to put a dash between two parts of a sentence (a--b, a - b, or a -- b), vs. or v. (not vs), etc. or et cetera (not etc...), etc.  Punctuation doesn't matter much in e-mail or in Web reviews, but these subtitle authors are being paid as professionals to create something that lasts.
Excellent 1st part, but quite a cliff hanger. Karas was a masterpeice. Anime at it's finest. It made me angry though. The ending, supposed to be a cliff hanger (since it is a supposed series), wasn't very good at all. The animation style was excellent and voice acting was spot on.So far, the second best animated movie this year, only surpassed by FF7: Advent Children
Loved it, so entertaining ... I have loved the comic series and I definitely loved the movie, RJ, Vern and Hammy especially will forever be my favorite urban forest critters. The forest critters meets suburbia is so smart, and as funy as the comic it was based on.
As good as ever, if not better!!!!. I purchased this season with trepidation as I was dubious about the changes in the casting as i had loved the previous 8 seasons with Richard Dean Anderson and the rest. The humour was excellent and each episode was most enjoyable leaving me always wanting more. Well, imagine my surprise when i watched the first few episodes to find that the changes had not detracted from the show at all but made it every bit as good as before. The writers etc have not tried to replace the O'Niell character but have introduced a new dynamic with some excellent humour. The episodes have been very good and while I still have 4 episodes to watch, I am hoping that the rumours about the show being cancelled after season 10 are not true. I will watch this show for as long as it is available. (I have to watch on DVD as i do not get the show on TV here). I love the new humour from all the cast and the transition from the Gou'Ald to the Ori has been interestingly handled. It is also great to see that the team do not always succeed, but i hope that they do eventually overcome the ORI.As for the extras, I have enjoyed those I have watched, but I generally do not buy DVDs for the extras rather for the show/movie. The extras are a bonus.I would heartily recommend this season to any of the Stargate fans out there who are dubious due to the cast change. For those who have yet to watch eny episode, rather watch the first 8 seasons first, then this one as there are references to past incidents with flash backs that are not likely to make sense if you haven't seen them.Roll on the next season!!!!
venus in furs. first off i liked the way he wanted to do it from the blackman viewpoint.to bad he backed down. would have had more KICK. too busy. to much jumping around.great music mr franco setting in on the sets was nice like hitchcock. not enough salsa!!!!!
Great Workout!. This is an excellent workout if you are feeling not-so-challenged by typical prenatal yoga classes and would like to build strength and keep toned. I am 35 weeks and can still do the entire video and feel great after! Highly recommend this video for strengthening, paired with typical prenatal yoga for stretching and flexibility!! It's a great combo to keep you feeling great throughout your pregnancy
My son loves this movie. I don't "get" Pokemon; in fact, I think it's pretty dumb.  However, my son LOVES Pokemon.  He has video games and books; I can credit the books and the role playing games on the Gameboy with helping him along with his reading.  As a present, I bought him this movie, and he has watched it many, many times and loves it.  If you have a child that likes Pokemon, then this is a good gift
Brilliant and Classy British Comedy. A rich and striking widow becomes poor with a parvenu purchasing her ancestral estate.  She moves into a cottage close the palatial estate. The widow and parvenu interact; hilarity ensues, class and breading are examined.  Social conflicts are abound.  The boredom of the gentrifying British countryside is magnified. The widow and the parvenu fall in love.  A copycat cheap romance novel, perhaps?  No, brilliant British comedy called "To the Manor Born".Audrey fforbes-Hamilton (played by Penelope Keith) takes control of her dead husband's home, Grantleigh Manor. She finds that the estate is heavily in debt and that the creditors insist on selling the estate. When the estate is put up for auction, she hopes that the all family members will rally around and raise the money to buy the estate, but she is unable to raise enough. She is horrified when the purchaser turns out to be Richard de Vere (Peter Bowles). De Vere is not only 'a nouveau riche grocer' - he owns a supermarket chain - but a foreigner. The worst thing that can happen to the landed British gentry!  His real name is Bedrich Polouvicki, and both he and his mother, Mrs. Polouvicka (Daphne Heard) are originally from Bratislava, Czechoslovakia. They both take up residence in the manor.Audrey, able to retain only the services of her butler, Brabinger (John Rudling) and her vintage Rolls Royce, buys the Manor's former gatekeeper's lodge ("this rabbit hutch") which DeVere had originally intended buying before the manor house came on the market. From the "Old Lodge" (as it is known) she can keep an eye on developments at the manor. Her best friend Marjory Frobisher (Angela Thorne) also has eyes for Richard. Audrey soon sets about teaching Richard the concept of noblesse oblige and working her way back into the life of the manor, whilst dealing with the awkwardness of maintaining the social graces - and simply keeping body and soul together - without any money. Eventually, Richard develops romantic designs, but Audrey will not consider marriage unless she is mistress of her own fortunes.In due course, Richard is forced to sell the manor to fund a business deal, and he returns to London. Coincidentally, Audrey's rich Uncle Greville (Ballard Berkeley, who played The Major in Fawlty Towers) dies and leaves his fortune to her. So she is able to buy back the manor. Richard is invited to the party to celebrate her good fortune and they agree to marry.Very, very warmly recommended
Great epic that also works as a moving family drama. "Il Gattopardo" (1963) is a stunning 3+ hours film that is one of the best epics ever made by the only director who could've made it. The film is a rare example of epic that also works well as a moving family drama.Prince Fabricio Salina (Burt Lancaster, magnificent in this performance which almost did not happen) is the great man full of energy and power who knows that his world of noble aristocrats is doomed to disappear in new Italy united as republic. He is a Leopard of the title, and these are his words, "The leopards and lions are being replaced by jackals and hyenas ... and they all think they're the salt of the earth." Lancaster is one of reasons I loved the film so much.The film also features two of my favorite actors, young Alain Delon who played Salina's favorite nephew, Tancredi, and heavenly beautiful Claudia Cardinale as Angelica, Tancredi's beloved.Each moment and each frame of the film are breathtaking, and the final act, an hour-long ballroom extravaganza, ranks among the grandest cinematic set pieces of all time.
Classic John Woo With A Twist. To say "Bullet In The Head" is just another one of Woo's gun-slinging, bullet-dodging feel-good action movies would be to discredit the director's much more ambitious undertaking on this project.  No doubt "Bullet" delivers the usual action thrill ride to satisfy the average fan of this genre, but a closer look will tell you that Woo is also attempting a serious discourse here on the socio-political upheavals in 1960's Asia, and more importantly, an examination of human nature in relation to war and violence.The story takes place in Hong Kong in the 1960's.  Three young men (played by Tony Leung Chiu Wai, Jacky Cheung, and Waise Lee) with distinct personalities, but all from the same poor working class neighborhood, decide to embark on a Chinese mafia-sponsored smuggling scheme to Vietnam.  They arrive at their destination, only to find that the chaos and violence on the streets of Saigon isn't much different from that of the world that they had known back in Hong Kong.  Soon they are making enemies with the mafia, and are hunted by the South Vietnamese military.  Ultimately, their friendship is called into question as they consume themselves in a deadly melee bound by survival, greed and vengeance.All of Woo's classic themes are on display in this movie --- namely the themes of fraternity, vengeance, and the tragic hero.  However, the portrait of Asia in the 1960's as a historical backdrop to the story proves to be more than incidental.  The period was an era of great social and political turmoil in Asia, as it was in most of the other parts of the world.  Hong Kong was deeply divided between the royalists and the anti-imperialist student movement spurted by the new communist regime in Mainland China (Woo himself has actually said that he had taken inspiration from the political unrest from the 1989 Tiananmen Square student protests in China in making this movie), whereas Vietnam saw itself torn apart by a bloody civil war that knew no bounds to its horrific toll on its own people.  Woo, although probably bogged with the usual problems that plagues Hong Kong cinema, namely a low budget and production values, manages to capture the chaos and distress of his generation --- there are plenty of realistic scenes of student protesters clashing with the police on the streets of Hong Kong, and guerilla warfare in the muddy jungles of Vietnam.  Woo first exposes the corruptive South Vietnamese regime, and the ruthlessness that it employs in treating the revolutionaries, however, the audience soon sees the communist rebels in the mountains, whose bloodthirsty and sadistic ways mirror the very regime that they are trying to overthrow.  Caught in the crossfire are the lives of innocent civilians, who become sacrifices to a war where there's really no rights and wrongs, and where human beings are merely pawns in the quest for power and fortunes.  One actually begins to wonder whether or not the director is asserting an anti-war message in this movie.As is characteristic with most of Woo's early Hong Kong work, the brilliance of this movie lies not in the plot and its execution, which is at times loose and hasty, but in the way the actors shine through the sincere portrayals of their characters.  Tony Leung ("In The Mood For Love") delivers a convincing performance as the conflicted leader of the pack, who faces many internal strives throughout the movie.  Waise Lee ("A Better Tomorrow") paints a decent transformation of a man who turns into a monster consumed by greed.  The award for most notable performance, however, must go to Jacky Cheung.  Cheung ("As Tears Go By"), a Cantonese pop singer by trade in real life, plays a man who is pushed past the edges of his humanity by the insanity of war and sadistic violence, and who goes through the dramatic change from a working class street delinquent to a deranged, cold-blooded assassin who kills for money to fill his morphine addiction.  Cheung succeeds in delivering a convincing performance with a sort of unreserved sincerity in his acting.  That sincerity, although at times a bit overly earnest in this movie, is genuine throughout.  One can not help but feel both pity and indignation for his character as he wrestles madly for the injection syringe, and stares blindly into the eyes of his long-lost friend, Leung, as the latter decides that he must kill his best friend in order to save him from further suffering.In the end, Woo does not offer a moralistic judgment on his characters or the events surrounding them in this movie, as is true with a lot of his other work.  What he is more interested in here is how a human being reacts, and is transformed by the situation that he's forced into.  In this case it's three young and ambitious men who had set out to take over the world, but in confronting the realities of war and violence, find that it's the exact opposite that takes place.  Also thematic of Woo's work is that the victory of the good in the face of evil is never obvious, even the line between good and evil itself is extremely elusive, and the heroes do not always live.  What he seems to be implying here is that violence and virtues are often irrevocably linked, and the survival of the body is determined by the survival of the will.
Excellent As Always. This Wiggles Live in the USA DVD is wonderful to watch especially since we saw them perform in Chicago. It's a must have even more so now that Greg Wiggle has retired, and it is one of his last live performances. It has a great extra episode, and everything about it is very good
The Flying Nun is hilarious!. I thought The Flying Nun was largely forgotten, but given the amount of trashy and low-quality "entertainment" which is flying off the production lines, it warms my heart to see such quality shows like "The Flying Nun" and "The Mary Tyler Moore Show" being released on DVD.  Even the kids enjoyed watching Sister Bertrille, Carlos and the gang.  Buy it
Slightly Better than Average Teen Exploitation Moview. It's a teen exploitation movie. That means you already know the plot. Gut has hots for girl and is willing to do "whatever it takes" to get her, even be incredibly stupid. That's what the genre is all about so people should not be surprised when that happens. In essence, guys, especially young ones, tend to do hilarious things to satisfy their...desires. This movie goes a step better.Synopsis: one of the school geeks is infatuated by the head cheerleader but lives next door to the proverbial "beautiful girl next door". A cousin of the head cheerleader, a jock, wants to add the "girl next door" to his scorecard. The two guys get togther to make each other's fantasies come true. Along the way, the "nice ones" learn important lessons and the "not so nice" ones get their comeuppance. Its as predictable as the sunset. It's still funny.Where this movie does its best is in the way it charactures the popular people. They are usually depicted as shallow and vapid. They still are but are taken to new heights of idiocy. It's fun to see them get taken down a peg by some nice kids who find each other.Don't expect any education from this film. Its strictly for laughs. Its not the best but it is certainly entertaining
The clown "IT" By: Stephen King. The clown "IT" is a cereal killer. He comes and goes and no one ever knows where he will pop up next. But every time he does pop up he ends up killing someone or something. When the killing happens the person that dies doesn't really expect "IT" coming. When this happens something odd happens to them or part of there property. An example would be losing power to there house in middle of the night. So begins the exciting and scary book. I thing that Stephen king deserves all the rewards that this book has won. Children twelve and up should have a copy of this book for there home library because this book could keep you going for hours if you like scary fun filled books
Not a sequal, just another story. I hate seeing the spotlight reviews with negative comments.  This was not a continuation of the story we were given, but also the last mini-series was a tale told by Merlin himself, and Martin Short's character Frik says that it was not how he remembered the happenings. This time we view the events after the Death of Arthur, when evil seems to overcome the goodness that King Arthur and Camelot has now for hundreds of years we all keep in our harts.  What makes an Authurian story good is by reminding us of this.A new cast & crew does not bring about the magical presence of before, but each cast member creates a different artform for their characters in this "day after" action story.  We are shown the flaws and goodness of characters who will rise to become the next heroes of Camelot.  This is what makes the magic for this movie.  Merlin is not the same character, he is more bitter and carries guilt of the fall of Arthur, much like the Merlin in classic writings.  Do not judge this movie because it is not a sequel in general terms, judge it as its own art and its own story.Their is hope for goodness when Camelot rises again.  For with a new story comes new heroes.  The Arthurian Legend grows with a new action-packed film
Great martial arts workout that's authentic & not watered down & excentuates posture/balance. POSE GUIDE: Explaination of YOGA poses for 11 min: moutain, moutain w/extended arms, standing forward bend, chair pose, plank/pushup, downward facing dog, downard dog w/knee to forhead, downward dog w/straight leg raised, modified cresant, hamstring stretch (kinda kneeling w/straight forward leg), side angle from cresent, upward dog/corbra, cresent, warrior 1, warrior 2, side angle, triangle. Exaplaination of Martial art Poses for 8 min: horse stance, horse w/center punch, front/offensive stance, pivot punch, defensive stance/side, rear leg knee kick, cat stance, cat w/front kick, rear leg front kick, lunge punching down, cat w/round kick, skip in front kick, squat w/rear leg front kick, rear knee front kick combo.SHORT WORKOUT   min: Yoga: moutain, mountain w/arms, forward bend, chair, plank, downward dog, plank, downward dog, downward dog w/straight leg raise & knee to forehead, lunge, mod. cresent, hamstring stretch, twisted cresent, downward dog w/straight leg raise & knee to forehead, lunge, hamstring stretch, twisted cresent, downward dog, plank, upward dog, downward dog, cresent, downward dog, cresent, downward dog, plank, upward dog, warrior 1, downward dog, warrior 1, downward dog, plank, upward dog, downward dog, warrior 2, side angle, downward dog, warrior 2, side angle, downward dog, plank, upward dog, downward dog, warrior 1, warrior 2, triangle, downward dog, warrior 1, warrior 2, triangle, downward dog, plank, upward dog, downward dog, standing forward bend, moutain for total of 16 min.  Martial Arts 9 min: defensive w/pivot punches in singles & triples, fighting stance w/rear knee kicks, cat w/front kick, lunge punches, cat w/round kick, squat w/front kick, single pivot punches, triple pivot punches, defensive w/knee kick, cat w/front kick, front kick w/rear leg, lunge punches, cat w/roundhouse kicks, skip in front kicks & squat w/front kicks for 9 min at 25 min mark, ending with a 2 min standing meditation.FULL WORKOUT 39 min.: 3 min intro, YOGA: mountain, moutain w/arms, forward bend, chair, plank, downward dog, plank, downward dog w/straight leg raise & knee to forehead, lunge, modified cresent, hamstring stretch, twisted cresent, downard dog, knee to forehead again, lunge, mod. cresent, hamstring, side twist, upward dog, downward dog, cresent, downward dog, upward dog, downard dog, warrior 1, downward dog, warrior 1, downward dog, upward dog, downward dog, warrior 2, side angle, warrior 2, side angle, downard dog, plank, upward dog, warrior 2, triangle, downward dog, warrior 1, triangle, downward dog, plank, upward dog, downward dog, standing forward bend, moutain for 18 min. at the 21 min mark.    Martial Arts: horse stance w/center punches single & double, front stance w/pivot punches, defensive/side stance w/rear knee kick, cat stance w/front kick, defensive stance w/rear leg front kick, defensive stance w/lunge punch, cat w/round kick, defensive stance w/skip in front kick, squat w/front kick, repeat all for other side for 14 min total, then standing meditation for 3 min.I wouldn't recommend this to anyone who doesn't have at least average strength/endurance & I hesistate to suggest to anyone who's never taken at least a few weeks of martial arts classes to get the basics. He has a nice soft voice, but the yoga felt a bit too repetitive for me, he could have added more variety.There's a trailer at collagevideo or also at gaiam which has the trailer in better qualit
A family film but maybe not for all of them. Tim Burton is one of those kind of directors where 2 or 3 of his films out of a whole filmography goes into a debate on which one's the best. For Spielberg people say it's E.T or Schindler's List, for Kurosawa it's either Rashomon or Seven Samurai while for Ridley Scott people say it's Alien or Gladiator. You probably even disagreed with me right there, well for Tim Burton it comes down to either Edward Scissorhands or Ed Wood. Well certainly this film is quite enjoyable but don't think it's one of those family films for all ages like Grinch Stole Christmas or something. But at a certain age, they'll love it.High atop the mountain near a suburbia-like neighborhood rests an old castle with an old inventor living inside. He decides to create a son only he's not finished and has scissors for hands. Well Peg Boggs, an overanxious Avon lady goes to the castle and finds Edward and decides to bring him home. Eventually he develops a following for his talent with topiary, unique hairstyling and pet grooming. However like any small neighborhood, anything bad and it becomes gossip which leads to misunderstandings.Since he is the title character, Edward Scissorhands has to deliver and who better than Johnny Depp. He's one of those kind of actors that you can write probably any part, no matter how wide the spectrum and he'll somehow make it work. From an effeminate pirate in Pirates of the Caribbean to a shy awkward Ichabod Crane, he gets you on his side. The rest of the cast is of course perfect from Dianne West to Anthony Michael Hall(!) to the always-a-cutie Winona Ryder. Even Vincent Price shows up as the inventor.Of course it's a family film so it's very vibrant and colorful and full of trademark Burtonisms. One can make a case that his films tend to be great set design with the occasional good film sometimes attached to it well Scissorhands manages to be very eye-catching as well as being just a solid film. It's a real-life story interwoven with aspects reminiscent of a fairy tale and for that it's a successful mix.There is one thing however you might want to be cautious about: its..."mature" aspects. No there's no sex but there's some small amounts of violence(don't worry, nothing Sleepy Hollow-esque here). A couple of people are cut because of Ed's scissors with accompanying blood and there's also some small swearing(no f words). It's essentially the perfect family film for outsiders, people who can handle it but if you're thinking this is in line with Bambi or Cinderella well you'd be quite mistaken.What are super disappointing is the extras. Basically it's a featurette(those back-patting "that guy's great to work with" EPK you see on TV), 2 separate commentaries by Tim Burton who's his usual non-gabby self and a score commentary with Danny Elfman. No featurette on Vincent Price who actually had his last starring role in this film? An in-depth look behind the music, art design, Depp's training with scissors, a retrospective on the making? It's quite clearly a big missed opportunity.It's hard to recommend since my comments about its mild language and violence still stand but this is still one of Burton's better films and one of the best from the 90's
Enjoyed the film, but.......................... I'm little unclear if this was the same or similar historical event that took place at the TA Ranch in Buffalo Wyoming. Where a man and a woman got hung by the cattle barons. Other film had Tom Barenger in it was called Johnson County War
Regarding the urban legend that George Reeves was cut from this film:. Actually, it's an urban legend of sorts that George Reeves's role in FROM HERE TO ETERNITY was cut down due to his sudden popularity as Superman. The source of this tale is Jack Larson, who starred with Reeves as Jimmy Olsen on the Superman show. He saw the film (FHTE) the day it opened and remembers audience members calling out "There's Superman." The next time he saw the film, he says Reeves's role had been severely cut.The problem with this is manifold. First, Jack's next viewing of the film, as he told me personally, was some twenty-five years later. I'm convinced that his memory of what he'd seen in that initial viewing had "expanded" over the years, particularly in light of the impact of Superman typecastingon Reeves's career and life. Secondly, Daniel Taradash's first-draft screenplay, and every draft thereafter, contains exactly the scenes for Reeves's character that are in the film as released and as now seen, and not one scene more nor less. Taradash told me personally that he did not write a single scene for Reeves's character that was not in the final releaseprint or in subsequent video releases. Thirdly, director Fred Zinneman told me personally that not only was not one of Reeves's scenes cut from the film, but that not one frame of the film was cut after the first audience screenings. He was at the same viewing that Jack Larson attended and, while he allowed as that there might have been some muttered reference to Superman from audience members, he does not remember any and that in any case, there was no impact whatsoever on the film as released, nor even any discussion of the matter. He said the video release of the film is identical to the original theatrical release and that not one frame of Reeves's scenes was cut for any such reason. Fourthly, the editor of the film and its assistant director also confirmed and concurred with the statements of Taradash and Zinneman. Fifthly, several of the cast members, including Frank Sinatra and Claude Akins, assured me they knew of no such reduction in Reeves's screentime for any reason.Part of the problem may stem from the fact that Sgt. Maylon Stark, Reeves's character, is a vastly more important character in the novel of FROM HERE TO ETERNITY. Scores of characters from that huge book were either trimmed or eliminated. Sgt. Stark remained, but in a smallish way, in the film. But it was a small part in the first place, long before George Reeves was cast. It was never reduced further, due to his Superman fame or for any other reason
I'd give it 4 1/2 stars if I could. I was skeptical about this film and expected to be disappointed, but on the contrary, I was pleasantly surprised.  The essential thing to remember is that this is Maurice Pialat's *vision* of Van Gogh, not a documentary.  Taken in that spirit, there is much here for Vincent fans to enjoy.  Those unfamiliar with van Gogh's life and work will likely be lost (and probably bored), but those who are familiar with Vincent and his oeuvre will appreciate the research Pialat put into this film and the artistic choices he made.  I also encourage viewers who may have felt they missed something the first time to watch it a second time, because there are many small things best noticed the second time round.  One detail I particularly appreciated was the replication of van Gogh's actual room at the Auberge Ravoux in Auvers-sur-Oise for this film (not the case in "Lust for Life" or "Vincent and Theo"); those who have visited the Auberge and been moved by their experience--like myself--will feel a surge of recognition the first time that humble little room appears onscreen.Of course there are some major inaccuracies/speculations that Pialat uses to fuel the drama.  The most obvious is the central love affair of the film (with Marguerite Gachet), which is Pialat's invention and is most implausible for a number of reasons.  But it serves its purpose in the context of the film. I did not get the impression (as did one reviewer below) that the affair was presented as a motive for the suicide--it's not. The suicide and the affair both result from a larger malaise.Jacques Dutronc is simply extraordinary as Vincent, his acting filled with subtlety.  He doesn't stoop to histrionics or scenery-chewing...he doesn't need to.  Every gesture, every facial expression, every look in his eyes says something about the character.  No wonder he won a Cesar for the role.  This is neither the Vincent of "Lust for Life" (Kirk Douglas' tormented soul searching for love and understanding) nor the Vincent of "Vincent and Theo" (Tim Roth's mad-as-a-hatter egoist).  This Vincent has a quiet cup of coffee before he goes to work in the morning and escapes Dr. Gachet's house to enjoy a solitary lunch in the wheatfields (the latter is one of my favorite moments of the film--simple but lyrical). There's no sign of the "mad artist" of the van Gogh mythology.  The suicide comes as much a surprise in the film as it must have in real life.  We don't see it coming.Apparently there's a Region 2 DVD available in the UK with deleted scenes and bonus materials.  I wish it were available as a Region 1 DVD in the US!
Unfortunately short and comparitively not worth the money. Get A Life was literally so far ahead of it's time it only lasted 3 seasons, and part of me is AMAZED that it lasted that long.  Vol 1 only encompasses 4 of the 36 original Get A Life episodes, and though the 4 it does have are damned funny, they're not worth $10 a peice to own.It seems like everyone I know remembers the misadventures of the 30+ year old Paperboy with the title track of "Stand" by REM.  And almost all of them kind of wonder "what the hell happened to that show?" OR they wonder "what the hell was that show all about?".Basically, the show was the father figure to such weird, off based shows such as Malcolm In The Middle or Arrested Development, because it uses a very dark, twisted "what the hell?" kind of humor that is only believeable in television, but all together hilarious.  If you think Arrested Development was "ahead of it's time" (critics claimed this regularly) then that would be Get A Life would be the equivilent to a Caveman holding a quarter pounder, a flashlight, and a glock with a laser sight.This show was great and needs to be re-issued on DVD (preferrably in 12 episode, FULL SEASON, DVD's)
Heil Klink and Pass the Ammunition!. The lovable antics of Colonel Robert Hogan and his merry band of heroes, working from inside Stalag 13, a German POW camp.
Breakout performance by Morgan Woodward. Dagger of the MindAfter exchanging cargo with the penal colony on planet Tantalus Five the Enterprise unknowingly takes onboard an inmate who was hiding inside one of the crates beamed up from the planet. The colony contacts the Enterprise to warn them of the escape and that the inmate is an extremely violent and dangerous case. Kirk orders a security alert and the search begins for an intruder that proves to be more than a match for the Enterprise's security detachment. The intruder who makes his way to the bridge holds the command crew at gun point identifying himself as Simon Van Gelder. He asks for asylum and not to be taken back to Tantalus and threatens to disable the ship by destroying crucial operating controls if his demands aren't met. Kirk and Spock are able to subdue Van Gelder, and the ship is ordered back to Tantalus.In the sick bay Van Gelder struggles to tell Kirk and McCoy about his horrific ordeal. Each word that Van Gelder attempts to speak seems to cause him immense pain. Checking the library tapes Spock learns that Simon Van Gelder is actually Dr. Simon Van Gelder and that he was assigned to the colony six months prior. Contacting the colony, Kirk talks to Dr. Tristan Adams the leader of the Tantalus Penal Colony who tells Kirk that Van Gelder's injuries occurred after he tried an experimental beam on himself. McCoy after having examined Van Gelder has his doubts about Adams's story. Following regulations meant that Kirk would have to file a report and therefore investigate the matter personally. McCoy assigns Dr. Helen Noel from the ship's Psychiatry Department to assist Kirk in determining if there was anything going wrong at the colony. Upon beaming down to the surface and after a stomach churning elevator ride straight down Kirk and Noel are greeted by Dr. Adams. Everything seems to be in order, as Adams takes the duo on a guided tour of the facility. On the tour Kirk visits where Van Gelder's accident took place, a room where the experimental beam called a neural neutralizer was kept. Adams told Kirk and Noel the equipment was an experiment that went wrong and that it was only used in the more severe cases in the hope that it would do some good. The equipment was in use and the technician at the controls gave Kirk a quick tutorial on its operation. The operator controls the intensity of a beam which is directly over the subject who is seated in a chair. The operator places suggestions into the patient's mind via a microphone and these suggestions with help from the intensity of the beam help cure the patient.Van Gelder warns Spock and McCoy about the neural neutralizer, despite the warnings Kirk decides to stay overnight to continue the investigation. Spock decides to use an ancient Vulcan mind technique on Simon Van Gelder to reach into the doctor's tortured mind. The Enterprise Captain, puzzled about the blankness of the people he had met during his tour and his growing suspicions about Adams himself prompt Kirk to want to take another look at the site of Van Gelder's accident. Using the Vulcan mind technique Spock learns about what Dr. Adams did to Van Gelder. Kirk and Noel make it to the neural neutralizer room and decide to experiment with the device. With Noel at the controls and Kirk in the chair as the "test subject" they learn that it is an extremely effect device. Adams and his henchman "interrupt" their experiment and conduct an experiment of their own. Dr. Adams uses the beam to bend Kirk to his will and suggest that he can't live without Helen Noel a woman with whom Kirk had a brief affair with in the past. Adams tortures Kirk and makes him turn over his phaser and communicator. Kirk tries to resist but the beam, pain and Adams's suggestions are too strong.Back in their quarters Kirk and Noel plan their escape. Exiting the room via the air ducts Kirk orders Noel to find the power source and short circuit the planet's security screen, a screen that when in operation prevents beaming. Adams continues to torture Kirk with the device and upon learning that Noel had escaped increases the beams intensity to learn where she was at, and with what instructions she had been given. On board the Enterprise Spock attempts to break through the security screen using different transporter frequencies with no success. Noel makes her way to the reactor room, and after kicking a guard into some live circuits temporarily knocks out the planetary security screen as well as several power systems allowing Spock to beam down to the planet. When the power fades out in the neural neutralizer room the beam shuts off allowing Kirk escape the room after knocking out Adams and his henchman, while Spock after beaming down to the planet permanently disables the security screen. Spock also restores the power which reactivates the neural neutralizer with Adams left helpless in the room exposed to the beam. Kirk, Spock and Noel later discover Adams dead in the room, having died from the affects of the machine without even a tormentor for company. Van Gelder having recovered from his injuries returns to the colony to continue his assignment and has the neural neutralizer dismantled forever.Great performances by a young Marianna Hill, as well as experienced actors James Gregory and Morgan Woodward
A Lady Takes a Chance. I've watched this movie at least a dozen times.  Fine romance!  My gosh he was a sexy young man! GREAT chemistry between him and Jean Arthur.  Thoroughly enjoyable
interesting. This movie is covers the life of Wyatt Earp from his mid teens to his late sixties. It spends most of its time in Dodge City and Tombstone.It is a OK film. It is three hours long and can get sort of slow. The first fifty minutes or so are hard to get through. But once you are past the 54 minute mark, things pick up and it gets more interesting.It is not as good as Tombstone.
a compassionate plea for freedom. alejandro amenabars biopic of ramon sampedro, who carried on a years-long effort for the right to die on his own terms. whatever your feelings on the controversy, there is no denying the power of javier bardems performance, nor the other performances by a terrific cast, all fairly representing the struggles each goes thru in accepting (or rejecting) participation in the final deed.
BRAVO WB and Errol Flynn!  possibly better than vol. 1!!!. Okay...I just bounced around this set and can tell everyone that the transfers are typically excellent for Warner Bros (the absolute BEST studio at handling classic titles!)...the extras are plentiful and just too much fun.  The Warner Bros Night at the movies concept is really terrific and they seem to work hard to dig up material from the day that really add to the experience and place the films  in historical context.and speaking of the films...WOW!  Its nice to see Errol out of the green tights and in a suit and tie. There isn't a clunker in the group...Charge of the light brigade is a stone cold  classic and another in a long series of pairings with Ms DeHavilland, Dawn Patrol features David Niven (also co-starring in Charge)...Dive Bomber is an early Technicolor triumph and perhaps the jewel of the collection is Gentleman Jim (reportedly Flynn's favorite of his films).  What Flynn set would be complete however without a swashbuckler  and Adventures of Don  Juan ...delivers the goods with a brilliant technicolor transfer ...and commentary by the late great director Vincent Sherman!!This is a terrific package at a ridiculous price...I've spent this much for 2 tickets for a current movie and this is a collection I will treasure.  Thanks WB! Please let 2008 bring volume 3!
Shakira...ROCKS!!!. Shakira proves why she is the best International Pop/Rock star in the world today, on this DVD!  Her live show is energetic, with powerful vocals and rockin' band!  The documentary takes you behind the scenes and into her life.  Which gives a great introspective view on both her professional life as well as her personal life.
Floored. A long time coming.  I never saw the theatrical release, and I still haven't.  As with 'Blade Runner,' it should be obvious to everyone by now that Ridley Scott is (or at least used to be) a director better left to his own devices and sensibilities.  The Director's Cut is essentially the European release, and it is something else.  It's horrific and beautiful beyond compare in the best fairy tale tradition, intensely glorious, and kept me on the edge of my chair from beginning to end.  Tom Cruise's role is relatively simple, but his intensity and earnestness has always served him well, and never better here.  Mia Sara's loveliness transcends into the realm of archetypes.  David Bennent is riveting, Tim Curry profoundly good.  Where are the Oscars for this film?  10 stars.
An extremely good deal for all Pokemon fans willing to put up the cash. This boxed set, while a bit more pricey than any individual DVD, is well worth the money. It contains every episode from Pokemon Advanced DVD volumes 1-4 (with approximately 7 episodes on each of 3 discs, for a total of 20). Purely in economic terms, this is a major bargain; buying all 4 volumes individually would run between $50-$60, or about $15-$25 more. If you are going to get the Pokemon Advanced DVD's, by all means, get them this way and save yourself enough to buy another DVD.As far as the content: die-hard Pokemon fans would buy these episodes no matter what, so my only advice to them is the economic sense outlined above. If you're one of the many people who are probably a bit undecided on these episodes, I would recommend giving them a chance. If you never watched any of the later Johto League Champions or Master Quest episodes, then you will notice that the animation has improved significantly since the first couple seasons. Misty is gone, replaced by a girl named May (who was modeled after the heroine from the Ruby & Sapphire GameBoy Advance games). Make of that what you will; if you are a Misty fan, you will be disappointed, and vice-versa. Personally, I am of the frame of mind that, while she is in some respects a more interesting character than Misty (she starts out disliking Pokemon and gradually comes to appreciate them), she is not, and never could be, a suitable replacement for the character who captured my heart 8 years ago and had been a permanent cast member for 5 full years. In any case, she and Ash are joined by Max, May's younger brother, and, as the box art implies, Brock ultimately returns to the team in about the 4th episode. Both Ash and Brock sport new, different looks from those with which we are oh-so-familiar from past episodes, and Ash has matured somewhat since he left Pallet in the 1st anime episode from 1998. Team Rocket is omnipresent, as always, and the storyline primarily follows that of the Emerald version (villains from both Team Magma and Team Aqua drop in from time-to-time; we ultimately see both of the Ancient Legendary Pokemon that grace the games' boxes; and Juan is the Sootopolis Gym Leader, not Wallace). They tend to follow the games' storyline more closely than the Johto episodes did. To somewhat disenchanted Pokemon veterans: these storylines are generally better than many of those from the Johto continuity. Most importantly in my mind, they don't waste nearly as much time as they did during the middle and end of the Johto episodes.Basically, I would highly recommend this release to anyone who really likes Pokemon, and also to those who just-plain like it
The Best I Have Ever Seen !!!!!. This was the best live concert on dvd I have ever seen ... it sent chills down my spine and tears down my face .....  unbelievable .......At the end of the show .....  1 singer ,1 bass player ,3 guitar players. 3 drummers, 100-piece orchestra , 100 piece chorus ... oh and one of the best rock concert fireworks displays ever !!!!!  This is True Metal !!!!
"Without the bike. It's Moody's now". I remember liking this movie when it came out when I was a kid, but it wasn't until I saw it many years later as an adult that I really appreciated it. Aside from the great acting by all the kids and classic lines, what I like most about it is that it's actually realistic and believable. The look on Clifford's face when he realizes he's offended Moody with his "BM" joke is priceless. Even the fight scenes are pretty realistic, not like most fight scenes where a guy takes 30 punches (with obligatory punch sound effects) straight to the face and then isn't even bleeding. I thought the little punk whacking rocks with a 2x4 in the vacant lot next to Linderman's house was a nice touch. Matt Dillon was great(possibly his greatest performance to date) and my friends and I still quote lines from Mike to this day (e.g. "You're really beginning to annoy me"). I thought Mike's 'towel around the neck tucked in to his sweatjacket' look at the end was pretty funny. Was he training up there? Or maybe sparring with Moody's buddies? What ever happened to Mike? I can't believe he didn't get more work after that performance. All in all, a great movie. A classic
Very Entertaining. "The Sentinel" isn't a movie I entirely expected to like, although I've wanted to see it since it was in theatres. Even though the plot is different, it kept bringing to mind another movie released this year called "Firewall." Even while watching this movie, I thought it was similar to "Firewall" in many ways...But I also found myself entertained by it. Now presidential assassination movies are almost a cliche by now; but a few good ones do come around. My favorite movie of this kind is "In the Line of Fire." It was entertaining, well acted, made sense, and was a great film. The Sentinel has good performances, it's entertaining, but it doesn't always make sense. It's never really explained why the people in this film want to kill the president. Even if they just want to do it to do it, they could've told us that. Inside Man told us the bankrobbers just wanted to do it in the beginning. Anyway, Oscar winner Michael Douglas (Best Actor, 'Wall Street') plays Pete Garrison, a Secret Service agent who once took a bullet for Ronald Reagan. Years later, Pete is having an affair with the first lady (Kim Basinger) and is at odds with his former best friend David Breckinridge (a marvelous Kiefer Sutherland), also a Secret service agent. See David is under the impression that Pete had an affair with his wife. Anyway, through a rat, Pete discovers that there's a mole in the Secret Service who's helping terrorists plot to kill the President. At the same time, Pete is getting anonymously blackmailed for his affair with the first lady and, as a result of that, evidence is piling up on the fact that Pete maybe the mole. Now with the entire Secret Service after him, including David and his new partner Jill (Eva Longoria, who's got some good acting chops away from Wisteria Lane). This movie has its share of cliches. There was a few times where I was watching this movie and thinking to myself "that sounds/looks familiar." I saw the end coming from a mile away. But, the ending quickly redeems itself (from my point-of-view anyway) with the relationship between Pete and the first lady not going in the direction you'd think. A lot of people won't like this film for reasons I've mentioned and more...But if you want some semi-mindless entertainment (although this movie has its smart characteristics blending in with its flaws), then The Sentinel is actually a pretty good way to pass the time. Due to its flaws, with only the fact that I enjoyed it to support my case, I should give it 4 stars...But I think that it's worthy enough of 5.Entertainment goes a long way.GRADE: A
Not fully professional. I don't like montage of this show. Many moments was unnecessary I think. When the dancer show the crazy tap - why they dont show this, on screen we see only his had or other dancers...? And moment like this not only.Music is boring and monotonous. Musician performance was uninteresting, and for most moments - copied from M.Flatley shows.I place 4 stars only for professionalism of the dancers
Applause! Applause!!. Although I enjoyed it immensely the first time, this hysterical showbiz farce, got funnier with each viewing. It is also a good idea to watch it at least once with the subtitles on, since the dialogue is extremely fast paced. The the actors are delightful. Michael Caine plays the two-timing director with his usual perfection, and Carol Burnett plays the temperamental leading lady with her usual panache. Both John Ritter and Christopher Reeve are very funny, the former as the neurotic leading man and the latter as a dim-witted method actor who has to have his off-stage beat for removing a box of groceries explained to him. Marylu Henner and Nicolette Sheridan are excellent in their supporting roles, as is Denholm Elliott, a has-been actor who hides bottles of whisky in convenient cubby-holes back stage. I especially enjoyed Mark Linn Baker who plays the beleaguered stage manager.Peter Bogdonovich's direction as well as his actors' split-second timing makes this farce a real treat. Doors open and close, plates of sardines get passed back and forth, props get mislaid, and everything goes exactly right--before it goes awfully wrong.And therein lies the fun!
Does not work on xbox 360 hd dvd drive!. This is a great series, but be aware, this does not work on xbox 360 hd dvd drive. It would be nice if there was a warning about this listed somewhere on the site. It will only work on a standard hd dvd player. Nice, now I have to return this for the standard dvd version. What a shame, i really wanted to see it in high def
Good Lord! Choke!!!. If you are a died in the wool EC fan then the body of this set, the hour long documentary on EC, isn't going to tell you much that you don't already know.  But having said that, it's still great to watch.  The bonuses are the real value of this set.  Mr. Selby has created a document that can proudly stand on any bookshelf with the likes of the fanzines Squa Tront, Spa Fon, the books Tales of Terror, Foul Play  and the The EC Library!  If you aren't a hardcore Fan-addict, then this dvd may just make you one.  By all means buy this set and support the effort of Mr. Selby....you'll be glad you did
CSI continues to bring the detective side out of you. After becoming addictive to the CSI series, I just can't seemto get enough. So I purchased the third complete series to geton with the excitement and I couldn't stop.Each episode is such a unique story, with twisted human emotionsand perceptions of the truth and the real truth. And how the human mindis so animalistic. This season only had one returning character, but made itworth while to get more insight of the character of Gil Crissom. And WarrickBrown returns to his oldneighborhood to give you a perspective of his past.All in all, if you're into CSI: Las Vegas, you'll enjoy thisseason as mush as 1 and 2.
Big O Lives On. It was a sad day in history when Cartoon Network stopped playing Big O cartoons.  I loved the series and was absolutely heartbroken when I learned they cancelled it.  Then I got this DVD of the first season.  It was one of the best purchases of my anime career.  Big O is one of the best animes out on the market, starring a jet-black giant robot that kicks ass constantly.  (Favorite episode: Big O versus the giant electricity-absorbing serpent.)  For fans of anime, this one's for you.  Adios and LONG LIVE BIG O!
Babar!!!. Babar was my favorite move when I was younger.  Now I watch it and still enjoy it.  As for the whole mother dying, well it teaches the small ones that life is short, and dont take things for granted.  Also teaches them that death is apart of life, and bad things happen for a reason like with all the bad luck towards the end of the movie.  The old woman getting bitten by the snake, the fire in Cornilious house, and the crocadile in the lake.  When ever I finally have kids they will watch it and learn from it
Abfab it is not, but a great British comedy it definitely is. Jill could be a sibling or an off spring of PatsyStone. The only thing that was wrong was just 6 short episode, but we know that these series aren't lengthy. I watched Night Night in 2 sittings and just laughed the whole way through. If you really love AbFab, then you'll love Nighty Night, especially if you are a Patsy fan.
Great Film. Very good copy of an excellent film.The documentary included allows to understand that more than an art work, Hedwig is the work of a life.Great for the possibility to have direct access song by song.It is important to say that I received the product at Mexico City in twelve days after I made the purchase. Excellent
Sweet justice. This is one of the most romantic movies I've ever seen even when there isn't a love scene.  Of course Johnny Depp makes the romance wonderful
Outstanding!. Public speaking is considered one of the most threatening situations you can face in your job. Answering follow-up questions can be even more terrifying. Author Jerry Weissman, an experienced presentation coach, has written a short book to teach presenters specifically how to field tough, even hostile, questions without losing control. This companion DVD provides visual material, e.g. from the presidential debate or public Q&A sessions. Weissman dissects the professionals' answers to show how their responses succeeded or failed, and introduces his own straightforward response technique. To increase the learning effect, the DVD goes interactive so that you can actually practice while you learn. With this training, even the most timid presenter should gain some confidence. We think whoever might end up in a situation where he faces tough questions, will find this helpful.
The blood is the life. Bram Stoker's vampire novel has been remade dozens of times, but perhaps the best adaptation is the classic Bela Lugosi version. And "Dracula - The Legacy Collection" collects not only Lugosi's movie and the Spanish version, but three inferior sequels that are still moderately entertaining -- basically a vampire-lover's delight.A solicitor, Renfield (Dwight Frye), is travelling to Count Dracula's castle for a real estate deal, despite the locals freaking out and crossing themselves whenever Dracula's mentioned. He soon finds out why -- the Count (Lugosi) is a vampire, who enslaves a mad Renfield to his will. Soon after, a ship with a dead crew (and Renfield and Dracula in the hold) arrives in England.Soon Dracula has moved into his new home, Carfax Abbey, and is insinuating himself with the Seward family -- and especially with pretty Lucy Westenra, who dies of blood loss and is reborn as a vampire. Only the intervention of the mysterious Dr. Van Helsing (Edward Van Sloan) can stop Dracula's attacks in London.Then there's the Spanish-language one, which is virtually identical and was filmed on the exact same sets, during the hours when the English-language one was not being shot. It's incredibly good, and although it lacks that iconic intensity that Lugosi brought the English-language film, it's full of atmosphere and amazing acting.And there's an immediate sequel, "Daughter of Dracula," about a beautiful Transylvanian vampire -- created by Dracula -- who comes to England seeking a way out of her eternal torment, now that her "father" has been permanently killed. But her sinister servant wants to keep her enslaved to her bloodlust.Then there are two inferior sequels: "Son of Dracula," which is basically a whittled-down plot set in the early twentieth century, with an exceptionally wooden "Count Alucard" played by Lon Chaney Jr. He moves in next to an heiress's house, kills her father, and marries her, so it's up to her ex-boyfriend to save the day.And finally there's "House of Dracula," in which the very popular Dr. Edelmen (Onslow Stevens) gets two requests for supernatural cures from some kind of miraculous mold: Count Dracula (John Carradine), and the wolfman Lawrence Talbot (Lon Cheney Jr). Talbot is suicidal over his transformations, and Dracula is secretly pursuing Edelman's vacuous nurse and driving the good doc insane. And they stumble across Frankenstein's monster too.It's a mixed bag, vampirewise. The first two are among the best classic horror ever made, but the sequels deteriorate as they proceed -- "Daughter" is a very solid movie on its own, and "Son" is cliche and wooden. By "House," they've decided to just be silly and campy, and throw in as many fictional monsters as they can fit in.The direction in the first three movies is quite solid, eerie and gothic, with plenty of memorably haunting moments ("I never drink... wine," Dracula says smilingly). Lots of cobwebbed castles, foggy London streets, bats and women drifting around in white dresses. The last two are strictly B-movie fare in terms of directorial skill, and some moments like the flaming mine are simply awful.Lugosi is simply brilliant as Dracula. While not the stately, imposing figure that Stoker described, he has a blazing intensity that works just as well, as well as great charm. Carlos Villaras is not quite as good, but does an excellent and faithful job in the Spanish version. Carradine doesn't seem to be trying too hard, and Cheney just doesn't work as a vampire (though he's glorious as Talbot).These actors are backed by casts that range from the sublime (creepy, bug-eating, cackling Frye) to the ridiculous (the dreamy-eyed, hammy nurses in "House"). Gloria Holden deserves special kudos for her tormented, bisexual vampiress torn between good and evil, and Edward Van Sloan as Dracula's nemesis, Van Helsing."Dracula - The Legacy Collection" has a dud and a campy monsterfest, but the first three movies are divinely dark horror/suspense movies. Definitely worth getting and enjoying
Mysterys & Lighthouses. I enjoyed this movie very much.  The photography was wonderful.  I am a fan of lighthouses, and mysterys, and this movie contained both.  I am not a fan of Demi Moore, but she did do a good job in this movie.
Out of Reach. Typical Seagal movie. Lots of martial arts  and some story.  Good film for evenings entertainmen
The Undiscovered Country - The fitting end, and the fitting DVD for it. The Star Trek movies have had a roller coaster trend.  There was the first movie which was like the "2001" of the series (which is adequately acceptable - I still like it).  Then came the classic Wrath of Khan, and its pristine follow-ups of Search for Spock, and Voyage Home.  Star Trek the Final Frontier wasn't great at all, let's leave it at that.  So came this movie to redeem Kirk and crew.The movie literally begins with a BANG.  Sulu is off as captain of the Excelsior (a ship he's always craved), and along the way his ship gets in a tangle with a shockwave of an exploded Klingon moon - which is essentially the most vital resource the Klingons have.  Months later at a briefing, Capt. Kirk finds himself vouched and volunteered by Spock to escort the Klingon chancellor to Earth for a peace conference.  Keep in mind Kirk is not too fond with the Klingons, especially since they killed his son some time ago.  The two meet up for a dinner aboard the Enterprise , which doesn't go too well exactly.  Then later on after it's over, the Klingon ship is fired on, leaving it with no gravity, then two figures beam on the ship and kill the Chancellor.  Kirk and Enterprise are left with the blame and Kirk and Dr. McCoy are arrested, held trial, and sentenced to life on a tundra mining outpost.  While there, Spock and crew look over the Enterprise to find all the bread crumbs that would lead to those responsible for the attack.  It seems all around there are those, from Starfleet, to Klingon that don't exactly go well with the idea of peace moving forward, and they'll do what it takes to prevent it - even if it involves a deadlier Bird of Prey, and another assassination attempt.Yeah, a sci-fi movie not only being true to being sci-fi, but getting even more serious.  All of the performers of the Enterprise crew, as well as Sulu (who is now a captain as mentioned), play their revered characters as they are known to be.  Plus, add the robust performance by Christopher Plummer as the rogue Klingon Chang, which easily rivals Patrick Stewarts Picard in different dimensions.The picture transfer is really a marvel, and most interesting on the widescreen frame being different - but that's because the movie was shot in 70MM.  About every scene looks amazing.  Same goes for the 5.1 sound, it has an aural depth to it.  Everything in the scene is directionally placed.  Special note goes out to the Cliff Eidelman, whose score is not only different in all regards in the movies, but truly a gem to hear on how it sets the mood just right.I'm not going to go deep into the extras, there's plenty to go around and ask for seconds.That said, I put my endorsement on this kickass DVD.  It's one of those special editions that is treated very special.
The movie has a life in and of itself. I saw this movie when I was in college (1998). I saw it again recently, I enjoyed it even more today (March 6, 2007). I absolutely love this movie
The Next Exciting Chapter in the Search for the Sunflower Samurai. This is the second chapter in this exciting series, as the "semi-friendly" trio search for the "Samurai who smells like sunflowers." Follow the trio as they continue their journey through early Edo-era Japan, and laugh at their sometimes funny mishaps, and gnaw on your fingernails at the extreme action that is throughout every episode.This series is NOT TO MISS! One of the BEST Animated Series that I have ever seen!
Not everyone is Cher.  Let us give thanks. Norah is just Norah on this dvd and that is way better than 99.9% of the singers doing concerts and/or dvd's at the moment.  There is not a single lightning flash or even a smoke grenade.  It is just Norah and a terrific group of musicians doing what they do so well.I found no problems with the sound (referred to by others) on my 6.1 system.  First-rate purchase imho.
An Enchanting Fairy Tale. Ella of Frell (Anne Hathaway) is an unusual child.  As a baby, a bumbling fairy godmother named Lucinda (Vivica A. Fox) gave her the gift of obedience.  Every time anyone gives her a direct command, she must obey.Despite, or maybe because of, this "gift," Ella grows to be a headstrong woman.  She goes against the conventional wisdom of the realm when it comes to ogres, giants, and elves.  Current rules state that these creatures are dangerous and must perform certain jobs only.  But Ella campaigns for their equality.She is also one of the few women in the realm who doesn't swoon at the site of Prince Char (Hugh Dancy).  When the two meet accidentally, Char finds this distain quite refreshing and immediately begins to fall for the headstrong young woman.Trouble is brewing at home, however.  Ella's stepsister Hattie (Lucy Punch) has figured out Ella's secret.  Now, Ella finds herself doing things she would never willing do.  So she leaves home and sets out to find Lucinda to give the gift back.I had missed seeing this movie in the theater, and finally got a chance to watch it.  I missed a real treat.  The movie is funny from start to finish, and I had a grin on my face the entire time.  While the story is a bit predictable, it isn't super preachy.  The cast does an amazing job bring their characters to life.  The only drawback to the movie is the special effects.  While some worked well, most of the time they weren't up to today's standards.While the main audience might be teen girls, this is one adult male who loved it.  It's sweet, charming, and entertaining.  What more could you want
An Inconvenient Truth, Presented By Al Gore. Let me say this first:  An Inconvenient Truth attempts to convince you that a) global warming is a hideous problem and that b) humans are the cause.Why would a documentary based upon a scientific theory need to convince?  If, for instance, the proposed theory and supporting evidence suggested that smiling makes people happy, only a bare report of the facts would be necessary, right?  Well, with global warming, making a passionate case is absolutely necessary because of a deliberate effort on the part of large industries and politicians who support them to confuse the facts - to lie to the public.  Because this issue has been politicized, the makers of this documentary have mixed Al Gore's presentation with his personal story, not to sell Al Gore as a man but to add needed emotion to the story of global warming.  They do it well.  If An Inconvenient Truth alarms its viewers, then it is doing a public service.Very entertaining as well as informative.  An eye-opening movie
Penelope Ann Miller and hormones. A ship that was supposed to transport some crates from South America to a museum seems to have a crew that lost their heads. The crates finally get flown in. One full of goodies the other just leaves. The museum's Dr. Margo Green (Penelope Ann Miller) is suspicious. Everyone else is happy until a guard seems to have misplaced his hypothalamus. Looks like Dr. Margo Green is about to be consumed by her work.This is a pretty spiffy well done formula movie. As with many contemporary movies they completely ignore the book and add all the standard clichs. We have the ruthless rivalry, missing scientists, and mysterious crates.  Naturally no one does what they are supposed to do and you start rooting for the, lets just call it a, relic.
MITCHEL MUSSO!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. THIS IS KL'S REVEIWTHIS WAS A VERY GOOD MOVIE BUT THE PLOT WAS A LITTLE ON THE STRANGE SIDE. MITCHEL MUSSO DID A GREAT JOB, WELL WE ALL KNOW HE ALWAYS DOES A GREAT JOB.OKAY I'LL STOP DROOLING OVER HIM AND GET BACK TO THE MOVIE.THIS MOVIE IS ABOUT A CRANKY OLD MAN THAT DOSN'T LIKE PEOPLE TO SET ONE FOOT ON HIS LAWN,AND A TEENAGE BOY THAT LIVES ACROSS THE STREET THAT DOCUMENTS EVERY TOY THE OLD MAN TAKES BECAUSE IT TOUCHED HIS LAWN,WHAT TIME IT WAS WHEN IT ACCURED, AND TAKES PICTURES.BUT THEN WHEN A TRAGIC INCIDENT HAPPENS TO THE OLD MAN AND EVERY ONE ASUMES HIM DEAD WELL AT LEAST THE BOYS DO. THE TEENAGER DJ AND HIS FRIEND CHOUDER DISCOVER THAT THE HOUSE IS EVEN STRANGER THAN THE OLD MAN AND THAT THE HOUSE SEEMS TO BE POSSESSED BY THE OLD MAN, WELL THATS WHAT THE BOYS THINK. THEN WHEN A AROGANT GIRL NAMED JENNY SELLING HOLLOWEEN CANDY GOES UP TO THE HOUSE DJ AND CHOUDER  COME TO HER RESCUE AND SHE ENDS UP HELPING THEM FIND OUT MORE ABOUT THE HOUSE. THEIR PLAN IS TO PUT OUT THE FIRE OR THE HEART OF THE HOUSE. BUT WHEN THAY FINALLY GET INSIDE OF THE HOUSE THEY DISCOVER A VERY STRANGE THING WHICH I'M NOT GOING TO SAY BECAUSE YOUR GOING TO HAVE TO JUST WATCH IT FOR YOUR SELF.BUT BEFORE THEY GET TO THE HEART, THEY GET UP CHUCKED, LOL.AND THEN A HORRABLE THING COMES TO THEIR MINDS ITS HOLLOWEEN AND EVERY KID THAT GOES TO THAT HOUSE IS GOING TO GET EATEN! BUT I'M GETING TOO CLOSE TO THE  ENDING OR AM I? WELL IF YOU HAVEN'T SEEN IT YOU WOULDN'T KNOW SO YOU'LL JUST HAVE TO WATCH IT BECAUSE I'M NOT GIVING ANY MORE OF THE MOVIE AWAY!HOPE YOU LIKE IT AND BY THE WAY MITCHEL MUSSO'S MINE!!!!!
On eof the greatest. This is one of my all time favorite movies. It's certainly my favorite Duvall movie. James Earl Jone is great; the whole cast is wonderful. It should have won all kinds of awards. I stumbled upon it accidentally, and was pleasantly surprised
&quot;American Pie 2: The Pie Strikes Back!&quot;. An absolutely charming entry in the coming-of-age field.  Donot be fooled by the.. cover; this is not in any way, shape, or form exploitative.  Instead, it is an intelligent, funny, and thoughtful exploration of the lives and minds of three priviliged NYC teenage girls (the location of this film is quite similar to the Upper East Side location of &quot;Cruel Intentions&quot;).  We follow the three girls (a foul-mouthed Gaby Hoffman among them) through their various romantic, familial and, yes, sexual tribulations... All of the performances are excellent, and the star-studded supporting cast includes Mia Farrow, Peter Bogdanovich, Yasmine Bleeth, and Spalding Gray.  Like a junior &quot;Sex and the City&quot;, there is quite a bit of mature (if graphic) sex talk; nonetheless, this is a film that every 15 - 21 year old girl should see.  Oh, and you guys who are big fans of &quot;Drop Dead Gorgeous&quot;, &quot;Dick&quot;, and other girlcentric teen flicks will love it too.  In closing, &quot;Coming Soon&quot; is arguably the smartest, most mature and most underrated teen flick of the past decade.  If &quot;Slums of Beverly Hills&quot; was riot-grrrl cinema, then this movie is pure cinematic Bikini Kill
AWESOME!!!!. This a a great work-out.  It's short in duration but gets the blood pumping and the sweat dripping.  I've always been active and this one really works my muscles!  Very convenient for a mother of two who finds it difficult to make time to work-out.  The best part is that you can customize your work-out - shorter if you wish, or longer if you have the time
The best show of all time. Gilmore Girls is an incredible show.  It is most definitely my favorite show ever and I know many other people who would second that.  I am completely obsessed with this show.  The fourth season had some great episodes.  True, this was also the season with Jason (ick), but the season ended right.  Here are the episodes and my ratings for each:5 stars= one of the show's best4 stars= one of the season's best3 stars= good2 stars= okay1 star= kind of blah1.  Ballrooms and Biscotti- Rory prepares for Yale-5 stars2.  The Lorelais' First Day at Yale- Rory starts Yale- 4 stars3.  The Hobbit, the Sofa, and Digger Stiles- Lorelai and Sookie cater a Lord of the Rings party- 3 stars4.  Chicken or Beef?- Dean gets married- 2 stars5.  The Fundamental Things Apply- Rory goes on a date/Luke has movie night with Lorelai- 2 stars6.  An Affair to Remember- Kirk goes on a date-5 stars7.  The Festival of Living Art- The townspeople pose as artwork in a festival- 5 stars8.  Die, Jerk- Rory reviews a ballet and angers the ballerina- 2 stars9.  Ted Koppel's Big Night Out- The Gilmores attend the Harvard/Yale game- 4 stars10.  The Nanny and the Professor- Michel babysits and Paris dates- 1 star11.  In the Clamor and the Clangor- Church bells drive the town crazy- 5 stars12.  A Family Matter- Liz visits- 2 stars13.  Nag Hammadi is Where they Found the Gnostic Gospels- Luke and Jess meet TJ- 2 stars14. The Incredible Sinking Lorelais- Lorelai and Rory have melt downs- 2 stars15.  Scene in a Mall- Emily has a melt down in a mall- 5 stars16.  The Reigning Lorelai- Gran dies- 4 stars17.  Girls in Bikinis, Boys doin'the Twist- Rory has spring break- 4 stars18.  Tick, Tick, Tick, Boom!-  Kirk hides Easter eggs- 4 stars19.  Afterboom- Everything and everyone breaks apart- 3 stars20.  Luke Can See her Face- The episode everyone waited for- 5 stars (possibly my favorite in the series)21.  Last Week Fights, This Week Tights- Liz and TJ get married- 4 stars22.  Raincoats and Recipes- The Dragonfly has a test run- 4 star
Middle of the road movie and just to correct a previous reviewer... This movie is situated between Greenwald's High Price of Low Wages and the other pseudo-documentary, Why Wal Mart Works and Why it Makes Some People Crazy. It is very well researched indeed. Actually, and I know this is not the right forum, but I would respectfully submit to a previous reviewer who wrote that this movie was a pro-Wal Mart propaganda piece that he/she (named DW "real life" (Texas)) probably confused it with the Why Wal Mart Works movie. It is understable as you actually have a number of Wal Mart "documentaries" on the market, either pro or con.
Slaves vs. Mighty Rome. "Spartacus" (1960) is a great film recreating the last of the "Servile Revolts" that occurred in Ancient Rome. The very name of the main character has been engraved in the collective imaginary, as a synonym for "Freedom Fighter".The story takes place in 73-71 BC, the late period of Roman Republic, when a new Imperial style was in the making. The confronting parties inside Rome are represented by two Senators: historical, but inexactly subscribed to the Aristocratic Party, Marcus Licinius Crasus (an excellent Laurence Olivier in one of his major movie performances) and the fictional Sempronius Gracchus (fleshed by an inspired Charles Laughton). This last one is inspired in the historical character of the People's Tribune Gracchus, assassinated around fifty years earlier. Disregarding these "historical licenses", the factions are accurate.Spartacus (Kirk Douglas) is a slave sent from the mines to Lentulus Batiatus (Peter Ustinov's great performance, which allowed him to win the Oscar to Best Supporting Actor) gladiators' school.  Here he is trained ruthlessly and reaches his "turning point" when a fellow gladiator (Woody Strode) spares his life at the cost of being slain.From here on, an unquenched libertarian fire sprouts from him, infecting his gladiator pals in an epic uprising that almost destroyed the mighty Roman Republic.The gladiators' school and its daily life are very well reconstructed (by the way if you are interested in the subject read "The Gladiator. The Secret History of Rome's Warrior Slaves" by Alan Baker).The battle scenes are very good and remain unsurpassed until very recently, when new techniques are available to the cinema industry. The evolutions of the Roman Legions on the terrain are historically accurate.With "Spartacus" Stanley Kubrik delivers one of his best films which is no little thing to say taking into account that he has directed such great films as "Path of Glory" (1957), "2001 a Space Odyssey" (1968) and "Full Metal Jacket" (1987) amongst other.This is a great film from "Hollywood Golden Age" winner of several Oscars. Very commendable for Epic Film lovers.Reviewed by Max Yofre
Heavy Metal, the greatest piece of American animation. If you think any of that s**t Walt Disney made was the pinnacle of American animation, think again!!  Heavy Metal crushes everything Adolf Disney made (he was anti-Semetic, hence "Adolf").  I don't know why this only gets a 4 star average while there's virtually no criticism for that overrated pile of dogs**t The Nightmare Before Christmas (Tim Burton sucks).  I recommend this for fans of alternative animation.In this movie, this guy lands from space to give his daughter a green orb, which absorbs him and tells the girl its stories of how it wreaked havoc throughout the galaxy.  There's many different worlds ranging from a futuristic city with hover cars to a world reminiscent to a Mayan civilization.  However, in all of them, there's lots of violence, profanity, and bare female flesh, a tour de force for a guy in his late-teens.The soundtrack is great, it has songs from groups like Black Sabbath, Blue Oyster Cult, Devo, and Grand Funk Railroad.  If you want something different in terms of animation, this is for you.  If you're a die-hard Disney fanatic, stear clear of this!!
Infernal Affairs and The Departed: Compare and Contrast. There are some very good reviews already posted about "Infernal Affairs", although they got some minor facts wrong (such as which actor played which role).  This review will look at differences between this film and "The Departed"--for Scorsese fans who enjoyed his version and now wonder if they should see the original.Yes, they should see the original.Scorsese did a remake which followed the original storyline closely.  Scorsese's style, as always, is marvelous.  His work is more controlled than usual--no digressions into extended violent scenes (as in Casino, although "The Departed" film is much more violent than "Infernal Affairs"), no plot diversions into draft riots during the Civil War...etc.However, the Scorsese film--which I enjoyed and was his best film in years--left me unsatisfied, while "Infernal Affairs" was extremely satisfying.  Both films are tragedies, but the drama is far more deeply felt (for me) in "Infernal Affairs" than in "The Departed".Why?The answer lies in the difference in approach between the film making cultures of Hong Kong and Hollywood.  Between what each culture feels the audience wants.  Between the pressures of a higher budget and bigger stars. Scorsese, whether the actors asked for it or not, clearly felt a need to give the principal actors meatier roles. The film brothers who made the Hong Kong original only wanted to get the job done--a crisp story that did what it needed to, and then got out.The Hollywood version takes a lot of time to provide additional detail to the story to flesh out the characters and give them showy scenes.  "The Departed" runs about forty minutes longer than "Infernal Affairs".  It adds a love interest (which really goes nowhere) and a lot of character details.  Probably worse...SPOILER ALERT SPOILER ALERT...the Scorsese film attempts "justice" at the end.  It is perhaps an American need to tie up loose ends, to make things right.  Maybe it is the pressure stemming from a bigger budget, and needing to satisfy a larger audience.  But dramatically, the Hong Kong version had it much better.REALLY SPOILERS, REALLY!  DON'T READ IF YOU HAVEN'T SEEN THE DEPARTED!!!!  STOP!!!  WHAT'S WRONG WITH YOU???In the Scorsese version, an additional character, played by Mark Whalberg, is added to create justice--someone, in the end, to bump off the Matt Damon character.  The problem with this is dual.  First, it creates a huge plot hole--if Whalberg is around, then there is someone to prove that the DiCaprio character is really a cop, so much of how the film ends simply makes no sense at all.  DiCaprio does not need to get Damon to prove he is an undercover cop if Whalberg is around.  And, why does Whalberg remain in the background instead of going directly to his superiors?  Why does DiCaprio not seek out Whalberg?No, sorry Marty.  None of it really works.  Whalberg is only there to kill Damon in the end.But this is very misguided.  I personally felt a lot of involvement with the DiCaprio character.  When the bad stuff happened to him, I felt the tragedy, but when Whalberg bumps off Damon, I felt cheated.If the movie was going after justice, why not just have an ending with DiCaprio living?  But this is the big budget American idea of entertainment, I guess--a more or less happy ending, even if it completely screws up the story.So while I enjoyed the film, I walked out unsatisfied.Then I watched, a few days ago, the Chinese original.  The ending is far more cynical, and as a result works a lot better.  There is no Whalberg character, no big plot hole.  In addition, the film was faster and cleaner, much less showy.  No bigger role for Nicholson to strut his stuff.  No extraneous love interest.  Not as much explicit violence to give the audience a cheap thrill.Less Hollywood over the top and pandering to the audience was what makes "Infernal Affairs" the superior film--and one worth buying, as you'll never see it on tv.Oh well, guess this means Scorsese will send Joe Pesci after me
SPENCER TRACY AND THE SEA ACT AS SURROGATE FATHERS TO FREDDY BARTHOLOMEW. Rudyard Kipling's classic boy's tale of the sea is inhabited by Freddy Bartholomew as spoiled rich boy Harvey, Spencer Tracy as compassionate fisherman Manuel, Lionel Barrymore as good-natured Captain Disko, and Melvyn Douglas as Harvey's negligent father. Freddy Bartholomew, who received top billing in this film, is perhaps the best child actor who has ever lived, simply because he really seems to be acting rather than just looking cute. Spencer Tracy, who won the Oscar for Best Actor for his role, is one of the best adult actors of all time. As if that weren't enough, Lionel Barrymore (It's a Wonderful Life) and Melvyn Douglas (Ninotchka, Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House) are two of the top character actors. And, to top it off, you've got John Carradine and Mickey Rooney in supporting roles. You can't beat the story or the cast.Victor Flemming (Wizard Of Oz, Gone With The Wind, The Good Earth) did a superb job directing his talented cast and crew through the John Lee Mahin/Marc Connelly/Dale Van Every screenplay, which tells the story of how a spoiled rich boy, out of sorts with himself and the world, falls off a cruise ship into the sea, and is fished out by a friendly Portuguese fisherman named Manuel. Once on board Manuel's fishing schooner, Harvey learns he won't be able to return to shore for three months, until the fishermen have finished their season of fishing. At first he fights his plight; but through the love and patience of Manuel, Harvey soon learns to fit in and become a contributing member of the crew. He makes mistakes; but Manuel helps him learn and eventually grow into a boy of character.This is a great father-son film. It's also a wonderful film about the sea and sailing. There are some breathtaking shots of ships, especially during a race between two schooners. There are some wonderful relationships. It's interesting to see how each adult deals with Harvey, and how each changes in that relationship as Harvey changes. One of the best scenes of the film, and the one that got to me the most, is at the very end, when Harvey is going home with his dad. First we see the dinghy in which Harvey and Manuel fished being pulled behind his dad's car. Harvey couldn't bear to part with it, so his dad brought it with them. Then the camera pans to the back of the car, where we see Harvey and his dad in the back seat through the window. Harvey is animated with enthusiasm as he is obviously telling his dad about all his adventures - even to the point of exaggerating the size of the first fish he caught. It's a great final statement about the difference an experience like that and a friend like Manuel can make in a boy's life.Waitsel Smit
GREAT!  I disagree with Robert M. Flynn. I loved this DVD.  I was a little worried when I first saw it, because I love the Flaming Lips, and the worst feeling in the world is finally seeing a band that you love and seeing their videos and being let down.  The Flaming Lips did not let me down at all, in fact, their videos are exactly what I had expected.  They are great visual partners to the wonderful songs.I recommend this to any real fan of the Flaming Lips, because the videos are perfect representations of the music.  If you like the Flaming Lips, you'll definitely enjoy this one
If you love wild westerns.... you'll love this movie.  I love watching movies about Billy The Kid, Jesse  James, Butch Cassidy, and more.  I'm tired of movies about good guys.   Here's a good one about the BAD ones.  The OUTLAWS of the wild west
Christian Pastor Who Resisted Hitler... Notable for its presentation, interview "gets" and unique archival footage, BONHOEFFER: PASTOR, PACIFIST, NAZI RESISTOR is a powerful, concisely comprehensive look at Dietrich Bonhoeffer's life as a theologian, pastor, and ultimately double-agent who actively resisted Hitler, in contrast to most of Germany's church who were either indifferent or in active support of the Nazis, as seen in film photos of pastors giving the Nazi salute and enormous swastikas over church marriage ceremonies.  PhD at 24, hanged at 39, Bonhoeffer's example and writings live on, thanks to the efforts of his student and best friend Eberhard Bethge, whose last interview is included in this documentary.  Also interviewed are Bonhoefer's niece, his nephew (whose own father was executed for the conspiracy), other former students, the sister of his fiance Maria, Desmond Tutu, and various theologians and historians.Of the films on Bonhoeffer, this is the one to watch first since it manages to fit both in and together so many pieces of Bonhoeffer's full life--vibrant worship at a Harlem church, influence of Niebuhr, early radio criticism of Hitler, shame and torment over not speaking at the funeral of his sister's Jewish father-in-law, writings on topics such as the relationship of church and state, setting aside a trip to visit Gandhi in order to start an illegal seminary, and becoming a spy ostensibly travelling to gather info for the Nazis but in reality trying to garner support from the worldwide church and the allies.  The movie is filled with excerpts from Bonhoeffer's timeless writings, with samples being included in the DVD special features.  And beyond Bonhoeffer, the movie draws attention to the German context, particularly the failure of the church, both the church that alligned with Hitler as well as the Confessing Church that broke off but was largely silent.  The overall film emphasis, though, is on Bonhoeffer's belief of the necessity of active faith, responding to the will of God.(There is one DVD negative, an accompanying movie trailer: Power and Terror: Noam Chomsky In Our Time.  Chomsky's life and teaching are antithetical to what Bonhoeffer stood for and including this trailer disgusts me as it totally turns Bonhoeffer's message of the church suffering with the oppressed on its head.    In the name of peace, Chomsky instead aids enemies of peace through his antiIsrael words and activities, such as meeting with the terrorist group Hizbullah.  Bonhoeffer specifically saw the Jewish of his time as oppressed, even drawing parallels of their oppression with the black Americans he encountered in Harlem.  Bonhoeffer, based on his reliance upon scripture and keen discernment, would see that despite today's propaganda, it is tiny Israel who is oppressed and in need of church support as she is surrounded by enormous Arab and Muslim populations to destroy her.)
Danger Man, Great TV. All the Danger man DVDs are excellent. The shows are extremely thought provoking and are much more enjoyable if viewed, giving time for some entertaining analysis that almost always occurs when I put these on. Any fan of Mcgoohan, British TV or TV with some intellectual bite to it will enjoy this series
"It's too much.  It's too much.........". If you are a fan of Mamet, then you should "enjoy" this - if it is possible to enjoy such a film. Some scenes don't ring true, but I was so engrossed by Macy's performance I was eager to see what he would do next.This has been compared to "Falling Down", but it should be noted that the play this is based on was produced in 1982.
Nice Choreagraphy, Effective Atmosphere. This is a beautiful film that will touch anyone who knows a lot or at least some things about professional dance. It has a very effective atmosphere and nice dance scenes. The story is also interesting, with nice acting and inspirational quotes. The choreographies are very good without any doubt, and I really liked the costumes! There are some very good dancers in this film. I would prefer a professional dancer in the place of Patrick Swayze. Patrick is a great actor but unfortunately only an amateur when it comes to dance. No matter how the director films it, it is not possible to entirely hide the fact that he is no pro and the difference with the rest of the dancers is obvious. Still, I enjoed the film and this proves that it is generally composed in a great way.
this is who we are... the time is near. Season 1 of "Millennium" featured fantastic performances from its cast and a dark atmosphere that made "The X-Files" look sunny by comparison. Unfortunately much of that year ended up as little more than a "murder mystery of the week" fare. Thankfully the second season, supervised by former "X-Files" producers Glen Morgan and James Wong, changed all that. The second season began with the suspenseful 'Beginning and the End', where Frank Black pursues the mysterious Polaroid Man who kidnapped his wife. This episode also introduces the comic relief for Season Two, computer hacker Brian Roedecker.Even though 'The Beginnning And the End' would fit perfectly in Season 1, the subsequent episodes follow a different path that greatly improved the series. Starting with the second episode, 'Beware of the Dog', and continuing with episodes such as 'The Hand of St. Sebastian', 'Owls', 'Roosters', and the haunting two-part season finale 'The Fourth Horseman/The Time Is Now', we find out that the Millennium Group has existed since the beginnings of Christianity and isn't nearly as altruistic as Frank Black (and the viewers) originally suspected.In addition to the Millennium Group storyline, we also learn more about Frank's childhood via two holiday episodes: 'The Curse of Frank Black', a Halloween-themed tale where Frank encounters the ghost of a neighbor who committed suicide, and 'Midnight of the Century', an emotional story of Frank trying to mend the relationship between him and his father. In the latter we find out that Frank was not the only one with a strange gift, as his mother was blessed/cursed with the ability to see angels. Lastly the second season even showcased two comedy episodes: 'Jose Chung's DOOMSDAY DEFENSE' and 'Somehow Satan Got Behind Me'. These hours of television are completely different from the average "Millennium" episode (to say the least) but they're still worth a look nonetheless.I could continue rambling on and on about the greatness of Season Two, but you'll really have to buy the DVD set and form your own opinions. The DVD set does come with some bonus features, but the only one of worth is the Season Two documentary "Turning of the Tide". The rest of the bonus materials are second-rate at best
amazing performances. I recently attended the premiere in New York City of Game 6 and was frankly surpised and amazed by what I saw. To me, Micheal Keaton is Batman, Bebe Neuwirth was Lilith, Robert Downey Jr., is well, Robert Downey Jr. What I watched was an amazing story from the master story teller, Don DeLillo, that was full of character, sub plots and great dialog. Keaton, as Ebert and Rober said, gave the first Oscar worthy performance of 2006. His character is torn between his passion for his play that tells the story of his family which opens that evening and watching his beloved Red Soxs in the sixth game of the World Series.This is not a baseball film, nor is it a theater film. This is a film about people. For anyone that wants to see strong performances deliver great lines under wonderful direction from Michael Hoffman, I highly recommend this film
Slow, Odd, but Interesting True Story of Nazi-Era Germany. Zishe Breitbart (Jouko Ahola) is a Jewish blacksmith in a rural Polish village in 1932 when he successfully challenges the Strongman in a visiting circus. A talent agent in the audience proposes that the young man travel to Berlin where there are greater and more profitable audiences for a man of his talents. Once in Berlin, Zishe is employed by Haussen (Tim Roth), an occultist who owns a popular theater specializing in spectacle. Mr. Haussen understands his audience well and strives to show them what they want to see, which at that time was a salve for German egos bruised by World War I and fodder for German egos looking forward to renewed greatness under the rising Nazi tide. Haussen is pleased to add Zishe to his show, but insists that he "Aryanize" himself in order to please and not offend the customers. So Zishe puts on a blond wig and takes on the stage persona of "Siegfried The Iron King", and the audience adores him."Invincible" is a true story, written and directed for the screen by Werner Herzog. The story is so odd and obscure that I am not tempted to question its veracity; no one would make it up. It is also an odd enough tale to overcome the film's length and deliberately slow pace. There are long periods of time where nothing happens in this movie. Unless you are fascinated by occultist dinner theater in prewar Germany -which is somewhat cheesy by today's standards- the long stretches where the story just plateaus are likely to wear on your nerves. On the other hand, it is interesting to observe the particulars of these shows and of their audience. They provide some insight  into the collective self-image in Germany between wars and how political extremists were able to exploit that to advance their own agendas. The performances in "Invincible" are all impressive. Tim Roth probably doesn't have the screen presence to be a movie star, but he is one of the best character actors in cinema today, and he does some fine work here. I don't know if Jouko Ahola is known at all in Europe, but he embodies this simple but self-possessed Zishe well. Young Jacob Wein also does as nice job as Zishe's younger brother. I recommend "Invincible" if you don't mind slow movies. It's an obscure little story, but it is pretty interesting upon close examination
magnificent phantasm. From the delicious irony of the main intro theme, which derisively echoes the Lion King soundtrack (Disney lifted the concept, characters and storyline wholesale from Osamu Tezuka's Kimba The White Lion), to the manifold schizoid behaviors exhibited by the central players, we know we are in for a uniquely wild ride.Popular anime in Japan surpasses most narrative film in America, let alone its television fare (and our execrable cartoons of the past three decades barely warrant mention). This is an engrossing set which demands and rewards repeated viewings
X3-What would Bryan Singer do?. When watching the third X Men movie, one cannot help but wonder if Bryan Singer was involved in the movie.Brett Ratner does a credible job on his contribution to a movie franchise that Singer defined.The movie is loaded with great action sequences,new characters,plot twists and and resolutions.Unfortunately at 105 minutes it crams in too much when an over two hour screen time would better service under developed elements(The Phoenix,and the off-screen death of a beloved X-Men)and characters(Angel,Beast,Juggernaught,Rogue).The endings leaves the door open for this not to be the "Last" stand of the cinimatic adventure of the X-Men
Best Scary Movie. Scary Movie 3 is best followed by #4 and then #1 and then #2
The Ultimate Scarface "FINALLY". This movie is excellent. Based on the subject matter(which is of a violent nature) it's certainly not for everyone, but I certainly believe it to be one of Al Pacinos finest performances and it is a classic as far as crime movies are concerned. I have waited a long time to purchase this DVD because I knew it would eventually be given the "royal" treatment, and I am happy to say that I was not dissappointed. The video transfer is very good and the audio upgrade is excellent. The DVD also has many extra features, although the counting of the F word feature was not necessary and actually detracts from the classic quality of this DVD. Otherwise I am very happy indeed.
Fine show, Great Band. This is a wonderful show and very true to the band's recent live performances, albeit with a condensed songlist. I give it only 4 stars because I had the pleasure of seeing Mr. Winwood and band live and the Sound Stage gig seems just a tad below that experience--which is admittedly an unfair comparison. Nothing to knock about this tidy show by a true virtuoso (actually a band of virtuosos). Consider it 4.5.
IT IS STILL A GREAT SHOW. IT IS STILL A GREAT SHOW. IT IS BETTER THAN I REMEBERED IT
The comedy is back in full force but where's the heart?. I've been a devoted Scrubs fan from the get-go. It's common knowledge that their distinct brand of comedy and touching moments never fails to amaze. However, on season 4 we see the comedy come more to the forefront. But where season 3, I thought, felt a little overdramatic at times, season 4 doesn't touch on real heartbreaking moments much which does disappoint me a little. As the writers have said, they pride themselves on making things feel real, so I find it difficult to believe that working in a hospital filled with dying people that a marriage on the rocks is more important. However, it is a good and engaging storyline throughout the season.Season 3 ended with quite the cliffhanger in which JD broke Eliot's heart. It takes a few episodes for her to forgive but I would've liked her to have held the grudge a bit longer. Other than that, both JD and Eliot move on to different people, Cox and Jordan are still together, and Turk and Carla (of course) are still holding strong. As for the janitor and Bob Kelso, they keep their usual antics up. Dr. Kelso's 'return to being a real doctor' episode surprised me though. It's hilarious but also kind of makes you look at him as more than a ball-breaker. And the janitor really pursues his crush on Eliot which is pretty funny.With the focus seemingly strongly fixed upon comedy this time around, they came out strong. Season 3 was funny but I didn't find myself quoting it randomly like I did with 1 & 2. That magic is back thankfully. But it is a shame that there's such few touching moments. Molly Shannon's appearance was excellent with her performance showing true vulnerabilty. Past that, we can only hope season 5 can marry the two as successfully as the first two seasons did. Newcomers need not start here, go back to the beginning because you'll be lost if you start here. I'm wholly impressed with this release and Scrubs remains my favorite show on TV. Give us better extras next time
good creepy fun, watch the "sentinel". i watched this on t.v. in the early 80's and it gave me the creeps,and it still does .a young model moves into a great new apartment and her life turns into a living hell. as we all know when we see people who aren't their the house has a dark secret and it will alter the models life forever. not that gory this is one of those that stay with you long after it ends
A True Television "Event". There aren't many television shows in the 50+ years of television history that can be categorized as a "weekly event".   A "weekly event" show basically has everyone talking about the episode the next day.   In the 1980s, shows such as "Dallas" and "Dynasty" were "weekly events".    In the 1990s, "Seinfeld" would take emerge as the show that would become a "weekly event".    As Seinfeld wound up, another show would soon take that title into the 21st century - that show being HBO's "The Sopranos".     "The Sopranos" would be different in that it was a show that appeared on a premium (pay) cable station and would prove that premium cable stations can produce high quality shows that provide high levels of enjoyment.    I'm not someone who subscribes to HBO so I felt on the "outside" on the "talk" would surround the episodes of "The Sopranos".   However that didn't stop my curiosity about wanting to watch the show.    Once I watched "The Sopranos - The Complete First Season", I not only got an appreciation for the show - but I now understood where all of the hype came from on this show.The show focuses on an organized Italian-American crime family that is based in North Jersey.   The main character of the show is Tony Soprano played brilliantly by James Gandolfini.   Tony is a "capo" (high ranking member of organized crime) in the fictional DiMeo crime family.   On the show, we see Tony try to balance his "work" in the DiMeo crime family with his home life.    In his home life, he is trying to keep his marriage together to his wife Carmela (played by Edie Falco) while his children Meadow (played by Jamie-Lynn Sigler) and Anthony Jr. (played by Robert Iler) are beginning to learn about the line of work their father is involved in.   Also on the home front, Tony is dealing with putting his mother in a nursing home.  The pressures of his homel life combined with the volatile nature of being involved in organized crime has triggered panic attacks in Tony.  To deal with the treatment of his panic attacks, Tony sees a psychiatrist - Dr. Jennifer Melfi (played by Lorraine Bracco).   Throughout the first year, we see how Tony begins to trust Dr. Melfi and how he grows closer to her.Here are ten points about the show that I took from watching this DVD set - in no particular order1.One thing I realized as I watched all 13 episodes in Season 1 - James Gandolfini is one terrific actor.   Gandolfini is extremely believable as Tony Soprano and he will probably always be joined at the hip to his character.   I think the fact that he was born and raised in New Jersey makes him a natural for the environment and setting of the show.2.As usual, HBO will push the sex and language - something that is typical in HBO's original programming.  While there are objectionable elements, these elements do play a role in contributing to creating a realistic environment with realistic characters.   I give producer David Chase a lot of credit for this.3.While I love the idea of Tony Soprano seeing a psychiatrist, I didn't find the character of Dr. Melfi very interesting.   I found Melfi's character dry and I felt more could have been done to develop her.4.The opening sequence and credits to the show are awesome.   Watching Tony Soprano drive from the Lincoln Tunnel through North Jersey to the song "Woke Up in the Morning" (performed by A3)  is powerful stuff.5.I found the whole idea of setting the show in North Jersey to be fascinating.  In addition to the opening sequence, a good chunk of the show is filmed in North Jersey.    I grew up in this area and never found the surroundings to be interesting.  However, putting the show in North Jersey really works.   It's amazing that people outside of North Jersey recognize many of the landmarks in North Jersey as a result of watching this show - landmarks that just never interested me.6.David Chase is brilliant at integrating music into the show.   In addition to the title song, Chase does a great job at finding the right music for the right scene.   The closing credits of each episode always use a different song - yet Chase finds a song that fits the ending of each of the episodes.7.Paulie Walnuts is one of the all-time great characters.  Tony Sirico does an outstanding job at playing Paulie while integrating a sense of humor into both his character and the show.   One of the best scenes is when Paulie is in an Espresso Bar and complains how "his culture" missed out on cashing in on the whole coffee boom.   It's a shame Paulie didn't get more airtime in Season 1.8.While the storylines are terrific and entertaining, sometimes I did find them a little tough to follow.   I often found myself having to do some outside research on the background of "The Sopranos" so I can could follow the storylines.9.Michael Imperioli is brilliant as Christopher Moltisanti.  Moltisanti plays a young cousin of Carmela who is trying to become a "made man".   There is a scene in Season 1 involving Christopher that will remind you of Imperioli's performance in "Goodfellas".10.Steven ("Little Steven") Van Zandt plays Silvio "Sil" Dante, the owner of the "Bada Bing" nightclub.   This is the same "Little Steven" from Bruce Springsteen's E. Street Band.   Van Zandt is brilliant on the show and has a very believable character.   Like Paulie, I kind of wish he had more scenes than he had.Overall, I found the show to be riveting television and would not hesitate to call this "the most exciting 60 minutes on television".   In addition to the usual extras, one thing I really liked was how there was a brief textual synopsis provided on the screen before playing the episode.  Overall, this is a very good and entertaining set - highly recommended
Bold and inspiring, though not flawless. "Brother to Brother" packs a lot of ambition into its compact running time. Director Rodney Evans has interwoven the modern-day story of Perry, a young gay African-American artist (Anthony Mackie) living in New York, struggling to find love and a sense of identity, with nothing less than a brief film history of the birth of the Harlem Renaissance literary movement, with its seminal figures Langston Hughes, Wallace Thurman, Zora Neale Hurston and Bruce Nugent shown in black-and-white flashbacks. An aged, destitute but still witty and unbowed Nugent (Roger Robinson) befriends Perry in the present and becomes his touchstone."Brother to Brother" is perhaps at its best in the flashbacks, which vividly capture the excitement and sense of limitless possibility that briefly existed for Nugent and his compatriots as they founded the radical literary journal "Fire!" They make one want to know more about these people. The present-day narrative has its virtues as well, shedding light on the special problems of gay African-Americans as well as the struggle to maintain one's artistic identity and integrity. The frankness with which male/male sex is treated, without prurience or heavy guilt, is most welcome. Curiously, as another reviewer has mentioned, however, the couplings shown almost exclusively involve black with white men, which undercuts the film's contention that black gay men should celebrate their uniqueness. Moreover, Evans' protagonist has too many issues to contend with--homophobic parents and classmates, trying to make a living as a painter, boyfriend troubles--for everything to fit comfortably within the short allotted time. Finally, it must be said that an actor with greater emotional range than Mackie may have been able to bring out more facets of Perry, who too often seems merely a handsome, glum cipher. Still, despite its flaws, "Brother to Brother" succeeds at illuminating corners of the human experience long neglected in mainstream filmmaking, and for this certainly merits praise
Surprisingly Good. Was expecting a stinker based on reviews and the trailer, but this movie was surprisingly funny, romantic and real.  A woman who thinks she is in control (Viveca Fox) is surprised by a man who doesn't go along with her script (Morris Chestnut).  Despite bad advice from their zany friends, the two strained lovers end up together again after realizing that love is not a game that goes according to plans.Give this movie a chance, and I am sure you will enjoy it as much as I did.
Top Notch TV. I've been a fan of The West Wing since the first season. I have previously purchased season 1 and 2, and just recently purchased season 3. The West Wing's early seasons (especially 1,2 and 3) has some of the best writing and acting on television. I borrowed out the season 1 and 2 DVDs so many times to friends, they've more than paid for themselves in enjoyment. Season 3 should be more of the same. Well-worth the money
The Truth is Too SAD to acknowledge.. This movie Shows it with Humor. I have seen the other reviews and agree with them in the main. This movie is absolutely worth the cost. When you have read and know the incredible pain visited on children by institutions like this, it is good to be told in a humorous way of the pain visited upon these children. It is definitely worth seeing especially after reading about these torture camps. If it evens open the eyes of one parent or caregiver, it will have been worth it.As satire and humor alone, it is admirably worth it
A beautifully subtle and genuinely emotional film. This is clearly one of the most polarising of Jane Austen adaptations on film. Some viewers will love the genuinely moving acting, the authentically costumed characters, the beautiful scenery and sets, the incredible story-telling and the wonderfully subtle touches that abound in this film. Others will loathe the complete absence of makeup, the fact that Amanda Root is visibly older than 29, the slow and tender story, the use of natural lighting and the re-writing of the Mr Elliot sub-plot (including his unforgivably and casually cruel behaviour towards Mrs Smith).I acknowledge both of these views. Certainly Amanda Root does not enhance her natural sweet looks, and she does look a little too old for the part of Anne Elliot, but mon dieu, her acting! That is something else again. In terms of the emotional involvement and the ability to subtly create this gentle and loving character, no better actress could have been found. If only she'd  been permitted to "youthify" her looks a little... After all, in the novel she is described as a very pretty girl - although it's true her looks had faded somewhat, her appearance revives mid-way through the novel to the point where she has enough beauty to attract the admiration of passing gentlemen - but to be honest, I do prefer superb acting to superb looks, and that is why I find Amanda Root's portrayal so very moving and real.Ciarn Hinds is excellent as Captain Wentworth, Anne's love whose proposal she rejected some years ago. He is not movie-star handsome, but a well-looking man whose serious demeanour is not cloaked by his occasional more lively ripostes. In personality and character, he is undeniably the right match for Ms Root's Anne. The interaction between the two of them is so gracefully subtle that it might be missed by viewers who expect a more obvious approach. He is very deliberately ignoring Anne, although with perfect politeness. More and more, the appreciative viewer will notice that there is a quite remarkable sensitivity between the two of them, and the beauty of Anne's character is so wonderfully brought out by Amanda Root's acting that the love between these two characters is truly and fully realised.The sub-plots are also superbly explicated. Anne's selfish and heedless father (Corin Redgrave) and monstrously insensitive and vain sister Elizabeth(Phoebe Nicholls), not to mention her laughably tiresome sister Mary (Sophie Thompson), are so well played that one becomes genuinely outraged on Anne's behalf as one sees their carelessly selfish behaviour. Mr Elliot (the brilliant Samuel West) doesn't really get enough storytime in this adaption, unfortunately - I do think the script didn't quite manage to include his motivations and personality well enough for a proper understanding of his character. But the wonderful Fiona Shaw is perfect in the role of Mrs Croft (Anne's put-upon friend who has fallen upon hard times), and Lady Russell (Anne's mentor) is just sheer delight in her well-meaning snobbery as played by Susan Fleetwood. I also found absolutely perfect the self-seeking Mrs Clay (Felicity Dean) and the thoroughly nice Charles Musgrove who, having been rejected by Anne, decided to wed Mary instead (very, very well played by Simon Russell Beale, who makes this sort of role look completely effortless).The look of this film is lovely in many ways. The lack of makeup may take some getting used to, but there's no denying it's authentic, and with such excellent acting from everyone involved, the dynamics of the film are unsurpassed.The truly magnificent singing of opera singer Rosa Mannion in one of the scenes is the first truly appropriate musical performance in any Jane Austen film. (All too often, the standard of singing or playing in this sort of film is clearly 'quite nice', but certainly not the result of natural talent honed by years of training - as would indeed have been the case with young ladies of the genteel class. Or... if no natural talent was possessed, perhaps the young lady in question would learn the harp instead of singing. But music was an essential asset for any damsel of the period who had any pretensions at all to social graces.)To sum up: for those who want a film that is purely escapist, that is full of lovely-looking people floating about in 18th century clothing and that is "exciting" to watch, this is probably not a film that will appeal to you. For those, however, who are willing to plunge solely into the subtleties of this film and its beautifully moving performances, there will be great enjoyment for you
Perfect for beginners. As soon as my dvd arrived and I put it into my dvd player, I was learning how to crochet. I never knew how before but now at least I know some of the basic steps to crochet. This is a very good buy for someone who has no experienc
They were soldiers. Glory is a truly extraordinary motion picture in all sorts of ways.  As a proud Southerner, I have to say no other film has ever had me cheering for a Union regiment taking on a company of Confederate soldiers.  I was a little worried that this film would demonize the South, but it proved to be a most even-handed treatment of all parties.  By demonstrating the racism of Northerners - soldiers and civilians alike - it paints a most nuanced portrait of the African-American men who seized the opportunity to don the blue uniforms and fight for a country many of them must have been unable to truly call their own.  That only makes their heroism and bravery all the more poignant.  The War Between the States can never be understood in simple black and white terms on any level, as many a Union soldier clearly wasn't fighting to emancipate the slaves (just as many a Rebel soldier wasn't fighting for slavery).Even when they actually used to teach actual history in the schools, the story of the 54th Massachusetts regiment was a subject that never really came up - and that is what gives Glory such an extraordinary amount of historical importance.  I wouldn't go so far as to say the heroism and sacrifice of this first African-American regiment in the Union army turned the tide in the War, but it did lead to the acceptance of actual black fighting soldiers in the Union ranks - and 210,000 such recruits certainly proved important for a fighting force that basically won through strength of numbers (as more blues than grays died in the war).The movie itself, though, is really about the men who led and made up the 54th Massachusetts regiment - and there are sterling performances all over the place.  As I have said many times in the past, Morgan Freeman is the best actor living today, and his character, Sgt. Major John Rawlins, is really the heart and soul of the whole film.  As an older, runaway slave, he has gained a measure of wisdom and restraint that Private Trip (Denzel Washington) has never even imagined.  Trip wears the scars on his back proudly, and he is not about to stand down before any man.  Washington earned a Best Supporting Actor award for his role, and rightly so.  Educated freemen are represented by Thomas Searles (Andre Braugher), who seems ill-suited to the harsh realities of war but shoulders the burden with pride and determination.  At the head of these men rides Colonel Robert Gould Shaw (Matthew Broderick), a young officer who secured the position more by family influence than merit, perhaps, but he more than rises to the challenge to fight both for and with his men.  Despite his lifelong friendship with Thomas, he has almost no connection with the men of the 54th and must learn to know them and earn their respect.  The Union army doesn't even want to supply his men with necessities such as decent shoes and a uniform, nor does it really have any intention of actually sending them into combat.  Thanks to the Colonel, though, the fighting men of the 54th do eventually get their chance to prove themselves by leading what is basically a suicidal charge against Fort Wagner in South Carolina.Aside from the multi-layered story itself, one must be impressed by the realism of the action.  War is an ugly business, and that fact is brought home in the very first scenes showing Colonel Shaw's charge during the Battle of Antietam.  While there should have been small rivers of blood covering the battlefield, watching a soldier's head basically explode makes for a vivid stamp of realism.  While I would question the tactics employed on the assault on Fort Wayne at the end, the movie certainly does capture the nature of the fog of war and the viciousness of hand-to-hand fighting by heroes on both sides.  Of course, this is a movie, so there are numerous historical inaccuracies as to the main characters (none of whom, other than Col. Shaw, are based on the actual soldiers) and battles, yet Glory certainly does succeed in telling the story of the 54th Regiment in the most compelling of ways
Terrorstorm - Alex Jones. It is an incredible eye-opener. Every Patriot should make it his/her responsibility to view this documentary. Never trust your government. Watch everything your elected officials are doing. Put your trust in no man or deception will follow
Probably the best season. I think this is probably the show's best work.  So many classic episodes.  The actors were definitely comfortable with each other by now, but they were still fresh.  I tend to think people who buy TV series on DVD start at season one and buy each one, so don't stop at three.  If you don't buy in order (which isn't really necessary for Seinfeld because it has no plot), season four might be a good place to start.
Piccadilly, Wong & Waugh. We've been hearing a lot about the legendary Asian-American actress Anna May Wong (1905-1961) recently. In the last couple of years there have been three book-length bios, some special film screenings and symposia, and a two-part appreciation by Time's film critic, Richard Corliss, to mark the actress' centenary. Now, with the release of her last silent film, Piccadilly, on DVD we can see what all the fuss is about.It's been a long time coming, but it was worth the wait. The Milestone Collection DVD release of E.A. Dupont's 1929 fluid, kinetic backstage show biz opus is loaded with extra features, and boasts a digital transfer of a print lovingly restored by the British Film Institute. Most importantly, it brings us the luminous and transcendent presence of Anna May Wong who bolts out of the murky past and creaky cinematic conventions of the Twenties fully ALIVE.With her captivating screen presence it is ironic that Wong, a native of L.A., had to travel to England--under the direction of a German, no less--to find and perform a role uniquely suited to her talent and abilities. Yet, her turn as Shosho, and her onscreen transformation from Limehouse scullery maid to glamorous Piccadilly nightclub headliner, is unforgettable movie magic.It is her economy of movement, her subtle and controlled gestures and expressions that are so remarkable and "modern" to our eyes. These attributes were not lost on her contemporaries--especially to one dazzling young English novelist chronicling the madcap lives of the "Bright Young Things" of London between the wars.In an article titled "My Favourite Film Star," penned for The Daily Mail, 24 May 1930, a gushing Evelyn Waugh writes, "the one essential requisite in a film star seems to me beauty of movement," and he found plenty of beautiful movement in the movies of "Miss Wong."A fan since adolescence, Waugh writes of catching "glimpses of her flitting through crook plays of Chinatown," but opines "it was British taste and enterprise that made of her the star we all admire today." Her star-making turn in Piccadilly supplies plenty of evidence for this theory.Waugh admits that it is "absurd to attempt any definition of her charm," but recognizes that Wong posesses "in the highest degree that subtlety of movement and restraint of expression which the film particularly nurtures."As her recent biographers have claimed, Waugh too notes that Wong has "several times been condemned to play in films of very slight merit of plot or direction, but always she has lifted them at once into a realm of genuine artistic merit through her individual and inimitable grace and poignancy."Waugh recognizes the subtlety and control evident in Wong's technique (compare hers to that of the other, more conventional players in this film), and writes "her acting has exactly the balance and modesty and refinement which the average European star loses before she attains the first rank."The English novelist then asks "But why should her talent be left where it is?" and contributes a decidedly Anglo-centric answer:"I should like to see Miss Wong playing Shakespeare. Why not a Chinese Ophelia? It seems to me that Miss Wong has exactly those attributes which one most requires of Shakespearean heroines. I cannot see her as Lady Macbeth, but she seems to me perfectly suited for the role of Juliet or to any of the heroines of the comedies."We can agree with Waugh when he writes that it "seems absurd to me that plays of oriental setting should have to be manufactured for her," but his argument to "put her in one of the traditional English parts," while admirably "colorblind" for the times, seems dubious, limiting and maybe slightly racist from our advanced perspective.Waugh even claims a certain "racial pride" in his appreciation of Wong, precisely because "it was the much-despised British film industry which first recognized her transcendent talent."Alas, Wong--who always projected an acute self-awareness and sense of pride--despite the paucity of roles suited to her true talent, can be viewed as either the ultimate Hollywood victim or ultimate Hollywood survivor.  As such, she is the stuff that cults are made of, and has been and will be "claimed" by many groups and individuals who empathize with and identify with her for reasons racial, cultural, gender based, sexual, artistic, academic, professional, political, or all of the above.Now, with Piccadilly readily available on disc, all film lovers are afforded the opportunity to fall in love with the luminous spirit that was Anna May Wong. At last, she belongs to the world again.
Angel. THe DVD arrived in good condition. I love angel and I watched it up till season 4. I watched a little of season 5 before I purchased this item. If you love the comlicated story of Angel, wait till you watch this season. It just twists comletely. And Angel has so much action so its something I like to watch over and over
A great way to introduce kids to opera. My four year old daughter loves this VERY short version of Mozart's classic opera.  The running length is just over 40 minutes, the great arias are kept in, the story is not compromised ... perfect for kids
Lazy mans guided to the other side. Wonderfully done and clear explanation. It should have subtitles in other languages. Dont miss this film
An entertaining murder melodrama!. Dedicated to Hitchcock, whom Truffaut admired so much, it tells us the sordid revenge of a suddenly when leaving behind the church minutes ago, his husband is shot by three men. He will assume the role of Fair Agent even she has to be in jail in order to come to the last act.Jeanne Moreau as always was magnificent and the rest of the cast too.
Still a few laughs. Not as good as the first movie but still funny.All new material, fast paced and as usual, only people with a good sense of humour will really appreciate the combined talents of these 3 comedians
One of the best concert DVDs you can buy. I only bought this a week ago, and it's far better than I expected. One thing I like about the DVD is that it's not wretchedly over-produced like so many other concert DVDs I have. Definately check out the rare shots of the audience during Hurt and Piggy. It's cool seeing Trent get off the stage and go half-way into an audience of tearfull fans during Piggy(not to mention Trent leaving the microphone in the audinece for the fans to sing "nothing can stop me now!"). NIN's songs are even more incredible live, they really are. It's funny watching Trent pushing the guitarist around that's doing the guitar solo with a wah-wah peddle on Sin, and watching him rasing his fist when he says, "your fist!" Probably the most emotional part of the concert is when NIN performs Hurt. It's more amazing live than it is on The Downward Spiral, as Trent screams the vocals instead of whispering them like on the record.Definately buy this if you're a fan of Trent's. And All That Could've Been is a great concert. I hope that I'll be able to attend a NIN concert some day.
When the Legend Becomes the Fact, Print the Legend. John Ford was fascinated by American heroes & how they shaped the popular psyche.  He was the first to freely admit that most of America's early heroes were actually a pretty disreputable lot beneath the surface gloss but he understood why Americans needed heroes. Back then, there weren't gossip columns or scathing myth-busting biographies.  Those were less cynical times.  Wyatt Earp is a wonderful example of a man who became a hero in spite of having led a dissolute life of gambling, whoring, gunslinging and, ultimately, eagerly selling himself out to Hollywood and other storytellers.  My Darling Clementine is a perfect example of Ford printing the legend. The Wyatt brothers ride into town, are drawn into a fight they didn't start and wind up cleaning up the criminal element of a pioneer frontier town and, thus, furthering American civilization at their own cost.  The perfect blend of sacrifice, pioneer spirit, rugged individualism and concern for the common good.
Endgame. The print looks like you're watching it through muddy water; is this something to do with the unclear "public domain" status of this and other of Capra's works?  Doesn't he have a family that could help out his DVDs the way that Chaplin's family has done, or even, to use the opposite extreme, the family of Edgar Ulmer, who have released superlative versions of some pretty dicey movies?  The point is that if people are paying for something they deserve to get it served up nice, and all the various DVDS of MEET JOHN DOE are painful to watch.We've heard for years of the re-worked ending of the film, and that another one exists (or existed at one time).  Bring it on!  For now the pleasure is nearly entirely in watching Gary Cooper react to Barbara Stanwyck's pure life.  It's sort of like BALL OF FIRE but a bit more subtle.  Moviemakers knew they were on to agood thing teaming the two, because Cooper's slow-moving, nearly snakelike screen presence got an injection of caffeine when placed next to Stanwyck's vibrant beauty and her gorgeous clear gaze and complexion.  She doesn't even have to speak, she emanates something very basic in her bones and her posture.  Okay, the movie writes itself into a corner, for what else is going to happen except that if Gary Cooper is not going to kill himself the movie will break the trust it's established with the viewers.  This has always been DOE's problem, that it has to cheat to come out ahead of itself, and it didn't work in 1943 and it still isn't working now.  It's great up until about an hour and fifteen minutes; then you feel the gears start to whine and complain as "Hollywood" tries to solve a basically philosophical dilemma
A Great Workout. I love Ellen Barrett. I highly recommend all her videos. This video makes you work and is still a lot of fun. I like how the video is broken down into different sections. A definite buy.
Great Music!!!. If you haven't got a chance to see T.P. perform live (like so many of us) you won't be dissapointed.  This is a must have for any old school R&B fan.  Teddy wows with his vocal abilities and his performance, there is also a couple of times in which he plays percussions.  If you've heard the live album that he released back in the day you would think that this is the same performance but it's not.  It just goes to show the consistant nature of a great performer.  Teddy sounds just like all of his recordings and the TP GROWL is effortless!
awesome!. this movie is a very realistic one. from the omaha beach scene to the last village scene! although the omaha beach sce was very very graphic, i still taught me that war is hell. the only nasty super graphic part is when that guy gets shot up and his intestines are falling out every where. great movie
ANOTHER MIRACLE FROM. It should come as no surprise that Einojuhani Rautavaara is without the shadow of a doubt the best living opera composer ofour times.After being an enfant terrible with his first two operas he consolidated his particular style with his fifth opera called THOMAS in 1985.RASPUTIN has been written in the grand opera style,perhaps a triffle different to the extremelypersonal universes that he evoked in his previous two operas,hiscapolavoro ALEKSIS KIVI and the "tragedia buffa" THE HOUSE OF THE SUN.In spite of this though the musical style follows the much more melodic vein which characterizes his operas from VINCENT on,permeating the score with a distinguishable russian flavor.There are great ensembles and monologues for the protagonist(a sweet and soaring description of his native Siberia)for Tsar Nicholas,for the Tsarina Alix and for the conspirator prince Felix Yussupov.A magnificent danced religiousorgy in the first act and a wonderful tavern scene with russiangypsy melodies inserted in the score,which gives way to an ensemble where the composer makes use of melodic continuos which approximate this opera to the conclusion of ALEKSI KIVI.Perhaps the only flaw of the score is the lack of dramaticism ofthe murder scene in act III,which can be forgiven given the greatness of the rest of the opera.The mammothical title role has been tailormade for the voice of bass Matti Salminen,one of the best singers of the finnish nation,together with other artists of renowned quality who alsotake part in this event.Of particular interest are baritone Jorma Hynninen as Tsar Nicolai III,mezzosoprano Lili Paasikivi as the troubled Tsarina,and tenor Jyrki Anttila and baritone Gabriel Suovanen as the conspirators Felix Yussupov and Dmitri Pavlovich.Mikko Franck conducts the orchetra of the Finnish National Opera.Five stars for this oeuvre d'art which deserves even more.[...
Great Baseball Movie, with frisbee included. Field of Dreams which is in the top 3 of the greatest baseball films of all time is a great purchase, here you get that movie, and For Love Of The  Game, which is like a free frisbee to throw around with your dog, or  yourself if you are so inclined..
Splendid DVD Shows Why Li Is Among Our Best Young Pianists. Deutsche Grammophon has to be commended for producing a superb documentary video which is an ample, excellent demonstration of young Chinese pianist Yundi Li's brilliant, technically refined and yet, quite expressive, playing. His performance of the Liszt Sonata in B Minor on this DVD may be better than the performance recorded on his critically acclaimed Liszt CD issued a few years ago. Without question, his thoughtful, expressive interpretation of this work demonstrates that although he is still quite young, he is nonetheless a very mature artist, whose skills will undoubtedly improve as he grows older; it is an interpretation that compares favorably to any I have heard or seen live from the likes of Brendel or Pletnev, for example. The other pieces on this DVD are also played with ample technical skill, with the right balance of expressive playing thrown in, most notably the Chopin Scherzi. When I heard Yundi Li for the first time perform live at Carnegie Hall last month, I was most impressed by the beautifully warm tones and reluctance to use the pedals; these I believe are exemplary aspects of his playing, which not only demonstrate his maturity, but why I believe he is among the best young pianists of his generation
Shiva Rea-Yoga Shakti. This DVD is useful for all levels of yoga. There is a very beginning section which was pretty easy, anyone could do it and it advances to very difficult poses that I don't imagine I will ever have the flexibility to do too. It is a great all around choice and is really the only DVD you will ever need for all levels of practice.I also like it because she talks just enough for the instruction to be useful but not so much that she is distracting or annoying like so many other teachers. She has a nice soothing voice too.I haven't figured out how to do the interactive part yet, but it is a nice feature for those advanced enough with the DVD player.
Irreverence and decadence!. As all pf us are aware about Terry Gilliam's border limits scripts, the repercussions and tendencies that occur, product of a progressive crumbling of the human mind; there us a visible breakthrough respect the established order, and the way to respond before this anomaly vary according the case.In particular, this movie may disturb most of viewers, in case you are not totally immersed in the spirit of that age, plenty of absolute lack of respect and negation of basic premises. Don't forget the famous French May's ideological emblem: "Forbidden  to forbid"Caustic, acidic and uncensored gaze around these outlaw period of a recent history, that now is part of the anthological  retrospective.All the cast was absolutely superb; and the movie reflected with absolute veracity the essential profiles of its hallucinating characters.
Another fine effort by Criterion. Once again, Criterion does a classic movie justice.  The digital transfer is 100x better than previous versions available on dvd and the extras are strong, as usual
Yesteryear. American in Paris &  Singing in  the  Rain  are  stories  from  a  time  long  that  no  longer  exists  .  .  .  with  sweet  music  &  excellent  dance.    They  are  an  excellent  education  for  the  young  &  an  escape  for  adults  trapped  in  60  hour  work  weeks
History Part 1. Required material for any person who grew in the 60th or has children or grandchildren who needs to know where the great music and inspiration came fro
Your security stinks!!. So barks iron-jawed Robert Stack at the end of this draining flight. This movie is almost more than a body can handle. Flight 502 leaves New York for London on a routine flight, routine that is until a letter shows up in the first class lounge. There will be murders on this flight.But who is the killer? Who will be the victims? And why? Could it be the priest who wears fingernail polish? The Davy Partridge look-alike kid who likes to play with smoke bombs? The has been rock star? The bank robber? The mystery novelist? The doctor? Or could it be the lovely stewardess played by Farrah Fawcett-Majors?I cannot give the ending away because it will blow your mind. Even Agatha Christie could not com eup with a plot with so many twists and turns. But I'll give you a hint. When the second stewardess spills her suitcase, look at the contents VERY carefully
A rare gem beautifully restored. This is a hard-to-find Karloff film, done in England. It's very atmospheric and it has some fascinating characters, not the least of which is that hoot of an old queen, Ernest Thesiger, in one of the meatiest roles he's done since THE OLD DARK HOUSE. The restoration is wonderful
Haunting and tragic. I'll always remember that in the early 1990's, at the time this documentary was first released, "The Oprah Winfrey Show" did an entire episode about it. On the Oprah show, they showed many lengthy clips from the movie, and then, near the end of the show, Oprah revealed the dark fate that ended the life of one of the six ladies that were featured in the film. The audience GASPED at the awful news, and for days I was haunted by it.Immediately after the Oprah episode ended, all those years ago, I tried to look for the movie on video, but it was never released on the VHS format.All of these years later, when I learned that they were putting this movie onto DVD, I bought it right away. After watching it, for days I was once again haunted by this sad story.The documentary as a whole isn't the best documentary ever made, but after the movie is over and you read the tragic follow-up, then you will see what makes this movie so sad and important.I only wish they'd included the Oprah episode on the dvd as a special feature
All That Jazz. The origional modern musical.  Even by todays standards ... a cutting edge piece of work.  I enjoyed it years ago ... and enjoy it just as much today ... fun and quirky.
Review of North and South - Elizabeth Gaskell, author. I have never read or viewed extensively the works of Elizabeth Gaskell, however, I have found I am a devoted fan after viewing "The Buccaneers" and   "North and South".North and South has become my all time favorite love story, better than Pride and Predujice, Gone  With the Wind, and all proceeding stories of the 19th century.Miss Gaskell describes the difference of the new working class  compared to the gentry, and how hard it is for change in society of any kind.This story combines literature, period movie, movies to see and romance all in one.I have friends and sisters who have come to visit me and watch this movie, who have gone on to order a DVD of their own
Watched in Social Studies. First of all. I LOVED THIS MOVIE! It was so realistic and didn't have a sappy love story part, it was pure battle and made you feel like you were involved. When i saw my teacher pull the TV into the room, i was just like ok time for me to do other homework, but that homework never got done, i was so wrapped up in the movie. it was amazing
In The Line Of Fire. I saw this movie when it first came on TV. Michael Gross gives a chilling performance, the best of the entire cast. It is based on an actual "case" and that lends credibility to the acting.
Equilibrium -Hidden Sci Fi Gem. Equilibrium is one of those movies not generally well known to the public at large, even to those who liked the Matrix trilogy.  For me, besides the truly awesome action scenes, the gradual psychological development of the main character (Christian Bale) was very well played out and believable.The director, in my opinion, did a marvelous job to allow this movie to transcend well above a mere 'kick-butt' tale.  Who cannot identify him/herself with a person who gradually and reluctantly comes to realize that s/he has been deceived by a totalitarian or religious ideology?  That the premises of one's political or religious certainties that one has come to take for granted are actually flawed and erroneous?  Mmmm?  Perhaps too painful to consider?  This movie puts a face to this ephipanic process.Well recommended
Excellent film. One of the best films, adapted from a book. very touching true story, and the acting impecable, Richard Gere gives a great performance as a man confronting his mortality
"When's the future?". Spike Lee has said, in hindsight, that he'd lost his abilities as a filmmaker between Do The Right Thing and Malcolm X.  If that's true, you won't be able to tell during Jungle Fever - at least not in a way you'd expect.  Jungle Fever is a lot of things - daring, empassioned, extreme, overarching, undeniably and intentionally "heavy" - but amateurish it is not.  Watching Jungle Fever now made me realize all the power Lee movies entail - which is, especially at this point in his career, a real voice.  Two scenes of extremes are rendered in equal precision - a group of African American women discussing the problems of keeping their men, contrasting with an equally long and empassioned scene of pugnacious racism between a group of Bensonhurst Italians.  In each scene the experience of its characters is given vividness by the authenticity of the dialogue, by the conviction of its cast.  And of the cast, let me add what a treasure of an ensemble it is: 15 years later, virtually every supporting role (some on screen for just minutes) has become a recognizable performer (it's a game in itself to count how many Oscar, Emmy, Tony, and Grammy wins/ nominations, not to mention plush Sopranos roles, these actors share).  In its leading roles, Wesley Snipes has a seething immediacy, John Turturro burns with conscience, and Samuel L. Jackson, in the most fearless performances of his career, unfolds so many gripping layers at once, the Cannes jury created a special acting prize to honor him.  All that helps make Jungle Fever provocative in the right ways - sparking conversations, as well as personal speculations, about the modern state of racism, of the way that we're never free of our own cultural expectations, and how they effect who and how we love.  The movie's first giant, nagging flaw is its attempt to handle too much - the plot that follows the path of crack addiction belongs to a (terrific) different movie.  Its second, and this is tougher, is that the notion of this "fever," of Flipper (Snipes) and Angie (Annabella Sciorra) being blinded by each others' race, is an unfulfilled idea in the movie - the characters, I'm afraid, work better as catalysts for thier environments than they do as lovers, as their affair is remote, and Sciorra, a gifted actress elsewhere, seems far too cold for fevers of any kind.  Yet even these flaws are the product of a force already at work on the film industry - the movie suffers only from an ambition to reach all aspects of the urban race experience, and succeeds as well as can be expected; you'll rarely recall a film who fails its goals this intriguingly
Excellent DVD to start Qigong Practice. I purchased David Garripoli's VHS a few years ago and I realized benefits from the first session of doing the Wuji "Swimming Dragon". I first realized the sensation in the my crown chakra. I also felt that all important burst of energy that comes along with the appropriate and correct practive of Qigong.The directions are easy enough for a child to follow and Garripoli gives the historical background to this treasured Martial Art.I would and frequently do recommend Qigong to everyone-not all for it's health benefits but for it's uplifting spiritual benefits.
This movie was freakin awsome they should make another one. The movie was really cool and it gave that fix of new Baywatch that i had been missing Baywatch was one of TV's most ground breaking shows and the movie was hot i would suggest this movie to anyone who liked the show or good looking people
Good DVD. I started power yoga classes about 7 months ago and have always found it to be really challenging and hard to keep up with others in my class.  My yoga teacher offered some advice and suggested that I pick-up a book or really good at home video/DVD to supplement my in class workout.  This DVD's instructor is precise and very engaging with many alternatives to fit anyones fitness level or flexibility.  Its a slower pace than advanced power yogi's may be in to, but the slow pace method is gaining popularity and this DVD is just on that curve.  Most of all its an incredible value with user friendly capabilities
Excelent purchase. Excelent episodes, I remember when I saw them for the first time in TV and I wondered myself: How could I get this episodes for me and can watch them over and over again...well, this is the solution...buy it here!
8 Below. This is a beautiful film with breath taking views and shows the deep love and devotion of human to animal as well as animal to human.  I cried for both.  being a large dog owner and a person that is devoted to my animals I thoroughly enjoyed this film.  All ages can watch this film without supervision.
Nobody puts baby in the corner to carry a watermelon. I have one hand on the bible, one hand in the air, and I confess that I indeed used to be obsessed with this movie, as most women my age were. I had the soundtrack, I knew every line, I knew the choreography every dance step and swivel and thrust. Jennifer Grey was me, big nose, bad perm and small chest. Patrick Swayze, well he didn't exist in my world, so I had to watch his again and again. We all knew the "I carried a watermelon" and "nobody puts baby in the corner" but did we really know why we even felt so passionate about it in the first place? The story being set in the late 50's, the setting at a family vacation spot, the outsider looking in, dancing, forbidden love, mystery, it all entered our psyches as THE perfect movie and never lost its footing. Could Patrick Swayzes white t-shirt be any tighter, could Jennifer Grays smirk be any cuter, could Jerry Orbach be a more perfect protective father?  NO! After this came out, I saw advertisements for learning how to "dirty dance" and asked my parents, with me being in ballet and jazz, what was one more class? Well it turns out 14 year olds shouldn't be gyrating against each other, who knew? I still learned them, by watching the tape over and over, but my partner was a girl named April and I think we giggled too much. Now that I think about it, if anyone had caught us I would have been straight to therapy. I haven't watched it in years, my husband refuses to even acknowledge its existence "chick movie" he mumbles, is it really just a girl phenomena? Well, no matter, It's a perfect specimen of Fun, laughs, thrills, tears and friction!
The action is the highlight. Mainly, the movie follows the aftermath of the very successful video game, Final Fantasy 7.  If you haven't played the game, the movie will probably not make as much sense.After the destruction of Jenova, there are still followers of Sephiroth.   They make attempts to resurrect this classical villain.  Cloud and his friends again step in to save the world.There is some good voice acting, and the action sequences are amazing!  There is a scene while Cloud is fighting on a motorcycle with his big sword, fighting two guys at once.  It is really something.If you liked the video game and enjoy action sequences, then I would recommend this to you.  If you have not played the game and do not like action sequences, then you might not like it.  Hope you find this helpful
I Like It. With a reference to Jewish mysticism, this black and white movie perfectly highlights a psychotic world of a talented mathematician attempting to unlock world mysteries "Chaos"(see:    http://www.amazon.com/gp/cdp/member-reviews/A32NUR740CAUFR/ref=cm_cr_auth/104-6854701-1987133?ie=UTF8    )is much close to resolve.Although mixing a Hasidic community with the Wall Street sharks might usher into unwelcome parallels, I like authors' depiction of New York environment -busy streets,sub,neighbouring- very much.
One Loud Hooker Plus One Insecure Writer Equals a Match Made Only in the Movies. After three big-budget Broadway-based period musicals in a row, Barbra Streisand obviously made a conscious career decision to convey a more contemporary image onscreen. She succeeds in spades in this often hilarious 1970 comedy adapted by Buck Henry from a hit Bill Manhoff play and directed by Herbert Ross. Streisand plays Doris, a loud-mouthed fetish hooker who claims to be a model and an actress. She gets thrown out of her apartment when her neighbor, a nebbish bookstore clerk and aspiring writer named Felix Sherman, reports her clandestine activities to the landlord. This causes a confrontation in which she is convinced he's gay and seduces him in a surprisingly graphic scene (at least surprising for Streisand). Another fight ensues causing them to get kicked out of his apartment. The rest of the film is mostly their bickering as they travel from one apartment to the next and carry out their improbable, Pygmalion-like opposites-attract romance.In the same year he made two greatly underrated films, the mature "Loving" and the manic "Where's Poppa?", George Segal makes Felix a lovably insecure schlub and provides great chemistry with Streisand in her first non-singing role. They have a great scene in the bathtub where both are completely stoned as his fiance and her parents walk in, and he has a funny scene where he pretends to be the TV to help Doris get to sleep. For Streisand's part, she wears a hysterically tacky negligee, dances in a go-go cage, appears in a soft-porn flick called "Cycle Sluts" (we only hear the riotous audio - "Where are you putting THAT?") and says the "F" word (unfortunately cut out of the DVD version though it's obvious when she says it). It's not her best screen performance, but it's one of her funniest. Henry's sharp dialogue and Ross' quick pacing help considerably in making this an enjoyably vulgar romantic comedy. The 2001 DVD had no extras other than three trailers, none for this movie
Una joya romantica. Una historia veridica llevada al cine magistralmente. Todos los actores realizan unas actuaciones tan maravillosas que en realidad uno cree estar viviendo en el 1848...Imanol Arias (Ladislao Gutierrez) transmite tanta pasion, amor y deseos prohibidos que es comprensible el por que Camila, sacrifica todo por el. Aparte de ser un actor increiblemente guapo, se adentra tanto en su personaje , que te hace llorar, amar, rezar y sufrir con el.Mi escena favorita es cuando Camila le confiesa su amor y le dice que se esta muriendo de amor, el le dice que eso es natural a su edad, como queriendo ignorar que es de el que ella esta hablando.  Su amor ya en ese momento es mutuo y el enferma de amor. Lucha entre su amor por Dios y su amor por ella.Definitivamente una pelicula que merece la pena ver, maravillosamente actuada, con unos efectos de luces tenuesque le dan un toque de romanticismo, una musica fabulosa ,unos dialogos en susurros entre los enamorados llenos depasion, la lucha carnal entre el amor humano y el amor a Dios yun tragico final.Mi pelicula favorita se la recomiendo a todos...
5 star film, 1 star DVD. This is one of Harrison Ford's underappreciated gems, made in that brief period in the 1980's when he had a two movie fling with roles beyond his usual fare, the other being the fantastic "The Mosquito Coast." Sadly, both movies bombed, and Ford never pushed himself again.Roman Polanski crafts a creepily realistic thriller. The first half is near flawless, as Ford investigates the mysterious disappearance of his wife. Things do start to unravel a bit as we find out just what happened to her, the mysterious becoming just mundane Hollywood fare. Still, Polanski's direction is so assured that I'm willing to forgive this fault. His own tragic personal loss clearly informs this dark, unceasingly serious film.Although filmed in Paris, Polanski makes a fascniating choice. This is not the "City of Lights" we're used to. Instead, Polanski shows the city at its absolute worst, delighting in its ugliness. The film opens and closes with lengthy shots of a highway passing through dreary suburbs. Trash trucks are forever collecting garbage and obscuring the Eiffel Tower. We constantly see bathrooms, alleys, concrete parking structures, rooms lit by banks of fluorescent lights, rundown apartments, the list goes on. This is not to say the film is ugly, it's beautifully shot, but not to look like a series of postcard images, this is a working, living organism of a city.There is an almost documentary feel to this film that will alienate many viewers. This is arthouse style filmmaking. There are no easy jokes and little snappy dialogue. Multiplex moviegoers, used to instant, constant gratification will be disappointed. But those who like a little more depth and intelligence to their thrillers will be mesmerized.Sadly, the American DVD is a disaster. It was one of the very first DVDs ever released and shows its age. In fact, the picture quality was notably worse than my old VHS. Even more annoyingly, it starts out in widescreen for the credits, teasing you, then zooms in to pan-and-scan for the feature, before zooming out again to widescreen for the closing credits. Infuriating. Luckily, the British DVD, available at amazon.co.uk, has an anamorphic widescreen transfer. It's not the greatest picture, but until Warner does right by this film in the US, it gets the job done. If you can play Region 2 discs, that's the one to get.
Incredible. I can't really add much to the only other review, but I, too, find it unfortunate that this film and much of Pudovkin's work has been largely made invisible due to the glare of Eisenstein (or if you're into cultural studies during the New Economic Policy, Protazanov and the other 'commercial' directors at Mezhrabprom-Rus). While this film represents Pudovkin at his peak, awash as it is in ethnographic detail, a real human story (instead of Eisenstein's cardboard cutouts), and the completely sublime use of his trademark 'bricking' montage, his other films (especially less famous ones like 'Chess Fever' and 'Deserter') deserve a look, too
Beginning Pilates Mat Workout. I love this DVD. Easy to follow and not too tedious for frequent use
Dream Team DVD. This DVD was in excellent condition and arrived within one week of purchase.
all about fire engines/ all about construction. My 2 year old loves this dvd.  It is a little cheesy but, the content is simple to understand and very engagining for my son.  My husband said he even learned a few things about construction equipment
Effective...just make sure you have the equipment. This is an extremely challenging workout in terms of lower body work. Format: Warmup, Lower Body Work, Cooldown for Lower/Warm up for Upper, Upper Body Work, Cooldown. The DVD allows you to select lower, upper, or both. Equipment called for: The Fanny Lifter, dumbbells. You could also use The FIRM Box or the TransFirmer. If you have a regular step, you can use it with a little creativity, no problem.As others have noted, you need some kind of step for basically ALL The FIRM workouts, plus your dumbbells. Some FIRM workouts also require a Sculpting Stick. There is truly no need to expect to participate fully in The FIRM workouts without your box (or step or whatever you have).Here's some helpful hints: All body sculpting systems (BSS) from The FIRM require dumbbells. BSS1 requires The Fanny Lifter. BSS2 requires The Fanny Lifter and Sculpting Stick. BSS3 requires The FIRM Box. BSS4 requires The TransFirmer.Some of The FIRM workouts will work just fine with a regular Step, others won't. Just be aware that you may not be able to fully participate without the proper equipment. I will say this about The FIRM: Even though they require you to purchase their equipment, you can use the equipment for years to come. Plus, the packages are not that expensive, they usually come with 3 or more workouts, and the old stuff is on sale on their website. And, they usually let you pay with two payments instead of one. Not bad.I love The FIRM. I've lost over 50 pounds of my pregnancy weight with these no-nonsense, effecient workouts. These workouts are challenging guys. They get results, so I'm willing to spend a few extra bucks on their equipment because these workouts WORK. I've noticed a definite change in my muscle tone, energy level, and stamina. Like everything else in life, this works if you work it. Good luck, everyon
10 Stars!. I can't say enough good things about this movie. I watch a lot of anime, but I have to say this is the most well animated movie I've seen. You completely forget you're watching a cartoon. The characters just come to life. All of their subtle movements make them seem like real people. Especially Hana the transvestite. She was animated with so much attention to detail. It's so incredible! And then there's the story. Three homeless people find an abandoned baby and go out searching for the mother. These characters show so much heart and you really find yourself caring for them. And each of their situations for why they're homeless are all so real. So then they find the mother and then there's a huge twist in the story which I wont give away. I'll just say the ending is a miracle.Fantastic movie
Sequel Time. Ingrid Bergman looks lustrous, her skin aglow, as though they fed them nothing but cream in that convent.  No wonder she turned a million little American boys onto Catholicism and boxing at the same time.  Bing Crosby can't take his eyes off of her, and this gives the movie an interesting tension; to doubters I say that Leo McCarey could have hired any actress to play Sister Benedict--a Helen Hayes, an Ethel Barrymore.  Or younger, it could have been Rosalind Russell.  But instead McCarey just happened to hire the sexiest, most beautiful actress in the movies!  You know he wanted those sparks.  The two stars are said to have conducted a romance whenever they heard the word "cut."  Who could blame them?  McCarey's sets were generally easy-going affairs, with great catering and plenty of cocktails served twice a day.  This was the last of Crosby's four 1945 pictures.  They kept them busy in those days!  (Besides which, of course, he was starring the whole time in his own Philco-sponsored radio program every week.)  THE BELLS OF ST MARY'S was a step up in quality from his other 1945 efforts (except for THE ROAD TO UTOPIA, which has its own surrealist charm and serious fanbase).  Bergman was similarly overworked, having just released SPELLBOUND as well as SARATOGA TRUNK (filmed earlier and delayed due to glut of studio releases during the war years).  She was at the height of her beauty and fame, and it seemed she could do no wrong.  The confidence of her portrayal of Sister Benedict underlines this.The movie, a sequel to GOING MY WAY, lit up the box office and became the biggest hit of the year.  However, Crosby felt he had gone to the well enough and declined to star in a third installment which would have matched Father O'Malley with an orphaned set of twins (his niece and nephew).  Even in the 1950s when he could have used a hit, he told his manager he would never make a third O'Malley film.Late in her life I asked Ingrid Bergman which was her favorite movie of all those she had made.  She laughed.  In Sweden?  She named a film I did not recognize its title.  With Rossellini?  She said "Europa 51."  In America?  There were two, "Notorious" and "The Bells of St. Mary.
Clasic Mystery. I have enjoyed watching this mystery over the years. Intriguing plot without too much violence with a final twist. Engaging
Rare Laserdiscs - dvds Movies Collector. Breakin' is One of The greatest 80s movies ever made..Add it to you Collection,,You'll love it ...I bought the dvd and I enjoyed watchin'  :
THREE STAR POWER AND..SIDNEY LUMET TOO!!. Connery,Hoffman and Broderick is not the typical cast . Would you in your wildest dreams picture Dustin Hoffman as an Italian named Vito? Not only that but Sean Connerys son? Not only that but Matthew Brodericks father? Watch and you will believe!  Sidney Lumet is a brilliant director and he pulls this one off beautifully!  Its wonderful fun!!!!  I enjoyed it tremendously!!!
Better than most modern thrillers. I was surprised by this movie, maybe because i hadn't heard anything about it so when i put it in the dvd player i had no idea what kind of movie i was about to watch.Action star gets stalked by dirty working paparazzis. It's not a standard theme for a thriller and it's nice to see something else instead of all "guess who is the killer" movies.It's not that long but things happen all the time so it feels much longer.
Solo Oliver Hardy. Before he teamed with Stan Laurel in 1927, Oliver Hardy had been working in films since 1914. This disc has films from the 1920's. Highlights include: Stick Around, a film from 1925 which has Ollie and Bobby Ray as paperhangers who are hired to wallpaper a Mental Instution. Ollie has his mustache and bowler hat, and looks and acts very much like he would with Stan Laurel. This is the complete film, as most others versions of the film are 10 minute cutdowns under the title The Paperhangers helper.  45 minutes from Hollywood, a 1926 Hal Roach film, stars Glenn Tryon as a man who goes to hollywood. Oliver Hardy has a role as a hotel detective, and Stan Laurel as a hotel guest. The boys never meet in the film, and Stan has a big mustache on. It was the first Hal Roach film which had both Stan and Oliver in it. Along Came Auntie features Ollie as a musisican who has to pretend he is married to Vivien Oakland so she can get an inherrentce. Oakland would appear in several Laurel and Hardy films, most notably as the Sherrif's wife in Way Out West. The Sawmill features Hardy in support of Larry Semon, with whom Hardy worked with several times. The reason for the four star rating is that some films have already been on other complations, most notable the Laurel and Hardy lost films series. Still I recomend to set to all Laurel and Hardy fans. And thanks to Kino for giving Oliver Hardy his due as a solo performer. And hopefully the prints used will be great
Intense. I like the fact that there was the background story with the performance. Great. Educational and entertaining at the same time
mystery best!. what can i say?...the brits have it right; wonderful mystery series...pleeeeeeeeeeeze make more
nice window into hell---or one of them, at least. As someone who followed the carnage in the former Yugoslavia with great morbid fascination during most of the 1990s, I found much of this film quite accurate.There is a long and bloody history between the ethnic groups of Yugoslavia of which none are guiltless, but what happened in the early 90s was almost ENTIRELY the doing of the Serb leadership, namely Karazdic and Milosevic who both deserve a special seat in hell.  It was also the fault of the West, namely the West Europeans, that nothing was done until hundreds of thousands had been displaced, killed, and wounded---in particular, the British government was openly sympathetic to the Serbian side, and much of the Western Europeans also were afraid of having another Muslim state at their doorstep (the reason they keep refusing Turkey entry to the EU).  It was also partially Clinton's fault for refusing to go it alone when the Europeans balked, until much too late in the game.  But at least US military power was used for some cause other than oil or imperialism, for a change."Welcome to Sarajevo" touches on all these points but very subtly; this is not a Spike Lee soapbox-and-a-megaphone type of movie, nor is it the kind of schmaltzy and posturing Hollywood misery-exploitation movie that I feared when I saw that Woody Harrelson had one of the starring roles.As filmmaking it is competent but hardly stellar---pacing is a bit slow, some dialogue and acting was jarringly subpar (Marisa Tomei was NOT well directed at all), and the plot is fairly predictable and ordinary.  However as history and journalism it is worth watching, this film takes us behind the usual nightly 30 seconds of carnage film footage and humanizes the conflict by showing us not only the physical but also mental and emotional environment that these people endured for so many years.The last scene, of a classical concert outdoors in Sarajevo near the end of hostilities, is simple, direct and beautiful.PS. It is also true however that had what happened in the ex-Yugoslavia happened in some Third-World non-white country (and much worse things DO happen in those countries all the time, e.g. Sudan and Rwanda) it never would've garnered anywhere as much media attention.  And it is also sadly true that had the victims been Christians instead of Muslims, more would've been done much much sooner.
A Nice Romance. Mandy Moore is sweet but sharp. She is thoughtful, forgiving, encouraging, with charming personality. She works at her relationships. A romance. Touching. Moving.The intent of the first 10-minutes is for you not to like the reckless teenager's behavior, to establish these characters as displeasing; rather than establish the film as displeasing; which becomes clear only later on. The producer should have grabbed the audience first, with another scene.Mandy Moore is meant to be nice, but not glamorous, and unappealing to these reckless students, because of her thoughtful, Christian faith. However, Mandy still seemed the most appealing girl, any which way.We do not see the guy, not liking Mandy, because he is pursuing another more glamorous, girl for selfish reason or shallow reason. The guy does not like Mandy, simply for puffing up his own image. Really, only one thing, prevents him from being able to value her,... a lack of real love. Sadly, many people never realize their lack of real love, or they do too late; only after their opportunity has come and gone.Many of the other reviews give away too much of the plot. You will enjoy the movie more if you do not read more.
I really like it. This is a very good product for great toning. I like using it after I do my weight training to really give me that final burn and to stretch the muscle really well.
A gripping action film and a powerful study of failure. "The Wages of Fear" was awarded by unanimous verdict the Grand Prix at 1953 Cannes Film Festival where it won over 27 films, some of which were made by Jacques Tati, Alfred Hitchcock, and Luis Buuel. Cluozot's own screenplay (based a novel by George Arnaud) focuses on four down-and-out European adventurers (Yves Montand, Folco Lulli, Peter Van Eyck, Charles Vanel) who stuck nearly penniless in a festering town in an unnamed South American country. An oil company need a load of highly dangerous and explosive nitroglycerin to be delivered to a remote well fire 300 miles away burning out of control. The route is through jungles and over crude and treacherous mountains and those men are desperate enough to take the chance. None of these men is heroic or generous, they are in for the money. The four were chosen by the managers of oil company because "if something happens to them, no one would care, they have nobody to worry about them". Henri-Georges Clouzot's view on humanity is not particularly optimistic but he finds a way to make a viewer care about disenchanted but desperate characters. Thanks to Clouzot's ability to create not only a gripping action film but a powerful study of failure, the four men will stay for long time in our memory.4.5/5
Dora and Josue. The transforming and redemptive power of forgiveness is the major theme in this moving film from Brazil. The two leads, Dora, an older woman whose self-imposed sheltered life has been long shut-off from the yearnings and longings that make us human, and Josue, a young boy who forces her to confront her detachment as such, move the viewer from a jolting start to a warm, satisfying ending.This is a film I never get tired of. The performances are great; the musical score is subtle, yet significant; the people and places are compelling; and the story, although perhaps somewhat manipulative, is overall enjoyable.Some reviewers have side-stepped the warmth of this movie in attacking it as pretentious, cliche, and overtly sentimental. Although these are valid arguments, I felt that overall these points are forgiveable and easy to overlook.
Great show - really miss shows like this. Really great stuff.  Loved this show when it was on, and it's great to get this on DVD.  Realkly love Robert Culp and William Kaat as a team.  Highly recommend
Phyllis Montana LeBlanc for President. Phyllis Montana LeBlanc for President!  Or, at least Secretary of Keeping It Real.  Ms. LeBlanc, a passionate and articulate victim of the 2005 New Orleans flood, is one of many Big Easy residents who appears in the Spike Lee mega-documentary film WHEN THE LEVEES BROKE.  Her commentary proves to be one of many unforgettable aspects of this must-see work.Of course, by calling New Orleans residents victims of the August 2005 floodwaters, I oversimplify.  As WHEN THE LEVEES BROKE documents, for forty years responsible powers knew the New Orleans levees could not withstand the pressure of a hurricane such as Katrina but did nothing.  The Bush administration and FEMA, who knew what was going to happen days in advance of the hurricane, did nothing.  And when the storm subsided and people needed rescue, food, and water, the Bush gang and FEMA dragged their feet, allowing preventable death and misery for several days before acting.WHEN THE LEVEES BROKE cuts no corners telling its story.  About the only lowlight of those tragic summer 2005 days it misses is Laura Bush's telling comment, where she referred to the storm as "Hurricane Corrina" at least twice in the same interview.While the illegal, immoral war in Iraq got most of the credit for the fall of the Republicans in the 2006 elections, the federal government's willful disregard for New Orleans had to be on voters' minds, too.  As I write this in March 2007, Louisiana governor Kathleen Blanco has announced she will not seek re-election because of low poll numbers, so it seems the people are repaying Republican Lite Democrats such as Ms. Blanco, too.  WHEN THE LEVEES BROKE closes with the Fats Domino song, "Walking To New Orleans."  Another Fats Domino song, "So Long," speaks to the responsible public office holders who knew what could happen but turned a blind eye.  May they get theirs.See WHEN THE LEVEES BROKE.
get slap happy. Ed Friedlin is a monthly writer for bass player magazine.  He covers in an excellent way how to slap, pop, mute, develop a groove, how to play with drum machines, ghost notes, and does some licks in larry graham, louis johnson, and marcus miller style and it is laid out in a very good manner.  very good instructional video
The Helplessness of war and the courage of one man. That is what Hotel Rwanda is all about, BUT more importantly it ends with hope, hope that this will never happen again.  Don Cheadle gives a performance of a lifetime in this movie.  I say that a really good movie can make you tear up, and I was tearing up during this movie.Terry George has directed a fabulous film.  Everything is woven together wonderfully.  This movie never turns to melodrama and has a documentary type feel to it.  Like United 93(another great movie)it draws you in and you know what is going to happen, but when it does you still find yourself in tears.  That is what great movies do.The sadness for me is that this is not a fake, it is not fiction.  This really happened.  The movie is amazing, BUT it also gives you a sense of anger at the US and all the big powers, I love the line Nick Nolte uses after he finds out they are only evacuating the whites.  Watch this film, it will give you a much better understanding of what happened in 1994...
Interesring. The story kept your interest even though it did not have all thehigh tech kismos of todays movies
By far the best concert DVD I've seen. Well, I've seen many concert DVD's and most of the time I was dissapointed, sometimes by a picture quality but mostly by sound. But this one! This is just the best DVD you can ever buy! Until recently,  I adored these two - The Cure - Trilogy and David Gray - Live At the Point. But Seal just sets a standard for all the others. The picture is perfect and the sound, guys, this just sounds awesome! No speakers on the stage, all the musicians wear Ultimate Ears custom headphones ($900) and it obviously works great! Not a single mistake, everything is so clear and Seal is just one of the best singers. How this guy can sing, that's unbelievable!Go ahead and buy, worth every penny! And go for the set with a CD - you'll find yourself listening to this concert CD instead of his other ones.Absolutely LOVE IT!
Third time the charm????????. This is the third remake of essentially the same story by director Hawks and star Wayne. The first two, Rio Bravo and El Dorado are superior with castmates like Dean Martin, Angie Dickenson, and Robert Mitchum though this affable outing is pleasant enough with suppport from the great Jack Elam and the gorgeous Jennifer O'Neal. Wayne, in the sunset of his career, turns in a workmanlike performance with deprecating humor. It's good fun and pleasant to spend time with. No Oscar asperations here.
This film will long be a cult classic. This movie is simply hilarious. You will make a connection between the movie, and your own job, no matter what your occupation. All I can say is, if you haven't seen it, you should
Great Show, Better Than Vol. 1. First off, I'd like to say that Attorney at Law is one of my favorite cartoons ever.  The timing and absurd humor are almost always spot-on.  Gary Cole (Birdman), Stephen Colbert (Reducto, Phil Ken Sebben), Paget Brewster (Birdgirl) and John Michael Higgins (Mentok) provide hilarious voice overs, as do all the other actors.  I didn't really grow up with the original Hanna-Barbera cartoons that the show is based on, but I can say you don't really need to know who the characters are, seeing as how they're generally so different from the original characters, and sometimes so obscure, that it doesn't matter.  You shouldn't be worried about "not getting it" if you've never seen a Hanna-Barbera cartoon.  In terms of "getting it," you probably will if you're between 16 and 40.  Younger or older and you'll proably either miss a lot of the jokes or think the jokes are too weird or "vulgar" (older people sure do love that word, don't they?).The episodes of volume 2 are better than volume 1 in terms of the plot and humor, in my opinion.  The writers and actors have clearly hit their stride by the second set of episodes, and each episode has some memorable, oddball moment.  Unfortunately, there are only 13 episodes, which is normal for an [adult swim] "season."  Also, the show is meant to fit into a 15-minute time slot, so the episodes are pretty short, but that's not to say nothing happens; they pack a lot into the time they're given.The DVD itself is pretty good for an [adult swim] set.  Most of the time their DVDs are fairly weak in terms of extras, but this one is actually fairly good.  While it doesn't match the likes of Futurama in the way its DVD sets are piled with extras, this one does have a respectable amount.  The commentaries with the main voice actors are nice, especially Stephen Colbert's.  However, it's only one actor at a time for select episodes, each actor only doing one episode, despite how the various descriptions make it sound (I was hoping it would be everyone in one room for all the episodes).  There are also a few extra little segments to watch, which are good for a few chuckles.More of a 4.5 overall, but I'll give it a full 5 given the rating limitation
Great starter for Pilates. I enjoy this DVD, but I find the routine less then challenging. I use it for a quick workout (it is 30 minutes), but the routine is very easy. I am coming from a walking (treadmill) routine to Pilates and I am pretty active. I didn't really feel that this was difficult enough to really make a difference.Ellen is very easy to follow and a good leader. The DVD also offers modifications for those who need to have an easier workout.I recommend it for beginners. It is a great start.
Fantastic!. I have seen the first series at home in England and thought it was fantastic.  Then, season 2 came out - just as good if not better.  There are a few huge events that occur so the cast changes, but all the new guys and brilliant.  Since I moved here, I have been looking for season 1 and 2 under the BBC name of Spooks, I couldn't find it anywhere, then I saw that it was called Mi-5.  It honestly made my day, sad but true.  I cannot wait to show my friends, over here in the Ol' US how fanastic this is.
Wonderful Australian Production. In all honesty, I purchased this DVD because it was one of Hugh Jackman's earlier works back in Australia. I was very pleased with my purchase though, when I began to watch it and realized that it also contained a wonderful cast of actors. The story was gripping, and the ending was completely unexpected. A wonderful police story
Love it!!!. I am a very huge fan of the movie.  I recently moved from San Diego, California, and I was always able to get all Disney shows there.  I have "The Happiest Millionaire" on VHS, and I cannot get anough of it.  I have been in Washington State now for a little over two months.  Maybe it is because I am homesick, but I am craving for this right now.  I found "The One and Only Genuine Original Family Band" a few days ago, but when I found out I could have both of my two ultimate favorites together, at one time, I had to order.  My Dad will get the open copy of my movie, and I will get the unopened (which is how it will stay until I cannot resist anymore)!!!  Love John Davis and Lesley Ann Warren together.  It is so much the match made in heaven.  Anyone like her in "Clue"?..
Even more fabulous with the extra footage and commentary!!. I really enjoyed this documentary because it was so entertaining and full of energy. I love the extra footage, and the commentary from the director herself was incredibly intelligent, while the men who spoke 20 years later were wiser and still resilient and funny. This film is also a great historical piece.  You see new york when it had a thriving underground scene, and "Balls" were held in theaters in Harlem.  The characters were stupendous yet the grittiness of life at that time in the city really creeps in.  I am really glad I got to this world through this film its really an important american document of race, class, and gender politics.
What became of John and Elizabeth. "Another 9 1/2 Weeks" shows us what became of John (Mickey Rourke) and Elizabeth.  The sequel takes place about a decade after its first part where an older John Gray goes to Paris in search for clues to what became of the woman he fell in love with.  There, he meets Elizabeth's friend Lea who knows a lot about him - and still wants to be with him.  She wants excitement and thinks she just might even be too much for him.  So this time the game of cat and mouse is not one sided, as she has a wild side to match his to make some sparks fly.John isn't entirely the same man he once was, as his mind is still on his past.  He is man of remorse and was never the same after Elizabeth left him.  I found part of the storyline sad because he loved someone and knows she is gone from his life because of his own actions.  Part of him seemed to want to make the past live on, and it did in his thoughts, but they really tormented him.  This part of the story really struck a cord and made me reflect on my own life.John thinking of Elizabeth and Lea knowing about his past doesn't stop them from developing a strange romance.  She wants the thrills and dominating man she heard about.  "Another 9 1/2 Weeks" didn't have the same level of suspense as "9 1/2 Weeks," but it definitely has some excitement and erotic moments like the first part.  It was a more somber film that gives some conclusion to what happened to that once passionate couple and how both their lives were never the same.  From there, this new romance leaves us with something to reflect on.
A Multi-Generational Tale Of Pain, Loss,Courage & Redemption. Three women, from different generations are still trying to heal from the horrors of the Third Reich and WWII more than fifty years after Germany surrendered to the Allied forces on May 7, 1945. The film's primary focus, however, is on a little girl who lost two mothers in a three year period - 1943 to 1946. She never received explanations for the horrors she lived through, nor did she have the opportunity to understand or express her pain. "Rosenstrasse" is set in 21st century New York City and Berlin, with flashbacks to Nazi Germany and Berlin in 1943.When Ruth Weinstein's, (Jutta Lampe), husband dies, she insists that the family observe a strictly Orthodox mourning period, even though they had never been observant Jews. Her son and daughter are both bewildered, and then angry, when Ruth forbids daughter Hannah, (Maria Schrader) to marry her Nicaraguan fiance Luis, ((Fedja van Huet). Luis is not Jewish, and although he was mentored by Hannah's now deceased father, and religion had never been a problem before, their plans for a life together are now up in the air. A distant cousin alludes that the source of Ruth's problems lies in the past, in Nazi Germany. She reveals to Hannah that her mother was cared for, in fact saved from certain death, by an Aryan woman during WWII. After the war Ruth immigrated to America to live with this cousin and her family, virtual strangers. Ruth had never discussed her childhood or her war experiences with her children. She always kept silent. And when Hannah probes once more she receives no answers, as always. She decides to fly to Germany to uncover the secrets of her mother's past.In Berlin, Hannah tracks down 90 year-old Lena Fischer, (Doris Schade), the Christian woman who brought seven year-old Ruth home to live with her, when the child's mother was imprisoned with other Berlin Jews in March, 1943. Hannah does not reveal her identity, but says she is conducting a study about Aryans and their Jewish spouses during the war. She listens intently, over a period of days, as the charming elderly woman finally reveals the facts about her own life and Ruth's, both so closely intertwined.Thousands of Berlin's Jews were swept up from their forced labor jobs and taken to Rosenstrasse 2-4, in central Berlin in March 1943. This was meant to be the capital's final round-up for the Final Solution, and the Jews were to be deported to concentration camps from Rosenstrasse. Ruth's mother was one of these unfortunate people. Left alone without a ration card, the child would not have survived without Lena's assistance. (The younger Lena is played by Katja Riemann, who gives a powerful performance). Her husband, Fabian Fischer (Martin Feifel), a brilliant violinist, was also taken to Rosenstrasse. Lena was a concert pianist and met Fabian through their mutual love for music. She married against her aristocratic parents wishes and was disowned by all, except her brother Arthur. As with most marriages between Aryans and Jews, the Aryans were pressured heavily by the Nazi State, their employers, and usually friends and family to divorce their Jewish spouses. Most who refused were marginalized, but they still maintained their status as Aryans and German citizens, and as such their Jewish mates were supposedly protected from deportation.Lena joins a group of women waiting for word of their husbands, keeping vigil, outside the building on Rosenstrasse. It is here that Lena meets the frightened and bewildered Ruth, who knows her mother is in the building, but never is actually told that she has been deported already. Svea Lohde plays Ruth, as a young girl, with great sensitivity. She has nowhere to go and no one to turn to, so Lena steps in, in spite of her fear of discovery for hiding a Jewish child. Lena and Ruth form a strong bond, a surrogate mother-daughter relationship which will last for three years. Director Margarethe von Trotta emphasizes throughout Ruth's heartbreaking ignorance of her mother's fate. The number of women on Rosenstrasse increases. Unarmed, unorganized, and leaderless, these courageous women, some with their children, stood up to the Nazis and demanded the return of their loved ones.The acting and the Rosenstrasse storyline are excellent, however Director von Trotta combines so many intense plots, involving so many people, that the points she most wants to make occasionally become lost in the confusion. We never hear Ruth speak of closure, if in fact she does ever come to grips with her past. The film's conclusion only hints at this. Almost all of her dramatic story is revealed by Lena, who has only second-hand knowledge of the events and no real idea of the child's feelings at the time. Von Trotta's handling of the character study is far too abstract. She is much more successful when portraying the women of Rosenstrasse and their protests and resistance. I must credit her with navigating an intensely emotional story effectively, without falling into sensationalism or melodrama.This is a little known true story of women, who in spite of loss, separation and fear for their loved ones, found the courage to fight back against a brutal Nazi state. I am glad it has finally been brought to the screen.JAN
Major Changes Don't Equal Failure. Season nine has proven that Stargate can survive without Jack O'Neill, but his loss is stil felt this season. Browder does a really good job as Cameron Mitchell, he is no O'Neill, but he is a worthy successor. This season has a lot of action and surprises that will leave you on the edge of your seat. Amazing villains such as the Ori will have you not missing the Goa'uld one bit.The Ori is a fantastic new villain the SG team now has to defeat. There is a lot of symbolism with these new threats. There are other villains as well that are in this season to keep it interesting. Ba'al is a very interesting Goa'uld just for the fact that he has many clones, and interesting twist to the classic Stargate enemy. But, this season also featured a fight with the son of Anubis! Overall, this season is very much worth having and is definitely worthy of the name Stargate. This is a must have, one of my personal favorite seasons of the series.
This is simply a Great (disturbing) Movie. I first saw Crimes of Passion in a theater years (and years) ago - and when I watched the DVD edition I realized - nothing is outdated.  Nothing is lost in the translation.  This is one of the most powerful, disturbing, yet poignant films I've ever seen - right up there with "Requiem For a Dream", and "Blue Velvet."  First of all, how can you beat the performances of Kathleen Turner and Anthony Perkins?  Better yet - is Perkins' character real?  Or is he China Blue's conscience, used as a pawn to elicit the doubts and insecurities within her, as she  questions the motives and morals behind her supposedly safe choices.  The rest of the cast is - ok - including a pre-Designing Women Annie Potts - but its Turner and Perkins who steal this show.  Quite simply, anyone who has ever struggled with relationships, struggled with life in general - should be able to relate to this movie.  If you scrape off the outer layers, that wonderful, happy, perfect life of yours probably isn't quite so perfect.  It might be easy for some to dismiss this as way too over the top - but that would be like saying Chris Rock is too funny.  Bottom line - See This Movie.
Fast Times indeed!. One of the classic high school movies, Fast Times spawned a slew of teenage talent on the big screen, but no one was more memorable in this movie than Sean Penn as Spicoli.  Amy Heckerling cuts out a slice of Southern Californian life from a San Bernardino high school that shows both honor students and misfits alike.  While the signature moments belonged to Spicoli, there were many other great scenes such as the ongoing burger war in which Judge Reinhold finds himself on the short end of the spatula.  Meanwhile his little sis, a seemingly innocent Jennifer Jason Leigh, experiments with dating and sex with an amusing pair of misfits, Brian Backer and Robert Romanus.  Phoebe Cates tries to set her young prodigy straight but to no avail.  Forest Whitaker even has a significant moment in this movie as the bruising defensive lineman who takes out the destruction of his prized car on the opposing team.  Little did he know that Spicoli had a hand in it.  But, it is the hilarious relationship between Spicoli and Mr. Hand (Ray Walston) that steals the show.  Fast Times may appear a bit dated, but it hasn't lost any of its humor.
Mean Machine (A PROPER game of footy). The formula is familiar but enjoyable. A group of British tough guys are assembled for an enterprise that combines violence with humor, while cherishing their peculiar personalities and even finding goodness where none should grow. We've had prisoners winning a gardening competition, pot dealers helping little old ladies, and crooks leaving crime for life as real estate agents. Now here is "Mean Machine," about a corrupt British soccer champion, jailed for rigging an important match, and ordered by the prison governor to coach the inmates' team. The big match will be against the guards' team.If this premise rings a faint, far-off bell, you may be remembering Robert Aldrich's "The Longest Yard" (1974), with one of Burt Reynolds' best performances, that told the same story, more or less, in terms of American football. Barry Skolnick's "Mean Machine" is more than inspired by "The Longest Yard;" it's based on the same Tracy Keenan Wynn screenplay, and indeed "Mean Machine" was even the original title of "The Longest Yard." The movie stars Vinnie Jones, a real-life footballer so tough he didn't even play for England, he played for Wales. He was known for dirty football, just like Danny Meehan, his character in the film. You may recognize Jones' Fearless Fosdick features from "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels," directed by Guy Ritchie, who produced this film. And he has appeared as a fearsome background presence in "Snatch," "Gone in 60 Seconds" and "Swordfish." In his first lead role, he handles the dialogue like meat and potatoes, one line at a time, chewed carefully.The deal: The prison governor (David Hemmings) has a gambling problem, and is crazy about football. He orders his new celebrity prisoner to coach the team. This does not sit well with the head guard, who coaches the guards' team, but what can he say? Danny doesn't much want to enter the coaching profession, but the governor makes him a threat he can't ignore.The most enjoyable passages are some of the most predictable, recycled out of countless other movies where a leader has to pick his men. Danny finds himself with the prison contraband retailer, Massive (Vas Blackwood), as his right-hand man, and a violent, feared con named Monk (Jason Statham) as his star player. He gets a lot of valuable prison lore and advice from the ancient convict Doc (David Kelly, who you will remember from his naked scooter ride in "Waking Ned Devine"). Kelly has had a whole late flowering while playing twinkly geezers, clouded only by the distressing tendency of his characters to end up in sentimental death scenes.All leads up to the big match, which of course involves hard play and dirty tricks, and dovetails neatly with the governor's gambling problem. "Mean Machine" lacks the social satire of "The Longest Yard," which was a true early 1970s film and therefore anti-establishment. "Mean Machine" is only interested in the characters and the game. Guy Ritchie, who started out as such an innovator in "Lock, Stock, etc.," seems to have headed directly for reliable generic conventions as a producer. But they are reliable, and have become conventions for a reason: They work. "Mean Machine" is what it is, and very nicely, too.
I love this workout!. This step workout reminds me of my gym's step class.  It starts out with easy steps then builds to a little more advance ones.  He lets you know ahead of time what to do next.  Each new routine builds a little more so that by the end of the video you don't even have to look to know what is coming up next.  Great work out!  I think it will be good for beginners and perfect for moderate steppers like me
best NIN dvd, great way to show off HDTV and 5.1 dolby!. I am a huge NIN fan, so this might be a bit baised to say that it is great. If you are a fan you must pick this up, it was edited perfectly.Even if you arent a huge NIN fan this is a great DVD to show off your High Def setup as the picture is by far the clearest I have seen out of any of my other HD DVDs. The sound is also great, the dolby 5.1 sounds great on my stereo. Have friends over and watch a bit of this DVD to truely show off.Only thing I wish is that it had a few more extras like the last DVD. Also not sure if this has any hidden easter eggs like the last DVD
"Don't you know what those are made out of????". This is by far one of the greatest comedy films of all time, along side classics such as animal house, caddyshack, and the Vacation Series.  John Candy and Dan Aykroyd are brother in laws who end up coming together by "chance" at a Cabin in the north woods.  Over the vacations time, the families discover new things about each other, strengthen their bonds, oh, and make you laugh until your sides split.  This movie has it all, animal talk, overeating, stupid human tricks, "scary stories", action, thrills, and romance.  What more could you want in one package.  Buy this movie, well worth the price, cause you'll watch it over and over again
Better than given credit, but not up to the other seasons. Season Five of The A-Team often gets bashed, and to some degree it's warranted.  The A-Team joining forces with General Stockwell holding them by the leash was awful since it never went anywhere.  These guys are suppose to be soldiers of fortune, outlaws for hire who play by their own rules, and now they're being controlled by someone else.  Then they added in Frankie Santana and forced him into a more prominent role than some other Team members.  I could see Frankie in an Amy or Tonya recurring role, but he got too much attention for my tastes.  The Simpsons once spoofed the fact that TV shows tend to add in new characters when they're desparate and that's exactly how Frankie and Stockwell came off.To top it off, some of the stories were awful and the production quality was horrible.  I know the production continuity wasn't perfect by any means during the other seasons, but it just seemed like they started to give up altogether.  The final episode, The Grey Team, was down right awful.  Come on, you got Frankie and B.A. running scared of a bunch of old folks?  B.A.?!  Watch the part where the car goes flying through the air then it cuts to a shot of the car dropping straight down.  Bad...really bad production.But for all the negatives, there were positives.  While some of the stories were bad, I thought some were excellent, too.  The opening threesome of The A-Team's capture, trial, and escape was very well done.  The episode where Face learns about his dying father and his sister is another one I liked.  It's that kind of character development, learning more about their backgrounds and tying up loose ends that really lacked in the first four seasons, and that was very refreshing to see.All in all, it was obvious they made a change of direction during Season Five and that they were desparate to make something work.  Unfortunately, there were too many issues from stories to production quality that made this season less than memorable.  It still had it's moments and it had some good character development as well, but the addition of Stockwell and Frankie definitely made it a different cup of tea that not all A-Team fans appreciated
we need 6 stars. Like "Peter Black" this a black and white classic - anAmerican classic in its truest sense, where else can you have sex with a dead person and do not realize that the partner is dead. It's rare for a motion picture to maintain the level of irreverence and humor of Clerks for its full running length. In his first outing behind the camera, Kevin Smith has given his audience the kind of film at which veteran film makers often failClerks was made for $27,575. It was mainly funded by 10 credit cards that Kevin had to his name, funds garnered from store credit after he sold his comic book collection, a family donation, and paychecks from working at the Quick Stop and RST Video.  Clerks was filmed using a 16mm Arri SR-2 camera and utilized Kodak Plus-X film.The Quick Stop and RST Video are located at 58 Leonard Ave., Leonardo, NJ. (Off Route 36 heading towards the beach for those of you familiar with the area) Postens Funeral Home is located at 59 E Lincoln Ave, Atlantic Highlands, NJClerk depicts a raw color of American society - it draws from the language of our society , everything that surrounds us and it is often the most difficult thing to do - this is a watershed in American movie since since here the heroes are not super build scientologist or fake lover boys - the protagonist is just a quick stop employee - every statement in this movie vibrates with our own life since we all must have gone through similar situations of defeat.The dialogue of Clerks has accurately captured the street language common in the part of the country where the movie was filmed. There are a few lines that come across as scripted, but this is often the result of the manner in which they're delivered (the actors are good, but not seasoned). As far as the level of profanity is concerned, anyone spending time on a Monmouth County (New Jersey) street won't be shocked, but those who are offended by such language should beware.Given more money, the director would have preferred a 35 mm color shoot rather than a blowup of a 16 mm black-and-white print, but the grainy, occasionally-"homemade" quality of the movie lends Clerks a pseudo-documentary look that a more polished product would not have achieved. It's hard to imagine the picture working as effectively with a different style -- some of the strange goings-on might then seem staged rather than natural.
SAME AS IN THE MOVIE JUST ON DVD GET IT !. CATBALLOU............................. ! WE STILL LOVE YOU
Must have for Sean Connery Fans. I enjoyed this film.  After watching the special AFI salute to Sean Connery I bought a collection of Sean's work. They are all great, set in different parts of the world but well worth the price.  He is a great actor and his films are worth the price. Enjoy
Skin Flick: This Film Delivers!. I was greatly surprised and pleased! Gorgeous girls everywhere, stripped naked! Lots of nudity! A funny plot! A true Skin Flick! BUY it! The dubbing of the Audio is terrible, but funny! The Visuals are FANTASTIC!! Gorgeous Girls naked! Need more? Buy it, you won't be sorry!
Thrilling and fascinating. This Duet (Volume 1 and 2) has great information about extended orgasm and the possibility of a man giving her a better orgasm than she would give herself. As a woman, a concept quite thrilling and fascinating.In Deliberate Orgasm, Expanding Female Orgasm, the discussion about sexual tension was one of the many subjects talked about that I found very useful, that as a man he can play with the level of sexual energy in her body to give her more pleasure than she can give herself. A fun concept to add to my sex life.I could feel this raising of sexual energy in my own body as I watched the video, I noticed places where he would take his finger off of her clitoris and take a short break from stroking her and I felt the anticipation in my own body for him to start stroking again.The video was informative in regards to the value of adding Doing as a way to have a better sex life and communicate more about what I like most as a woman and enjoy sex more all the way around, especially more fun during intercourse as was explained in the video.The instructors answered some questions I have had about the sensitivity of the female anatomy and of the visible signs of orgasm that I have had for a long time.It was so good to see a woman in orgasm enjoying him give her so much pleasure, I felt like she didn't want to miss anything and she was fully adoring his attention and every stroke that he did on her.
Watch with your best girlfriend... I took my best friend to see this (second run) in an small, artsy theatre in San Francisco.  It was so vivid and colorful... very interesting to watch.  I found myself following the storyline without having to focus solely on the subtitles.  As a result, I could appreciate the landscapes, the costumes, the hidden innuendos... all the first time around.  This movie is definitely for those that can truly appreciate the pure essence and beauty of female friendship.  There is a scene near the end when the uppity, seemingly prudish Momoko staunchly defends and protects her rough-around-the-edges biker friend, Ichigo that made us want to cheer.  As the end credits rolled, the small audience broke into applause.  Afterwards, we raved incessantly about how much we collectively loved it
Complex and riveting drama. The perpetrators of a high-level corporate scandal (Masayuki Mori, Takashi Shimura, Ko Nishimura) are pursued by the illegitamate son (Toshiro Mifune) of a low-level functionary that they drove to suicide to protect their schemes.  This film begins as a deeply satisfying revenge epic, but the masterful director Akira Kurosawa is not content to let it rest there.  He draws out all the moral complexities of the situation, then hits us with an unexpected development at the end that gives an ironic twist to his title.  The bad may not always go to prison for their crimes, but do they really "sleep well?
Mighty Ducks. Great films for whole family and for all fans of Anaheim Ducks hockey team. :)But, in my opinion, first film of the trilogy is more attractive than others
A Little Gem. Beautifully filmed and acted.Connects the spirituality of Buddhism to the 21st century seamlessly
Movie for dreamer. I am not a movie buff like i used to be during college days. Now i dont even want to watch a movie even if it is a good one. I happened to watch Rookie, Evelyn and The assassination of Richard Nixon in the span of last 6 months maybe. Rookie is a movie for huge dreamer like me. such a movie would encourage anyone with goals and dreams for his life. I like the scene where Jim Morris confronts his baseball team after they lose real bad and tells them that if they dont have dreams they dont have anything. It is true in any mans case as well. The movie is about having dreams and pursing it without quitting which is very important even though there seems to be hurdles along our way. But not quitting should be our motto. The movie jumps from the time when Jim was a young lad in Big lake Texas to the time he grows into a chemistry teacher. What happened in the middle of his life hasnt been potrayed. The cast Dennis Quaid was brilliant. SO was Rachel Griffiths and their little boy Hunter. The score of the movie was good as well. I dont understand baseball but the movie is simply true to life. Watch it.
Very, very good :-). I remember watching this at the movies and not ever wanting it to end.  Back in the day, movie tickets weren't too expensive so I think I saw it 3 times there and rented it out on video when it came out about 50 times.  It's been about 12 years since I saw it until today, and it's just as good and I still love it.Peggy Sue (Kathleen Turner) goes to her high school reunion and faints.  Upon waking, she is back in school as if it were all those years ago again.  I think for me, it was one of the first 'time travel' movies I saw.  It's not especially funny or dramatic, but it's really nice and warm and beautifully done.  It also stars a very young Jim Carrey which is funny to look back on.This really is a cute movie and worth watching because there is good music in it (also a very nice score throughout), familiar faces (Helen Hunt, Joan Allen and a young Nicholas Cage to name a few) and a good feeling to finish with.  You'll love it.
smarter than you might think. Watch the Seventh Seal by Ingmar Bergman and you'll appreciate the &quot;battle&quot; with Death even more
More than "Need You Tonight". This dvd single is the only commercial release of the ground breaking video for the Australian hit "Burn For You" from "The Swing" album.Worth the purchase price for this alone as well as the live version of "Need You Tonight".It was one of Michael's last filmed live perfomances.A must for all INXS fans!!
"Murder! That's what this dirty rotten politician's war is.". Howard Hughes' big-budget World War 1 classic has never looked better in this beautifully restored dvd edition. While the dialogue is corny and dated and some of the actors (especially the male stars) overact bigtime, the brilliant mixture of color and black-and-white photography, the beauty of Jean Harlow in rare color footage, and the unbelievable aerial combat scenes make this an absolute must for any Jean Harlow fan or history buff!Ben Lyon and James Hall play two brothers who join the Royal Air Force as World War One begins. Their Oxford buddy, a German (played by John Darrow) bids them farewell as he recieves his draft notice for the German army. The German is killed in battle after he spares his friends' lives during a nighttime Zeppelin attack. Jean Harlow, in her first major film role, plays the sexy vixen who seduces both brothers before moving on to other "prey"! In this classic she utters one of her most unforgettable lines: "Would you be shocked if I put on something more comfortable?"The younger brother is accussed of cowardice, and so he volunteers along with his brother for a suicide mission: fly a captured German bomber over a heavily defended German ammunition dump and blow it up. Getting there and dropping the bombs will be the easy part, because the German fighter patrol under Baron von Richthofen will be in hot pursuit after they discover the German bomber is no "friend" of theirs! The final aerial battle is simply stunning, something that only Howard Hughes could've financed.137 pilots in all were used to recreate the chaotic dogfights of World War 1 in this epic production. James Whale was credited as dialogue director, but he actually wrote and directed most of the film. However, without Hughes' vast fortune this classic would never have been completed. The dated dialogue is forgivable since, after all, this was first intended as a silent film. The dvd has absolutely no special features, which is unfortunate, but the picture and sound quality of the movie are superb. Highly recommended
An Excellent Summation of the Escaflowne series. After watching the series, I found this movie to be an excellent summation of everything in its entirity. However, those who haven't seen the series may find it a little hard to follow, as some characters have little or no introduction. If you have seen the series though, its the perfect addition to your collection, as it is very entertaining and has a wonderful sound score
Red Shoes. The Red Shoes is one of my favorite movies, but only because I'm a dancer myself, I think. After a while, it does get a bit boring, but it's worth watching, because the dancing is amazing, and the picture and music is unbelievably cool
A Shout Out to Shout Factory. I give up, Shout Factory. How do you get to the episodes? Do you really have to push "forward" on the remote four times to get to the menu? At least with previous Shout Factory releases such as Home Movies, the flagship show of Cartoon Network's Adult Swim block, you could push "menu" to get to the episodes. Like Rhino, Shout Factory, despite their ad flyer, betrays no love for classic TV, and shows no sense of what they're doing.They also, like the entire TV industry, have a completely wrong view of the demographics of the viewing audience. If you think there's no market for classic TV, sit back and watch the sales. What there's no market for is Shout Factory's fumbled handling of this classic material. Next time leave out the "collectible temporary tatoos" and put the "trailer collection" in the menu, where it belongs. There's also no reason to have "play all" as a menu selection on TV shows, which are made to be watched one at a time. If studios want to stop bootlegging, try putting out DVD sets people will actually want.The show, on the other hand, is hands down five stars. Long before MASH, this was a military comedy played for laughs, but with serious undertones. The writing is so good it recalls the early days of TV in New York, which began with filmed plays, and hearkens to the days when "sitcom" was not a dirty word. Ernest Borgnine is excellent as Commander McHale, and the young(er) Tim Conway is hyserical as Ensign Parker.Looking backwards, this show tipped its hat to Phil Silvers and Sergeant Bilko, and sparked interest for other military- themed sitcoms like Ensign O'Toole. If Shout Factory had made a ship shape release, this would be a six star DVD set. I hope someone like Leonard Maltin, who loves and understands classic TV will get involved in the fight to improve DVD sets before it's too late. Season one includes 36 black and white episodes on five one- sides discs in a three sleeve box set.
Lassie Come Home. Touching tale gets full MGM treatment, with sumptuous Technicolor and a solid cast, including Donald Crisp and Elsa Lanchester as Joe's parents, and Elizabeth Taylor in her first MGM role. Mc Dowall's performance is heartfelt and restrained for the time, and Lassie, of course, is the dog we'd all love to own
My first review - 4 stars!. I really enjoy this tape and use it often.  I particularly favor the 'zoning' or waves as she calls it.  3 zones that progressively get harder and each one definetly build on one another.  The end is a killer when your 'popping' up in the middle between side squats!  Defintely a worthwhile tape that uses time efficiently and pacts a lot of cardio into its zones.  I think having the weight training at the ends is a good idea, but dont think you're going to use heavy weights- more for toning so stick to the lower weights.
Action, Suspense, Drama, what more do you want?. What's that you say? You just can't enjoy a film unless it has Bruce Lee style dubbing? Fear not it's here! Yes, seriously! Eager humanitarian Steven Seagal has given someone else the honour of reading his lines for him during key scenes in this, his pet project. I don't know what else you could want
One of Stallone's better performances. Let me say that I've always been a Stallone fan.  I've always liked such films as Rocky I & II, Copland, the original First Blood, Lock Up, and Cliffhanger.  If those are your favorites as well, then I think you'll like F.I.S.T.I won't rehash the plot here, you can read about that in Amazon's description.  What I will say is that if Sly had continued in the direction of films like this, I think he'd be perceived today as being a much better actor.  When he opens his heart to a role, and truly gives of himself to a character, he is capable of great things.  "Rocky" and "Copland" are great examples of this.  "F.I.S.T." isn't quite on a par with "Copland", and it doesn't pack the emotional weight of "Rocky", but it still deserves to be listed amoungst those films as examples of what Sly can do when he lets his guard down.If, on the other hand, you want to see Sly's work when his guard is up and he's totally closed his inner self off to a role, go watch "Cobra" or "Rambo III".  Yes, "Rambo III" has its merits, but Sly so often hid his inner gifts from the camera's eye, and that's just not what acting's about.This is a film in which Sly truly invested himself.  His performance is strong, and I hope that Hollywood gives him a chance to flex his acting muscles again sometime soon.  "Rocky Balboa" is soon to be released, directed and written by Stallone.  Hopefully it will remind the movie moguls that this man is has his gifts.  If you'd like to see Stallone showing some of his dramatic talents, watch this film.And Mr. Stallone, if you are reading this, please consider a film version of "Death of a Salesman".  You'd be perfect for it, and you already got a standing ovation for it when you were still a young man and contemplating being an actor.  A film version, directed by you, would be great.Also, how about a film about Bernard Kerik?  A few years ago I read a story about how both you and Mel Gibson were competing for this role.  The solution?  You star and co-write the screenplay with Mr. Kerik, whilst Mr. Gibson directs and produces.  It's a winning combination.  Mr. Stallone, you're all about New York and Mel isn't, but Mel's experience with acting in and directing great character-driven action roles would make him the perfect director for you in such an outing.
Bizarre, yet tantalizing. If you bought this DVD, well, you must have knew what to expect. BH is one strange mofo, and this DVD fits the bill. Your not getting a Oscar nominee DVD folks, its a collection of home videos, raw concert footage, and some interesting music. Its well produced considering what you see and hear. The extras are funny to us BH fans, yet the format to see everything on the DVD is weird, many extras you have to seek to get to. Maybe that's what BH wanted, his fan-base is smart. If you like BH or play an instrument, doesn't have to be guitar, get this DVD. If you expected a Star Wars production , don't. BH loves old Giant Robot, and this DVD is put together like an old Japanese Sci Fi show. Even has sub-titles at moments with foreign footage.In the end, this is quite possibly the first DVD I ever saw, enjoyed, and when over, shook my head wondering what the hell I just sawThat's the beauty of i
"My name is Tina Turner and my husband and I have had. an argument. I have 32 cents in my pocket. If you give me a room I promise you I will pay you back as soon as I can."And if this powerful scene of a battered and bruised Tina Turner from the hands of Ike Turner, fleeing to a nearby hotel - a star performer known throughout the world - with only change in her pocket, doesn't move you, then you just don't get it.Angela Bassett won Golden Globe and NAACP Image awards for her portrayal of Tina Turner in the 1993 release that was based on the best-selling autobiography, I, Tina. Laurence Fishburne turns in a fantastic performance as Ike Turner.The movie follows the life of Anna Mae Bullock from Nutbush, Tennessee to St. Louis - where she meets Ike Turner - and to what appeared to be a charmed life of international music stars. But success came with a harsh price for Tina Turner.As her popularity grew, Ike Turner became physically and verbally abusive. Fueling this cowardly anger with cocaine, he openly flaunted his affairs while being surrounded by a group of enablers, who said nothing as long as the party never stopped.Tina Turner finally finds the courage to leave the relationship and rebuild her shattered personal & professional life. The final scene brings even more powerful meaning to the song, What's Love Got To Do With It, which streaked to number one in the Billboard Hot 100 chart on September 1, 1984.A man like Ike Turner who physically and mentally abuses a woman is a sick bully and coward. In the divorce proceedings, though Tina Turner agreed to sign away any claim to future record royalties and publishing rights to their music, Ike Turner - who played a bizarre victim card - also wanted her stage name, claiming, "That name's got my daddy's blood written all over it."He was so wrong; it wasn't his daddy's blood written all over it. Anna Mae Bullock got to keep the name that she made even more famous as a solo artist, author and - perhaps, most importantly - as a woman who showed the fortitude to leave an abusive relationship and take control of her life.
Educational, Entertaining and Effective!. Meet the Numbers is a very clever DVD that taught my 21 month old son to recognize numbers zero through 10 and to count.  He watched Meet the Letters for three weeks and learned ALL of the letters of the alphabet.  He began to point at letters everywhere we would go but would become frustrated when he saw number characters.  I bought Meet the Numbers and within 2 days he knew numbers too!  The first section of the video is designed for children to learn number names.  The number characters only say their own name while they are doing something that has to do with that number.  For example, "zero" blows bubbles that pop before they form.  This is such a clever way to represent zero!  "One" rides a unicycle, and "two" blows out two birthday candles.  The second section of the video is the counting section.  Each character counts to get to their number.  When my son counts he always imitates the characters voices.  The third section gives the kids a chance to test what they have learned.  A series of familiar objects appear and the child counts out loud.  Then the number character pops up on the screen.  The video ends with a counting segment that my son wants to watch over and over again.  I showed this video to my preschool and now they show it in all of their classes along with Meet the Letters.  I only wish these videos were available when my first two children where toddlers.
Under-appreciated period piece. For as much as I enjoyed the first season the second one blew it away.  This was a character-driven period (1930s) show that did what good shows should; allow you to escape into their world.  Actually, it went one step beyond and pulled you in.  The theme was good vs evil.  This is nothing new, but the way it is presented here is what makes this such a special show.  Each episode was layed with scenery, characters and dialogue that do not grow stale with repeated viewings.  If you want to compare to a more conventional show think of LOST.  Every time you watch an episode you discover something new.  The same applies here.  Although the show only lasted two seasons I will be watching for many years
Great Story. I was on the edge of my seat - WILLING Melanie Griffith's character to MAKE IT in the business world. She was smart, pretty, and hard-working. She deserved a break.Will she get it? Watch and see.
5 stars for the film - not the DVD. What a pity that this classic film has entered the public domain. It's almost enough to make you wish that copyright laws lasted in perpetuity. Maybe then this movie would have been preserved and remastered the way that MGM's excellent DVD of "The Thief of Bagdad" was. I would gladly pay $15-20 (and quite possibly more) for such a treatment of "The Jungle Book," and would sleep just fine at night knowing that the heirs of the Korda brothers were getting a cut of it. Rather, we are treated to a slew of slipshod generic DVDs. It is probably only a matter of time before the original masters of this gorgeous, magical film deteriorate beyond all recognition, and all memory of this film vanishes into oblivion. This was the first film my mother ever saw as a young girl in Hungary in the early 1950s, and one of the first films I ever saw as young child in the early days of VHS. In all probability, I will never get the chance to show it to my own children, at least not in the way it was meant to be seen. What a pity
You feel like you're there!. Great music.  Makes you want to get up and dance - or sing - or both.  Filming in a New York winter helps to really bring you into their angst.  I loved it
Amistad=GREAT FILM. This film is a truly great film.  It not only "tugs" at the heart strings but also gives one an insight into what the African people actually endured during the slaving period in history.  This is perhaps one of the films that schools need to show during Black History Month as well as any time during the year.  A definite story that needed to be told
"Every Day's A Brand New Deal". This one quickly became a favorite of mine. Ever polemical, working class "everyman," Harvey Pekar, desperate for an outlet in which to channel the frustration he expereinces as a downtrodden oddball, decides to make himself into, as cult comic figure R.Crumb puts it, "a comic book hero," and to entertaining results. As Harvey tells Crumb, "ordinary life is pretty complex stuff."The revelatory movie-sometimes-documentary is quite unique, funny and touching. The scene where Harvey, his voice reduced to a series of squeaks and raspy whistles due to a vocal chord nodule, pleads with his second wife not to walk out on him, is one of the most pathetically funny attempts at a semi-romantic interlude I've seen in a movie. Out the doors she bolts, as Harvey, played to a T by Paul Giamatti {"Sideways} rolls his eyes skyward and grimaces. Such is life for Harvey.However, he and Joyce, played by Hope Davis {my wife used to wear glasses like that!} soon "meet strange," as opposed to Hollywood's typical "meet cute," and the curmudgeony, weary Harvey at long last finds the woman who sees in him something most wouldn't. Upon the hilarious closing of their first encounter/date, Joyce suggests they skip the courtship and just get married. In her unique way, with her own idiosyncracies and peculiarities, she compliments Harvey's gloom and doom existence. This is crucial; as a movie telling their story, it is, underneath the usual day-to-day ups and downs, actually a "real" love story of lost hearts and souls finding their way, finding refuge, finding a taste of what's sold to us all as that abstract American dream. Very well done and highly recommended
Lowbrow humor at it's best. If you're looking for laughs without being challenged, this is a great way to spend a couple of hours. It's not ground breaking, it's just funny. Watch Meet the Press to rev your brain back up after this one
Another Excellent Boxed Set!. I just picked up the Season Two, volume one DVD boxed set of He-Man and the MOTU, and must say it is just as great as the Season One, volumes 1 and 2 sets.The effort put into the creation of these boxed sets of this great cartoon show is nothing short of amazing. Everything from the carton design, the character art on the DVD's, and to the cartoons themselves, everything here is first class all the way.If there are any complaints whatsoever, it would be on the part of Filmation, who recycled some sets and in some cases sacrificed story to introduce new characters. But in 1984 when this occurred, the He-Man cartoon and toy line was exploding with popularity, which no doubt caused a rush to get these cartoons finished and on TV. They are still extremely fun to watch, and if only for a half-hour at a time, transports you back to an easier time in your life.I highly recommend any fan of this show to buy this set! You most definitely will not be disappointed! I look forward to the fourth and final boxed set, Season Two, vol 2.
this van damme movie is actually quite good. the only thing not so good in this movie is the police casting jobs. some of the cops in nopd just looked like a bunch of high school dropouts. the uniform cop who lost his undercover wife was even worse, unshaved, looked like a guy just got out of bed, so sloppy look in an unkempt blue uniform. the plain clothe detective also look too young to be promoted to detective rank. van damme played pretty convincing as an over-the-hill tired junki+alcoholic detective. the gun fighting scenes were nicely arranged. the  storyline although was a bit slow and loose but still not too bad for a b movie like this. at least van damme still has some dignity to do marginally serious enough action movie, even transcended himself doing this drama+mystery+action thriller. definitely 100% better than what steven seagal has been shamelessly doing in recent years. he not only degenerated himself as one of the worst actors but also betrayed all his once loyal audience. salute to van damme, puke on seagal.
A Seinfeld lovers dream come true!. If ur a Seinfeld lover then this is a must have! Not only do you get the first three seasons, but you also get the pilot episode; the episode that started it all. Also, the salt & pepper shakers are a priceless souvenier to add to your collectibles. Lets not forget the Seinfeld playing cards included in the package; their hilariouse! Everytime I play poker i look forward to seeing the hole cast when i get a "Full House"
Classic Kurt Russell!. This is one of the most exciting thrillers I saw in the 90's. Kurt Russell's performance is great! The cinematography and direction are excellent.The movie works because it doesn't try to be TOO serious. This is a Hollywood thriller, so the action certainly gets extravagant at points. The premise of the film is a fantastic setup.I love films like this where the editing is paced, rather than sporadic and choppy. For instance, the scene with Kurt Russell climbing on the outside of the semi is shot masterfully. The tension is real. The supporting roles played by Kathleen Quinlan and J.T. Walsh are convincing.This movie, considering the low price it's at these days, must be owned. It's one of Kurt Russell's best films.
a pretty good film. this dvd wasnt bad at all, it shows the life of vince mcmahon and what he's about and it shows about his family in it alot. 9/10 stars, id recomend this to anyone who is a fan of ww
Very Good. I am a big X-Men fan, i like almost anything Marvel has done, and it is true, this series cannot compare to the older x-men cartoon.this one is better.now, i will watch the older one whenever i can, it has started coming back on tv recently and i watch it almost every day, but honestly, there are many times that i find it...boring. i mean, i love the plot lines, but there is far too much talking, far too many flashbacks for no apparent reason, and far too much jubilee, and not nearly enough gambit.but this review is supposed to be about the new series, sorry i got off topic there for a minutex-men evolution, as the other guides have already mentioned, portrays the x-men as high schoolers (with the exception of a few), and gives some great development for characters. i especially like nightcrawler in this series, often times he is betrayed as a thing to be scared of, and very serious, but in evolution he is the fun loving character he should have been all along, a big furball, or the fuzzy blue elf as he is sometimes referred to. cyclops is very serious, and looks out for everyone alot, like always. jean grey is pretty much on the same level as cyclops, but not quite as extreme. they also have a on and off relationship, but they were always destined to be, right? spyke is new, basically a teenage boy form of marrow, big trouble maker and storm's nephew, though he has a few good plot lines through out the show. then shadowcat is also a main character, the girl that can walk through walls (or any other solid object), who is an average teenage...mutant...ninja tur-oh wait, i mean girl. wolvie is the same old guy, as is professor X, and storm is pretty much the same as always too, but luckily she has left her "catch phrases" such as "power of wind, get real windy!" back in the older show. oh yeah, and rogue, at first she is with the brotherhood, but then she joins the x-men, never really sure where she belongs. i guess never being able to touch another person will freak you out some.there is also a large selection of bad guys. there is the "brotherhood of mutants" who at first is led by magneto, but they tend to go off on their own alot. they are made up of blob, fat and stupid, quake, he can...make earthquakes and has a thing for shadowcat, quicksilver, magneto's beloved (or not so) son, and toad, who has all the powers, and intelligence, of a toad. magneto has the same old plans for global domination for the "homo-superiors" (mutant kind), and mystique is his loyal as ever follower...when we know who she is at the time. there are also others that follow magneto, but arent part of the brotherhood (not in high school with them...) including sabertooth, wolverine's arch foe, pyro, the australian with attitude, colossus, the guy with the awesome body armour that comes out of no where, and gambit. this was a huge problem with alot of people, putting gambit as a bad guy, but i rather like it. gambit was trained by his father to be a theif, and as a bad guy he really got the opportunity to use those skills, and do some very cool moves with his powers besides throwing cards at everyone like when he was a good guy (dont worry, he still does though)now i know i didnt tell you any of the plots of the episodes, but hopefully all you x-men fans that are afraid to try this show will see that despite some changes, it isnt the bane of x-men history like some have suggested. it is a great show
An extremely underrated movie. Althoush critics and pretty much everyone else dismissed this movie as awful, I think it is great.  It is Denis Laery at his best both in acting and writing.  The dialouge between him and a young Sandra Bullock is  excellent.  You get to see his Boston/Irish side like in other in Monument  Ave but in a better plot with better actors. (Although his art theif  sidekicks do have some great one-liners)  Sandra Bullock is also an  excellent sidekick to Leary.  She made this movie before she was a star in  movies such a Speed, but plays a her &quot;wanting to get out of the  gutter&quot; character great.   This movie will not be loved by everyone,  but serious Leary fan or Bullock aficionado will appreciate its merit.    Finally, any Homicide fans will enjoy seeing &quot;G&quot; Yaphet Kotto in  a less dramatic law enforcement role
I think. it was a hoot upon seeing this film in the theatre espeically the part where Candice Bergen tries to woo Burt back with her terrible singing "Better than Ever"  I think that is the name of the song ..as always Jill Clayburgh was winning as ever and Burt couldn't been better too.  Its a shame Jill's middle age romance flick with Jeffrey Tambor .. "Never Again" got the due it deserved when ti came out.  Everybody should check that out, its a hoot too
Leaves you wanting more. Everyone remembers the 1963 series where Dr. Richard Kimble (David Janssen) goes running around in every episode just missing the criminal that killed his wife. He in turn is being chased by Lt. Philip Gerard (Barry Morse) who thinks Kimble did it and is a fugitive from the law. The whole thing was narrated by William Conrad.Well now we have the movie. This time we have a beginning middle and ending all in 161 minutes.Dr. Richard Kimble (Harrison Ford) and his wife Helen (Sela Ward) are the perfect couple. Then one night while he was working for some inexplicable reason a despicable person dispatches Helen. On her way to the netherworld she inadvertently says Richard on the 911 call. One thing leads to another and Kimble gets the blame. In the process of transporting him from one containment system to another the transport meets with a little accident; now Kimble is free to find locate the real perpetrator. Now it is up to Marshal Samuel Gerard (Tommy Lee Jones) to find and retrieve Kimble.Now that we have covered the basic there is not where to begin to tell how great this movie is on many levels. The anticipation of the chase of Kimble to find the perpetrator (by the way he has only one arm) before Gerard catches him. We get close and have a few read herrings. Tommy Lee gets to keep his stoic look as he says things like "I don't care." And "I don't bargain."Personaly I think that the Chicago police knew all along who the real bad guy was and was covering for him several times right up to the end. They went out of there way to paint Kimble as the bad guy.  Detective Rosetti (Joseph F. Kosala) also tried to stop him from revealing the real perpetrator. Rosetti referring to Kimball even after the truth is revealed "He's going down. You won't help us, you stay the hell out!"
Randy Travis At His Best!. My whole family loved this. Randy does some popular songs like "He Walked On Water" "Forever and Ever" "I Told You So," and five other songs. Everybody who buys this will love it
5 Stars for Season Two - But Season One Deserved 6!. Season Two is a glorious revelation from the Gods of Comedy and features such wiley moments (often musical) such as Noblett singing 80s power rock ballads and yellow-clad cult members of the Safe Trap House joyously chanting, "I'm gonna sit at the Welcome Table, Hallelujah!", but unfortunately Season Two is missing a bit of that life-altering je ne sais quoi of the first.  Guy, Jerri's actively catatonic father, is dead by episode three to be replaced by a weakened rendition of the old favorite, Stu, the Meat Guy.  The sexual tension between Noblett and Jellineck has fizzled.Despite its faults, Season Two is gem of hilarity.  I give it five stars, but I still think that Season One deserved six
Coma. Audacious, brilliant, cerebral yet firmly grounded in the stuff of life, Barbet Schroeder's &quot;Reversal of Fortune&quot; is as much a winner now as it was when it was first released, 14+ years ago. And this has as much to do with Jeremy Irons' performance as Klaus Von Bulow as it does with Schroeder's masterful writing and directing: here is an example of everything coming together in the right place at the right time
Very informative. All you want to know on the history of vegas is right here in this 2 disc special.  I love vegas and love the history even more so.  Vegas has been threw alot and you can find all of it here.  A great buy
Up-close and intimate. The films I watch tend to be action films of the likes of Arnie, Stallone and Gibson et al. So it may come as a surprise that I say that I think this film is a real gem. So why do I think that? Well, for a start it's just a pure delight from start to end. Great acting, great directing, great storyline. It's a southern story played out with charm, elegance and humanity. It's really very diificult to say exactly why one likes this movie because it really is a special personal experience that covers so many things, from aspects of motivation, the way the characters reflect and even just their accents. I will never forget those simple lines "oh babe why did you do it" and the replies, or the "she was just having a very bad day" lines too. It's a very personal film, laid back, up-close, intimate, soft, a work of art. Brilliant acting, brilliant direction and brilliant script - lovely film
A Real Lost Classic. This is not a great movie... but it is a GRAND one. It is also one of my top ten favorite movies of all time... because it is so "atmospheric"... it is one of those wonderful movies that will literally transport you to a different time and place. The lush musical score (which does NOT sound "science fiction" at all, if anything it more closely resembles the scores of the old Roman gladiator genre films), the wind in the sands and beautiful Sophia, at her technicolour best, make this film great fun to watch.  How could you top such lines as "I can cook, I can live, I can breathe!"  and the Duke putting the make on Sophia Loren who retorts "Oh no, NOT YOU!!"  Well, this is definitely a movie to curl up with on a rainy Sunday morning. This film is less of an adventure film and more a story of 3 very different people who's lives are brought together and how they play against each other. Fantastic
Tiger Woods DVD. Unfortunately, I am unable to review the product because it was used as a gift.
If You Want To Laugh.. This movie has nothing but comedy written all over it. Fast moving plot with the right recipe of characters. Hilarious to the bone and excellent set up. If you are looking for a great laugh and enjoy the humor only David Spade and Marlon Wayans can bring, pick this one up. An excellent addition to any DVD collection. Fun for all to watch
Great movie, could have done without the political revisionism. This movie is based on the fall of Phnom Penh, Cambodia to the Vietnamese trained Communist Khmer Rouge.  It is the accounts of NY Times reporter Sydney Schanberg and his aide Dith Pran that are shown here masterfullyThe Khmer Rouge is one of the worst regimes in the 20th century and that is saying a lot.  They moved the Cambodian people from the cities and urban areas into the rural areas and forced them into agricultural production.  Those that did not die at the hands of the Khmer Rouge died from diseases and malnutrition that city life had left them ill prepared for.My only complaint about this movie and the reason I am docking it 1 star is for the political views espoused by Sydney Schanberg.  America may be held accountable for many things, certainly Lyndon Johnson's personally orchestrated war (for which both he and Robert McNamara should have been tried for war crimes) in Vietnam is among them.To blame America for the Khmer massacres is insane.  The Khmer, Vietnamese, Chinese, and Soviet Governments are the villains here and take 99.9% of the blame for the atrocities committed.  Yes America was involved in covert bombing campaigns in Cambodia but it did nothing to precipitate the events depicted in the Killing Fields and possibly held them off for the briefest of times.  This kind of revisionist history is straight out of the lexicon of Noam Chomsky, who first denied the events occurred and then tried to place the blame on anyone else but his "idealized" government system of communism.America and western countries do share the blame though of not educating their people enough about these events.  It is a chapter of history that we would like to put behind us which makes it all the more important that we never forget it happened and that brutal regimes like the Khmer Rouge exist and will subject their own people to the worst atrocities.As for the using of the song "Imagine" I am not sure that John Lennon would have liked the irony in the lyrics.  The communist Khmer Rouge tried to strip the normally religious Khmer people from their faith.  As religious faith tends to get in the way of Communism.  "A brotherhood of man" Pol Pot referred to himself as "Brother Number One" and also operated a "Big Brother" type regime.  "No need for greed or hunger" strip them of their possessions and make everyone engage in food production and see how quickly everyone starves to death.  "No hell below us" why have it below them when the Khmer's can endure living hell on Earth?  "Imagine all the people Living for today..."  They have to live for today because the "people's government" will take it from them indiscriminately tomorrow.  Sorry John, I have seen and read all I need to on your "ideal" government of Communism.  You may be a "dreamer" but everyone that has seen your "dream" felt like they were living in a nightmare.
Not the best... ...but not as bad as some people wrote. Please keep in mind that this is a "American Pie" movie. If you do expect some serious movie then you should not buy this one. But if you do like to have a good time and to get some laughs on a weekend evening then you should watch this one. Give it a try ..
Yet another installment of the "Champloo". Fuu, Mugen, and Jin... we meet again. This time around the gang is in for some revalations of sorts. You find out a bit about Mugen's Past in the first 2 episodes and a little more about Fuu's facination with the "samurai who smells of sun flowers". I'd have to say my favorite of the 4 has got to be "Bogus Booty". The gang comes into some money and while Fuu stuffs her face (typical for her since all she seems to do is eat and complain), the guys decide to hit the local red light district. You can imagine the sort of things they get into. I won't give away any details, except that it involves a couple of nice fight sequences. I gave it a 4 out of 5 only because its not the best of the series but its not the worst either. If you have liked the first 3 dvd's u love this one too
The First "Guy Cry" Movie Ever. When I was playing HS football, this movie hit the air waves.  It did so with such a powerful stir as well.Guys crying at or watching a movie was never heard of, but for weeks afterwards, my teammates and other friends admitted to crying when we all discovered that "Pic" had cancer and especially when he was told after an operation that he still did.This is the first of many James Caan great acts.  The week before the Superbowl this year one of the networks showcased the foundations for cancer run by the families of Brian Piccolo and Walter Peyton.  It was amazing seeing old news footage and videos of Brian with his wife.  Caan and Fabresze looked just like them.The movie really broke a lot of ground. First, a white and a black player sharing hotel rooms on the road.  Even coach Hallas warned them that there may be trouble.  But these two, who vied for the same position, would become the best of friends.Piccolo even ups the ante when Sayers gets injured working with him to get back to playing.  Brian tells him that since he was second team, he did not want to be first team if Sayers could not play.  He told him he was going to beat him at his best and they worked together to get Sayers back in playing shape.Eventually, they both start in the backfield and they are elated.Brian's illness comes on quickly, yet you feel the sadness and the suffering of all around him.After the movie I found the book written by Gayle Sayers entitled; "I am Third."  The movie was based on Sayers autobiography.  For anyone interested in playing sports at any level, this book is a must and is related to the movie for sure.The movie shows that the ultimate of teamwork is working together and sacrificing for one another.  Practing what you learn in Brian's Song will take your work life, family life and social life to a much higher level.  Enjoy this movie with your family and friends.  And really, it is okay for guys to cry, they will even brag about it
Coming Home. Although this movie was set in a Veteran Affairs hospital during the Viet Nam war it still has the most amazing relevance today.  The characters depicted are well executed and the chemistry between Jon Voight and Jane Fonda is absolutely electric.After you see this film I hope that you will look at anyone who has gone to war with a deeper understanding of a little of what they may have gone through.  While there is an innocence we don't have today, it is still a movie that will stay with you long after the last scene.
quick and perfect, thank you very much!. I ordered the DVD in the US around the 15th Dez. and it was delivered at Cologne only two weeks later - I think this is a good job
Best Sit Com on TV. I had never watched Scrubs until about one week ago.  A week later and I've watched all five seasons.  Absolutely must see.  Braff possesses a perfect blend of witty humor and sappy emotion for his part, and Donald Faison complements him perfectly in his role as his best friend and fellow doctor.  You couldn't ask for a more naturally hilarious and emotionally driven combination in a TV show.  The progression of the characters in terms of rank in the hospital and emotion is amazing through each season and even each episode.  All the actors grow into their parts with more ease each season too, creating a great growth throughout the show.  Certainly worth watching... and definitely my favorite TV show of all time.  I'm carrying a full 15 unit load in college and have made it through 117 episodes in 6 days... be warned that you may have no life for however long it takes you to watch these!
Great movie - however this dvd is edited. An outstanding movie.  This film has always been a favorite.  I was sad to see though that this DVD version has been edited.  Some lines are missing here and there.  If not for that, I would rate it 5 stars.  I do not understand why those lines would have been taken out.
Amazing in color. It was a delight to see this childhood memory again, and in pristine quality with color (if you prefer it in original black & white, turn the color down on your tv set). It brings this 60s series to a whole new generation of fans (my nephews & nieces wouldn't watch it in b&w)
Great movie on bluray. I bought this movie because I'm a fan and it is one of my top five action movies of all time.  I wanted to see this film at it's best on bluray and I was not disappointed.  The picture and sound is awsome.  The commentary by James Cameron is a treat, one the most interesting commentarys I've listend to.  It lacks some of the extras that dvd versions may have contained, but the bluray transfer of of the movie is superior to the dvd version.  Finally, I can enjoy a sharp picture on my wide screen
awesome if you are a boy george fan. the video's were great the whole thing i Really enjoyed and I am a big culture club fa
HYSTERICAL. I am a huge fan of Leslie's goofball movies and outside of his Naked gun flicks,i thought this was the funniest. In fact,it's quite similar to the Naked gun movies as far as what Leslie does in the story and that cant be a bad thing! Very funny movie,and yes of course quite ridiculous
Excellent video of the Yang Long Form. I have seen quite a few Tai Chi DVD's and this one is probably one of the best.  There are plenty of videos of the so-called "Yang" short form (I prefer not to call it Yang, but instead the "Beijing 24 form"), but not many good videos of the Yang Long Form.  This one is worth buying.  The production quality of the video is very good and the descriptions are clear.  You can repeat individual sections, which is helpful.   Even though the title of the DVD includes the words "Tai Chi for Health", this is good traditional Taijiquan with martial application; not just flowery new age movements.
Shamelessly Entertaining Neo-Noir Masterpiece. "The Bride Wore Black" is another neo-noir classic from Francois Truffaut.  It's adapted from the pulp novel masterpiece by Cornell Woolrich (aka William Irish.)  Truffaut retains the story and the sense of doom of the book but pares down Woolrich's convoluted plot so that it is even darker.  Jeanne Moreau is scary as the implacable Bride, who tracks down the five men she holds responsible for the death of her husband on their wedding day.  (You can see the tremendous influence this film had on Tarantino's "Kill Bill.")  This is an icy examination of the eternal war between men and women;  the men are either sexual predators or spinless wimps, and the Bride is remorseless in exterminating them.  The film has several setpieces that are obviously tributes to Hitchcock (like the high-rise building; and the wrongfully accused teacher.)  There's even a musical score by Hitch's signature composer, Bernard Herrman.  Truffaut ratchets up the tension to unbearable levels as we wait to see how the Bride will dispatch her next victim.  Truffaut, the great humanist and friend of small children, occasionally peeks out, but mostly this film is  a gripping ride on the dark side.  It also has one of the gratest final scenes I've encountered in a movie.  Just terrific
Great for teaching music, drama & US History. I hate musicals.  This one is tolerable because it is so rich in history.  My 8th graders love it.  They really get into it once it gets started.  They realize that they know who all the characters are and what they are doing inh the film.  I think it is great to use along with the book, "A More Perfect Union" by Betsy Maestro.  It really moves the whole process of creating a nation into the real world for them.
My favorite!. I've been Netflixing exercise DVDs to decide which ones I want to actually buy, and I knew from the first time I watched this one that it was going to be one of the keepers.  It's fun!  Well, mostly -- the beginning is difficult (hmmm... how many squats/"plies" can I do in rapid succession before my thighs, hips, or knees give out on me?), but I still actually look forward to this routine.  It seems to lean more toward the dance-type moves than just exercises, even more than the (admittedly few) other Pilates DVDs I've seen.  Also, she doesn't make you do so many of any one given exercise that you get bored -- or she adds moves or changes the routine slightly, so you feel like you're doing a different exercise (which you kind of are).  And the clincher, of course -- it's having an effect on my weight & muscle tone.  The instructor is a pleasure -- very likable, and her movements are very graceful.  I just wish she'd release some more DVDs
"Best Movie Ever Made!". Probably the greatest biographical film ever made, "Mommie Dearest" holds a place in American pop culture not only as a film classic but a movie people still talk about nearly 26 years after its initial release. No matter what you think of it the film comes across as an absorbing drama that pulls the lid of Hollywood's elite. The film basically ruined Joan Crawford's image as a beautiful, articulate, hard working actress and Faye Dunaway's career has never been the same. Most know the whole story...it's excellent. So I'll go into detail about the DVD. Film is beautifully restored with a ton of bonus features including the trailer, picture gallery with still shots not seen in the film ,and a behind the scenes making of the film. A must for any Hollywood film buff
ANOTHER STELLAR PERFORMANCE FROM THE DIVINE MISS M!. This movie was Bette's best performance since "The Rose".  Definitely worth seeing and having for your DVD library.  The pain she went through when she decided she wanted to give her daughter up to a better life was just amazingly unselfish.  I would have given it a 10 if there were 10 stars!  I only wish the Divine Miss M would make more movies like this
Take this journey... harrow your soul. Having just seen the DVD of Children Underground I must say strongly that this film should be seen by everyone in the postmodern first world. I saw these things for myself in Romania during December of 2000. The apathy on the streets of Bucharest was deep and dark. My friends there kept shrugging their shoulders saying; "What can you do?" A documentary on the thousands of dogs on the streets would be a riveting nightmare in itself. While I was there they held an election. The choice of presidential candidates was reduced to a hard-line old school communist and a new school fascist. The Communist won. People shrugged. The train stations and subway entrances were indeed hives for feral children. Im deeply grateful to Edet Belzberg for having the courage to descend into this manmade hell to bring these images back. It is my hope that the Romanians themselves find some of that same courage. I was moved that even at this stage of hell several of the kids held on to at least some idea of God. That could be seen by the cynically ironic of the West as the superstition of the hopeless, but perhaps it is also evidence that these children are not hopeless. To blame these problems on the lack of abortions or contraceptives is nave and simplistic. Listen to the voices of the parents in this film. It is the apathy, the failure of courage and the utter selfishness reinforced by too many years of soul crushing communist dictatorship. We, ourselves, have no reason to gloat. Apart from having a surfeit of material possessions would we fare any better if the props were kicked from beneath us? Perhaps perhaps not. This film, along with Lilja 4-Ever, is a warning sign of something growing in this world. Robert L. Kaplan termed it The Coming Anarchy. It will spread.  Meanwhile how will you respond to these things? With compassion or with apathy
My favorite Michael Mann movie. My 18 year old son and his 60 year old dad both love this movie. The casting is just about perfect - especially Robert DeNiro in a "sympathetic" role as a criminal. Al Pacino is also outstanding as a flawed but determined cop. Michael Mann does an excellent job of distilling LA both visually and geographically.
The best and most well rounded anime of all time. Two samurai owe their lives to Fuu, a ditsy waitress who saved their lives. She saved their lives under one condition; help Fuu find the samurai who 'Smells of sunflowers'.Director Shinichiro Watanabe became famous for his anime masterpiece, 'Cowboy Bebop'. Which I very much enjoyed and would heavily recommend. Besides 2 shorts from 'The Animatrix', Champloo would be his next project.This is the most amazing anime series I have ever seen. And I'll be damned if anyone thinks otherwise. From the characters, to the storyline in each episode, everything is perfect. And the Finale is really something to marvel over. It's absolutely amazing.My favorite episodes would have to be 'Memories of the lost verse' part one and two.I have to warn you though, beware of episode 22, and don't let it get the best of you. It's just mind provoking fun. Just a filler.If you love anime, watch this. If you don't, watch this. I guarantee you'll be anime-addicted after one episode
Long John Silver. In the end, Captain Silver manages to get the captain Flint's pirate treasure.  Pirates treasure controlled by Captain Silver and a new legend born.  Young Jim Hawkins is admired by Captain Silver, a hopeful apprentice; Captain Silver saves Jim's life, a barginning chip; Captain Silver avoids the curse of the black spot, kills his mutinous crew; Ben Burr surrenders Captain Flints treasure to Captain Silver, (Pirates loot)
The Biggest Winner. I love the workouts except I find Jillian's sense of humor somewhat annoying, which only allows me to give her workouts 4 stars instead of 5 stars
Good movie, scared my kids. I remember this movie from when I was a kid.  I liked it then, and I still like it now.  It freaked my kids out the first time they watched it (at night).  When I put it on during the day, they liked it
A Charmingly Bad Movie. I really shouldn't like this movie but I do.  However, I gave it four stars SOLELY because of the acting and soundtrack. Sandra Bullock and Harry Connick Jr. were fantastic to watch and the music was a delight to listen to if you like pop-country.  If the director had casted any other actors for the roles, it definitely would have flopped.  Bullock and Connick have such an irrisistable charm about them that you can't help but love to watch them act.On the other hand, albeit a wonderful actress, Bullock's daughter in this movie was so irritating and unlikeable she spoiled the magic of the moment for me every time she appeared on screen.  I cringed when she opened her mouth.  I could see why her father didn't want her (just kidding...not really).  If I had been like her growing up my father would have driven off leaving me on the side of a road too.  The only redeeming aspect of the daughter's role was to show how difficult a divorce is on a child and how a mother's love will get them through.  In spite of unfairly being bombarded with insults and rejection (annoyingly throughout the ENTIRE movie) from her daughter, we saw a mother who will love and support her child no matter what.  Sorry fathers, the movie didn't portray you very well.On another sour note, this movie lacked direction, character development, continuity, and any kind of substantial plot to follow.   Viewers are just along for the ride without one scene having much to do with another. Characters and scenes were thrown together with no rhyme or reason--seemingly, just to move the movie along to the end.  I found myself saying, "Huh?" a lot to aspects of the story that just didn't make sense.  Perhaps I blinked and missed something that provided a rational explanation.There aren't enough bad things to say about this movie.  It is supposed to be a love story but all we see of the true romance is in the few remaining minutes of the movie. Forget this being a "love" story; it is more like a "reject" story: Husband rejects wife. Daughter rejects mother. Father rejects daughter. Woman rejects man. Town rejects man.  Town rejects woman. Daughter rejects man. Mother rejects son, etc.... With all this rejecting going on it's no wonder that the actual love part doesn't come out until the very end.Director, Forrest Whitaker, ought to be ashamed of himself for dropping the ball on this one.  Although to be fair, I now understand that the studio pulled support during production and several key scenes weren't filmed. After Bullock put in her own money to get the film finished, they shot a make-shift ending and edited together the footage they had already filmed. Unfortunately, knowing why a movie is a mess doesn't make it any easier to watch.In spite of itself, this movie is as charming as it is horrifically directed and edited.  For some reason (i.e., Bullock and Connick) it works.   I have watched this movie many times over and never tire of it.  You'll enjoy it too if you can suspend the movie critic within you and overlook the glaringly obvious megaholes in the storyline.  Just sit back and enjoy the sweet simplicity of this movie.  It's a 155-minute bumby ride but the 2-minute heartfelt emotional ending will definitely leave you emotionally fulfilled.
Sondheim Review. The clarity of the picture and sound were both excellentI thought that the jacket design was a bit drab, hence no fifth starThe only other criticism I have has nothing to do with the product, but relates to the concert program itself - I thought that the selection of which artist sang which song was not always good, e.g., Bernadette Peters did not sing her masterpiec
Beautiful and "nutritious for the brain". In our family, sometimes we only watch videos/DVDs that are "nutritious for the brain" - especially after several requests for another disney princess movie. This sweet version of Peter and the Wolf is always considered "nutritious".  The ballet interpretation of the meadow and the pond are our favorites. The Wolf is great too
The art of not caring for other people's approval. I got CYE based on seeing it in the DVD store, never having seen HBO.  I know Larry David is the co creator and writer on Seinfeld, yet as comedian actor he is totally new to me.It is fascinating and a little disturbing to see the similarities between Larry David and Jerry Seinfeld.  The gestures, intonation, delivery, humor and even similar facial expressions are a little eerie at times.  Who influenced who?This third season is brilliant with obvious parallels with both Seinfeld and Fawlty Towers starring John Cleese. Minor situations become major drama, with the main character creating situations which become farcical and then get resolved.  The ruthless self absorption of the LD character, is quite compelling to watch, as he fearlessly goes where other people just wouldn't, and is often oblivious or indifferent to the destruction he causes.  You just got to admire someone who relentlessly does not care what other people think.I was particularly appalled by the firing of the chef, after hiring him for being bald, and then firing him for wearing a toupee.Refusing to thank a friend's wife for buying dinner, because her husband put down the card, and he was the bread winner, as it was his money not their money that was paying for the meal.Shamelessly using the death of his mother to get sympathy sex from Cheryl.Having Cheryl bake cookies filled with Benadryl so that Richard Lewis' new Christian girlfriend who refused to take medication would eat them and recover quickly from her peanut allergy reaction which LD triggered.  The beauty of it would be she would think her recovery was due to prayer.Asking a waiter for the tip back because he thought he had tipped him twice.Giving his friend a yoga mantra, Ja Ya then asking him to stop using it.  Friend discovers yoga mantra means f--- me!The episode where he hires the chef with Tourette's syndrome, is classic in the way of Seinfeld.I think my favorite episode if I had to choose is the Corpse Sniffing Dog.Cheryl the wife is priceless as a study in patience 'Loving you is my job Larry.'I could go on.  LD is truly appalling, yet I love the show, and have also ordered season 2.  The series does contain some strong language, compared to network offerings.  Update: Having now seen season 2 as well, I consider season 3 is consistently better, although I have to say season 2 has a couple of really outstanding episodes.  I particularly liked the one with Thor the Wrestler.  I recommend you get season 3 first.All the episodes on season 3 are very good. There is a stop and greet interview with most of the cast. It is interesting to note that there is little scripted dialogue, yet the stories are very well structured, and the situations are extremely well set up, and the actors just go, and they have different cameras focused in on each actor.  It is unconventional, yet works amazingly well.If you were to find this review helpful, please click yes.
Samaritan Girl -- the newest DVD from Asia Extreme May 2005. Samaritan Girl is a really impressive film directed by Ki-Duk Kim.  To end all the discrepancies about the title, the film has been illegally bootlegged as 'Samaria'.  The real official title of this film in English is  "Samaritan Girl".  The film is coming out on official non-bootlegged dvd from Tartan's Asia Extreme...which I should add, have been putting out some awesome Asian films on dvd, not to mention they are the ones responsible for getting 'Oldboy' in the theater.Anyway, Samaritan Girl is not like the rest of the Asia Extreme catalog.  It's a sexy drama that is also a really interesting slice of life film.  Most Korean films that have been picked up by American distributors tend to be horror or thrillers but maybe that's because blood/slasher movies sell really well. Samaritan Girl on the other hand is far from a slasher, and while there is some violence, some nudity, and blood, it's really more like a Korean interpretation of the American indie film.The story is about two girls who are trying to save up money to get away from their town.  They don't really have strong relationships with their families who are sort of out of the picture.  It's like the Larry Clark film KIDS in the way that the parents aren't really there, or at least the parents think they know their kids, but they don't.  Jae-Yeong, the prettier of the two girls decides to be a prostitute and makes her friend Yeo Jin, her business associate who sets up the meetings.The film's opener is awesome, with a really great credit sequence over the girls on Korea's instant messaging program picking up a guy.As the film progresses, there is some interesting sexual tension between the girls.  They bathe together in a public shower house which is really  sad and illuminates their aloneness.  Yeo Jin tells Jae Young not to divulge to much to her 'clients'.  Jae-Young who is clearly very childish, capricious, and obviously depressed and lacking self esteem, actually enjoys these encounters with men, as the attention is probably what makes her feel good about herself.About halfway through the film, Jae-Young has an accident (I wont give anything away here) but Yeo Jin decides to switch roles and become the prostitute instead of the secretary.  Yeo Jin's father gets wind of the whole thing and starts to follow her on her sexual encounters.  He eventually catches her in the act...and I wont give away the end.The film is really well done.  And frankly, the two girls are really adorable and the film is really sweet and sad at the same time.  It's also disturbing a lot of the time.If you're not in the mood to see people getting chopped to bits, but would rather watch an awesome Korean indie film (With really cute actresses, I should mention) this film is a great one to check out
no title. Another movie with sniffling and Kleenex.  Tom Hanks, as I foresaw in "Big", is absolutely superb.  Another comic, like Robin Williams and Bill Murray, with marvelous depths.  And yet the movie is not really about a man with AIDS, as all the critics say it should be, and then berate it because it isn't; it's about society's reaction to gays and AIDS, a much broader subject.  On that scale, it delivers well.  We don't need detail scenes of Tom Hanks and his lover, or his facing the disease, or any other of the nitty-gritty the critics said was lacking.  I think they missed the point entirely.  Washington was society, and his slow progression from homophobia to understanding is what Demme is trying to say to the audience.  And, increasingly, I am thinking, we should be out there, living life, helping people, instead of watching them on a two-dimensional screen.  Maybe movies really distance us from life, instead of imparting more knowledge.
Excellent movie, but version missing some scenes?. This movie still rocks after all these years since it first came out.  An excellent and energetic movie from the start. Plot is cutesy.  It serves as a vehicle for the wonderful selection of songs and dance sequences.  However, I think this version of the movie is missing a few scenes?  I would rate this movie version with 5 stars had it been unedited to me.If memory serves me, didn't Alex receive a letter from her friend, Hannah, when Alex discovered Hannah passed away?  Isn't there a reconnection at the end between Mickey and Alex's (girl)friend whom the latter was dating?  Wasn't there more of a story build-up between Alex and her boss?  If this version is cut in anyway, I prefer getting the complete and unedited version.  I find this version incomplete somehow.But Jennifer Beals looks terrific and one wonders why she didn't star in more movies for her generation
Great zombie movies, no more and no less. I feel that both of these films are somewhat underrated.  They were hurt by critics who sort of missed the point and by video gamers who expected them to be carbon-copies of the games.  They are, simply, very good zombie movies - lots of campy fun, great action, and even some genuine scares.  They're just fun to watch, and one of the big reasons for that is Milla - who looks great and is just perfect for this role, simultaneously strong and vulnerable.  (An earlier review said these were among her first films - in fact, she has been acting since 1991, when she famously appeared nude at age 14 in "Return to the Blue Lagoon".  She is a veteran actress with nearly 20 films to her credit.)It is true that these films don't do much that's new with the genre - if that's what you're looking for, see "28 Days Later" instead.  But the Resident Evil films do the traditional zombie genre as well as any film has recently, with great special effects (these were big-budget films), good acting and a lot of action
My Little Pony Child Care Movie. My Little Pony is a movie for the little boys and girls in child care centres. The My Little Ponys are enjoying the first day of Spring, but three witches are plotting to ruin it. My favret carictar is the tall witch sister. i liked her ponytail, her voise and the clothes she wor. I didn't like that monster that had tenteckles. I didn't no what is was. this is my favret movie thow
Excellent. I have seen this film twice. Once before reading the book and once immediately after reading the book. The film is a very faithful rendering of a long and detailed book.  The film is very well produced.  I was particularly impressed by the scene where the B-52's huge bombs are dropped within yards of Vann's bunker. It gives one an idea of the massive destructiveness of these weapons. See it if you have any interest at all in Vietnam and American involvement there
Mad-cap family fun. A clever idea, to produce a new spin on the summer camp movie involving the kids inventing their own camp and conning their unsympathetic parents to part with the necessary cash after they've been hoodwinked by the kids' token "grown-up", Christopher Lloyd, in various guises.Some moral lessons, lightly delivered, but the highlight of the movie is Jonathan Jackson's performance, with a young Andrew ably Keegan supporting.The high-speed turnarounds, when the parents come visiting expecting completely different camps, provide an exciting denouement & round off a fun movie for all the family
Money very much a side issue. Jennifer Aniston is good in this film, as the girl who is unaware of her talents or attractiveness. She's not an "every girl" in this role. She isn't anything really, and she seems to want that to be okay with everyone before she can move on.Her character feels the outside pressure to want more, but doesn't seem to.I liked that, and the sweetness of her relationship that develops in the end.I also liked the examination, if you will, of a marriage at its end, and what happens if you take away distractions and diversions from unhappily attached people and force them to deal with each other rather than the work of suburban or upperclass images.I felt that the couple with money wasn't dynamic in the way that I would have liked. They were supposedly happy, but I didn't feel that very much, and it didn't go anywhere from that place.But overall I liked this movie very much, and found it thoughtful, not funny. People might be put off if they wanted to see the kind of mainstream comedy the advertisements made it appear to be in editing.-Stephanie
home alone. I first saw this movie on a flight to dallas airport.  the entire plane was laughing so hard the Flight attendants had to stop serving.
Remembering. Twenty years later, after PLATOON was released in 1986 and brought some of the horrors of the Vietnam experience to the public's media-jaundiced eye, at last the film can be seen and discussed critically.  'At last', in this viewer's vocabulary, includes the fact that more time for healing from actually being in Vietnam in 1968 and 1969 has passed, making the response to Oliver Stone's film more rational.  Now the film is a film, not a nightmare memory inducer, and that fact in no way diminishes the power of the message.Oliver Stone wrote and directed this musing on the effect of war on the psyche and emotional crippling that Vietnam produced in those who survived. Stone was there and that makes his cinematic lead Chris (Charlie Sheen), an random kid from a privileged family who volunteers to go to Vietnam for 'patriotic reasons',  an exception in the platoon to which he is assigned, the leader of which is  the mentally broken and emotionally scarred Staff Sgt. Bob Barnes (Tom Berenger). Chris' positive influence is Sgt. Elias Grodin (Willem Dafoe), and the two are the polar opposites of evil and good.  But the main characters of this gripping film are the other kids who daily are subjected to the horrors of life in the Vietnam jungles with the atrocious living conditions of filth, rain, heat, vermin, and the constant threat of the VC hidden in the atmosphere, ready to kill them at any moment. And these conditions along with the destructive effects of the government's insane war result in mankind stooping to its lowest level, such as decimating a village of people in the manner of My Lai.The combat scenes are viscerally rigorous and well staged, but the odd thing about seeing this film as a veteran of that war is how watered down the atrocities now seem: scenes of dead bodies, both US and VC, lying on the ground or being scooped into mass burials ignores the fact that in reality what would have been seen are strewed body parts, unrecognizably torn by booby traps, mines, and powerful gunfire.But there is only so much the public can tolerate and so the film must be tidied up a bit. The impact remains in the eyes of the actors called upon to recreate the veterans.  Stone does his best to show the insanity of war, a statement as powerful as any that war must not be the answer in today's world.  And we haven't learned.  And that is what this viewer is remembering.  Grady Harp. May 06
Loved "Rent"!!!. I saw the Broadway musical about 5 years ago and after seeing the movie and purchasing the DVD, I think that everyone should see this movie over and over again.  Chris Columbus has done a wonderful job bringing this musical to film and keeping Jonathan Larson's ideals and thought-provoking view and dreams alive.  The actors are first rate!  They each have their own unique style and their voices are remarkable.I am happy to have the deleted scenes as a bonus in the DVD.  I wish that Chris had kept "Goodbye Love" in the film, but thank god we have a chance to see it. It is a scene that has to be seen by all!The documentary on the Disc 2 is something I am privleged to have watched and I'm so happy to now know how Jonathan Larson lived his life.No day but today!!
Absolute excellence. Throne of Blood is a masterpiece by one of the world's greatest film makers at the height of his powers.Only Kurosawa could take the essence of Shakespearian stage drama and incorporate it into the medium of film as a dynamic tour de force. Yet at the same time he remains faithful to elements of Noh (a stagy traditional Japanese play-form in which design and movement are minimalized). A seeming contradiction, dynamism and static-ness yet Kurosawa masters both in the same medium.  As usual; acting, writing, cinematography, sound, direction and production are all pitch perfect.In this second Shakespearian based film by Kurosawa, focus is on the interplay of fate,  free will and the fine thread the human psyche uses to weave the two together. On a more simpler level it is a man living and dying by the sword. In short what goes around comes around. What comes around for Toshiro Mifune as he gets his just deserts is a scene with straight as an arrow, perfect direction by Kurosawa leading to quite a pointed culminatin of events (pun intended...see the movie you'll understand).Bonus features include excellent linear notes as well as the superb commentary of Donald Richie. Few people are more knowledgeable about film and Japanese film then he. The commentary is almost as interesting as the movie itself.As usual Criterion presents its film in pristine condition. Some may complain that Criterion is too pricey but with them you get the best cinema has to offer. You cannot go wrong. One Kurosawa masterpiece packs more poignancy, punch and philosophy then 10 lesser films thus you get 10 times the movie at 5 times the price, really quite a deal if you look at it that way.
Hey Batman, like where's your pants, man?!. The "Scooby Doo meets Batman" DVD is campy fun featuring the two appearances made by Batman & Robin on The New Scooby Doo Movies (1972-1973).  In "The Dynamic Scooby Doo Affair", The gang teams up with Batman & Robin for a wacky showdown in the funhouse against the Joker & the Penguin. In "The Caped Crusader Caper", Batman & Robin join the gang to once again stop the crazy villainous duo Penguin & Joker, this time from attempting to steal a flying suit from the word fumbling Professor Flakey.  There are some cool extras like elapsed time footage of animators drawing both Scooby & Shaggy and interview clips of the original voice actors.  As cool as this DVD is though, you may want to instead invest in the upcoming 4 DVD set release "The Best of the New Scooby Doo Movies" featuring 15 out of the 24 that aired including both of these Batman & Robin episodes.  However, if you're only interested in the Batman & Robin appearances then this DVD is for you.Goofs:*There are always some animation slip ups in cartoons, but not always as hilarious as Batman with no pants!  Watch for it!Trivia:*"The New Scooby Doo Movies" are double the length of an episode of the original "Scooby Doo Where are You?" show.  They were aired in an hour block.  On DVD they run around 40 minutes each.*"The Best of the New Scooby Doo Movies" 4 DVD box set features episodes with guests the Three Stooges, Jonathan Winters, Don Knotts, Laurel & Hardy, the Harlem Globetrotters, Don Adams, Speed Buggy, Mama Cass, and Dick Van Dyke.  Curiously, episodes with the Addams Family, Phyllis Diller, Sonny & Cher, Sandy Duncan, Davy Jones, Jerry Reed, Tim Conway, toon characters Josie & the Pussycats and Jeannie & Babu were not included. Instead the set chooses to have the multiple appearances by the Stooges (2), Batman & Robin (2), Knotts (2)  and the Globetrotters (3).*Both Shaggy & Robin are voiced by radio personality Casey Kasem.*The genius Don Messick who is of course Scooby also voiced Astro from the Jetsons, Droopy the dog, Boo Boo & Ranger Smith of Yogi fame, Dr. Quest & Bandit from Jonny Quest, Papa Smurf & Azrael from The Smurfs and that goofy dog Mutley from Wacky Races...just to name a few!Also recommended:  The 4 DVD set Scooby Doo Where Are You? - Seasons 1 & 2 (which is actually the entire series!)
Where's the Special Edition?. Great flick, good for all ages, and above all else, it's SCHWARZENEGGER!!! I would really like to see a widescreen special edition of this film, but Universal is severely lacking in that department. The picture quality isn't that great and it's only available in fullscreen pan and scan. But it's a great film either way
Double-sided value. A great value option of an American Cult Hot Rod Icon. Personally I would prefer 2 seperate discs but this is value for money for sure!
What can I say?. A Movie that will make you wonder if it could be true. It made you wonder what would happen next or if they would be able to stop it in time and did not come with the normal hollywood happy ending that we all wait for. I would recommend this movie to anyone who likes a good action movie
Golden Age "TREASURE ISLAND". I've just finished seeing once more my VHS copy of Victor Fleming's "TREASURE ISLAND"(MGM,1934).In glorious B&W and with magnificent performances by almost everyone.Thank God ,it was made in the Golden Age of Hollywood.So,we don't have to endure the likes of who knows whom...Jackie Cooper is still alive,I think.He is a good Jim Hawkins.Wallace Beery(Long John Silver)and Lionel Barrymore(Captain Billy Bones) are simply great.Charles "Chic" Sale(1885-1937)is superb as Ben Gunn.The greatest Ben Gunn ever.And I don't see anymore actors like Otto Kruger,Nigel Bruce and Lewis Stone(what a marvelous trio:Dr.Livesey,Squire Trelawney and Captain Smollet).And it's good seeing again the menacing canadian Douglass Dumbrille(1890-1974)as Israel Hands.What an entertaining movie!True to the spirit of Robert Louis Stevenson.When we'll see a DVD(a Special Edition DVD, I hope)version of this enchanting film?Thank Heaven for MGM ,John Lee Mahin & Vic Fleming!
Powerful statement !. In this film you will face two opposite sides between a gay lover of the arts and a alienated and confused fanatic of the ancient regime. This ideological train crash will be adjusting when the time goes and slowly every one of these men will respect and admire each one another .Above all the prejuices you may have about this disturbing tour de force between two human beings with different visions about the life , this movie shows you a new reality . Becasue the aparience is many times the only lense that many people employs to judge the world . And you know the world is a complex web of relations .If you only read what you like you will never be an illustrated man, said once Seneca . And that statement may be well translated to thah brave , poignant , reflexive, artistic and captivating  film.Try to find as soon you can Memories of the underdevelopment , the masterpiece of Tomas Gutierrez Alea , the best cuban director of the XX century.To love and learn about the inmense possibilities of art is live twice .
Extraordinary Focus on Ordinary Men and Women of WWII. I use the term ordinary to emphasize just how extraordinary the US infantryman was in WWII. In motion pictures it seems that most war films focus and glorify trained teams sent on secret missions or small groups of elite fighting men trained for a specific purpose. Most of these films never really focus on the men, the morality and camaraderie developed (one exception being THE DEVIL'S BRIGADE) and the day-to-day grind of combat and unsettled nerves. A WALK IN THE SUN is one of a handful of war films that focuses on these endearing elements of civilian men thrown into this mundane (on the surface) yet extraordinary routine of constant exposure to death from enemy ordnance. They are a unit from mixed backgrounds thrown into this maelstrom of uncertainty and death. They develop camaraderie and build trust in each other and execute the daily task they are ordered to without real knowledge of the bigger picture and without specific question of purpose. They get the job done ay any cost whatever the reason. Men die, they grieve and they keep moving. They are on the lowest rung in the field of getting the job done. And they persevere. Recent pictures like SAVING PRIVATE and the restored Sam Fuller epic THE BIG RED ONE have redirected the focus to the lowly ordinary infantryman out there getting the job done. BATTLEGROUND and THE STORY OF G.I. JOE have been around for a while and they too have gotten their deserved recognition. Their greatness comes because they have focused on the men. A WALK IN THE SUN is poetic in nature. Mild mannered Sterling Holloway's death scene is very poignant and difficult to watch and even fathom because of the irony that war has exposed these men to. The diversity of the men is great yet the leader types pick up and take charge when it becomes necessary without any hesitation. Dana Andrews is a man seeing that they get the job done. John Ireland, in one of his better performances, is a distant and cool character that seems like the eyes and ears of the viewer taking in all that transpires. Screenwriter Robert Rossen's script is rich in the character studies of these men including Richard Conte, Lloyd Bridges, Norman Lloyd, George Tyne, Huntz Hall and Herbert Rudley under Lewis Milestone's lyrical direction.WE DIVE AT DAWN directed by Anthony Asquith is an excellent submarine film. This is a very realistic film containing skillfully structured dialogue giving insight into the daily lives of the sailors aboard a British Submarine. It is very atmospheric and gives a good feel of what life may have been like aboard a submarine during WWII in part thanks to cinematographer Jack Cox and art designer Walter Murton whose efforts helped achieved this immensely. The exceptional cast includes Eric Portman, John Mills and Niall MacGinnis. Once again it's the ordinary man put into extraordinary circumstances that perseveres. I like this one.Samuel Goldwyn's THE NORTH STAR is a prestigiously mounted film about a small village in the Ukraine attacked by the Nazis during the Barbarossa campaign during WWII. The film demonstrates how the men and women of our ally Russia worked as a cohesive force to fight off the Germans. An impressive cast includes Dana Andrews, Anne Baxter, Dean Jagger, Farley Granger, Erich von Stroheim, Walter Huston, Walter Brennan and Jane Withers. The list of other filmmakers is also very impressive. They include director Lewis Milestone, screenwriter Lillian Hellman, legendary cinematographer James Wong Howe and distinguished composer Aaron Copland and producer William Cameron Menzies. That's quite a list. Aaron Copland, James Wong Howe and Lillian Hellman were all nominated for the Academy Award for their work on this film. This film puts the Russians in a good light as romantic combatants meeting the brutal and barbaric Germans in this skillfully constructed piece of propaganda. It is an interesting to see the American perception of the Soviets from this film made during WWII. It also does entertain, however much unlike A WALK IN THE SUN and WE DIVE AT DAWN
Television is reality, and reality is less than television. They say you either love or hate this rather bizarre offering from 1983, but I found myself somewhat indifferent as Videodrome approached its conclusion.  To my mind, the final third of the story is ultimately too haphazard, esoteric, and too consciously horror-driven to clearly express the themes worked into the heart of the film.  It's easy to read a lot into this film, but that's as much of a credit to the viewer as it is to the filmmakers.Still, Videodrome is certainly a fascinating, unique film that compels the viewer to contrast the interplay between video and real life in our increasingly technological age.  By 1983, most people were already seeing life through a television screen - TV defined the news, fashion, the latest fads, etc.  In the movie, TV plays as integral a part as food and comfort in the rehabilitation of the homeless taken in at the Cathode Ray Mission run by Dr. O'Blivion (Jack Creley).  Rather than paint the television as a soul-draining maker of brain-dead zombies, Videodrome forges its way down an even more frightening path, where television is used as a potential weapon on the masses.James Woods plays Max Renn, a rather sleazy cable operator who depends on shocking television shows to keep his little station up and running.  He discovers many of his shows through satellite piracy, and that is just how Videodrome first comes to his attention.  He is fascinated with the show, which features nothing but torture and abuse of individuals, especially women, with no sign of a plot anywhere behind it.  It's just the kind of shocking new thing he's after, and so he begins searching for its source.  His prurient interest in such violent material is enhanced by his current girlfriend, Nicki Brand (Deborah Harry), who is so into S&M that she vows to audition for Videodrome herself.  Before long, Max begins hallucinating, and his efforts to discover the source of Videodrome become, at the same time, a desperate attempt to maintain his sanity if not physical life.  The show isn't rotting his brain, but it is physically changing it, and therein lies the unheralded danger of this example of reality TV taken to the extreme.All of this works beautifully for the first hour, but I just feel the psychology of the story is ultimately sacrificed in the name of horror, as the special effects force something of a disconnect between the viewer and the film.  At least in my case, this robbed this otherwise perversely fascinating film of much of its power
Urban love story hits Hollywood... Compared to the book, the film left out a lot of things, which is understandable, but maybe not the right thing????? In the book, Franklin had a closer relationship w/his sister and that wasn't mentioned at all in the movie. Maybe seeing the other interaction with his family may have given viewers a bit more insight to that character. Wesley Snipes was good in the role, but should have kept his facial hair...at least a little.Sanaa Lathan was great! I easily saw her as Zora and my heart went out to her as a single mother trying to survive and deal with Franklin's ever-changing moods.We understand that it is not always easy to take a novel and turn it into a film and keep all aspects of the novel on the screen, but it's nice when you can read the book then see the film and know that it's just about all the same.Overall, I was pleased
GOOD DRAMA, PLOT, AND SPECIAL EFFECTS. Good cast.  Well written drama with a believable "what if?".  Realistic details, and special effects make this movie interesting enough to watch to the end.  Nice to to see a disaster movie that doesn't involve New York City, Los Angeles, or San Fran.  It's a a change for the disaster movie buff from earthquakes, floods, tital waves, tornadoes, etc
Pre Ordered the Moment I Saw It. This is a gift from the Gods.  All the combined works of Kinski and Herzog in one packaged set.  I pre-ordered it the minute I saw it.  Just having &quot;Nosferatu,&quot; &quot;Aguirre,&quot; &quot;Fitcarraldo&quot; and &quot;My Best Fiend,&quot; in a set would be cause enough for joy.  But ALL of their movies together is fantastic.  If you are a film fanatic, you cannot live without having this most shining moment of German film.  If it ever goes out of release, you will be able to sell it for a fortune as a collector's item, if you can bear to part with it.  I separately review the movies in here under their own titles so will not attempt to do that here
Five Stars!. I had basically given up on police detective shows until this came around. It's smart, has great acting, and can be visually breathtaking. The DVDs are great because this show, unlike a lot other suspense dramas, doesn't dumb it down for the audience, so it's great to be able to rewind a scene that you might have missed or not completely understood.
Golden lessons form the "hills". First off I have to say I am not a big fan of high gore slasher films, but Aja's "hills" offers us something diffrent. in adition of watching maniac fiends stalk torture and kill unsuspecting victims (wich this show provides in volumes)we see something not too common in the genre: people fighting back, facing danger and winning. In a world were passengers on an airplane that outnumber hijackers fifty to one would rather die in a fireball then get a cut on their arm it is refreshing if not inspiring to see this picture where the unlikliest man goes into the heart of danger to save his baby. Hats off to the hills
What's Up With The Undue Harsh Criticism???. It is apparent to me that those that don't appreciate this documentary are missing out, and misleading potential buyers, on a great piece of filmmaking. How many films include Coppola, Hopper, Scorsese, Lumet, Christie, among others in a documentary?The film illuminates on the profound and revolutionary techniques by these "student mentality" (meaning innovative) filmmakers and actors. It is such an interesting and hip documentary handled with care, with a great soundtrack and cool, and surprising, clips.Those that want to grow as a filmmaker should watch and heed the words of these film icons. Sure, it's nostalgic, but it should be; a film involving the free-ing spirit of '70s films.It'd be interesting if it included more nudity from the various influential films. Regardless, it is a wonderful companion to any aspiring filmmaker, and much better than Easy Riders Raging Bulls, which focuses too much on the excess of the era.A Decade Under the Influence shows even the artistry of the money-making Corman, along the next generation of filmmakers! Great film! Deserves more praise from Amazon!
For me this movie delievers. We have all wondered what would happen if the Alien and Predator met...head-to-head.  This movie answers that question very well.  No cheesiness.  We have watched this movie so many times we have lost count, and we still watch it sitting on the edge of our seats or our knees to our chest.  Great Saturday evening movie
Excellent!. This movie is factual and filled with interesting bits of knowledge.  The graphics are unbelievable and make it more of a movie than a factual video. It is fascinating to watch and very well done.  Obviously the content is mature, but young adults would enjoy the presentation and it isn't too graphic.
The Best Volume of the 3 Princess Sing Alongs. Very much worth the money.  Do not buy any other volume of Princess Sing Alongs or even the Princess Story line of movies.  This dvd has a few songs from some sequels: Little Mermaid 2 and Return of Jafar, but it has all of the original Princess movies represented - except Aladdin.  "Kiss The Girl" is in here from Little Mermaid.  The other Princess Sing Alongs have many songs from sequels.  So if you want to give yourself to the brainwashing marketing program of Disney - Buy the other Sing Alongs or the Princess Stories.The DVD has an auto-repeat function if you need to get a lot done (meaning - do housework while your princess is glued to the TV).  (I think it's 40 minutes or so without repeat).AWESOME DVD!!!
Truly a classic. This is what Science Fiction is supposed to be, Thought Provoking.Excellent imagery. Superb plot. Well developed. Wonderful ending.
I hate exercises but I love this DVD!!. I need to stress that I really loathe any form of physical exercises. However, after having two babies, being completely out of shape, feeling constantly tried, and having to suffer very strained and sore back almost daily, I know I need a remedy for good. Ever since I was no longer able to visit my chiropractor on a weekly basis, my back has gone further and further out of adjustment and is really starting to negatively impact my emotional health as well. Then I purchased this DVD after reading the reviews here and skeptically tried the whole routine (about 1 hour) at first viewing.The next day, though my back was still sore, I was not experiencing sharp pain anymore. This was my first experience with the DVD. I felt pretty good for a couple of days and the pain came back. Then two weeks went by without trying to do the exercises. My back was hurting me so much that it was causing me stomachaches. (I know it sounds odd but not so in reality since our body parts are very much linked).I finally broke down and did the yoga exercises yesterday. I started to feel better half way through it and by the end of the routine, I was so relaxed that I was sound asleep on the floor! I repeated the exercises at night the second time. Today, I have very minor, dull pain in my back but I feel so much more energized and light!One more thing I need to mention is that: though I am very much inclined to seek alternative/ homeopathic/ holistic, etc... form of healing, I dislike the new-age-ish garbage that sometimes goes along with this community. I was afraid that I'll be watching some ugly, long-haired weirdo chanting a foreign language, preaching new age spirituality while trying to teach yoga. The instructor, Alan Finger, did none of that. He is very much a gentleman, likable, humorous, and though long-haired, he's not at all ugly and weird. His descriptions of the breathing technique and the poses are clear and concise. His constant remainder and emphasis on completing the breathing while attempting the various poses are a tremendous help to a beginner, both in yoga and exercises in general.Anyway, I hope my clumsily put together review actually goes to show how much I've benefited from this DVD and I would definitely recommend this to anyone who has an interest in the healing power of yoga
Higher education meets urban apocalypse now. A truely dark unsettling look at high school life in inner cities of america. Jackson's charecter is a burned out shell of a man trying to get through life one day at a time. Still though you get the feeling that he still cares about his students even though he went off the deep end and resorted to vigilante justice. Giving the viewer a feeling of why he chose to kill the student who perhaps was just too far gone,and why he tried hard to change the other troubled youths back to kids with a purpose.As the movie centers towards the final scene the audience has the feeling of a building crescendo. The final scene of this film is perhaps one of the most powerful gut wrenching displays of raw human emotion I've yet to see. Very underated film.A pure Cult Classic.
Example of great film-making. This is not the kind of movie I would normally go for, BUT it was so well done that it deserves 5 stars !Whenever a film can pull you in and make you forget even for a minute that you are watching a movie, then it has accomplished something."MOAG" does just that !Great job
Tremors: The Legacy. Before I rate the box set and the four movies I would like to give you a brief history of my life with these films. When I was really young I use to always ask my dad to rent Tremors and we would all set and whatch it. But when I got a bit older and I could understand things better I became afraid and was scared of Grabiods coming up from underneath are house and eating me. Anyways after about two years I got the guts to whatch Tremors 2: After shocks. And Afterwards I was agian afraid of Grabiods and now Shriekers attacking me. Finally after about ten years of not watching them, me and my buddy Travis got to talking about Tremors and he asked me what Grabiods where. So I dicided to draw him pictures of them and after a few days I ended up creating a Tremors comic. So after becoming so involved with Tremors again I decided to watch the first film again. And after it ended, I bought it off Amazon and a week later I bought the third movie and then another week after that I bought the second. I had literly gone a 180 from fearing Tremors so long ago to become a huge fan. And when the fourth finally came out I had my family, my friend Travis and his brother hooked. Now after being a huge fan and watching the four films over and over I can finally rate them. The original Tremors is by far the best; with it's all star cast and great story line. The second best would have to be Tremors 4: The Legend Begins because it stays more true to the first and it shows how it all began. Tremors 2: After shocks would be third best since it stared Earl and Gummer and Tremors 3: Back to Prefection would have to be the worst since it's story is weak, its short and it takes the evolution thing a bit far. Overall this is a great pack of all four Tremors movies and if I hadn't boughten all of them aready I would buy this Attack Pack. Ps. Tremors 5 script has been finished and if Tremors 4 sales enough they will make a fifth. And one more thing it would be awsome if Universal would release Tremors: The Series on DVD.
Can somebody be so shamless??. I watched this video and feel myself embarassed as a common man that how some idiots we call "our leaders" be so shameless and senseless that they can trigger the deaths of thousands of children,women and common men to fullfill some of their dirty plans .Also i feel it so dangerous how some fundamentalists can hijack a powerful and democratic machinery and use it at their will.I am still thinking why a person(or president!) who is clearly exposed to lie to millions of people and a cause of thousands of unnessary deaths/tortures should not resign atleast(if he can not dare to commit suicide).I strognly feel that persons who lied are first-hand responble for thousands of innocent deaths and be treated as criminals.
Best Player movie in a while. When I looked at the trailer for this movie, I knew I had to see it. I'm a big fan of Pimp movies. And this one not only expores the game, but it also incorporates something that we can all appreciate- love. This movie is very entertaining as well as dramatic and it covers a lot of realistic views of the game. All the characters took their parts seriously and made this an appreciative production. If you like "game", you'll love this movie
It Get's Better With Each Viewing. It's hard for me to just toss around 5-star ratings for movies. I think they need to be reserved for something really special. Absence of Malice is a great movie and it deserves a solid 4-stars in my opinion.There is really no need to rehash some of the other things said in the previous reviews. I certainly agree with all the kudos for Wilford Brimley. His performance became the initial reason why I fell in love with this movie. The repeat viewings have shown me that it is hard to find bad acting in this movie.You always know that a director has done a great job when he can take characters with limited screen time and still cause us to know what they are feeling and thinking. Pollack does this masterfully with DA Quinn (Hood), Uncle Santos (Adler), and Editor McAdam (Sommer).I did have 2 problems with the film after the first couple viewings but have since made peace concerning them. First, I really didn't like the Teresa Perrone character played flawlessly by Melinda Dillon. I didn't buy the relationship between her and Gallagher (Newman) but I guess if she had been his sister or his ex-wife then the revenge plot he charted with his uncle would have taken a different course.I also initially didn't like the casting of Sally Field in the lead. I felt the same way a fews years ago when Meg Ryan tried to pull off Proof Of Life. If you needed cute then Sally Field was your huckleberry but this role needed a little more street cred. The problem I had was who else could you have cast? Streep was even younger then Fields at the time. I'm not a huge Faye Dunaway fan but she probably would have been a better fit. But, I will have to admit that Ms Field never looked better then when she was standing on the dock in the closing scene with Paul Newman.One last note. I wonder if Bob Balaban, who since has been great in the Christopher Guest trilogy of films and the TV show Seinfeld, kept the rubber band that he kept spinning around in this movie. It was a very effective prop in moving forward his career
darkwalker. Great horror flick, good acting, and story line.  Pop some popcorn and settle back for a top of the line scarey movie. It also has some great humo
One ring to rule them all. Part 2 of a movie to rule them al
for whom the bell tolls. A hollywood classic at it's best.  Ingrid Bergman displays innocents, warmth and the sincerity of a woman coming to terms with the cruelity of war.  Gary Cooper is the hero, brave true and uncompromising in the face of danger...Their love story is beautiful to the eye and raises the spirit of human courage to new heights..
Taming the wild and crazy guy. With oldest daughter Nora (Piper Perabo) married, pregnant and moving to Houston and Lorraine (Hilary Duff) just graduated and moving to New York, patriarch Tom Baker (Steve Martin) feels life quickly passing him by and decides to have one last outing with the whole family intact. Accordingly, the Banks clan goes vacationing to Lake Wanetka. There, Tom is reluctantly reacquainted with his old rival Jimmy Murtaugh (Eugene Levy) and his annoyingly perfect family (though, in due time, we find out there is something rotten in Boulders). It's not too long before Tom's competitive juices are flowing and he and Murtaugh are trading snide, snarky comments and pettily battling to top each other in campfire songs, in tennis, and, ultimately, in the annual Labor Day Cup Event.The whole gang from the first movie is back and comfortably slips into the old, familiar roles. Steve Martin once again mines the family comedy vault of uncomplicated humor and shtick. As Tom Baker, Martin is wackily distraught, sentimental, and unwilling to let go of his maturing offsprings - basically, he's being a normal dad, and Eugene Levy matches him hangup for hangup. The excellent Bonnie Hunt, with her quiet, good-humored takes, predictably shines as Kate Baker. The film strays from the evil stepmother cliche as Carmen Electra plays Murtaugh's third wife as a sweet, understanding woman, who seems to genuinely care for her husband and step-family. Because of the immense cast, Tom Welling, Piper Perabo,  Hilary Duff and others don't have enough screen time to strut their stuff. However, special mention must go out to young scene stealer Alyson Stoner (Sarah Baker), the tomboyish prankster who teeters on the brink of girlish teenhood and has her first ever crush. She probably was the best actor of the lot.I've read the wonderful book by Frank B. Gilbreth and had seen the original 1950 Cheaper by the Dozen starring Clifton Webb and the great Myrna Loy. I saw the later version with Steve Martin and thought it highly diverting. This feel-good sequel is marked with the same easy-going sense of fun, warmth and mirth that permeated the first movie. What can you expect from this film? Well, let's see...predictable hijinks, predicaments you see a mile off, a crazed Steve Martin escalating situations to the point where you're just cringing (the movie theatre scene, for example), and, finally, quick blanket resolutions ending in hugs and handshakes, and a once-again harmonious family or two. Even the given villain has his eyes opened and transforms into a semi-softie. Harmless and good-natured, Cheaper by the Dozen 2 may not have the vaunted zany Steve Martin comedy stylings, but, c'mon, you really didn't expect him to bust out with a "King Tut" rendition, did you?
Zeffirelli's Romeo and Juliet. As a high school English teacher, I show this film every year to my students and they love it. Some even love it more than the Luhrmann version in 1996. What is so helpful is that now it's on DVD-rather than VHS-I no longer have to fast forward and rewind to get to the right part. Plus the wide-screen layout gives more of the picture and the beautiful Verona scenery! This is a must for any English teacher or Shakespeare lover!
What A Pace!. This show begins to fly along into the stratosphere this season.  It commences with a wrap to Season One's cliffhanger, but a wrap that is realistically unsatisfying and sets up Frank's descent through the remainder of the season.  The things merely hinted at in Season One come into full fruition here and after a couple of early season 'so-so' episodes, the series moves rapidly into what I consider the most visionary and intelligently entertaining television presentation EVER!  The Wong/Morgan 'humor-sodes' are a needed relief from the overwhelming race towards doom that becomes apparent about halfway through the season.  Kudos this season to the actress playing Lara Means as well, as usual, to Lance Henriksen.  The last two episodes are my favorite two hours of episode TV ever.  if you've been paying attention to the series up to this point, they will floor you--shocking visionary and as timely today as then!  I will not be a spoiler past that.  If you like DARK but intelligent television with a twist, it does not get better than Season Two of Millenium
It's a great deal for the mixed titles. My son loves to watch Dora & books.I also love it.It's a great deal for the 3 titles in one package.I bought 3 packages as the X'mas gifts. Kids all love them
Great Inspirational Film!!!. This movie brings truth and new meaning to the phrase "You can do anything if you put your mind to it."  Erik Weihenmayer is an inspiration to blind people and sighted people alike.  Not only was this film inspiring, a great story, and a historic landmark, but it is beautiful to watch too.  Captured in HD this film is a must for your anyone's DVD collection.
I loved this movie. This is a great movie, I highly recommend it.  Tim Roth an Liam Neeson both do a fantastic job.  The movie feels very real.  I never get tired of it
The Vanishing (1993). In 1988, director George Sluizer had directed a film entitled, THE VANISHING. The film was all in Dutch and starred Dutch actors, who are nowhere near well-known in this country.In 1993, director George Sluizer, who had directed the original Dutch film, had decided to direct a remake of his own film, this time, casting a well-known cast that consists of Kiefer Sutherland, Nancy Travis, Sandra Bullock, & Jeff Bridges. The film is almost the same as the original Dutch version, but this one is much more worth the time and money.JEFF HARRIMAN (played by Kiefer Sutherland) and his girlfriend, DIANE SHAVER (played by Sandra Bullock) are driving to the mountains for vacation. They have a little spout, after their car runs out of gas, while in a dark tunnel. Leaving Diane there, Jeff heads off to get enough gas to drive them to a nearby gas station. He comes back to find Diane sitting outside the other end of the tunnel, upset and distraught. They pull into a gas station, where Diane has Jeff, who laughs with cheerfulness, repeat an apology. They kiss passionately, where Diane heads into the store to buy her and Jeff some cold beers. A half-hour goes by and Diane has not yet returned. He searches the store, as well as the whole ground, but Diane is nowhere to be found.Three years later, Jeff is still on the hunt for his beloved girlfriend. Every month for the last three years, Jeff would renew the posters he had printed of Diane. He has even gone to the local newspapers and national television news stations and pleaded with the person who had kidnapped Diane to tell him where she is. He walks into a diner one night, still very miserable, and meets RITA BAKER (played by Nancy Travis). Rita is instantly attracted to Jeff. Jeff and Rita begin a love affair together. Jeff tries to move on with his life, but he cannot, for he is still searching for Diane. Rita finds out about what Jeff is doing behind her back. She tries to help get over his obsession, but it doesn't work. Jeff receives a letter from a man named BARNEY COUSINS (played by Jeff Bridges). Jeff shows Rita the letter, but she realizes that his obsession is still going on, where she leaves him. She goes to their appartment, packs her things, changes the outgoing message on their answering machine. Jeff returns home and changes the machine himself, but as the recording is still going, Barney appears. Jeff beats the hell out of him, but Barney reveals that he can tell him where Diane is, and that in order for Jeff to find out what happened to her, he'd have to ride with Barney.While at a bar with her girlfriend, Rita calls her appartment to let her girlfriend her the outgoing message, but Rita hears that Jeff had already changed it, to which she finds Barney's voice on the machine. She realizes that Jeff is in danger and rushes over to help him, but Jeff and Barney are already on their way.Rita finds out what happened from her neighbor, where her neighbor gives Rita the license plate number to Barney's car. With this License Plate #, Rita finds out where Barney lives and drives off to his place.Jeff and Barney arrive at the gas station where Diane was last seen three years earlier. Barney hands Jeff a cup of coffee, where Barney informs Jeff that the coffee is drugged. He tells Jeff that in order to find out what happened to Diane, Jeff has to go through the exact same details that Diane had gone through. Jeff, through hurtful tears, drinks the coffee and blacks out. He wakes up to darkness. He flips on his lighter to find himself locked...in a coffin and...buried alive outside Barney's vacation cabin in the woods. Barney had done this to poor Diane, who, after three years of being buried in the ground without anyone coming to her aid, is now dead.Rita arrives at Barney's house, where she meets Barney's daughter, DENISE (played by Maggie Linderman). She asks Rita to giver her a ride to the carnival, as long as she doesn't say a word to to Barney. Rita asks Denise how to get to the summer cabin where Barney is at. Denise gives her the directions and Rita is on her way. She arrives and has a brief brawl with Barney. She stops when he is about to kill her. She is now seated inside his cabin, talking with Barney, trying to find out what he did with Jeff. She notices the dirt on his shoes, the dirt on a shovel, standing beside the door, and realizes that she had seen a long spot on the ground without grass, and realizes that Barney had buried Jeff alive. She knocks Barney and begins digging up Jeff. But not before Barney awakens and begins brawling again with Rita. Did Jeff suffocate and bite the dust as Diane had done? Will Barney kill of Rita as well? The only way to find is to watch this 1993 remake of THE VANISHING.I have read the reviews from many Amazon.com reviewers and I cannot believe that anyone would hate this remake. So what? The ending was changed. I do not find that a good enough reason to hate this movie. This movie was just outstanding and was much better than the remake. Kiefer Sutherland, again, proves that he is the best actor on this planet, maybe even in this whole galaxy. This movie is one Kiefer's best starring roles and I recommend it to any Kiefer Sutherland fan who has not yet seen this film
Beginnings of a Genre that was All the Rage. The best thing about "Look Back in Anger" is Richard Burton, whose volcanic performance as Jimmy Porter set the bar for angry young men in Great Britain.Like Malcolm McDowell in Lindsay Anderson's "If..." (among other films in the "angry young man" genre released during the following decade), Jimmy isn't thuggish as much as he is disaffected. His answer to the question of what he wants in life-"Everything... nothing..."-indicates a profound confusion about his own place in the universe. Though college educated, he lives in relative squalor. Though bestowed with artistic gifts, these traits haven't helped him achieve much in the wider world. Perhaps Jimmy is just too lazy to apply himself, and prefers hurling invectives from the sidelines at others. At any rate, Jimmy's life is his soapbox, from which he rails against the upper-class, popular culture, and everything in between.For the most part, Jimmy's audience consists of his wife, Alison (Mary Ure), and close pal Cliff (Gary Raymond). Cliff occupies the spare room in the couples' flat, and works at Jimmy's candy stand. A close friend, he often acts as peacekeeper when tensions between the Porters flare up. Usually, it's Jimmy who goes too far, making one too many snide remarks about Alison's family, or Alison herself.On the morning of a particularly ugly incident, Jimmy is seething because his wife has written a letter to her parents. They happen to be old money-types who never approved of the marriage, and it incenses Jimmy that she maintains communications, when he has abandoned all civility. Jimmy makes relentless fun of them while Alison goes about her ironing, pretending to ignore him. This only makes him try even harder to get a rise out of his wife. Cliff tries to persuade his pal to back off. But that leads to rough horseplay, which causes Alison to burn her arm.After Jimmy retreats to the nearby pub, following harsh looks from his wife, Cliff tries to comfort Alison. He mentions that he is thinking of abandoning their crazy household. In a moment of intimacy between friends (although it is implied that Cliff thinks of Alison more strongly than that), he asks why she doesn't just give up on the abusive marriage, and leave Jimmy."I'm afraid," Alison replies. After all, she isn't sure her parents, whom she is estranged from, will take her back. Later, however, we find out more. Alison is pregnant, has been pregnant several months, and has yet to tell Jimmy. She has vacillated on the decision of letting him know, and now feels uncertain she wants to have the baby at all, since it would cement her bond to this angry young man. In desperation, Alison seeks the counsel of Helena Charles (Claire Bloom), a childhood friend who happens to have landed a role in the local play.Helena-a prim, raven-haired beauty-presents a fine constrast to Alison, who possesses straw-blond hair and more earthly charms. Helena also appears to be the more stronger-willed of the two women. She refuses to be brought down by Jimmy's snide remarks, although an attempt on his part for "a little fun," crashing one of her rehearsals, nearly pushes her over the edge of good behavior.Having witnessed the way Jimmy treats her, Helena desperately tries to convince Alison to leave him. Her main problem, however, is that she still finds herself attracted to the fire that burns incessently inside her husband. She relates the story of how they met-Jimmy walking into the dance at her old town, covered in motor oil, seemingly burning even then. While that reminiscence doesn't change Helena's opinion about how bad a husband Jimmy is, she admits that such an angry man must make life exciting. At this point, a strange look comes over Helena, which implies a possible weakness to the very trap she is trying to extricate her friend from.Will Alison run away from Jimmy? Will Jimmy change his ways after finding out that he is going to be a father? Will Cliff really jump ship, leaving his two closest pals to their domestic strife? And ultimately, is Helena to play a larger role than enabler to all this?Director Tony Richardson and screenwriter Nigel Kneale-with John Osborne providing additional dialogue for his adapted stage work-resolve everything in a relatively unsurprising fashion. More compelling are the insights into Jimmy, what motivates his contempt for religion, culture, even education. He was once the beneficiary of university training, but now, the way he uses erudite words in his rants seems like a deliberate attempt to bring them down, to make them vulgar.So why is Jimmy full of rage? The answer, it turns out, falls into what Orson Welles cited as "pop psychology:" Like Charles Foster Kane, Jimmy Porter suffered a childhood trauma. He lost someone dear to him. Now he resists the love of those who would willingly give it, pushing them away with insults, sometimes unconsciously. But at the same time, nothing seems to make Jimmy sadder than the thought of one more friend going away. "The child is father to the man," sayeth the poet Gerald Manley Hopkins. In his heart, Jimmy wants everything to be the way it was back when he was a little boy, back when he was happy.But alas, the nature of life dictates that people must move on, must leave us, must change. The realization on Jimmy's part-that people never stay, that nothing remains the same-fuels his rage at life itself. At a relatively young age, he already learned the inevitability of death. So now, at twenty-five, he firmly says to hell with earthly ambition, and to hell with love, money, art, and other earthly trifles (Basically, he adopts the whole "angry young man" thing).Jimmy has stared into the abyss, and having not fallen in, turned away scarred. Only the appearance of a soul mate, worn down as much as him by despair and bitterness, can bring out his long-dormant sense of empathy. That is the only way Jimmy can ever change, and while such a fate has tragic implications, it also provides a strange sense of comfort when it finally comes along, and saves him
"The sun does not spit!". One of the most hilarious films ever made, THE OWL AND THE PUSSYCAT has more laughs than ten of today's so-called "comedies" combined.  Even though a few set changes and a couple of new supporting characters are added to "open up" the storyline, director Herbert Ross and writer Buck Henry manage to keep the same spirit of the original one-act, two-character play intact.  There's a lot of verbal warfare in Henry's screenplay, and he seems to have a gift for penning wickedly funny dialogue.  Some viewers could argue that THE OWL AND THE PUSSYCAT is little more than two characters insulting each other for 95 minutes, but - when those insults are so rigorously funny - who cares?In the female lead, Barbra Streisand gives a refreshingly unsentimental performance as Doris, the semi-literate hooker who (for once) does not have a heart of gold.  George Segal was primarily known as a dramatic actor before he was cast as Felix, the snotty book clerk/writer-wannabe.  His performance is so convincing that he has been known as an expert comic ever since.  The chemistry between Streisand and Segal ignites from the beginning, and it stays aflame throughout their relationship's many ups and downs.  Robert Klien has a funny supporting role - and plays it expertly - but THE OWL AND THE PUSSYCAT remains a showcase for the chemistry between Streisand and Segal.  I think well-respected film critic Pauline Kael said it best when she wrote, "Were Tracy and Hepburn ever this good. . . maybe, but they were never better."  High praise indeed!About the DVD:  This relatively featureless DVD has excellent picture quality (I wish all films from the seventies looked this good), but I am very disappointed that Columbia chose to use the PG edit of the film for this release.  Though only one scene was edited, that particular scene no longer makes any apparent sense with Streisand's foul-mouthed phrase deleted.  Hopefully the original theatrical cut will someday make it's way to DV
Best Chinese movies. Although Infernal Affairs 3 is so boring, getting all is the best choice
Underrated Early Frankenheimer. "The Manchurian Candidate," another John Frankenheimer film which preceded "Seven Days In May" by two years, has drawn more critical praise, and perhaps deservedly so; its insane assassination plot against a Presidential hopeful is carried off brilliantly. Nonetheless, for my money, this film actually works a bit better, partly because of the fascinating behind-the-scenes look it provides at the workings of the Joint Chiefs and the Oval Office, partly because of a superior cast, and partly because the plot here (to overthrow a sitting President) is more plausible and thus more alarming. The love interest involving Ava Gardner is a bit of a throwaway, which is a shame because it wastes a charismatic actress. The rest of the film, however, is gripping and tightly told, and works in much the same suspense mold as "Candidate." Perhaps the best solution is just to buy them both and treat yourself to a double-feature. You'll never trust your government again (not that many of us do now)
GENE KRUPA STORY. Any film that features Gene Krupa and Shelly Manne on the track is worth seeing.  It would have been nice to have more music included, such as the songs that featured Roy Eldridge, as well as Anita O'Day.  Sal Mineo carried off the Krupa role with great style.  For swing fans, it's a "must see."Tony Horowitz[...
A cruel and hateful masterpiece. I will start with my thesis, namely that this film is one of the single greatest American films of all time, ridiculously complex psychologically, completely satisfying on an aesthetic level but at the same time hating itself as said success. Not a shot or line of dialogue is unnecessary, and almost every scene is ambiguous enough to be read any number of ways. It is easily more complicated than Pauline Kael and Roger Ebert would have you believe, and is in my mind a much subtler and more intelligent father to the cinema of satirist Paul Verhoeven.I don't believe David is the villian, that is too simple of a subversion, nor do I find him to be as unsympathetic as others do, but I think that is the whole point. We are meant to identify superficially with David, to congratulate ourselves on our intelligence and civility, all the while enjoying the inevitable brutish spectacle play out as it does in all genre films, only this film is one of the very few that is aware of the voyeuristic beast that is the audience. Rather than cartoonish villians, I would argue that the villagers should be seen as more overt manifestations of David's personality throughout the film. He is smug and condescending, secure in his intellectual and moral authority, and he is just as much an aggressor as they are, flaunting his money, car, and knowledge as opposed to his drinking, crudeness, and sexual potency, and using it to constantly one-up everyone around him who will bear it (the single scene in that most exemplifies this is his meeting with the reverend). Amy is too often knocked for being a one-dimensional "tease" character, but I would argue against this as well, although I'm not sure I would call her the most sympathetic character in the film as some would. I would instead argue that she expressing herself sexually because it is the only way she can express herself in this microcosm, where every woman is objectified and men are only interested in them for sex and as a symbol of status. In the end no one is right here, though some may be more abused than others. Everyone is fair game for Sam Peckinpah's misanthropy in this great and crude masterpiece
Brilliant Cinematic Distillation of Buuel's Surreal Vision. Luis Buuel began his career filming a short film, Un Chien Andalou (1929), together with Salvador Dali and they agreed on one thing before making the film - the idea that each scene should not reveal anything in regards to rational thought.  At the end of his career Buuel made The Discreet Charm of the Bourgeoisie (1972), which won the Oscar for the best foreign film in 1973.  Winning the Oscar and the success of the film gave Buuel an opportunity create whatever he desired.  Consequently, Buuel returned to his accustomed traditions of surrealism and the workings of the subconscious through a cinematic experience that would leave many scratching their heads and applauding simultaneously - The Phantom of Liberty.The Phantom of Liberty, in essence, is not a single film in the traditional sense, as Buuel moves away from cinematic convention by breaking the rules of filmmaking.  The principal distinction from other films is that Buuel draws the audience's attention to the film by presenting an idea that he slowly makes more interesting by introducing additional stimuli that build up the intrigue.  However, when the intrigue enters the climax Buuel simply leaves the story where it become most stimulating.  At this point he starts over with another less interesting story that moves forward with new intrigue that once again intensifies, and as before he tosses away the intrigue by starting over.One of these stories within the film opens with "I'm sick of symmetry.", as a man sits down watching the fireplace and a large preserved spider.  The man stands up while picking up the spider, as he shortly after slides the clock above the fireplace to the left and places the spider on the right.  This scene has nothing to do with what is about to happen, but it offers a brilliant analogy to how simple it is for Buuel to break the chains of cinematic convention in this film.  Yet, the film has a common thread that continues throughout the film, which brings to mind Marquis de Sade's literary works.  Much of the film offers suggestive sexual and erotic situations where some are more overt than others.The opening of the film takes place in 1808 during Napoleon's occupation of Toledo where the French Army executes captured resistance while the officers are getting drunk within a church.  One of these drunk officers finds a sculpture of a kneeling woman attractive with which he tries to make advances on, but to the audience's astonishment the male kneeling statue next to him stops the officer with a resolute smack to the head.  This is one of several scenes in the film where a character presents deviant sexual behavior.  There is also the man who advances on a prepubescent girl on the playground, the family that defecates in the living room, and the four monks that play poker with the lady in a nightgown.  None of these scenes are explicit in nature, but the mere situation provides strong suggestive notion of the sexually tense moments that also have strong surreal ambiance.Each moment in the film surrounds a surreal element that causes a cerebral conflict.  These moments seem dreamlike, but with enough reality to keep the audience guessing of what will happen next.  For example, there is a man who tries to go to sleep and is visited by an enormous rooster, a candle carrying woman, a postman who delivers a letter, and an emu.  Later, the man visits a doctor, as he found the night extremely disturbing to which the doctor responds that he must see a psychoanalyst.  To convince the doctor the man shows the letter that he received from the postman that visited him during the night in his bedroom.  Cleverly, Buuel displays the workings of the surreal in the subconscious, as he let reality converge with dream.  This makes it more difficult for the audience to separate the two, as they simply fall into what seems to be a blender that mixes anything that falls inside.Visually The Phantom of Liberty offers something like a stroll through an art museum's section with surrealism, which suggests that Luis Buuel is not simply a film director trying to tell a story in the traditional sense.  Through Buuel's direction the audience can experience a plasticity in the manner the film moves along, but it is idiosyncratic in contrasts to the other cinematic geniuses such as Kurosawa, Fellini, and Bergman among others.  It is the peculiarity of Buuel that makes him unique, as he did not try to do what has already been made.  Instead he took the step into the unexplored and brought back from the deepest corners of the human psyche several experiences that none have ever been able to match.  Thus, the Phantom of Liberty offers a distillation of Buuel himself
fine topical comedy show. Fortunitely, way back when, I got a hold of a vinyl album that spotlighted various tracks of comedic highlights from this show. Fortunitely this show plays on cable like "I Love Lucy". The opening duet and final piano play were both included on the vinyl album in entirety.The show had many moments that could make the most solemn creature belt a good one because the situations were anything but goody-goody. They were newsworthy from pregnancy, abortion, homosexuality, atheism, religion, politics, and of course, bigotry. I read one article, back when the show first premiered, that a woman called her son long distance to make him tune in to "All In The Family" so he could see how his deceased father was.
Great Film & Story. I dont know why some people have low comment on this film. maybe bcoz they have watch Men In Black before this film. Well i tell you what, its way to different.But i would say that the story, casting & effects we're great (but not the fighting scenes and martial arts), but still this film for me deserves a 5 star rating for its exceptional story and the kung-fu flicts.Awwww
Wonderful,innocent movie. This movie always makes me smile.Such nostalgia with the technicolor,shiny cars,women in dresses and men in suits.Lucy is one of my favorite comedians and she does a great job.I've never been a fan of Desi(sorry)but James Mason is absolutely dreamy.Forever Darling is bottom line just a fun movie to watch
Ever get the feeling you're being watched?. The magic of a Coen Brothers film is that you never know what to expect and you can slowly go insane trying to categorize what exactly their cinematic messages are.  Never has this idea been more apparent than in Barton Fink.  Throughout this moody homage to 30's and 40's cinema, John Turturro's Fink rants and raves with his pretentious and arrogant speeches while never really allowing himself to soak in the true "everyman quality" that he claims to possess. Fink is left with only questions, not answers.As rich and wonderful as the script to Barton Fink is, watching it has a truly unique and mysterious effect.  We are constantly presented with haunting imagery, ambiguous character developments and riddles galore.  As Barton has sex with Audrey, we get treated to a long and painful camera shot that leads us down a sink drain whilst moans and gasp echo from above.  This shot shows us in painstaking yet quiet detail Barton's sexual repression and the way he views all other mortals in comparison to himself.  The walls in Barton's apartment slowly peel away, oozing with slime and further handicapping his writing efforts.  The ominous picture of the lady on the beach that constantly beckons Barton, giving him a painful ache of deja vu.  Barton's room is a character in itself and each movement he makes causes a reaction that seems to stem from deep inside his imagination.  As always, though, he's too arrogant to understand anyone else around him and the answers that so allude him prove to be right under his nose.Enter his good natured neighbor Charlie.  This relationship is fascinating as with each subsequent visit, Charlie grows deeper into Barton's head.  The first meeting, where Barton complains about the noise, is awkward and hard to watch as Barton is so busy pontificating about the good of the common man, that he fails to listen to real trials and tribulations of the common man that stands right before him.  As time goes by, though, we begin to sympathize a bit more with Barton, as he actually listens more intently to what Charlie has to say.  Of course, this all blows up in Barton's face as we begin to learn that Charlie isn't all he is shaped up to be.When Charlie offers Barton the mysterious box and later, when we learn that Charlie has an affinity for lopping off heads in his spare time, we begin to suspect what might just be in this box.  But clueless Barton still has no idea what could possibly be inside as he continues to struggle with not only his writers block but his overall mental block as well.  When the woman on the beach asks him what's in the box, he simply replies, "I don't know."  This ending brilliantly summarizes what Barton has been dealt in life and that if we were presented with the contents of the box it would completely diminish all of the fascinating quirks and mysteries laid throughout the film.Part of the fun of this film is reveling in the conceit that what we see as viewers doesn't necessarily mean that Barton sees it too.  One great and perhaps more obvious example is when Barton goes dancing and begins screaming at the sailors, "This is how I serve the common man!", as he points at his head,  "This is my uniform!".  As hilarious and agonizing as it is to watch, poor Barton just never gets it.The greatest irony in the movie for Barton is his misunderstanding of what is expected of him from Capitol Pictures.  The Coen's couldn't have presented a more "everyman" quality as good old fashioned family fun like going to the movies.  Even with such a simple task as writing a B-movie about stout wrestlers, Barton drowns in a river of his own self-importance and all other things that confound his sanity stem from this one basic premise.  When looked at this way, the riddles and ambiguities in this film aren't mysteries at all, only devices to further confound Barton and separate any connection that we may begin to feel with the main character.When the film was released, director Joel Coen said, "Where would it get you if something that's a little bit ambiguous is made clear?  It doesn't get you anywhere."  Which, in itself, is a riddle of sorts.  Barton Fink is a rare exercise in truly alternative film making methods.  Nothing is left explained and it's up to the viewer to form their own unique interpretation and unwind the riddles that aren't as difficult as they seem if we just allow ourselves to not enter into Barton Fink's world of pretentious musings and closed-mindedness.  As Barton begins to touch down into W.P. Mayhew's and Audrey's world, he asks, "What don't I understand?".  In the film Barton Fink, this question is precisely the point.
A True Guitar Legend. This DVD is special! No added or hidden musicians back stage,just one helluva live 3 piece power trio plus vocalist Davey Pattison. From the opening song (Too Rolling Stoned) it's easy to see why Robin Trower is considered to be a top notch live act and guitar hero.  Trower fans of old will love the audio and video quality of this DVD and it will almost certainly attract some new fans as well. Robin Trower's playing ability is second to none and this production showcases Robin's outstanding vibrato technique,nice bends and smooth riffs. After puchasing this DVD, I went to see Robin play live in St. Paul Mn. in July 2006 with this same line-up of outstanding musicians. WoW!!! If you like great guitar this is a must !!!
Truly Memorable Screen Adaptation of Shakespeare's First and Bloodiest Tragedy:,. Made by a very talented director, "Titus" is a stylish, visually stunning, energetic and truly memorable adaptation of the bloodiest parade of horrors which the first tragedy of the young Shakespeare is.  More of the horror show than powerful and poetic later Bard's tragedies, "Titus Andronicus" offers betrayal, murders, tortures, rape, and cannibalism for which Julie Taymor's vision was just perfect in transferring this blood fest to the screen. If it is not enough, the movie has one of the greatest performances in Shakespeare's tragedies I've seen and it is Harry J. Lennix as Aaron. Never have I seen an actor who was able to combine both, noble Othello and the embodiment of evil, Iago in one character so convincingly with such power. Anthony Hopkins, Jessica Lange, Alan Cumming, and Colin Feore all give terrific performances.
Cute. this movie is a cutiesy family movie that has big time actors in it like John Travolta and Kirstey Alley.  However, it seems to be more of a series of thoughtless imitations of life in which it so desprately tries to emilates.  But in of itself it is still a great movie to watch with the family and laugh at how much different their family is compared to yours
Multimedia Magic. I've long been a fan of John Santerineross' evocative artwork.  His images are hauntingly beautiful and thought provoking.  It was exciting to learn he is expanding into the medium of film.  I purchased the DVD for that reason and was not disappointed.  His short film, "Child, Doll or Bone", brings a quiet, gentle, beauty to subject matter rarely perceived in that way.  BUT, best of all, the DVD contained an unexpected treat. The slide shows & multimedia presentation are just wonderful.  When I recently hosted a holiday party, I played them to add to the ambiance of the evening.  I feel they really enhanced the feel.  Several of my guests commented that they finally understand what draws me so strongly to Santerineross artwork.  Just get this DVD and you will understand too
Awesome feel good chic flick!. This movie is one of my favorites.. I am a sucker for a cheesy movie with all the ingredients.. I watch this movie whenever I need to just smile and feel good... Sarah Jessica Parker and Helen Hunt make an awesome pair in this movie.. I used to watch the movie every night as I was going to bed during my single days:)Great feel good movie!!!!
A movie that was way ahead of its time (and still is)... This movie is enthralling from start to finish. Awesome, timeless special effects, great acting, a great plot and excellent direction and production. It really takes you to a whole different world, an innocent, young world, but also a scary one.This movie can be seen by the whole family because there is no hardcore violence or bad language and the little nudity is not blatant. I would recommend this movie to anyone who loves sci-fi, a great story and film as an art.It is truly a masterpiece, and Peter Ustinov plays one of the most endearing roles ever seen on the silver screen.
One Of The Best Movies. i loved this movie it was awsome i compare to it to the lost boys and fright night i like the way this one is made because they are not refered to as "Vampires" and they never show fangs i highly recomend this to anyone who is a fan of the lost boys or fright night
"No One Knows Who They Were Or What They Were Doing, But Their Legacy Remains". A seering exploration of life behind the glitz and glamour of rock and roll? Not quite, but it is an amusing mock-u-mentry on a fictitious band named Spinal Tap and the trials and tribulations on the concert road for a group long past its glory days.Released in '84 'This Is Spinal Tap' is a cult classic amongst those who are in a band, or have ever been in one. I on the other hand have never possessed any musical talent and therefore I'm not privy to the clever nuances and insightful jokes that populate this film, I can only take the word of those on the inside.Be that as it may, if you, like me, find yourself on the outside looking in give it a chance anyway. There's enough funny material, like the Stonghenge bit, for all of us to enjoy
A wonderful film about a real American Hero. This film moved me.  Maya Lin is incredibly gifted, articulate, and seems amazingly humble.  The Vietnam Memorial, and the hardships of it's creation, show the young woman's strength.  It's truely a feat worth the history books.  The most striking thing I got out of this film though was the fact that it wasn't a fluke.  The rest of her work is just as incredible, even if not as well known.  I'm so glad that I saw this film.  The DVD is well done, audio is good and the extras, while sparse, are enough.  Everyone really should see this film about one of the great artists living in our time
Please Do Adjust Your Set To This. The Please Adjust Your Set DVD Set is a worthwhile purchase on several levels. Watching the episodes that comprise the set, you can see what Idle, Jones & Palin brought to Monty Python. In fact, when I was watching the sketchs, many of them seemed like dry runs for later Monty Python sketches. The other worthwhile aspect to this set is seeing the Bonzo Dog Band w/Viv Stanshall in their 1960's glory. Although I have heard that the Bonzos have recently got back together & are touring England w/worthies such as Stephen Fry, there is nothing that can quite replace the absurd brilliance of Vivian Stanshall. To me watching the Bonzos perform on video on this set is like finding video footage of ancient Egyptians walking around the Pyramids. You get glimpses of what the Bonzos would have been like when they played live. The fact that this set is in glorious black & white instead of dull drab color gives it an almost Victorian patina from a time which is as distant from today as the 1920's were in the 1960's. This is a very entertaining set, especially for fans of British rubbish, erm humor (or should I say "humour"?)
A little controversy is always good.... Battle Royale is a film that has gained an enormous following despite the fact that it was never released in most of the world. It was in fact the controversy created by it that helped to make it sought after by some. So what is the basis for this controversy and what is really so bad about a movie that is as great work of political satire as there is out there? Well, read on to find out.Battle Royale takes place in Japan during a time in which the insolence and lack of motivation of the populous has driven the government into action. In order to stop the development of so many good-for-nothing people in society, the BR (Battle Royale) Act was passed. Essentially the act is used as a way to motivate students and weed out the weak from the strong and as such make society more productive. The way it goes about this however is a bit out of the ordinary. Once a year, a ninth grade class is randomly selected to participate. In the instance shown by the movie a class leaves to go on a field trip and along the way become drugged and shipped to an island where the "event" will take place. The event being a three day long battle royale in which only one person is allowed to come away alive or else everyone will be killed. Putting friend against friend, how do the children respond to the order they have been given. Supplied with weapons and provisions, can they really turn against the others and kill them in cold blood, or is there anyway that trust can be found amongst the others?The cast does an amazing job of portraying the twisted emotions that are felt within the students and even their former teacher (played wonderfully by Takeshi Kitano) who is put in charge of overseeing the entire affair. It is a profound look into the human psyche as well as a look at the overbearing opressive that the government is capable of holding over its people if not kept in check.There really is no reason that the movie has been unable to be released in places such as America, but it is pretty obvious that with all of the over the top violence that takes place all involving ninth graders, it would definately come under fire should it ever be widely released. It is a movie that will both shock and awe viewers a like, and despite how shocked one may be they can't help but feel the overall power and message of the movie. It is truly one of film-makings most profound creations in recent decades and underneath all the shock and controversy, there is a profound message to be seen that is as true as any other. Highly recommended
More mutants, more mayhem, more Bryan Singer!. An exciting and suspenseful follow up to the first X-Men film.  My favorite part is still the climatic clash between Wolverine and Lady Deathstrike.  For style buffs, note the changes in style and character of Jean Grey and Storm.  It's too bad that Alan Cummings couldn't return as Nightcrawler for X3
What happened with the transfer?!?. What more can I say about this show that hasn't already been said. The best show ever in television in my opinion. I've grown up with this show so much it is as if I knew these people. Having all of my relatives come from Long Island NY made me relate to this show completely. This was a show about real people in real situations talking the way real people really talked. Seasons 1-4 were stellar, absolute masterpieces. No sitcom has ever had such wonderful intelligent writing backed by acting (OK I'll let Sally go on this) that was way above par for TV. I'm curious if you can find the never aired pilots anywhere? I've never seen them. Who are the actors in them? I've read Archie is called Archie Justice. Now unfortunately the transfers done apparently on all of the DVD releases so far are atrocious. I've only seen seasons 1 and 2 and it is like watching it in first run with rabbit ears. The audio is terrible too. That is a disapointment. I gave it 4, not 5 stars only because of that reason. Otherwise, these DVDs (up until season 5 or 6 at least) are a must for anyone that appreciates classic, sidesplitting, groundbreaking comedy. It's a shame they watered this show down towards the end, like a lot of shows they didn't put it to bed when it was time. It dragged on WAY too long especially if you count "Archie Bunker's Place". Let's not
The declining years. Most fun was seeing myself in the audience. I saw DP again this year in Montreux and can say that this concert should be the last... Ian gets out of breath on Highway Star
Another excellent ER season. I started watching ER while on vacation a few years ago. I'd come in from the beach, crash on the couch and get invovled. When I found they had come out on DVD I bought the three series that are available. Although I have not yet completed series 3, it's proving to be just as enjoyable as the previous two. What we need are the rest of the series to be released on DVD too. I see series 4 is available in the UK but not here. What gives with Warner Bros.? If you enjoyed the earlier series, get series 3 too and place your order with Amazon for series 4. Hopefully, if enough of us do that then Amazon can get WB to go burn some discs
More than meets the eye. Superficially this move seems, well, superficial. But it's really not. On my third viewing I found three things I never noticed before. One must pay attention
Re: anti American. After watching this DVD I must say I am still very impressed with there work. however another reviewer said something that I believe needs to be corrected. the first and most obviouse error is the American Flag Patches. If you look at any american service man, or woman, you will find there flag is the same way. this is actually the correct way for it to look.While I agree that "make up" has its flaws in that place, it just wouldnt have been the same exciting ending if it was otherwise.The tachikomas and a philosophical element to a, for the most part, otherwise psychological anime.This DVD is deep, and gives you some more back stories to the lesser known characters and I highley recomend it to any fan
SAE Review. An excellent show.  It has positive plot development, good character richness and keeps you guessing.  In a busy genre, it stands out
To ALL parents who are finding it difficult to discipline their child. Because the child comes from their womb, many mothers find it hard to discipline their child. Here is the greatest movie about raising a child. It is universal in that it is a manual of how to raise all children. I should know, I am a teacher. We usually have about 198 students to discipline daily (6 classes of 33 children each). I also teach at a school for the visually impaired. In the interest of all children, please watch this movie. It is such a great movie.
Batman begins, again!. 16 years after Tim Burton stunned audiences and critics with his believable and dark motion picture version of Batman, Christopher Nolan (Memento, Insomnia) has remade the movie with an even more believable premise and darker edge.After Burton and Batman star Michael Keaton left the Batman series in 1992 with Batman Returns, the sequels got worse and ridiculous (Joel Schumacher literally destroyed the Batman installments with Batman Forever, with Val Kilmer as Batman, and Batman And Robin, with George Clooney turning Batman into a smiling dummy). Nolan succeeds in bringing back the seriousness of the original Batman, with Christian Bale (The Machinist) donning the bat suit this time around.As the title prescribes, the film explores Bruce Wayne's gradual emergence into the dark caped superhero, and in the process resurrects the death of his rich and famous parents. The film then shows Bruce getting picked up and raised by the family's butler Alfred, played by Michael Caine (Dirty Rotten Scoundrels), departing from Gotham to no man's land where he learns the skills of fighting on the hands of ninja warrior Ducard, played by Liam Neeson (Gangs Of New York), being initiated into but refusing to join a dark cult known as the League of Shadows led by Ra's Al Ghul, played by Ken Watanabe (The Last Samurai), returning to a corrupt and crime-ridden Gotham city, reestablishing a relationship with his childhood sweetheart Rachel Dawes, played by Katie Holmes, and vowing to bring back order to the city that his father help build, and in return got him killed, while in the process fight a relentless enemy known as The Scarecrow, played brilliantly by Cilian Murphy (Red Eye), with a little help from an honest detective named Jim Gordon, played by Gary Oldman (State Of Grace, JFK).Nolan's directing never fails, while Bale's portrayal of Bruce Wayne/Batman is only second best to, if not equal to, Michael Keaton's. Whether you agree with me or not, Batman Begins is destined to be a new beginning for yet another adventurous and exciting Batman franchise, just as long as Joel Schumacher stays away!RecommendedA
Extended Cut Gives A New Look. I bought The Punisher when it originally came out so now I have both the original DVD and its new Extended Cut.As for the film itself, I liked the original but the new extended cut does what it should do. It gives the film a whole new look that was missing before! I won't give it away but it has a new subplot that makes the film make more sense (much like the director's cut of Daredevil) and makes it better in my view!On a personal note, for those that says its nothing but mindless violence and that it has no regard for human life obviously didn't watch the film or read the comics! Yes, there is gory violence but this isn't freakin' Spider-man (though I enjoy that character's movies as well)! The Punisher ISN'T a nice character. I am not married nor do I have children but if my wife and son (along with my extended family) was gunned down in front of my eyes, I don't think I'd have such a positive attitude either. Also, Frank Castle isn't so hellbent that he can't see suffering around him. If that was so, he wouldn't have helped Joan (played by Rebecca Romjin) with that creepy boyfriend of hers or befriend (sort of) Joan and her friends or left the "gift" that he left so on that note, Frank Castle wasn't totally twisted.Anyway, back to the DVD, it has the animated beginning both with the film and seperate. Also, there is a 10 minute short explaining the new extended cut as well as classic Punisher covers from the comics. I would also recommend keeping the original release for the extras (it has some good ones too). Overall, if you can stand the violence that comes, its a good film
Pure progressive rock performance. Really liked this dvd a lot, specially watching my favorite Dream Theater album being played live. Sound quality is good, image quality is good, I already knew the plot of the album so it bothered me having to watch those alternating scenes from the movie instead of the band, but I recognize that it really complements the show for those who don't know what the album's about.The end of Finally Free, where Mike Portnoy almost pops his heart out... I hated not having a decent camera focusing on that.Anyway, completely satisfied with it
Oddly Shaped Beings. My son (13) had never heard of these characters (neither had I for that matter), and he wasn't really interested in watching the DVD's after watching the first one (the pilot episode).  He said it was lame with preditable, stupid jokes.Soon, after he had watched everything else, he tried this set again and proclaimed the rest of the episodes to be awesome, so it's a hit in our house
Brilliant, Hitchcockian Thriller. This is one of the best thrillers in recent years.  The story centers on Tom Ripley (Matt Damon) who comes to Italy to befriend Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law) and persuade him to come back to the U.S. (at the wishes of Greenleaf's father).  Soon, Ripley becomes immersed in Greenleaf's style and doesn't want to leave.  Identity swapping, lying, and murder ensue.What's great about the movie is how you identify with Tom Ripley even as he does many evil things.  The story also highlights great truths about social class, gender, and identity.The cast is exceptional--Matt Damon and Jude Law are the best.  And the look of the film is wonderful.  If you buy/rent the DVD, be sure to check out the commentary by director Anthony Minghella, which is like a film class.  Minghella highlights how he uses performances, shots, music, editing, and backgrounds to highlight the many themes in the movie
Ready to throw Fonda away; don't until you see this. Jane Fonda, with Ms. Redgrave, makes this a reasonable and incredible synopsis of the war and difficulties of free-thinkers at this time.  When you see the poor publicity Fonda has gotten recently because she's upset about the latest war, remember too, that you need to see her films and read her autobiography. She is brilliant.She's been there; done that. She deserves great recognition for this wonderful, valid, strong, creative experience of her  brave, yet scared character here. She and Redgrave portray the best of intellectuals. And lately, intellectuals seem to be forgotten by the movie business. Here is a saga, a journey, worthy of high praise. Doesn't anyone miss the wonderful historic dramas of times past? This is one, with acting worthy of acclaim
--King Arthur, like you've never seen him before--. This film has it all with spectacular scenery, an interesting story line and good acting.This is definitely not the King Arthur that most of us have seen in past films or read about in the wonderful stories of Mary Stewart.  This Arthur is no gentle scholar, but a skilled Roman soldier. The story begins with an explanation about how Rome required the young men from their conquered countries to spend fifteen years, in service, as a soldier in the Roman army. After that time, they were free to go where they pleased.In this film, Arthur is presented as a great knight and the leader of a band of very skilled soldiers.  His men, including Galahad and Lancelot, are all seasoned warriors and have fulfilled their duty to Rome. Just before they leave the army, they are advised that the Saxons are invading Roman territory and they are needed.  They are all battle weary, but forced to take up their weapons and go on one last mission.Guinever is of course beautiful, and in this story, a capable warrior. One part was pure Hollywood, where during a battle scene, King Arthur and his knights are completely covered in armor and Guinever goes into battle with them wearing body paint and skimpy clothes. Aside from that bit of silliness, this is an interesting and well-done film. Clive Owen makes a great Arthur!
Great movie. takes you back to watching those summer race car movies on tnt....after watching it just makes  you want to build a car and race i
SECOND SEASON SYNDROME. After establishing itself as a very unique series, MEDIUM moves into its second season with 22 episodes, and the continued strong presence of star Patricia Arquette.  Ironically, one of the show's strong points turned into a weak point this season:  the focus on the family problems seemed to override the central "crime" part a little too much this season, with Ariel and Bridgit's "minor crises" becoming too much like "Mother Knows Best".  They included Ariel's falling for a 21 year old in a convenience store and later a 14 year old rich boy, whose doctor father may be a psychotic killer.  Add hubby Joe's problems at work and with his wife's gift, you got a lot of familial focus.  That's admirable in some ways, but it tended to dilute a lot of the more powerful storylines unfolding.  There were some decent chills and some clever plot twists with lurid defense attorney Connor O'Farrell returning for a few episodes, as despicable as ever, and other guest appearances from stars such as Molly Ringwald, David Carradine and David James Elliott.  Arquette's brother Ryan Hurst returns as a possible bank robber; executive producer Kelsey Grammer has a neat turn as the Angel of Death; and sleazy doctor Mark A. Sheppard returns as the psycho who gets doctors to kill their patients.  One strange episode is included with 3-D glasses, and it's storyline is so convoluted, one misses the point and the 3-D effects are far from innovative, they tend to be distractive.But Arquette, Jake Weber and the girls do come across as a strong family and little Maria Lark is a hoot.  All in all, MEDIUM is a good show, I just wish it would focus more on the meat of the stories than the endless family crises.
Thunderball Strikes Big!. SPECTRE is back, and 007 has got'em.  This time SPECTRE plots to steal two atomic bombs and hold the world for ransom (a situation still very real for the world today).  A bit underrated by some James Bond movie fans, but I think it just gets better with age.  Sean Connery's personal favorite!  Still has the right stuff as James Bond.  Has by far the best looking bevy of Bond girls ever to grace the silver screen!  Claudine Auger, is my Bond Dream Girl as good-girl Domino.  Lucianna Paluzzi, lusciously evil as the first true Bond femme-fatale!  Adolpho Celi, a scary and most formidable opponent. Awesome production values, classic witicisms ("I think he got the point"), spectacular underwater action, and another classic John Barry score make this Bond effort a total splash!****1/2 out of *****
Awesome. A must have for anime comedy fans. Being a big fan of anime comedy (the intelligent, yet lame humor) I was eager to see El Hazard "The magnificent world". Because of the high price of the set, I had some hesitation (because of some poor reviews on Amazon).Well, I have to say that the bad reviews are wrong. This DVD series was totally awesome (although I admit it started a bit slow). I promise the more you keep watching, the better it gets. The plot is highly intelligent (involving dimensional and time travel) and the characters are very interesting (with distinctive special powers).Some say the humor in El Hazard is juvenile (but I would argue no more juvenile then southpark), and seriously what good comedy isn't juvenile?Some also say that the story is sometimes too redundant (because many episodes involve a doomsday device), to which I respond "Do we call the original starwars trilogy redundant because they involve the death star"? no, ofcourse not.yes this DVD set lacks some extras, but I think Pioneer did a great job. The DVD menu presentation is beautiful, and the box is very elegant too. Hopefully you can get this set for around 40 dollars on Ebay (beware of bootlegs). It's very hard to find a good authentic set. The sequel "alternative world" which I just ordered, individually should cost around 30 dollars if you shop smart.For my fellow anime comedy fans, I also reccomend "Niea under 7" and "His and Her Circumstances".animation=5plot=4music=4characters=5comedy=4Total= 4.4 Star
A truly unique, visionary motion picture. The Nightmare Before Christmas is one of the few truly visionary motion pictures of the last couple of decades.  The bizarre story is one only Tim Burton could tell, and he brings that story to life with some of the most impressive animation I've ever seen.  Stop-motion animation requires infinite care and patience to create, and one could easily forgive any slight hitches that result - but you'll find no imperfections at all here, as the animation rolls along beautifully and naturally.  As for the story, I found it good but not great, but the dark and imaginative vision behind it all more than makes up for any flaws in the writing.Jack Skellington, the Pumpkin King of Halloweentown, has grown bored of all the scary shenanigans to which his land is dedicated to producing, finding little joy in topping his past accomplishments each year.  Wandering off alone, lost in thought, he happens to come across a sort of holiday crossroads, which leads him to Christmas Town.  It's a world like nothing he's ever seen before, and the Christmas magic quickly captures his heart and soul - so much that he returns home to refashion Halloweentown in the guise of Christmas Town.  He has a hard time communicating the spirit of Christmas to the townsfolk, but his perseverance pays off in the transition of the local industry from scary items to Christmas toys and gifts (unfortunately, gifts such as shrunken heads aren't exactly what little Johnny or his parents are particularly looking for).  As Christmas approaches, Jack prepares to don the red suit and white beard, hook up his remodeled coffin sleigh to the reindeer created by the local mad scientist, and sail off into the night to deliver toys to all the good little boys and girls - after he has the real Santa Claus kidnapped, of course.  Only Sally, a rag doll who loves Jack from afar, sees just what a disaster this is in the making.  With Santa suffering torture at the hands of the Bogeyman, it looks like Christmas is doomed for sure.I don't see this as a children's movie, although children will no doubt be delighted by all of the dark and wacky animation.  I also found the somewhat rushed ending somewhat ambiguous, especially in terms of Jack's feelings for good old Halloween.  Still, the film does evoke the Christmas spirit somewhat and certainly proves entertaining with its wonderful soundtrack, incredible animation, and dark humor
Great killer doll flick!. A young girl named Judy ( Carrie Lorraine) with his dad ( Ian Williams) and stepmother ( Carolyn Purdy Gordon) with a saleman ( Stephen Lee) and two punk rockers ( Bunty Bailey and Cassie Stuart) seek shelter from the storm after their cars break down to a creepy mansion owned by a old dollmaker ( Guy Rolfe) and his wife ( Hilary  Mason). As they are getting comfortable for the night, the dolls the old couple has are actually alive and want the guests dead.From the creators of "Re-Animator" Brian Yuzna and Stuart Gordon and the creator/producer of "Puppet Master" Charles Band brings a delightful and exciting modern fairy tale with some humor and horror thrown into it with terrific special effects for it's day by David Allen ( "Young Sherlock Holmes", "Puppet Master"). It has an interesting idea about the innocence of youth and the young-at-heart and why dolls are there for them to protect them from the wickedness of adulthood. The film predates "Puppet Master" a couple years later and is one of the most underrated gothic horror comedies of the 80's that i recommend if your into killer doll flicks or horror comedies.This DVD has great picture and sound quality with some good extras like the original theatrical trailer, two audio commentaries, photo gallery and storyboard-to-film comparisions.Also recommended: "Puppet Master", "Magic ( 1978)", "Trilogy of Terror", " Child's Play series", " Re-Animator", " Pinocchio's Revenge", "Dolly Dearest", " From Beyond", "Poltergeist", " Devil Doll ( 1964)", " Tales from The Hood", "Dead of Night ( 1945)", " The Company of Wolves", "Suspiria", " Phenomena", "Deep Red", " Tourist Trap", " Making Contact ( a.k.a. Joey)", " Nightmare on Elm Street", " Hellraiser", " The Amityville Horror ( 1979 and 2005)", " Legend of Hell House", " Castle Freak", " Demonic Toys", " Blood Dolls", " Saw", "Evil Dead II", "Beetlejuice", " Ghost House"
Gwennie. Another very funny movie with Sandra Bullock! In rehab, Gwennie finds friends, and oddball romance. Favorite part when she gets a diamond
great. this is great..i love the crow movies especially the first one...it rocks this box set rocks ..and the ppl who created it rock too
no the greatest of action, and kind of a weak story, but when brigitte shows up, sheeit happens. And I am serious man.  I don't want to give anything away, but this thing is insane.  We don't get to see all the beautiful movements people are doing like bride with whit hair, but we get an extremely weird action movie that has people dying like by the tens.  There is a part where I am prett sure the exploding heart thing from kill bil comes in to play.  If someone knows where tarantino could have gotten this, tell me cause this is from like 93 and is the first reference I have seen of it.  And it is WAY cooler than what happen in kill billy.  So overall b lin is just too beautiful not too watch her and yuen biou gets to show off some of his acrobatics and gives a mre than solid acting performance.  And the music is REALLY good.  They don't play it enough but it is REALLY freaking awesome.  When brigitte fights the special effects are really weak but the bodies being blown up are super cool.  So don't expect fist of legend here type of action, but a lot more akin to butterfly sword, it;s just brigitte wasn't in that and with EVERYBODY underused, I would say this movie is far superior.The dvd I got IS NOT a special edition, so maybe when you buy them from the new used section you just don't get what the picture is but that's fine but this movie is worth it.  It has BOOMING 5.1 sound.  It has a pretty good picture, not perfectly widescreened but good enough.  The picture quality is well above average and that is a good thing sice it has IMBEDDED FREAKING SUBTITLES.  Luckily, there is seriously only like 1-2 lines I couldn't read.  So unlike a movie that I bought form rarescope awhile ago, the imbedded subs on this are very good.  I would compare the imb subs to magic crane if you have seen that.  No special features but seeing the beauty of b lin and having to turn my speakers way down not to blow them, that was sweet.
Tell it like it is!. Truth, justice and the American way!  Something Michael Moore seems to know very little about
SCOOBY DOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!!!. i love me some Scooby Doo and Season three is cool. i enjoy all the fun and adventures in a Scooby doo episode. Scooby Doo never gets old to me. i enjoy the Original Scooby doo episodes. Scooby was always bringing the fun and getting his eat on as well.i've watched so much Scooby it ain't even funny. this is great for the collection
Better than most. I have seven children -- 11 years old and younger.  I've seen a lot of children's videos (my oldest was very interested in Winnie the Pooh, and we have them all).  Lately, my four-year-old and some of my other children have been watching Digimon, Pokemon, etc..  Somehow we became aware of "Bob the Builder" stuff (vidoes, books, etc.).  They have been GREAT!!!  My children, now, watch Bob the Builder videos; they are MUCH BETTER than most of all the other options out there.  They teach a lot of good values and manners, cooperation with others, and helping others.  I heartedly give them Five Stars
Oh the Memories!. This is a wonderful collection from my childhood that I can still enjoy!  My daughters who are 10 years and 19 months can't wait for me to turn it on.  It goes beyond generations.  The additional features of seeing little "fun facts" is great too.  This is a must have to anyone who enjoys Jim Henson's talent.  This is a great bargin too getting all of the first season.  I cant wait for season 2!!!
A warm hearted movie about parents and music. A low budget film, yes, but it really works and I really enjoyed it which surprised me no end.Once again a plot that is not rocket sciene which is good when you want something ease on the brain to watch.A washed-up 80's pop star Paul Kerr (Craig Ferguson) who moves to Wales on a spur of the moment decision and in doing so discovers that he has a teenage daughter, Olivia, (Charlotte Church) living in his new backyard.Olivia was the result of a weekend affair he had with her teenage mother during the height of his fame and his arrival in the small Welsh town unsettles the orderly but now very boring life of his ex-lover Rebecca (Jemma Redgrave).We are treated to fun galore as Paul tries to get to know his daughter whilst trying to woo her mother back into his arms.  Olivia in turn is having her own problems with her mother, Rebecca doesn't want her to become involved in the music industry, her own father is an aging rocker who is always on the road with his band and the man she loved seemingly abandoned her for his career.Anthony Head (Giles in Buffy the Vampire Slayer) as Paul's foul breathed manager is a treat, there are some great funny moments, like when Paul finds out that his best friend's girlfriend is Scottish and she just happens to be called Nessie, the scene on the motorbike when Paul and Rebecca race to London to "rescue" their daughter is hilarious, you can see the sparks of attraction flying between them and the scene in the hospital is hysterical along with the pub scene when the locals worry about the possibility of "Americas moving in," not to mention the soundtrack to the film is lovely, especially with all the songs that Charlotte Church brings to life with her glorious voice.This is a lovely film with a cast of fine characters; look out for Joss Ackland as Rebecca's rock-a-billy father, Phyllida Law as Olivia's teacher and Imelda Staunton in rippingly good form as the po-faced Dr Bridget
Very silly ballet, but some great dancing. Not all ballet music is created equal. Le Corsaire's "score" is one of the "less equal" of classical ballet. Because it's a pastiche of six (count 'em) composers, there's no cohesiveness or continuity whatsoever in the ballet. Things feel and sound like either: 1. pas de deux music, which always has a lot of harps and strings; or 2. filler junk. The plot of Le Corsaire is also unbelievably silly and convoluted. In short: A pirate's crew is shipwrecked, said pirate falls in love with a harem girl, buys her, but then his servant betrays his master, kidnaps girl ... And oh, really, who cares.The reason Le Corsaire has any hold over the ballet repertoire at al is because it requires a large cast, and everyone has his/her "moment" in the spotlight. It's really a dance extravaganza with only a bare-bones plot; even the corps don't really get much attention. But it's a great piece for showing off technique or charisma. Incidentally, the "slave pas de deux" (most famous moment of the ballet) was the calling card of Rudolf Nureyev. He danced it for his Vaganova academy graduation (a tape still exists) and in the West as a showpiece. The pdd remains a great favorite of ballet galas, although both the Kirov and the ABT present it as a pas de trois with Medora, Slave, and Conrad, as that is closer to Petipa's original choreography.There are two video versions of Le Corsaire: the Kirov video, and this video from the American Ballet Theatre which was incidentally staged by the great Kirov ballerina Natalia Dudlinskaya. The two videos both feature incredible dancing, but the companies differ in their approach. The ABT seems to have realized that the story is a joke, so the dancers (especially the men) play up everything for camp. The ABT video includes some charming footage of Kevin McKenzie and the dancers trying to explain the nonsensical plot. Vladimir Malakhov is particularly delightful as he "defends" his character's actions. The Kirov doesn't take the story very seriously either, but their approach is to just let their lead dancers show off.I'll just spend the rest of the review comparing the videos:PRODUCTION - ABT wins hands down. The Kirov's Corsaire looks slightly old and ragged, like many company warhorses. The video quality is not as clear. Moreover, the Kirov performance is one of those 'fake live' ones where the dancers dance but applause is tracked in later. At the ABT, everything looks new. The ABT dvd also includes brief interviews with the dancers before every act as they "explain" the plot. It's a nice touch and gives us viewers a chance to feel slightly closer to the dancers.DANSEURS - A close call, but I'd give the nod to the ABT. Both Conrads (Yevgeny Neff for Kirov and Ethan Stiefel for ABT) are the male weak links. They don't dance badly, but they aren't particularly memorable either. Farukh Ruzimatov is the slave for Kirov, Angel Corella for ABT. This one's a draw -- Ruzimatov has a natural Tartar exoticism that kind of works for this role, but Corella's dancing is more exuberant, and Corella seems to be having more fun. For Lankedam the evil slave trader is, ABT wins. Vladamir Malakhov is wickedly funny and over-the-top, in his bright red outfit. Konstantin Zaklinsky also tries for some comic relief but he isn't quite as funny or talented as Malakhov.BALLERINAS: Here, the Kirov wins, no question. As Medora the slave-girl of vaguely Mid-Asian descent, Altynai Asylmuratova is just perfect. She looks extremely Asian and exotic, and really has the kind of belly-dance-goes-ballet thing down pat. In Sleeping Beauty I might call the extreme curvature of her spine and the way she kicks her leg up in attitude a bit distorted. Here, it's just right. Her Medora is also personally adorable. In the famous "slave" pas de deux Altynai has trouble finishing her 32 fouettes but she does them anyway. Julie Kent, OTOH, has a kind of homogenized, bland dancing style that isn't quite as compelling to watch. Her Medora is just a smiley girl-next-door. In one bizarre scene, Julie Kent has a mile-wide grin as she's being bound and kidnapped.The smaller part of Gulnare is taken by Elena Pankova for the Kirov and Paloma Herrera for the ABT. Herrera is very strong technically, with an extremely solid, unadorned style. Pankova is light and feathery, sort of a "floater." Both are good, but I think Pankova is more believable as a barely pubescent slave girl. Incidentally, both videos feature as odalisques who would later become famous principals. The ABT has Gillian Murphy executing triple pirouettes, while the Kirov has an odalisque trio of Margherita Kulik, Zhanna Ayupova, and Veronika Ivanova.I think both ABT and Kirov videos are worth getting for balletomanes. In the end, I'd have to give the "dancing" nod to the Kirov, and the "concept/production" nod to the ABT
One of Godard's most fun. Before the 'umbrellas of choubourg' there was a 'woman is a woman' a film which uses the format of the hollywood musicAL to explore the very nature, at its most abstract, of cinema.. This is some of jean luc godard's best commentary on the art of film-making... It is ablaze in color and glamour, making it one of Godard's most accesible films.. It is unique, however, to the point of questioning its own validity.. This is the first film to fully realize the potential of the new wave to capture the visual imagery of the popular hollywood musical and to turn it against itself.. it is also an introduction to the magic of Anna Karina - an actress with very revealing eyes.. Jean paul belmondo reunites with godard to create a fine companion piece to 'breathless' - they would later come together again in the incompareable 'pierrot le fou'.. One of the top new wave films.
Young Fatal Attraction. This movie is great. I just bought it the other day and rushed home to watch it. I throughly enjoyed it entirely, I believe it kind of relates to Fatal Attraction
the reason why I am a musician.. In mid 1975, I saw the movie "Tommy" in a theater by myself. I went because I was a huge Elton fan, and had just begun to get into The Who. After leaving the theater. I could barely catch my breath. I was 16 at the time and at that very moment I decided that this was my calling. I had played piano since age 3 and just began to sing in front of people in 1975. I was astounded that the characters in the film actually got paid for what they were doing. Any the production work of Ken Russel blended the surreal with real life in a unique fashion. The story was strung together perfectly, but it did take a few views to make sense of the film. Even at age 16 I was able to understand the story which I felt had to do with teenagers worshipping rock stars, and those stars believing their own press. What a job they did assembling one of the most memororable casts in cinema history. Jack Nicholson and The Who? Great tunes as well. From the first "..it's a boy, Mrs. Walker, it's a boy..."Oliver Reed was a scream! Too bad his real life was cut short by his excesses. Keith Moon was a natural actor and performed naturally as Uncle Ernie. And what job by Tina Turner. I am digressing from the soundtrack, and reviewing the movie. I have trouble picturing one without the other. Favorite tune: "Amazing Journey". Close second: "I'm Free". I also think that Paul Nicholas did just great not only on the song but in his role as cousin Kevin. One of my favorite scenes and songs came when the bikers confronted each other and along came Roger on a hanglider and cast a spell of peace among those rogues. "I'm A Sensation". Townshends work on the music was flawless. He sounded as if he worked himself to death. He had a hand in EVERY song. I liked this "Tommy" better than the original mainly due to the new sound of Daltrey's voice. Much more powerful. The original was a bit on the "Flower Power" side which was to be expected in 1970. Thanks Pete for creating works that have inspired me over the years. Other faves: "Who's Next", "Quadrophenia","Meaty, Beaty, Big & Bouncy".
Great Irish Folk Music. I rented this film on netflix and watched an outstanding performance. Very traditional irish music played and the camera angles were great. if you want to see irish folk music at its best than this dvd you want to see. Shaskeen plays great irish folk music. The performance takes place in a pub outside of Dublin city.
Embrace the Power of the Alphabet. In this DVD, Blue and her friends explore the alphabet, all the way from A-to-Z. The episodes on this DVD all fit that idea very well and together, it's a great package."Blue's Room: Alphabet Power" contains an episode of "Blue's Room" and three episodes of "Blue's Clues:""The Power of the Alphabet"This is the new episode for this DVD --- a new "Blue's Room" story in which we join Blue and her playroom friends for an alphabet playdate. Of course, it's not an alphabet playdate without the alphabet and they're all there, from A-to-Z, all with little googly eyes on the top. Blue makes words with the letters and then pretends to be the words that they've made. We play Polka Dots' puzzles and receive letters to make a word. Later, a real kid joins Blue for a reading of the story "Chicka Chicka ABC" and the letters of the alphabet act out the story."The Alphabet Train"Joe, Blue and all of our friends in the Blue's Clues house work together to create a train in which each of the cabs contain an item that starts with a different letter of the alphabet. "B" is blue, naturally and "J" is Joe, but we've still got a lot of letters left to go. We help out with this, even skidooing into a magnet board to find some things. As for Blue's Clues, we play the game to help Joe figure out what Blue wants to put in the very last cab of the alphabet train."Let's Write"Nice one --- Joe and Blue have decided to make labels for all the different things in the house. We go around everywhere, helping them to make labels for things and also help to identify what things are based on already-existing labels. And for "Blue's Clues," we help Joe to figure out a label that Blue wants to write."Magenta's Messages"Magenta goes for a day-trip to the beach and asks Joe and Blue to take care of her house. To do this, she's left us a series of messages --- both a set of instructions and individual messages to complete the different tasks. These generally include pictures and words. While all of this isn't strictly alphabet-related, it still completes the set nicely.These last two are bonus episodes for the DVD, although unlike past releases, they're no longer buried in the Special Features section. Instead, they're in the episode selection, under More Episodes, or you can also choose to play all episodes. Notice that there are no Steve episodes this time around --- if you or your kids don't like Joe, this DVD probably isn't the way to go.This release also has a few special features:Doodle, Doodle, SpellA fairly simple game in which the player is given two letters of a word and a picture and fills in the missing letter. Also includes one with four letters. If the wrong letter is put in, you get a simple Try Again screen, but if you get the right letter, then the image animates and makes some noise. Not too bad of a game, but could have been jazzed up a bit.Nicktrition Tips for ParentsA two-page thing to read giving tips on getting kids to try healthy foods and such. I imagine this info can also be found somewhere on the Nick Jr. website.Blue's Room SpotsThree spots featuring either song numbers or Blue with real kids. About two minutes long in total, but still a nice addition.Previews for these other shows:Dora the Explorer --- double-length DVD releasesBlue's Room --- other Blue's Room DVDsRugrats --- Tales From the Crib Christmas specialMy Little Pony --- another Christmas specia
Truly amazing and unusual. Wow!, this is an amazing viewing experience, and definitely the best Derek Jarman film that I've seen. The script is based on Christopher Marlowe's equally bizarre 16th century playscript, the story of King Edward II and his love for his favorite Gaveston.  Edward neglects all his princely duties of governing England so he can hang out with Gaveston and party. He also rejects the love of his wife, Queen Isabella from France. The leading nobles then conspire with Isabella to get rid of Gaveston, and eventually to depose Edward and murder him in a particularly gruesome manner.Jarman retains the original Elizabethan language (don't worry, it's very accessible) but modernizes the setting to some extent, keeping the medieval castle, but updating the costumes and some props. Medieval and modern elements are mixed together in post-modern fashion. This is a very stylized and even symbolic production, although the story is more or less dramatically realistic. The original dialogue has been edited and shortened, in order to highlight the settings and gestures. The play is a visual and musical feast for the senses. Jarman's treatment of the play reminds me of Julie Taymor's TITUS (based on Shakespeare's Titus Andonicus) starring Anthony Hopkins and Jessica Lange.But be forewarned, this is not for the squeamish; there is lots of male nudity and even homosexual love making, although enough is hidden to keep the "R" rating. There is also a fair amount of violence.The play's treatment of homosexuality is very interesting and complex. In Marlowe's original playscript, the homosexual nature of the relationship between Edward and Gaveston is fairly obvious yet not completely explicit----still rather veiled according to the customs of the time; Jarman, in contrast, foregrounds the homosexuality; at the same time he doesn't idealize Edward and Gaveston to make them innocent victims. In line with the original script, Edward is portrayed as criminally negligent in his duties as King. But the nobles who depose him are also corrupted by the desire for power, so there are no clear heroes or villains here. The play, however, questions the irrational prejudice of the nobles against homosexuality.Well worth the time and money. This play will be especially interesting for fans of Shakespeare and English Renaissance drama. Jarman truly makes Edward II accessible, interesting, and relevant for a contemporary audience.
An open Request. To the owners of the t.v. series starring adam west and burt ward:  Please, please put the show on dvd soon, so we can share this wonderful show with our children before they grow up.  It was done so well, good clean humor and it's obvious the actors are enjoying making the show.  I will pre-order the moment you decide to release.
That's right:  Westerns can be Metaphysical. The motor that drives HIGH PLAINS DRIFTER is a metaphysical one.  A "Stranger" mysteriously appears in the dysfunctional desert town of Lago, kills three thugs who were hired by town fathers to protect the community from three vengeance-seeking outlaws soon to be released from prison, and subsequently intimidates, terrorizes, and humiliates everyone when the Stranger himself signs on to protect the town.All the while, we are privy to bits and pieces of an earlier death in Lago:  the death of a U.S. Marshal--brutally bullwhipped to death in the street--at the hands of the three imprisoned outlaws.  We learn the killers were set up by their employers--the Lago city fathers; and we learn why law-abiding citizens stood silently and looked the other way when their marshal was murdered.  With the outlaws released and on their way back to Lago to extract numerous pounds of flesh, the Stranger is revealed for who he really is:  a metaphysical Avenger who not only claims vengeance for the murder. . .but for the actions of those who were so callously duplicitous.While Clint Eastwood has more than his fair share of locker room humor in his portrayal of the Stranger, he succeeds in coming across as a terrifying and inhumane force.  When the Avenger finally confronts his killers, the effect is bloodchilling.  As mentioned before, the motor that drives HIGH PLAINS DRIFTER is a metaphysical one, and it's a motor that works perfectly for this Western.--D. Mikels, Author, THE RECKONIN
Not for everybody, but truly fantastic!!!!. For the Boys is truly an underrated gem. Spanning a period of 50 years and three different wars, the film tells the story of Dixie Leonard (the Divine Mrs. M), a singer who is plucked from semi-obscurity at the outset of World War II and given her big break: A USO tour of Europe with Eddie Sparks (James Caan), a song-and-dance man who's a famous star. Their first time on the stage together, Dixie steals the show, Eddie tries to fire her, and they're off and running. Through thick and thin - North Africa, the Korean war, television, McCarthyism, Vietnam - they fight and make up while the world applauds, and finally there's a climax on a live TV awards show, where Dixie and Eddie are seeing each other for the first time in years.Bette Midler is truly fantastic in her role as Dixie. The first USO musical number is a great success, with Bette trading risque repartee with Caan and then belting out a loud number and a ballad.  She has a beautiful voice, powerful and bursting with emotion. This part was written for Bette, no one else could have played Dixie quite like her. She was once again robbed at the Oscars that year, losing to non other than Jodie Foster for the terribly overrated Silence of the Lambs. Midler's performance was much more dramatic and real, and she deserved that statuette.I am not a big fan of James Caan, but he was good in the film. He had a certain chemistry with Midler that made his character believable. Sparks isn't a particularly likeable soul, but Caan brings a certain charm to a role that's tailor-made for his talents. He's right at home with Eddie's emotional isolation and single-minded ambition, bringing to mind a used-car salesman who discovers that the marks are actually buying his manufactured sincerity. The script has no intention of guiding him down the road to redemption, but the occasional showdowns with his conscience add a human touch that allows us to tolerate (if not entirely enjoy) his company for the duration.The film is full of cliches, yes, but seriously, what movie isn't. And are we really expected to believe these guys are so famous that 50 million people are going to tune in to their awards ceremony? Probably not,  and yet, despite it all, there are moments when you might find yourself moved beyond reasonable expectation. The first 40 minutes are terrific, and while the rest of the film never quite manages to hold onto that unbdeniable magic, it remains an entertaining and touching experience.Unfortunately, but not surprisingly, the singing and dancing occupy a surprisingly brief portion of the 140 minute running time. There is a lot of story to tell and not much time to tell it. Encapsulating an entire life in a couple of hours is always a dicey proposition, but our innate awareness that the years are slipping by makes us naturally receptive to a film that follows its characters from the comparative optimism of early middle age to the long nights at the end of the line. The transitions are sweeping (fifteen years here, twenty-five there), sacrificing a coherent whole for a series of snapshots, but there's enough here to provide us with an investment in the outcome. Every misstep is matched by a finely tuned observation on the human condition and it works its way to a manipulative but undeniably emotional climax that could conceivably end in tears.
A Very Powerful Film by the Great Billy Wilder and Performed Masterfully by Oscar Winner Ray Milland. The first time I saw "The Lost Weekend" was about a year ago on TCM and in my own opinion, it was a excellent film. Billy Wilder, who had just done "Double Indemnity", does not miss a step. Ray Milland's performance as Don Birnam, who was chosen as the star, after several of Hollywood's box office draws had turned it down, was perfect for the part and most deservedly won the Oscar. Jane Wyman was perfect as Don's girlfriend, Helen St. James, who stuck by Don no matter what the outcome. There was also the support of Philip Terry, Howard DaSilva and Doris Downing, who helped to add to the film as well.While the ending may seem a bit rosy in some regards, any other way in which the film would have ended, possibly with Don committing suicide would have violated the Production Code, which still was prevalent during the 1940's. Also, to take into consideration of World War II coming to an end when the film was made, a rosy ending would probably help to bring a little bit of optimism after years of fighting and bloodshed. That's just what I have surmised from this.Anyways, excellent film and performances. This film is highly recommended and should not be missed!!
Pure Rock N' Roll. Telsa is a pure rock band!!! They are true musicians!!! Some the best in the business!!! Their music will simply move you.Whether it's hard rockin tunes or very well arranged ballads they can play any style!!! Frank Hannon is one of the best guitarists in rock Hey this band actually play's guitar solo's something the younger generation probably doesn't know about, Jeff Keith is an excellent singer he is always dead on!!! The whole band is tight and this was just the beginning!!! If you love straight up Rock N' Roll this DVD is for you!!!P.S. Pick up there new CD Into The Now, You'll love it!!!!!
100% action. Think for people, who are in realistic movie - this movie will be not so interesting, but still entertaining.Jason Statham looks perfect in role of Frank Martin. A man, who ask no question, who will transport anything anywhere. He's is not interested in what he transport, but what if he will?If its action you want this has plenty, the plot is slightly thin but you won't notice, just sit back and enjoy - the action is terrific especially the chase scenes
The hustler being hustled. I did like this movie becuase it is a "could be so real" movie. It is about a man moving to the big city from the small town wanting to be a sexual hustler. When there is no knowledge about the "vocation" that he is going into, he is the one that is being hustled. This movie is not a happy story or one that is particularly funny it is a very real "small fish in a big bowl" story. I do recommend this movie to anyone that likes a "close to real life" kind of story.
History as it happened... I love this old documentary...Capt Clark Gable does an excellent job narrating it, the color footage is a rare treat, and it gives an excellent insight into the day-to-day lives of those from the greatest generation.  It is a real tribute to all the men who flew bombers in WWII and we need to remember their service and sacrifices.  They fought a tougher war and sustained much greater losses than we have in Iraq or Afghanistan, plus they were gone for much longer periods and didn't have the technology such as email or video teleconferencing to keep in touch with their loved ones.  We need to remember them, as we are losing them quickly and soon they may all be gone.  But their legacy remains, and it is films like this one that preserves it
BRAVO ZUCCHERO E TUTTI AMICI. WONDERFUL SONGS AND INSPIRED PERFORMANCES MAKE THIS A MUST OWN CONCERT DVD.EVEN IF YOU DO NOT UNDERSTAND ITALIAN THE CATCHY MELODIES WILL HOOK YOU IN.THE GENERALLY RESERVED ENGLISH AUDIENCE WAS REALLY HAVING A GREAT TIME. I THINK HE IS ALL LOVE AND PEACE IN HIS LYRICS.AS A NEW CONVERT ALL I CAN SAY IS FANTASTICO MIO NUOVO AMICI.
Best Potion for youthfulness. This is one of the most original films I have ever seen. Meryl, Goldie, and Bruce work well off of each other, which is why the film was a success. Helen and Madeline each woman want Earnest. and they each seek eternal life when they find out about it. Helen and Madeline are both viscious women.This movie is a dark comedy. very funny. I reccomend this to everyone
pantera2. Simply excellent,i have watched this movie many times and its been very emotional every time,every movie collector has to have this in their collections
Better than the others. I bought this movie last year on a hum bug. This movie really surprised me. I really enjoyed it. My daughters love it as well. We watch it constantly and the soundtrack is awesome too
This is one awesome salsa DVD Collection!. These DVDs were easy to follow with clear instructions. The multi-angle feature allowed my boyfriend and me to better learn each step. This complete set has a lot of lessons, it will keep you entertained and you will have lots of fun with your dancing partner.I recommend i
Entertaining and suspenseful. I enjoyed this movie pretty much from beginning to end.  It was not predictable and kept my interest.  It was good to see a female character who was determined and brave.  Also, the Mexican taxi driver was great as well!  While the plot is a little implausible, if you suspend your disbelief, you may find the story quite absorbing and suspenseful.  I recommend it for the characters and the exciting action.  Stacy Edwards was outstanding
In a word EXCELLANT. This movie was much better than I expected. With all the nonsense about the "NC-17" rating wooooo, I thought it was gonna be all T&A and more. Not that I don't like that, but the movie was exactly what Siskel & Ebert were saying at the time: A movie that has a plot and sexuality. NOT porn, but a truly ADULT movie. This is a movie that deals with grown up issues regarding sexuality, marriage and fidelity.Those who are to immature or whose sense of morality forbids them from whatching a movie about two adults having extramarital and love affairs, DEFINATELY will be offended and should avoid this movie.If you can watch something like that with an open mind and are interested in such a story line or you are interested in a love story that gets a little complicated and convoluted then this is for you.I am a big fan of UMA THURMAN and that only makes this movie better for me. The story gets a bit complicated as the lovers grow in different directions.This is a very "artsy" movie. It deals with comlex love and sex issues. This by the way, was the first NC-17 movie. Yes, they made that rating especially for this one, but its not anywhere as hot as SHOWGIRLS as far as nudity. (see my review of that one) I was expecially surprised to find out that this is a TRUE story about famous people.I loved it and I give HENRY & JUNE 5 stars
Triumphant return to Giallo for Argento!. Argento's return to giallo in 1982 after his two supernatural outings SUSPIRIA and INFERNO was triumphant one. By this point Argento was so well versed in the sub-genres conventions that TENBRE has an effortless feel about it, the sense that the director was hardly stretching his innumerable talents. The film has a nice allegorical feel in its exploration of the effects of violence in the media on people. In this case it is not a film, but a novel. Argento is clever to divert attention away from the medium of cinema. At the time of the films release just such arguments about violence were reaching an apex, especially in the UK where TENEBRE was actually banned due to its violent content and the influence such imagery might have.From a visual perspective Argento goes to the extreme opposite of his previous two films, by presenting a bright and starkly lit world, this brightness is taken to its extremity when one character played by JOHN SAXON is stabbed to death in broad daylight. The film works well, because of a confusing narrative structure, which is punctuated by flashbacks, which is what one expects from a giallo. If it makes sense, then arguably it has failed. As usual the film is filled with tremendous set pieces, including an astonishing sequence where Argento shoots a house from every conceivable angle in one take. A scene which is disturbing because of the almost omnipotent quality of the gaze of the killer. The Rome location is evocative and surprising in the rather dour and dreary impression it gives.Sadly the broader themes of the film are not dealt with in a particularly intelligent and sensitive way and half way through the film Argento loses patience and begins despatching cast members with clockwork regularity. Performances are above average for an Italian horror production as is the soundtrack. Considering the way Argento deteriorated as the 80's became the 90's, TENEBRE stands as one of the directors better films.
A Puzzle of a movie. The desire to look is what cinema is all about.. In this regard we are all guilty of a certain fascination, sometimes even a somewhat morbid fascination prompts us to view situations that would be unacceptable if they occured in our real every day life, it is the safe comfortable distance that the movies allow us that makes it socially acceptable to take part in these strange activities. When director Michael Powell and screenwriter Leo Marks put a sort of metophoric mirror in front of us we are shocked by the distorted vision we see - and we find ourselves at once at an interesting crossroads.. We actually find ourselves showing sympathy for what we thought to be a monster - for it is this character, like Dr. Frankenstein's monster indeed, who is from a certain perspective a victim. It is this twist of perception, shocking for audiences at the time of this movies release, that make this one of the most powerful cinematic expressions of all time. It is also an interesting film to look at - the extreme colors that Powell uses transport us to a strange world - one that looks like our world but also it looks like a stage or even a dream.
Some trivia for true Vacation fans!. In 1983, I was 20 and working as an usher at a movie theater that seated 1000 in San Diego.  Hollywood used to test a lot of movies there and one nite, the original "Vacation" was premiering for the first time before a test audience.I saw a few movies that were tested there, but I never saw such a great reaction as that nite for "Vacation".  The audience completely roared from start to finish.(By contrast, when the Steve Martin movie "The Man with 2 Brains" tested there, there was little audience reaction, and I saw Steve Martin leave 10 minutes before the movie ended looking very dejected.)During "Vacation", I had to go behind the screen to get supplies and I couldn't believe how freekin' loud the laughter was from the crowd!When the movie ended, I was outside setting up cones and Director Harold Ramis rushed past with an attractive woman on his arm.  Like an idiot, I yelled, "Hey Harold, I loved you in "Stripes"!!!"  He turned and smiled and waved at me, he seemed like a nice guy.
great set. very well produced. there has been some delay with this package, which has been recalled due to errors with one of the discs. the new ship date is Dec 6. i managed to have received mine before this item was pulled from circulation by Panik House. yes, one of the discs does not play, but they will replace it. so, not a big problem.for fans of this genre, this set is a must. the remastered films all look great. and there are lots of fun extras, and goodies, such as the additional fifth disc, a CD with songs of Reiko Ike.the packaging is fantastic. definitely one of the cooler, funner designs of any box/multiple set i own.highly recommended
A Tight Little Story. It's Hitchcock like in it's presentation that admits you into a very short segment of our hero's life, but one momentous enough to change his life forever.  I also like being fooled by the story teller into reaching for the wrong conclusions before all is finally made known to me.  A good yarn, as Mark Twain might say.  William Bendix does a great job of sustaining the suspense throughout the film
no title. Another wonderful film of Spike Lee's.  Reminiscent of "Do The Right Thing" with the neighborhood flavor, odd characters, a richness of detail and editing.  But expecting it to be funny and light, I was disappointed.  The family was always fighting and Alfre Woodard always yelling at her sons.  I do have trouble with that.  But they all seemed to love one another and the episode of Troy with her southern aunt was very well done, except for the odd way it was filmed.  And the little girl who played Troy was effective in her role.  Woodard is a truly gifted actress.  I've liked her in everything she's been in.  She should've gotten an Oscar for "Passion Fish".  It never ceases to amaze me  - the range of films that Lee has made.  All of them good; most of them exceptional.  Only Woody Allen comes close to such a body of work.  Lee's characters are just so believable in their humanness.  It's like you're looking into their lives and troubles and joys.
Hard to be critical of this one, it's a must-see!. Tale of murderous child with no conscience, superb cast. Tense drama wherein the ending had to be changed to get past the censors when released as they didn't want to send the message that evil can win over good.If you enjoy suspenseful drama without blood guts and gore, you will love it. From the days when movies didn't rely on special effects to sell tickets!
Bruce vs. the wretched serial killer. Bruce Willis would not be the first actor to bag on their own work. Some people might take the fact that an actor bags on their own work as a very authoritative statement and not bother seeing such a film. If the actor doesn't like their own film, why should anyone else bother? But I think such need not always be the case, and this movie is one good example. And artist is always critical of their own work, and rightly so. But just because they see things they don't like about their own work or something else about a film they are in, does not mean that others will certainly see the same things for the same reasons.After seeing a trailer for this movie on a dvd I have, I came upon an IMDB post about a Bob Costas' TV interview (I've never seen it myself) and Bruce Willis saying he knew this movie was crap when he was making it, and that this experience made him decide to choose projects based on the projects merits and avoid Hollywood tripe. For this and other reasons, I did not bother to pursue getting the movie at the time. Recently, I came across this movie in a Wal-Mart $5 discount bin and being a Bruce Willis fan I grabbed it. After watching it, I find it easy to say that even though I don't care much for movies involving serial killers, this was a decent enough flick that would have been worth it had I paid $10 instead. It could be defined as typical Hollywood tripe, especially if you're an actor who's been in the business for years and are looking to expand your horizons. But not all tripe is truly tripe. Bruce did a decent enough job going up against the killer, and the movie was not just tired and boring and by the numbers. It looks and sounds good, has good production values and cinematography, is fairly suspenseful and entertaining. In the big picture it's probably fairly typical of this type of movie, but if you want to see Bruce Willis go through the paces in the taking down the serial killer routine, it's a decent and interesting take on it all and without a lot of in your face gore or anything.Incidentally, I and plenty of others think that Hudson Hawk rocks! Some people just don't get it I suppose
Passion of Mind  entertwined with Passionate Bodies. The film is well titled and is full of intrigue and mis-direction, yet it always returns to its central theme of over arching sexuality and attractiveness.
Absolutely Amazing!!!~. This movie is a complex journey into the minds of the Wachowski brothers and how they have got the knowhow to put trilogy depth into one single movie. They have this movie so multilayered, that half the movie, V is talking through the other characters and since the whole movie is one idea, it turns out to be possibly the most wholesome movie I've ever seen! From beginning to end, its poses many questions and lets you create the answers within your own mind. Everytime I watch this movie, I find something new and Natalie Portman plays the part perfect... puts me in tears. It takes a couple time of watching it for it really to kick in. Very well made flick. Amaaaaaazing!!!
very good. this movie is very good...it was a little hard to follow in places...the special effects were amazing and the story was great too...it lost points for me when the ending came around, though entertaining and a great 'oooooh' moment, it wasn't well explained, and for an ending like that not to be explained, it lost just an ounce of specialness...good but wier
exercise your Gray matter. spalding gray is stream of consiousness on speed.  Over before you know it, you'll know a lot more when it's over
Funny movie. This is one of my favorite movies.  I've watched it for years on cable and finally decided to buy the dvd.  It stars the great John Candy and the late Richard Crenna.  It's a fun movie to watch!
Review of Theatre of Blood - Price's personal favourite... I have not seen Madhouse, so this review is a reprint of one I wrote on the previously available single film DVD version.In an interview with NPR's Terry Gross, the daughter of the late great Vincent Price was asked which of her father's films was his favourite. She said he loved Theatre of Blood because he got to do Shakespeare (albeit with a bit of poetic license).1973's Theatre Of Blood followed the two Dr. Phibes films which were marvelously devilish black comedies. In Theatre Of Blood, Price tops his Phibes performances. Price plays Edward Lionheart, a Shakespearan actor loved by his fans but mercilessly reviled by a group of snobby theatre critics who berate his performances in print and later humiliate him at an awards ceremony. Lionheart sets out to get revenge on the nine critics by use of murder plots in Shakespeare's plays. The makeup and costumes are superb as well as the supporting cast -- particularly the lovely Diana Rigg, Milo O'Shea, and Robert Morley. Price dons dozens of disguises as he methodically carrys out his mission. He's hysterically funny as "Butch", a hairdresser for one of the female critics. This film should be considered among his essential works.
Sad story, but in a feel good way. More than meets the eye. This movie may not be for everyone, but to me it's highly memorable.POSSIBLE SPOILER ALERT:This isn't your ordinary "travel back in time to alter the futures of people you care about"-flick (Back to the Future--although, granted, it was better made and more entertaining).Butterfly Effect is really about (in alphabetical order) acceptance, chance, charity, choice, grownup love, hope, identity, opportunity, regret, and sacrifice.Some reviewers mentioned the quality of acting.  Here are my thoughts:Kutcher to me always seemed an innocent, caring, small town fellow more than the fun guy most of us might know him as, and that's why I wasn't surprised to see him pull off this role.Amy Smart was good mostly, but glaringly off-key at times (granted she had to show more range the the other actors)
About time Sam's fans had this sort of thing to enjoy. My only reservation with this program is that I would have liked to have more on the circumstances behind Sam's death .He was very influential as a singer and business person , but he was also a man . That may have been too much for certain people to stomach .The fact that the program features interviews with Sam's family shows that it has been approved - that can also mean that it is a whitewash , sanitised for public consumption .That is a fine line to walk .Just like the Kennedy assassination , one gets the feeling that there is still more to be told . I believe the writer Peter Guralnick is writing a book on Sam and if it is anything like his books on Elvis , it will be compellng reading .A great program and worth watching whether or not you are a fan of this wonderful singer who may have never reached his true potential
Michael Moore's dorm buddy. Yes, there is hardly anrguement made in this film that was not made in FAHRENHEIT 9/11, but it appears Greg Palast serves dual roles in this film, asserting the corruption and greedy of the Bush Administration, and confriming that Michael Moore is indeed, NOT a liar (Moore is actually given VERY SPECIAL THANKS in the end credits.)While Michael Moore is known as a populist rabble-rouser (and, of course, reviled by conservatives everwhere as a "Lying Propagandist"), Palast is more of a resourceful gumshoe. While Michael moore proudly where a Michigan State University cap, palast dons a fedora.Indeed, BUSH FAMILY FORTUNES elaborates on a number of arguements commonly made against George W. Bush. For example, did he ever serve his coutry during the Vietnam War? Well, that's what cradle-to-grave conservative Republican politicians and voters would have you bleieve.But not according to the assisstant to George Texas Air Guard General (the General is deceased), who states unequvically, on camera, that while Bush was Governor of Texas, his underlings called in and order any shred of evidence that Bush went AWOL to be removed from his military records and be, well, shredded!!!And what about the 2000 election. Palast takes this even further than did Moore, with his discovery the some 94,000 Florida voters, mostly blacks, were forbidden to vote because they were listed as felons. Were they? Well, Palast discovers that the list of felons forbidden to vote in Florida in 2000 was 95% inaccuarate, and that these people who were barred from voting would more than likely have swung Florida, and thus the Presidency, for Al Gore. This is due to the fact that Bush campaign manager Katherine Harris, conviently also the woman in charge of the Florida vote count paid DBT ChoicePoint $4 million to come up with a list of names of felons, who should not be allowed to vote, and then telling ChoicePoint not to bother verifiying the accuracy of the list, thus barring Floridians voters (the majority, Palast asserts, Democrats) from voting because their names are similar to convicted felons anywhere in the U.S.And finally we come, as all Anti-Bush documentaries must, to the War in Iraq, and Palast essentially proves without a shadow of a doubt that indeed, it WAS for oil.Aside from Bush going on live television and forbidding Iraqis from desroying oil wells, Palast also uncovers a confedential White House document, "written long before the war started" the lays out plans the divide and privitize all of Iraq's assets, "especially those in oil."And if that doesn't convince you, than how about the evidence that Cheney prepared for the Iraq war by studying maps of Iraq with Oil company CEO's. This has recntly gotten more media attention in the face of oil companies making record profits in the wake of the recnt takeoff in gas prices. This, I imagine, is going to provide a massive blow to the Bush Administration's already sagging Public Approval ratings.If you let the liars and conservative Bush supporters trick you into beliving that Michael Moore's FAHRENHEIT 9/11 is full of lies (Moore critic and unapologetic liar Dave Kopel, in the film FAHRENHYPE 9/11, calls the allegetion that we invaded Iraq for oil "Preposterous"), then let Mr. Palast be your guide
A film that exposes more than you expect at first sight !. This film is just a curiosity piece than a good film drama. It's a poetic film about the existential conflict between modernity and the cowboy times, so he gathers three real outlaws an their livings in a true foreign territory.On the other hand it may be seen as a mordacious paradox, between the febrile homesickness what should be called the tradition of the new.Once more Huston' s approach is deliberately cynical respect his chosen cast: Montogmery Clift, an actor who was passing through for the mature age crisis, the declining stardom of Clark Gable and the multiple contradictions of the embodiment of Aphrodite on earth . Marilyn Monroe.
A prelude to the Bush presidency.... I've always loved this film, which has grown more prophetic over the years.  Now, it has actually come true.  A simpleton has become the President of the United States.  In this film, Chance (Peter Sellers) is a complete boob, devoid of any intellect, and who only knows from what he watches on TV.  He ends up getting in the circle of Washington insiders, and the final scene is these insiders saying that they make ask him to run for President.  They take his idiotic sayings as "plain speaking, folksy wisdom", when in reality he's a complete moron, although charming.  This film has a lot in common with the Bush presidency, except Peter Sellers is a much better actor than George W. Bush.  And no one has gotten killed from Chance's idiocy, but that's for the sequel (which we're living now)...
The Best Movie of the 90's. Remains of the Day joins Goodfellas and Breaking the Waves as movies that did not win Best Picture Oscars in the 90's, however will be be remembered as truly three of the finest flims ever produced. Merchant and Ivory has always been an aquried taste, however this movie truly crosses all boundries. As the years go by (I'm writing this review in 2005), Anthony Hopkins brillance as an actor gets dimmed somewhat with every mediorce script he takes, although if anyone has earned the right to sell out for money, it is he and Deniro.This movie will truly haunt you, and I don't say that lightly. Lesson for all young movie directors who think you have to have raunchy sex scenes with wafer-like women and thick headed men to generate heat on screen: the chemistry between Thompson and Hopkins in the library scene is the most intense, heartbreaking, sexually-charged scene I have ever witnessed on screen, AND THEY DON'T EVEN TOUCH EACH OTHER! The fact that BOTH did not receive Oscars for their roles is borderline criminal. The last 35 minutes of this movie will stay with the you for weeks, if not years. That last scene of Stevens the Butler releasing the trapped bird out the window, while he is left inside looking out and wondering all he has missed, and eventually lost, is almost to much to bear. The beautiful harp-centric soundtrack is worth noting as well.  The excellence of this movie is hard to overstate; it is simply one of the 10-15 greatest movies ever made, while Hopkins and Thompson's performance in my estimation rank as the two single greatest performances of the 1990's.
Amazing!. They always seems to cancel the best series and this is another case of that. The Oblongs is laugh out loud funny and you will not be able to move away from the TV until you have watched the whole series. 14 episodes that say so much. You must see this!
one of wayne's better later westerns. i love john wayne movies and this one is no exception. the ageless wayne looks great and is just right as a man , john chisum the friend of john tunstell and one of the forces behind the "lincoln county wars" that gave rise to billy the kid. the music is great no matter what some may think and this even has some fine bits from forest tucker, ben johnson, and the underrated richard jeckell all wayne movie vets. this movie is like a beloved pair of sweats and houseshoes to me in that no matter what it will stay in my house as long as i live. i never get tired of this throwback to the westerns of old and with wayne in the saddle one more time,its like a home movie of wayne and friends, because this film is peopled with actors who he had worked with and you can feel the fun they were having being in waynes company again. this is one my boys and i watch together and they love it to. we have a great time watching it. that makes this one even better that we all share a love of this movie. one last thing about the music, it can't be to bad because my boy go around singing the theme song. i bet after you hear it you'll hum it to. saddle up and ride with the "duke" one more time
To either love or hate as a film. The question is whether you're viewing this as a lover of Bacon's work or to enjoy what is simply a fascinating cult film in itself.  A few of the intermittant shots are not the most original and the storyline might not be to all tastes, but the Jacobi-Craig clash and borderline humour of supporting characters combine for some wonderfully twisted dialogue that brings it alive!  If you're aware that none of Bacon's work is on offer, and appreciate tongue-in-cheek humour of it's darkest type then you will love this film
The CLASSIC original rag tag fleet. I really enjoyed the previous reviewer's episode guide.  I printed it and decided to see how my own humble opinions stacked up to his.  I especially laughed at his review of FIRE IN SPACE: "A fire. In space."After a month of viewing it was fun to see where we saw eye to eye and where we differed.SAGA OF THE STAR WORLD [A]: Pure classic.  The bridge sequence is beautifully cinematic.  This 3 hr pilot offers the very best of Galactica.LOST PLANET OF THE GODS [A]: The magic continues without falter as the Galactica continues its escape from the Cylons in this 2 part story.THE LOST WARRIOR [B-]: This Shane/ Wild West formula worked for me.  I enjoyed it and The Good, The Bad and The Ugly Apollo showdown in the end with Red Eye was perfect.  The poor dubbing on the barking dog was laughable.  Still, it's a cool episode even if it riffs on many western classics.THE LONG PATROL [C]: This Starbuck prison colony episode is a yawner.  I didn't care for it as much as I liked the previous Apollo solo plot.  I loved watching the actors in the Cylon uniforms in one sequence tentatively walk down the stairs in fear of falling.THE GUN ON ICE PLANET ZERO [B]: The whole Hoth flavor of this episode worked for me.  I loved the story and enjoyed the ensemble cast.  It's a solid 2 part story.THE MAGNIFICENT WARRIORS [D]: This episode plays it loose with the whole Magnificent Seven plot.  I love Akira Kurosawa's Seven Samurai and anything that pays homage to it, but this particluar episode is poor.THE YOUNG LORDS [C]: Starbuck crash lands on a planet and helps a group of children rescue their father from the Cylons.  Okay.THE LIVING LEGEND [A]:  Lloyd Bridges guests as Commander Cain of the Pegasus.  Apparently Cassiopeia had a thing for him.  Damn he's good!  An excellent 2 part story.  Oh and the very hot Anne Lockhart as Sheba starts here, daughter of Cain.FIRE IN SPACE [B]: A fire. In space, but man I can't be as harsh on this one.  I found it exciting.  It's like Towering Inferno on the Galactica.It's riveting stuff especially given how atrocious GREETINGS FROM PLANET EARTH was.  I love the Apollo and Starbuck on wires bit.  My 8 year old noticed.WAR OF THE GODS [A]:  Patrick MacNee stars as Count Iblis.  He's a long way from The Avengers.  This is a strong 2 part story.  The science fiction is very Star Trek here and the exchange between Adama and Iblis and others is taut with drama.  Great stuff.THE MAN WITH NINE LIVES [B-]: Fred Astaire guests as the alleged father of Starbuck.  The Nomen arrive.  Good.MURDER ON THE RISING STAR [C]: Starbuck is accused of murder following a heated exchange with a shipmate during a radical game of Triad.  Dig the undies guys!GREETINGS FROM PLANET EARTH [F]:  You see Battlestar Galactica was truly ahead of its time with its own take on the Alliance [pre-FIREFLY].  You've got Ray Bolger guesting [formerly the Scarecrow] and Mantooth [formerly of Emergency 51 fame].  Hector and Vector perform a little dance number that Fred Astaire would not do for the show.  All of this culminates in a 2 part stinker.  It just isn't compelling sci-fi.BALTAR'S ESCAPE [C+]: The Nomen and Baltar team-up to hijack.  Not good.ESCAPE FROM TERRA [C-]: The Ship Of Lights [again]. Ed Mulhare [of Knight Rider fame] guests.  It takes a page out of the Cold War.  Again Not good.TAKE THE CELESTRA [D]:  Great idea.  Fairly rediculous, silly execution. The Cylons have all but disappeared since FIRE IN SPACE.THE HAND OF GOD [A]:  Premium Glactica returns along with the Cylons.  Where have you been guys?  Final episode here departs in a blaze of glory.  Great stuff but where has Boxey and Moffat gone.  They dissapeared with the Cylons but never came back.REMEMBERING BATTLESTAR GALACTICA THE DOCUMENTARY [A]:  Terrific.  nice seeing the entire cast, reminisce about their fave episodes and see how they have all aged.  Lovely memories.  My wife tells me "they are not your friends."  I keep telling her but they are.  Apart, from overutilized explosions and dogfights, reused launch sequences, bad edits and some minor continuity problems [one episode Starbuck goes from long hair to short to long to short again - what!?], it was fantastic to watch these again.  Poking ocassional fun is part of the fun, but I was surprised how well this series looked being nearly 30 years old.  Sure, the mastering isn't there.  It would have been wonderful if they cleaned these prints up like they did with Star Wars, but still looked good and the 5.1 sounded great with the subwoofer.A short, sweet, wonderful series thanks to great characters created with care and well-acted by a tremendous cast.  THUMBS WAY UP!  I can see why they brought it back for the SCI FI CHANNEL's NEW MASTERPIECE!
Fine acting in a rather bleak story - fashionable for its time. Jack Lemmon won the Oscar in 1973 for his performance in this movie.  Jack Gilford was nominated for best supporting actor and it was also nominated for writing.  The performances are very good.  Theyer David makes a great impression as the professional arsonist Charlie Robbins, as well.  The women in the movie are all more or less victims and are there to provide to the sense of moral decay in the movie.  Not necessarily because they themselves are corrupt, but because they are consumed by the appetites of the men in the movie.It is hard to capture the sense of America in 1973.  Vietnam was in its death throes, the sexual revolution and drug culture were in full swing (hence all the casual promiscuity in the film), the schismatic rage over the Equal Rights Amendment was underway, Roe v. Wade was pushed on the country, Watergate was underway as were other corruption charges in the Nixon administration, and women were beginning to enter the workforce in large numbers.Lemmon plays Harry Stoner.  He is clearly suffering from what we would now call Post Traumatic Stress Disorder, but that wasn't really known at the time of this movie or was just beginning to be discussed because of Vietnam.  Stoner is a World War II vet.  He is unsuccessful in developing personal relationships because he deals with his pain by focusing on numbing it through work, through gratification of his sexual appetites, and fleeing intimacy.  He dwells on his war experiences and is on the verge of a crackup.His business is also about ready to fail because of bad finances.  How much of his stress is caused by the business pressures or whether the business situation is caused by his narcissistic way of living is hard to distinguish.  However, his partner, Phil Greene (the wonderful Jack Gilford) is caught up in this mess.  They are coming out with a great new line they both believe in, but the bank won't give them any more money.  So, do they get it from mob or do they burn some insured building down and use the proceeds from the policy.  Phil doesn't want to commit any crimes and is the voice of the old morality in the movie.  Still, he doesn't fight Stoner too hard.The whole movie takes place in less than two days and in the end doesn't resolve the issues it raises.  We get the problems raised, given a tour of what is eating at Stoner, and left to ourselves to decide what it all means and guess as to how it comes out.  This was more fashionable in those days than today.  It was somehow supposed to be more sophisticated.  Maybe it just avoiding writing a satisfying ending that would be difficult to pull off was the real point.I am now the age of Stoner's character and find him to be selfish, self-destructive, and do not believe that his war experiences justify what he setting about doing.  Life has a way of pounding pretty much everyone who gets to their fifties.  Most do not do the things he resorts to and the behavior he justifies.  He sees others more as a means than ends in themselves, and there is the beginning of his moral dilemma.Lemmon does a fine job with the character as do the other actors, but it is 70s fashionably bleak.  So, it is up to you whether you think it will wear well for you
Johnny Depp as a credible actor? Who knew!. I list this movie as a 5 star review because it surprised me so much. Specifically, Johnny Depp's acting quality in this movie is far beyond that of any of his other performances so far.As a former actor, I regularly am drawn toward movies whose actors have powerful performances. This is certainly one of them. Johnny Depp's range is  just astonishing as he moves from a man of cynical egoism to humble humanitarian, all the while resisting the transformation, dying of syphilis, and dealing with the ails of alcoholism.What is so astonishing is that Johnny incorporates these qualities, and there are many, so flawlessly, there are many moments you forget it is Johnny Depp but some unnamed talented british actor. (The accent by the way is nearly flawless as well.) These are the performances that are great, you are so drawn in by the character you forget who is playing. Johnny Depp has achieved a performance that would rival Olivier and I do not use that comparison often.The movie opens with Depp giving this brilliant monologue that has the feel of an Iago (villain in Shakespeare's Othello) type of character. You feel he is egotistical, intelligent, and up to no good, yet still charismatic.  He is a lavish womanizer, popular statesman, and both loved and hated by his peers. Depp really brings out his own awareness of his situation and plays all the right notes, perfectly hitting the difficult British wit that so many times is above an American actor's head.As his situation degenerates, we find weakness in the seemly untouchable  character; Depp embraces regret, shame, and self-destruction in only the way an alcoholic could understand it. A feeling of uniqueness and loneliness that is covered by an over-compensating facade of selfishness. It is amazing to see that when Depp compares himself to Jesus Christ, you totally understand why he thinks that way, desperately grasping for meaning in his life as grand as Jesus's.Then as we see his last attempt to do good, which works out well in his favor, he is able to die. He no longer has the contempt of the world on his shoulders and even as he hobbles away, so badly afflicted with syphilis he can't even walk straight, he is even able to make peace with his wife in his dying breath and discover a sense of dignity he never had before.The closing monologue, as powerful as the opening one, returns to him commenting on his own life, trying to retain his facade of disinterest, but this time we see a crack of humanity as he repeats the last line of the movie over and over in a quite desperation.Unlike Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas and Ed Wood, where he played parodies of the characters he portrayed, this is the real stuff. This is acting at its finest. The fact he is not mentioned for an Academy Award for this performance makes me weep. If you enjoy watching movies to see great quality acting and believable performance, this will be at the top of your list.
Comic Genius. The truly great have to deal with the same resources, situations, and expectations as the mediocre contend with, but they always manage to find a way to outshine their comtemporaries.Take Scrubs for instance. Nearly every sitcom that has an unattached male character and an unattached female character fights with the "will they, won't they" paradigm in one form or another. Most choose one of two paths: they either yank us along painfully, by our nose hairs, until they hook the two together, as their uninspired fanbase heaves a harmonious sigh of relief, or they throw them together too early and offer their unimpressed following another 22.5 minutes of clichs once a week.The creators of Scrubs chose a third approach - they designed the personalities of the two characters in such a brilliant fashion, that it's virtually impossible to picture JD and Elliot ever, in any way, shape, or form, enjoying an actual, romantic relationship.They have had an occasional tryst, but each risqu rendezvous was sabotaged by the end of the episode in which it was formed. So, instead of the usual, blas helping of predictable, relationship-based mishaps, we are entertained by the richness of well-developed characters parading along well-designed story lines.So, if you are tired of tired plots and bored with boring stories, check out any season of Scrubs and you won't be disappointed.
Enjoyable - keeps you guessing. Ghost Game is a very enjoyable movie.  It has suspense and kept me guessing what was going to happen next, unlike alot of horror movies where one can pretty much figure out what's going to happen next.  The effects and music were great.
Still A Fun Watch, Even After All These Years. The film "Repo Man" is a bit dated, and yet it's still a fun watch. And I think that being a little dated makes it an even better film. Many films, especially from the 1970's to the mid 1980s have not stood the test of time. "Repo Man" does. From the punkish Otto (Emilio Estevez) to (Harry Dean Stanton) the film is as enjoyable [if not more] than when it was first released. I remember when I first watched the film, and thought how clever Nesmith was to include Otto's parents. When you see Otto's parents and their total devotion to the televangelist [very popular at the time] and being totally mesmerized by him that they send him all their money; you begin to understand that Otto's a hell of a lot more normal and sane than society would have us believe.Also, the film is so full of funny and witty dialogue; from Otto's boss, to his newfound employer (Harry Dean Stanton), that every time I view the film I see something else that I didn't see before: Or saw it, but now see it differently. I think this is the best Harry Dean Stanton role too. His character is hilarious. A straight and narrow guy, [sort of], who winds up being funny. I don't think the film would have succeeded without him. I found it particularly funny when the Repo Men are talking about John Wayne and how it's okay to wear dresses. Or when Otto tries to steal a car and winds up getting beaten up. There are many, many funny and witty parts of the film [too many to go into]. I think the film is funny, witty and hasn't lost its charm after so many years. Highly recommended! [Stars: 4.5]
Still my favorite after 10 years. I wrote a review eleven months ago after buying a video tape of this 1991 movie and was wondering why they hadn't released a DVD version with director's commentaries + cast &amp; crew interviews etc... Now the DVD finally came out and did feature the commentaries but not the interviews. That's a waste, although I totally enjoyed watching the movie again. After 10 years, I still haven't seen any better romantic comedy, something that got me laugh so hard and made me melt so tenderly. Of course Meg Ryan, Julia Roberts, and (most recently) Ashley Judd prove to be great in this category as well, but none of them has surpassed Elizabeth Perkins in &quot;Big&quot; and &quot;He Said She Said&quot;. Only Perkins could be so charming and so vulnerable at the same time. Maybe that's what made her the loveliest and most unforgettable of them all
Better Than The First. This movie was better than the first and that does not happen often!  I love action movies and this one delivered action, adventure and romance.  I really liked Angelina's love interest in this movie Gerard Butler and the interaction between the two.  Again the setting/scenery was awesome.  I would definitely recommend this movie the action adventure fans
That... was the coolest thing... I have ever seen. I'd like to take up argument with those who say that the Mike Judge collections (I own all three) are 'not what people want.' Which is to say that people want to see season collections rather than a group of cartoons selected to appear together by the director and/or his team.  Sitting down to watch Beavis and Butthead has NEVER been about having a sense of continuity.  I couldn't tell you which cartoons came from which seasons... however each volume of this collection leaves you laughing at inane, repetitive, and obscene observations... which is the pretty much the point, agreed?The only complaint I have about these dvds... are the music video interludes.  When watching Beavis and Butthead on TV I would often complain about how the videos interrupted the flow of the short cartoons but after bringing home the first of the three volumes, hitting the "play all" option, and laying back on the sofa with a bag of nachos I found myself begging for the video commentary... so after watching the cartoons I popped in the third disc that features the videos and got bored rather quickly watching one video after the next.That's the long and short of it... BUT... as a diehard Beavis and Butthead fan who can boast sensible and responsible behavior most of her life... I still have to say... Whoa, that was cool
Awesome Kelly Brook. I have this movie saved on my DVR from Showtime,Ive watched it about 20 times.I also saw the Showtime HD version also,it was awesome.I'll probably buy the DVD just to see if it has any extra's like pics of Kelly hopefully
Six great Miyazaki movies, one worthy pack!. Thanks to the success of SPIRITED AWAY in America, the works of Japanese animation maestro Hayao Miyazaki are finally starting to get the recognition they deserve.  Two years ago, when Disney issued the aforementioned Oscar-winner along with KIKI'S DELIVERY SERVICE and CASTLE IN THE SKY on DVD, AMAZON.COM made the very generous decision of offering all three of these masterpieces together as a three-pack.  Now, with NAUSICAA OF THE VALLEY OF THE WIND and PORCO ROSSO slowly enchanting newcomers and a few great more Miyazaki/Studio Ghibli works on the way to America, AMAZON.COM has prepped yet another package of Miyazaki treats--this set not only includes the aforementioned movies, but also PRINCESS MONONOKE (distributed by Disney's then subsidiary Miramax).  The most convenient thing about this pack is that by purchasing this deal, you'll be saving yourself the potentially costly choice of buying each one individually.The films themselves are unquestionably masterpieces, as I'm sure you may have heard from many other people, but special mention should be made to Disney's DVD releases as well:  all six of these movies have top-quality visual transfers (CASTLE and KIKI sometimes show their age in the video quality, but still look excellent) with the original Japanese language track complete with the original credits and English subtitles for longtime afficionadoes.But for English speaking audiences who don't want to read subtitles and pay attention to the visuals, Disney has provided high-quality dubs for all six films.  While dubbing in a live-action film can be distracting (especially if the voice is not associated with the actor on screen), the same arguments do not apply for anime (or cartoons in general).  An animated cel stands on its own and is open to all kinds of vocal interpretation.  Some argue that Disney's choice of big name actors and actresses are distracting, but on the flip side, these assembled talents such as Mark Hamill, Cloris Leachman, Phil Hartman, Minnie Driver, Patrick Stewart, Michael Keaton, Uma Thurman, Suzanne Pleshette and others help attract newcomers to these movies and give strong, solid performances in their own right.It's not like Miyazaki sold out to the Mouse House or anything:  he has stated that any adaptations of his movies should be done under the supervision of his company, Studio Ghibli and that any alterations in dialogue or music (in the case of KIKI and CASTLE; where the former's songs were changed due to licensing problems and the latter received a superbly lush and breathtaking reorchestration by the original composer, Joe Hisaishi) must not be done without consultation.  Thanks to a strong campaign by PIXAR superstar John Lasseter, Disney has honored Miyazaki's wishes through their dubs, remaining faithful to the spirit of the original stories while occasionally adding to them.  It should be noted that KIKI, CASTLE, and MONONOKE were not dubbed by Lasseter, but by Anime overdub veteran Jack Fletcher.  But while these three dubs may not have the name "Lasseter" attached to them, they are still very much worth watching for excellent performances and solid scripting.As far as the extras go, they range from barebones (MONONOKE) to passable (KIKI, CASTLE) to good (PORCO ROSSO) to must-watch (NAUSICAA and SPIRITED AWAY).  The most common feature is a behind-the-scenes featurette on translating the movies into English (and the actors speaking fondly about Miyazaki and his work).  With the exception of MONONOKE, the other superfluous but interesting extra are the Japanese trailers and storyboards synched to the soundtrack.  But the real meat of extras are on both the NAUSICAA and SPIRITED AWAY DVDs, which include featurettes on the making of SPIRITED AWAY and a worthwhile history lesson on the birth of Studio Ghibli.  Not a whole lot of extras for such fabulous movies, but better than satisfactory nonetheless.Whether you choose to watch these movies in their language of origin or in the A-grade English tracks provided by Disney, Miyazaki's work is essential to anyone's DVD library, and by purchasing a deal like this, you'll not only be saving a bit of money, but getting more than what it's worth as well.  I like that AMAZON.COM put together this excellent offer of a purchase.  Not only is it less expensive than buying each movie individually, it's more convenient, too
Yes, watch those lips!. Carla is a 30-something office worker, secretary to the boss of a real estate development firm in Paris. She wears frumpy clothing, and works hard. Too hard. She also has a handicap -- she is hearing-impaired, and underneath her hair, she wears hearing aids in both ears. Her co-workers do not fraternize with her, and they make fun of her plain appearance and un-sexines. She knows this, because she can read their lips from across the lunch room. She longs for excitement and romance.Carla is the boss's right arm. Very competent, but overworked. One day, she collapses in exhaustion, and her boss suggests that she hire an assistant to help relieve some of the drudgework she's been doing.She agrees, but her first candidate turns out to be an ex-con. He lies about his office skills, but she hires him and tries to groom him into a decent employee, probably just to have some male company. He's attractive in an unkempt, roguish sort of way, and she trains him as a gofer and copy-room worker.The trailer says something like, "She taught him good manners... He taught her to be bad." In fact, she uses him, by asking him to steal a file from one of her colleagues who cheated her out of a development property she had been working on. The colleague is completely humiliated by the loss of the file, and Carla has to step in to deliver the pitch for the property before the local development council. Score one for the deaf girl.Things get a bit dicier when the ex-con sees a chance to get back at a loan shark he's indebted to, and make some bucks in the process. He needs Carla's lip-reading skills -- to spy on the shark's apartment while his gang plans the caper. The scheme goes sour, and therein lies the action and suspense that one reviewer called "Hitchcockian."I don't see much of Hitchcock in this film, but it is a good story, the characters are well-drawn and superbly acted. There's a little double entendre in the title, I think. The actress who plays Carla has full lips that frown and quiver and pout and twist throughout the film -- she's a great actress -- and a lot of her emotion is read by watching those lips. You don't always agree with the choices this lady makes, but you certainly can sympathize with the loneliness and boredom that drives her to make them.
I can't believe that was so good. I had heard about this flick being talked about as the Chinese Charlie's Angels.  It took me a while but I finally popped it in.  WOW, this has to be on of the coolest movies  I have seen in a while.  I was expecting a chick flick but maybe that is why I liked it so much.The story is about these 2 women who have kind of a stupid backround story but what they do now is assasinate people for a living.  Sweet!  I am not going to lie, I wasn't paying attention to the story what so ever the first time i saw this because of how hot these women are.  Add in a super hot cop who wants to take them down, and you have yourself one of the funnest movie ever.  All of these girls know martial arts, or at least they can put their legs up really high and director Corey Yuen puts in some of the best wirework I have seen.  This movie certainly isn't going to win any awards for it's high amount of cheese injected in the plot but it is a movie that I wish I could fill my room with about 100 diffrerent screen shot posters.So on top of this being an amazingly fun movie, Yasuaki Kurata shows up for the finale!!!!!!!  Corey Yuen goes all out with this one and puts together truly one of the best screen battles of all time that will rival any old school kung fu movie.  If you have seen some of Coery's 80's stuff like Yes Madam or even the newer Fong Sai Yuk then get ready to be taken back some years when Corey did some of the best action sequences in the history of cinema(Example:Ninja in the Dragon's Den).  Kurata plays a great character in my favorite movie ever, Legend of a Fighter which was made in 1981.  Well at 56 years old he looks just as good!!!!  I was so amazed by this movie I have watched it 3 nights in a row and I will continue this routine for a while:)The picture quality on the Columbia Tristar version is perfect and has pretty well written subtitles.  Also good 5.1 sound, cantonese track, the original mandarin track, and a horrible English dub.
Great instruction, great menu options. Where do I start?The intro/welcome was great..The Warmup gets all the major muslces in 8 min...The Choreography has 4 options for each of the 3 Dance Routine Drum Solos.1. Seeing the Performance in full costume in front of an audience. 2. The Choreography Breakdown which is her showing you each step 1x slow & 1x normal speed with an occasional "instant reply" for harder steps in front of a wall to floor length mirror in a studio for about 8-15 min depeding on which routine. 3. The Demonstration which is her doing the routine normal speed all the way through in the same studio w/mirror. 4.  The Learn & Practice which is hearing a snippet of the beat first before each step is taught, then same video of her teaching the step slowly, then again normal speed, then after the 2nd is taught the same way, the first two steps are put together before going on to step three & so on so this portion is about 15-20 min.The Rhythm Workshop shows you 8 different rhythms, what they mean, where they are popular, how to clap to it & Jenna showing how to dance to it. There is also a Drum Solo Improvisation which Jenna dancing in front of an audience for about 6 min.The Shimmy Drills is another optionThe Performances option is her doing each of the 3 drum solos & the 6 min Drum Solo Improvisation.The music option tells you what CDs they use & where to find them
MARENGO RE-MASTERS THE PIRATES. Marengo Films is proud to announce that we have found two fabulous prints and replaced our previous films. Long John Silver Returns is now in LETTERBOX format. Both prints were put though a scene for scene color correction, sound design and re-mastered. WE GUARANTEE THESE ARE NOW THE BEST QUALITY PRINTS OF THESE TWO FILMS ON THE MARKET.MARENGO FILM
A nice intro to Disney Cartoons. Unlike my fellow reviewers, my five-year-old and I think this DVD is great.  "Hawaiian Holiday" was playing (over and over    again) on Disney World TV when we were at the Wilderness Lodge Resort and we've been hooked ever since.  No, it is not as complete as the Disney Treasues, but they are nice additions to our collection.
Wow!  Don't read about the movie, just go watch it... Often in my reviews, I touch on elements of the plot.  I wouldn't call them "spoilers" per se, but I went in to this movie almost cold, and that turned out to be an immensely rewarding experience!  Harakiri rewards patience.  I was actually bored for the first 30 minutes of the film, and then it all comes together.  Somewhat light on action, this film is an articulate criticism of the corruption power brings and the length one man goes to expose the hypocrisy.
Finding your destiny at Mooby's. I became a fan of the original "Clerks" back in the 90s.  After watching a "Clerks" and "Mallrats" double feature on satellite TV last month, I decided I needed to catch up with the characters.  So I bought this DVD, checked out the movie, and went through most of the extras.  If you liked the first flick, then you need to add this one to your collection."Clerks II" picks up a decade or so after "Clerks."  After accidentally torching the Quick Stop and RST Video building, Dante (Brian O"Halloran) and Randal (Jeff Anderson) wind up with jobs at Mooby's, a typical fast-food joint.  A year later, Dante is engaged to an attractive but controlling blond and prepping for a move to Florida.  To "celebrate" Dante's impending departure, Randal decides to throw a raucous surprise going-away party.  The rest of the movie plays out over the course of Dante's last day, as buried passions rise to the surface and all sorts of crazy stuff happens.The "Clerks" characters are easy to identify with.  In the first movie, Dante and Randal struggled with young adulthood and finding purpose in life.  Here, their rage against the machine continues with the thirtysomething angst of "growing up" and leaving youth behind for stability and responsibility - in other words abandoning options in order to take a certain path (see the movie "High Fidelity" for another great example of that theme).  They're also poster boys for what happens to close male friendships when a woman enters the picture (especially when she doesn't like the other guy).  Finally, the geek in me loves it when they rant about pop culture, like arguments with customers over which movie trilogy is best: "Star Wars," or "Lord of the Rings."  As a Christian, sometimes I struggle with Kevin Smith's raunchiness, especially when I'm laughing at it.  But the man professes a relationship with God, and he touches on some deep stuff with a sense of humor, so I have to give him props for that.Despite the considerable gap between the two movies and some additional paunch, the actors nail their characters (doing the "Clerks" animated show must've helped).  The two leads have a natural chemistry, so I easily bought them as lifelong friends.  The female leads from the first movie don't return, but the women in our heroes' lives this time around are good to go, especially Rosario Dawson as Dante's manager and confidant.  She conveys just the right mix of ebullience, seriousness, and vulnerability with her character.  And it's always fun to see Jay and Silent Bob in action, both in and out of jail.The DVD extras are cool - Kevin Smith certainly uses the format to its fullest potential.  I was amazed by the amount of planning and detail involved in the filmmaking process.  Even a small budget film like this one entails a ton of planning, development, and logistics.  Aspects of the creative process, like a critique of the rough cut by directors Quentin Tarantino and Robert Rodriguez, were fascinating.  And after all that blood, sweat, and tears, how will the public receive one's pride and joy?  Mr. Smith was somewhat cynical about how "Clerks II" would be received at Cannes, but the 8-minute standing ovation at the movie's end was a solid affirmation.  Particularly touching was Jason Mewes' struggle for sobriety (apparently this is the first time he's played Jay w/out chemical assistance).  It was a nice touch to see the cast and crew rally around him and encourage his recovery.  Of course, the deleted scenes and bloopers are fun as well.A special nod should go to the two main commentary tracks.  The cast commentary focuses more on the actors and their perspectives.  As with "The 40-Year-Old Virgin" commentary, I was disappointed by the absence of the female lead (Rosario Dawson) - her insights were missed.  However, the rest of the cast made it fun, especially with Mr. Smith holding the reins and keeping things on track.  It's obvious that they got along well during the shoot.  The technical commentary with director Kevin Smith, producer Scott Mosier, and director of photography David Klein is a bit drier because it's, well, technical.  It centers on the filmmaking process (film stock, lighting, set design, special effects, etc.).  Although I found the tech stuff less captivating at times, it was interesting to get the scoop on how they used color and film type to help tell the story.  Overall, it's amazing to see how the film came together, and how far they've advanced as filmmakers since the first movie.If you're a Kevin Smith fan, then I'm sure you've already seen "Clerks II" (if not, then what are you waiting for?).  However, if you're new to the View Askewniverse, then check out the original before watching this one.  That way you'll get the full meal deal, and hopefully come to enjoy these characters and their struggles as much as I have
Rockin Britain. If you have ofbeat humor, you will really love this DVD.  It is Britan as never seen before.  The inventiveness and sneaky humor is hilarious.  It is directed for adults and not really something the kids will like or even understand.  Anyone who has liked Monty Python, Doctor Who, or Red Dwarf will enjoy this.  I can see why it became an icon in the UK.  Smashing good time!! The behind the scenes is great because you find out just how much work went into this show and it is obvious everyone enjoys making it.  The two guys in the lead are really down to earth chaps who are very quiet and unassuming off camera.
Outdoor or Indoor. Regarding the previous comment, was not the show performed outside at the Milton Keynes Bowl ?
Sympathetic Ballad to a Lost Grandfather. Proponents and opponents of the verdict that sentenced the Rosenberg's to death agree that the harsh sentencing was a product of the extremely tumultuous and fearful times in which they lived.    Anne Meeropol, a grandchild of the Rosenberg's, put together a well-crafted documentary that explains her family's life in the shadow of her grandparent's misfortunes.   Heir to An Execution is not a fair and balanced synopsis of the Rosenberg Trials. Nor will it ever become the equivalent of a history book on this subject. Through slickly crafted interviews, Meeropol explains the Rosenberg Trials from her family's unique position. Although the movie drags on at the end, very little of the footage is the traditional stock video shown in tired documentaries. After viewing Heir to An Execution, I was more confused than before on the Rosenberg Trials. This is not the fault of Meeropol; her perspective provides a fresh outlook on a somewhat tired debate. Rather, the movie is more effective on showing the ease with which members of the same family are willing to disown each other in the face of crisis
I liked this version. I know that there are a lot of mixed reviews for a number of reasons, and as every has there own taste so do directors and actors.What I like about this film is the fact that unlike the previous versions there is more consideration for the peoples who were native to the Sudan.  As someone who descends from an area in the world where the British colonized and caused instability to the region I think that it is important to put this as a part of the context of such a movie.I also fealt that the actors all did well in the film.  More could have been done to stress Harry's reasons for being afraid, and also his mind set that made him decide to go to the Sudan and seek out his friends.  Yet, had this been done it may have caused the movie to be to slow.  That is because much of the advertisements paint the film as a desert epic, and taking to long to get to the desert may have caused problems with the story line.All in all, if you are not relying on a comparison between previous versions, and you are willing to allow this movie to stand on its own as a perspective of the book you may enjoy this one
Its not heaven, just idaho... a very good, very underrated movie about a pitching scout, who help a young pitching ace realize his dream of making the big leagues.the casting is wonderful.a loving ode to baseball. get it
Great but could have been better. Shawn Michaels is my absolute favorite wrestler.I think the DVD had alot of his great matches but i think they should have included much more extra's and matches.Such as his last match at Wrestlemania 14.And also should have had more commentary. But overall it was enjoyable and worth watching for any of his fans
Lowest of low-budget documentaries is nevertheless fascinating. Dick Proenneke almost lost his eyesight after some diesel fuel splashed into his eyes while on the job.  That was in the early 1960's.  So, he decided that, while he still could, he would take his brains and brawn into the Alaskan wilderness to see if he could carve out a life for himself in some of the harshest conditions imaginable.  Fortunately for us, he brought along a little 8mm film camera to film some of his exploits, and he also kept a daily journal.  35 years later, at the age of 82, he decided that he had proven himself and left his little slice of paradise behind.  Those minus-forty degree temperatures in the height of winter get a little tough for the old bones.The result of Dick's little film clips and his journal is the documentary, "Alone in the Wilderness."  Much of the hour-long DVD is given over to clips of Dick building perhaps the perfect log cabin with his own two hands - even making his own tools.  Even a master carpenter would have to feel a little inadequate watching Dick cut his own lumber, carry logs over one shoulder, build a fireplace and chimney, and even use Alaska's natural permafrost to create his own refrigerator!  This is all after Dick makes several of his own tools - truly amazing.Other segments of the film are simple explorations of the wilderness by Dick and his camera.  Look for some amazing shots of fish, moose, bear, mountain goats, wolves, and most charmingly, a wolverine playing slip-and-slide down a snowy slope.  Proenneke's journals are read in voiceovers by the filmmakers, and he writes with a plain Iowa sensibility ("Winter comes on, quick as a broken shoelace."This is back-to-basics filmmaking about a back-to-basics man.  Yet through this simple film perhaps the simplest questions are asked and answered - how much does a man need, how much can a man withstand, and how much of our modern-day baggage is really all that necessary.  The answers are, in order, not much, a lot, and very little.   An excellent film
"No Disassemble". Nova are a research facility that have just constructed five robots designed for war. After a lightning storm, their Number 5 leaves the group and heads into town, realizing he's alive. Is he alive? That's up to Stephanie Smith (Ally Sheedy) and Number 5's creator (Steve Gutenberg) to find out.I found it a bit hard to sit through when I was a kid, but "Short Circuit" isn't too bad. The robot is cute and the plot is fairly engaging. Worth a look for fans of robots
Medicine Man excellent. Sean Connery is at his best in the movie.  Lorraine Bracco is great. Loved it in the theater so bought it to watch over and over
Add this to your Arsenal  for a Longer Life-Span... Watch this DVD once through and then just jump into it.You will: Sweat, stress-out your big muscles and jump around enough to feel the ol' ticker tick and, yes, you will change your body.There are two workouts included here (listen, whatever you do, do not buy the "Total Body Workout 2"; it is one of the two workouts already in this DVD) a basic but challenging beginner's set and a second more weights-intensive version.Mr. Holland is very effective at motivating you just as he was in the first "Men's Health Abs Diet" DVD. In this one he works alone and in real-time, the workout is longer and stronger. You will use weights, you will do pushups, ab crunches, and Squats. And you will feel the burn...I think this DVD will be a great addition to your arsenal, it will come in handy as you join the battle for good health.Do it
A real winner. I saw the Parents Seal of Approval award winner stamp and I knew it would be great and it was. I bought this for my sister and we watched it together.  Now I now how to take care of my niece.  I finally understand why a baby's head is so soft and why we should be careful holding it.
You will be entertained. This is a very entertaining film that explores many of the situations that young adults must master on their way to understanding themselves and their goals in life.  Primarily this means how to balance work demands and the demands of family and friends. I personally think that the years following college graduation and the first successes and failures in business help a young adult clarify their values and the path or direction they wish to take their life. In this regard, The Devil Wears Prada, is right on the money.Anne Hathaway does a great job playing recent college graduate, Andrea, who takes a job as second assistant to a highly demanding supervisor. Meryl Streep, as editor Miranda Priestly, does a superb job of playing a driven, workaholic, creative power-broker in the fashion industry. Strep's performance was captivating yet not 'over the top'. She never was a cartoon witch, just incredibly demanding and self absorbed. The fact that Meryl Streep can take a character that is totally unique and bring out the vulnerable human qualities attests to her superior acting skills. Watching Streep play the Machiavellian diva is worth the price of the DVD.So what happens to little innocent Andrea? She gradually takes the challenge of trying to please the totally unpleasable Miranda. She gradually masters her job and the field of fashion. She also gradually begins to edge out first assistant, Emily Blunt. Blunt is also superb as she trys to imitate her hateful boss, yet always a softer side comes through. Handsome Daniel Sunjata plays a young designer, dependent on Miranda's good graces and opionion. He is willing to change an entire line of his designs to please her.Simon Baker as a jet set journalist, Stanley Tucci as Miranda's second in command, and Adrian Grenier as Anne's college boy friend, Nate, all allow Andrea to see herself as other see her and as she is gradually becoming. Andrea is almost lost, until she discovers that Miranda's position is in jeapardy, and she comes to the loyal defense of a woman most folks consider to be a monster. But Miranda was already aware of the coup, and is willing to double cross her second in command to remain in power. Andrea gets a glimps into the driven inside dynamics of Miranda and at some point realizes she doesn't want this future - even if she may have the instict and brains for such a world. In the end, Andrea makes the right moves, she does not fall for the chaos and competition, and gets her life and love back.You will remain entertained by the beautiful cast, Hathaway and Streep's superb performances, and the stunning designer clothes Hathaway shows us throughout the second half of the film.
A Free Meal. We were in IHOP and my three yr old grandson was humming the theme song from one of the Little Einsteins' movies.  There was an older couple sitting across from us and I noticed the lady put her arm on her husband and motioned to Darius.  They sat listening to him sing and smiled and nodded.  They left before us and when I asked the waitress for the check she told me the couple had paid it for us.  It was almost $40.00.  All because they were impressed with my grandson's humming and we owe it to the movies.  They are awesome!  Now if only there were action figures and a rocket.
Funnier than anything else on television. More of the same AD. My only complaint is that the episode with Martin Short was out of step with the rest of the show. Worth every penny. Stands up excellently to repeated viewings
Great fun for the whole family!!!. I watched all of these shows as a child. I still enjoy watching them just as much as I did back then. I've never heard my grandkids laugh so much. Great fun for the whole family!!!
one of my favorites. I don't expect anything more of a movie than to enjoy it and be entertained. I don't seek to psychoanalyze or offer up in-depth critique, it's only a movie. I either enjoy it or I don't. This movie is priceless, MacLaine & Dukakis are exceptional. Field can still make me cry. EVERY time
"You're in the way of the Peace Process, Michael". On August 15th, 1998, 3 months after the Good Friday Peace Settlement, a 500 lb. car bomb exploded in the town of Omagh, killing 29 people (one who was expecting twins), and injuring 160. It was the "the most grave and exceptional crime in the history of Northern Ireland," and rumors of government conspiracy and cover-up continue to this day. "Omagh" starts in the early morning hours of the 15th, with the terrorists preparing the bomb, the deadly, horrific scene of the explosion, which was made worse by the misinformed police directing the people towards the bomb instead of away from it. It continues with the inexpressible grief of the families seeking their loved ones in the aftermath. The central focus of the film is the story of Michael Gallagher, who lost his 21 year-old son Aiden in the blast, and to this day seeks justice that is hard to come by, as many government officials from both sides have seemingly stalled the process. Gallagher was told that the Peace Process was more important, and we see his frustration dealing with the authorities as the spokesman for the bereaved families.Directed by Pete Travis, this is a wrenching film with marvelous performances, notably by Gerard McSorley as Gallagher, and Michelle Forbes as his wife Patsy. Brenda Fricker has a small but pivotal role as Police Ombudsman Nuala O'Loan, who uncovered much of the details behind the government inaction. "Omagh" is a riveting but sometimes flawed film, and should be seen for its historical value for those interested in the many years of Troubles in Ireland, and the timely topic of terrorism worldwide. I needed to use the subtitle option, not because of the Irish accents, but because the audio is unbalanced, and at times inaudible. Another quibble is the print used for the titles, credits, and most importantly the aftermath update, is so small it is illegible on my 27" screen. Information on this incident is widely available on the internet however, and one can read that justice has been slow and meager. Total running time is 106 minutes.
Inside Tinseltown. "I used to think that actors made up their own lines" remarks a casual acquaintance.  Movie screen-writer Dixon Steele  retorts:  "When they get to be big stars, they usually do". This 2003 DVD was quietly released in 2003, without any fanfare. There should have been some.  Nicholas Ray's powerful direction of 1950's "In A Lonely Place" is a gaunt inspection of "inside Hollywood", complete with ruthless studio bosses, boozy actors on-the-skids, and one motion picture screen-writer who's fed up with it all.  Dixon Steele meets a young girl at his favorite restaurant, and invites her home to read a story he's considering adapting for a movie. The girl is pretty, but it's just business to him.  She's seen leaving his Hollywood apartment by his quiet neighbor, Laurel.  When the girl is found murdered the next day, the police naturally want to talk to the bad-tempered, wild-living Dixon Steele. Did he fly-off-the-handle again, and knock off the girl?  Humphrey Bogart stars as Dixon Steele.  Flush from success in the late 1940's, Bogart had set-up his own film production company, Santana Productions, and was releasing movies through Columbia. In this period, Santana made three films in a row.  Two were real stinkers, but "In A Lonely Place" is now film classic.  Humphrey Bogart, still in his prime, had perhaps the role of a lifetime. Yes, he was great in "Casablanca", but here, as Steele, nothing is held back. Like Bogart himself, the character of Steele is acerbic, raw, and violent.  A brawler in real life, Bogart wasn't afraid to illuminate his darker side in a gutsy portrayal of a neurotic, almost psychotic reprobate.  Ray's direction is flawless, and this is his finest work(It's even better than his marvelous "Rebel Without A Cause").  His wife(at the time) Gloria Grahame co-stars as Laurel, the neighbor.  A fine cast includes Robert Warwick, Frank Lovejoy, Morris Ankrum, Myron Healey, and in a small part, Jack Webb. The DVD is spotless, with a Dolby Digital 2.0 track. Extras include "In A Lonely Place Revisited", a featurette on restoration, and a Bogart photo montage. Just a few years later, Bogart's health would decline, and meaty roles would become somewhat rare.  But here, just before that happened, is an electrifying performance by a motion picture icon at the top of his game.  A quality DVD,a great story, and amazing multi-level theater. I think I'm going to watch it all again.
sports themes,very positive roles for wendy too. Some of the original British only Bob the Builders had rather restrictive roles for Wendy, very stereotyped into helpless female etc.  These episodes are fantastic on two levels -- Except for the wallpaper Wendy, they all feature ball games, soccer, tennis, mini golf etc.  Very appealing for any little boy.  AND, as a stay at home mom, who does all of the fixing around our house, I like that Wendy takes over very capably when Bob is sick, and acts like an equal partner, rather than just being a secretary sitting in the office and taking phone calls
Excellent, once it gets going. A supercomputer that takes over the world, eh? Sounds like a rather unbelievable plot, except that in this movie they make it believable. That is, if you can believe they'd make the computer in the first place that controls all the nuclear bombs in the U.S., which I had a very hard time believing as most people who make war machines would install some kind of manual safety.This movie starts out optimistic which makes it a bit dull at the start, but about halfway through it becomes very intense. The ending is very chilling, and makes me wish there was another couple hours.I give it 4 stars because it is a bit slow and predictable at the start, but it builds and builds until the end scares the pants right of you
C'MON ALL YOU NAYSAYERS - IT'S  A  H O O T!!!. This is a GREAT film on so many planes, it's simply beyond me that anyone wouldn't love it! It's a HOOT.  It's a black comedy-horror-drama-thiller-action movie with a little kitsch tossed-in just to keep it balanced. Tee hee.It is SMART; it is FUNNY; and it has its moments of horror, tension and well-choreographed military action.The script is superb: It's cleverly written and and just plain makes you smile, okay all you snooty pooties out there?  And make NO mistake, there ARE doses of action, horror, suspense and thrills.Forget the plot; forget the low budget. Let yourself be entertained by another "cult classic".You will NOT be disappointed! Trust me...
Top notch espionage film. A very well-done telling of the ingenious plan to mislead the Nazis before the invasion of Sicily.   It was audacious and elaborate but well-coordinated in its scope to stage the death of an important curiour and make sure his body and papers were found by the Germans in a circuitous manner not to draw suspicion.  It is difficult to measure how well the plan worked but it did indeed have some impact when the Germans believed the ruse.  It seems a difficult kind of story to tell in movie form but this film does it well.  A top notch espionage film
Far from maddening Germany!. "Nowhere in Africa" (2001) is a new approach to the Holocaust tragedy, done now by a German film director: Caroline Link.This film deservedly earned the Best Foreign Film Oscar 2003 and many other international awards.What's new is that follows a Jewish family's destiny far from Germany and yet deeply affected by the political circumstances.This film starts briefly describing the situation of a well-to-do family residing in an increasingly hostile and restrictive environment.Jettel and her daughter Regina are recalled from Kenya by Walter her husband who is already living there since the year before.Here is the first sore spot to be disclosed. It was not only almost impossible to leave Germany but also to find a country willing to receive the migrs. If nations at that period had been less restrictive to Jewish emigration, perhaps tragedy could be mitigated.Jettel is suddenly immersed in a different universe. Different people, different climate, different social position, different...everything!As soon as she is starting to adapt, a new major change occurs: WWII explode and her family is considered as enemy by British authorities.Again turmoil, changes and resettlement, Regina is growing up and she is increasingly assuming the key position of being the cultural bridge for her family.There are several high points in this film.Cinematography directed by veteran Gernot Roll (a TV film specialist) shows Kenyan environment with lucid images.Playacting is just great. Julianne Khler as Jettel shows the difficult metamorphosis from a pampered High-class young woman into a hardened farmer. She will again show her actress proficiency as Eva Braun in "The Downfall" (2004).The two girl-actresses that impersonate Regina, Lea Kurka, the younger and Karoline Eckertz the elder, give a fresh and natural version of a European girl discovering Africa.Last but not least Sidede Onyulo fleshes with deep tenderness Owuor the cooker first and then overseer, butler and confident.It is a great movie not to let it pass by unnoticed!Reviewed by Max Yofre.
All accessories included. I've had this set since it came out, and in anticipation of a newer release, I'm writing in about it.This set is one of my more valued dvds. I absolutely adore Blade Runner, and this set had everything to go along for the ride.If your a collector and Blade Runner is in at least your top 30-50, buy this!i understand it's out of print, but it's worth the extra
Poignant loss of child by two different parents. As both a parent and a grandparent and also having lost a child in infancy, I found this movie extremely satisfying in terms of the emotions it portrayed.  I really got into it.  It's hard to go wrong with the star power involved and they worked well together - I'd like to see more of this caliber - on American TV for a change.The Colone
An underrated gem. This underrated, highly entertaining satire boasts memorable performances, clever camera angles and a spirited production design. Look for a red-headed, scene-stealing Douglas Spain (Walkout, Band of Brothers, Resurrection Blvd) as one of gone-with-the-gays True Directions' "misfits." His climactic tearful speech is both touching and hilarious. Pop the corn, kick back and treat yourself to this delightful romp
CARLY SIMON, VINCE GILL, ELTON JOHN, HEART = A SUPERSTAR DVD. Who better than a collection of music's Superstars to honor the genious of Brian Wilson!!!  Brian is honored beautifully in this stellar collection of his most loved songs & touching remembrances from the master himself!  Standouts include:  The fabulous Carly Simon (with David Crosby & Jimmy Webb) performing 'In My Room';  Vince Gill (whose voice brings tears to the listener) performing 'The Warmth of the Sun'; & Heart performing the classic 'Good Vibrations'!!!  Carly Simon brings magic to EVERY song she performs, so it was wonderful to hear her perform a classic by a fellow performer in her own inimitable style!  And the performance of Vince Gill was just breathtaking.  His voice is amazing.  (The last time I heard 'Warmth of the Sun' performed so beautifully was on an old Melissa Manchester album, one of her finest performances also!)  And of course, Heart rocks out like no one else but Heart can do!!!  You'll recognize the songs - but they're all spotlighted beautifully in these performances by Brian Wilson's adoring musical Superstars!!!  You will LOVE this fantastic DVD!!!!!!!!!!!!
Moore of the same, please!. In the golden years of Television - indeed in the golden years of Entertainment  - quality was important. Performers on TV had honed their skills, during years of endeavour in halls and theatres across the country, perfecting their work. Musicians - of all forms of music - played proper instruments with virtuoso ability. Lyrics could be understood and the musical sound replicated  - because it was written down and 'scored'. Actors, musicians, dancers, etc., all had 'great ability'.Even in this milieu, some performers stood out as exceptional. When thoroughly competent TV directors and skilled television technicians were able to work with these outstanding performers, shows  of exceptional quality and were produced.Mary Tyler Moore had an ability and an aura about her that was rare. The 'situation comedy', a long cherished and much loved TV art-form, seemed to have been made for her and her many skills. Moore's first great TV success was in the Dick Van Dyke Show. Then, when she starred in her own shows, Moore was magnificent.The Mary Tyler Moore Show was produced and directd by consumate experts. Add to this a particularly high standing of casting, which ensured only the best supporting actors,and the Mary Tyler Moore Show was destined to be in the 'Top Flight' of its gendre.Importantly however, unlike the crass and peurile content of so much 'entertainment' today, the Mary Tyler Moore Show ( and other great shows of the era) contained no gratuitous violence, no explicit sex or nudity, and no foul or blasphemous language. The show was humourous without being coarse and was, truly, a delight to watch
Great Movie. Local Hero was a great movie.Was one of the original sea-change concept movies, had great story, good scenery and a great theme song.Would highly recommend it to any age
Great!!. I have an 11 year old and 8 year that really enjoy this DVD.  It is easy to follow for all ages.  They love to do the family part.  Sometimes it is difficult to get kids motivated, but this DVD really helps
~Professor Higgins vs. Eliza Doolittle~ A Review... Pygmalion is the predecessor to the musical My Fair Lady, but saying that, it undoubtedly rings true as the best version of the popular George Bernard Shaw play. This 1938 film version stars Leslie Howard as Professor Henry Higgins, a teacher and hobbyist of phonetics. Engrossed in this trade, he stumbles across a "cockney guttersnipe," flower peddler Eliza Doolittle (played by Wendy Hiller in her film debut). He takes on a bet with his new acquaintance, Colonel Pickering, and proclaims that in a short time, he can transform her into a proper lady and pass her off as "The Queen of Sheba."What follows is rigorous training in dialogue and etiquette. From the famous `Marbles in Mouth' exercise ("I swallowed one!") to the final test at the Transylvanian Ball, hilarity and poignant antics ensue. The film shows us a budding friendship between teacher and pupil, even though said characters come within inches of striking the other down in tense moments of their relationship. Pygmalion shows "how deliciously low" Professor Higgins is. There is only one fault in his seemingly perfect facade (besides his swearing): his unsuccessful attempt to see Eliza not just as a guinea pig, but as a human being under her yowling dialect and uncouth manners. Henry's mother couldn't have put it more perfectly, saying that not once has he praised, petted, or admired Eliza for her work. Because of his lack of feeling towards Eliza, he gets a taste of his own medicine when Eliza threatens to forget and leave him.Traditionally put in the Romance genre, Shaw never intended Pygmalion to be so. In an epilogue for the play that never came into the light, he writes that Eliza and Freddy do get married. He won an Oscar for the film's screenplay, and although in public he loathed having received the award, it was told that he proudly displayed it and showed it off to his friends in private.Pygmalion is one of Howard's great masterpieces. His facial expressions can't be beat, his silvery voice cannot be overlooked, and his physical magnanimity is priceless. Shaw personally picked Hiller to play Eliza and it's crystal clear why he did. She is a treat to watch as a poor flower girl-turned-duchess. Other praiseworthy performances include Wilfrid Lawson as Alfred Doolittle, Marie Lohr as Mrs. Higgins, and Scott Sunderland as Colonel Pickering (Oh, do be reasonable!)DVD wise: Classic black and white. I did find troubles with the closed captioning because on default, my DVD played viewed them. I had to consult my player manual to try and see how to take them off because the DVD itself doesn't offer an option. Comes with chapters and a Color Bar menu (don't know what that's all about!)Pygmalion is a classic! Do not pass up the opportunity to place this in your collection. Whether you're a Howard fan or not, Pygmalion is a movie the whole family will enjoy
Sensual Repression via the 80s. This is a nostalgic bit of filmmaking from the 80s. The sights and sounds are inimitably 80s. However, this is sort of an enigmatic film. As much as it is part of the 80s it seemed to lack the chic timeliness of those days. I don't know why but David Caruso was the one actor who I remember being indelibly connected to it. Every time I think of this film all I can remember is Caruso's screen presence even though he is a minor yet disquieting character. Steven Bauer is very good and gives a heartfelt performance. Barbara Williams seemed rather detached and added to the obscure feeling this film has along with John Getz's performance as well. Bauer, Williams and Getz remain no more than shadowy figures upon recollection, while the production design, cinematography and story remain imbedded in the psyche. The story is interesting and disturbing at the same time and I wonder who really is the thief of hearts in this tale giving the film's ultimate conclusion. I think Douglas Day Stewart's directed only one other motion picture and he is primarily a screenwriter. The film's ambiguous style seems to bolsters that fact. The film is a very provocative mix of sensuality, sexual repression and seems to represents an era when introverted self gratification and glossy lifestyles replace traditional intimate values between otherwise loved ones. Interestingly, this film seems to have a strange allure about it leaving an indelible impression once viewed.
Finally!!!. Thank goodness for Anchor Bay, Blue Underground, Shriek Show, and now, Dark Sky Films. Though the horror genre would truly be in a sad state if not for the efforts of Anchor Bay, sadly, Anchor Bay has recently started expending FAR less of its energy releasing classic horror films and is now for some reason releasing mostly current, straight-to-video garbage. This leaves the task of finding classics like Asylum and releasing them on DVD to other companies. Here, Dark Sky is re-releasing this Amicus classic, which will be remastered, hopefully with an much-improved picture quality. Amicus, a British horror studio from the late 60s early 70s, was one of Hammer's major rivals. Though Hammer films have been treated rather nicely on DVD, Amicus films have sadly been very much so neglected. Specializing in horror anthologies, Amicus put out such gems as The House that Dripped Blood, Asylum, and the equally great Dr. Terror's House of Horrors (one of the studio's greatest films, which has NEVER been released on DVD). Asylum is a blast, and is a must-own item for fans of British horror. It also features some of British horror's most talented actors, such as Peter Cushing and the underappreciated Herbert Lom. It is a great anthology, including one segment where a man taking over an insane asylum discovers that the last man who ran the place is now committed as insane. These anthologies from the 60s and 70s (they all but died after the 70s) are a pure blast, and horror fans should grab as many of them as they can. This one is almost as much fun as From a Whisper to a Scream, the greatest horror anthology of all time! Buy it!
Definitive portrait of Robert Kennedy. I have read just about every book and watched just about every movie that there is regarding Robert Kennedy, and I've got to say that this is, by far, one of the best pieces of work I've yet to see.  The movie was brilliantly put together in a way which captures the audience's attention, allows for us to actually *feel* what Robert Kennedy is feeling, to sense the tension during chaotic times, and most importantly, to understand the wonderful man who made a huge difference for America.This movie is extremely well-balanced, provides excellent insight to the inner mind/heart of Robert Kennedy, and includes many very personal excerpts either via interview or editing of films from Kennedy's life.If you are looking to pick one movie on Robert Kennedy - this is it.  This is THE one you want to watch.  After watching this, you will see Robert Kennedy in a way you never have before.
Nice boxset but the packaging! Ugh!. I won't go on about the contents of this nice boxset as it has all been addressed already, but I thought I should add that upon receiving my shipment today I was dismayed to find all 3 discs rolling around free from their hubs!  This poor packaging virtually guarantees damage to the DVDs...If it wasn't limited I would demand a replacement, but I'm not sending mine back and hope they still have one to replace it.  The replacement would more than likely have the same loose DVD problem anyway.  Boxset 4 stars, packaging (disc protection rated only) 0 stars.  Disappointed
Terrorstorm should wake up the conspiracy deniers. Terrorstorm is an important and courageous film whichshould wake up the conspiracy deniers from their mainstreamtrance.Like holocaust deniers and mafia deniers,conspiracy deniers dangerously providecover and flack for the defense of the standardoperating procedures of evil and deadly combinations.The power elite, the corporate elite, and secret police collaborationsare now so blatant in their criminality and lies that it takes an act ofwill comparable to Oedipus's self-blinding to deny their evil deeds.Alex Jones rips the mainstream veil off the history of false flag operations
Very Enjoyable for the Whole Family!. I was not really a Jennifer Hewitt fan but my kids and I started watching this series and we are hooked! There is enough excitement, enough humor, enough suspense for all of us!Jennifer Hewitt owns an antique shop sees ghosts (dead people who can't move on) and helps them to finish what they left undone here on earth. (Touched by an Angel meets Sixth Sense!) Her husband is an ambulance driver and very cute! There is a dark figure/ghost that waits in the shadows during each episode.You really get involved with the main characters and we are anxious for the new season to begin
A PASSIONATE VALUER!. Kevin Sullivan's TV movie "Anne Of Green Gables" is as unusual in theme as it is beautiful.  On the surface, this 4-hour adaptation of Lucy Maud Montgomery's classic novel deals largely with everyday events (everyday, at least, for Canada's rural Prince Edward Island, in the early 1900's).  But in terms of fundamentals it is a richly romantic story about values and their role in human life.Talented Megan Follows plays the feisty red-haired heroine to perfection.  Richard Farnsworth and Colleen Dewhurst give unforgettable performances in their roles of Matthew and Marilla Cuthbert, the elderly brother and sister who ask an orphanage to send them a boy to help on their farm, Green Gables.  Instead of a boy they are sent 13-year old Anne Shirley by mistake.Anne is bright, imaginative, and talkative, dreamily preoccupied with poetry and tales of romance.  But she is a passionate valuer, constantly searching for a "kindred spirit" or "bosom friend" to share her values with.  Passed from one foster family to another, with no one to care for her, she has known little happiness; but she loves life's promise with an aching intensity that makes her shine out in the midst of her bleak surroundings, and makes her seem "odd" to most people.  Marilla, a hard-headed "realist" who seems almost to have given up valuing, meets Anne's affection with nothing but crustiness, at first.  Matthew, on the other hand, is a painfully shy, quiet, gentle old man, who blossoms for the first time in his life under the warmth of Anne's love.  He is first to realize something it takes Marilla much longer to understand: that they needed Anne even more than Anne needed them.At the beginning of the story Anne is an impractical idealist with her head in the clouds, constantly coming into collision with her surroundings, falling from one misadventure into another.  With the best of intentions, she insults Marilla's friend, gets into trouble at school, is caught trespassing in a neighbor's cow pasture, and falls off a roof.  Marilla shakes her head: "When I said you could stay as a trial, I had no idea you'd take me literally."  Teased at school by a pesky boy who pulls her pigtails and calls her "carrots," Anne breaks a slate over the boy's head.  In despair over her red hair, she tries to dye it and accidentally turns it green.  Finally Marilla begins to soften, as she recalls how her own fiery temper used to lead her into trouble as well.  Thoughtfully, she tells Anne that the girl may now stay with them permanently: "I think you may be a kindred spirit, after all.""Anne Of Green Gables" does not have a complicated plot, but is full of colorful incident: Anne loses her best friend through a misunderstanding, attempts to act out Tennyson's "Lady of Shallot" in a leaky rowboat, lets a mouse get into the pudding, attends her first ball, and saves a baby's life.But her transformation from an impractical idealist to a romantic realist is what the movie is really all about.  This is a highly unusual theme, and it is dealt with better in the movie version than in the original novel.  One character, early in the movie, tells Anne she hopes that life will "shatter this dream-world that you live in;" and eventually Anne does change.  But unlike most people, whose youthful love of life is eroded and replaced by cynicism, Anne's values are merely transformed into practical goals, and she remains as much an idealist as ever.  (The transformation is not actually completed until the sequel, "Anne of Avonlea," which is also noteworthy, though not as good as the first movie.)As an added bonus, "Anne of Green Gables" is beautifully filmed at historic sites on Prince Edward Island and elsewhere.  And Hagood Hardy's benevolent music score is rich in inspiration.  This masterpiece of romanticism deserves to live forever
Fascinating ghost story with plenty of twists. 4-1/2 Stars. I was actually surprised at how well I liked this movie. I am a fan of the 60's through 80's horror. Most of today's movies just concentrate on the gore and the not-so-special effects. When I saw the description of this movie, just had to see it, and was very pleasantly surprised. The scenery was just beautiful, the acting was great, and it just keeps you guessing. Just when you think you have it figured out, another twist in the plot. The ending was not what I expected. This is definitely going in my collection of favorite horror/supernatural movies
Something to learn from. I first saw this movie  during Christmas of 2004. Then I saw it again a couple of days ago. That was a time when I was going through some troubling times and blamed GOd for everything. Bruce Almighty came in just the perfect time to teach me several lessons. BA does teach you a couple of lessons. It teaches you that GOd knows what is going on in our lives and everything happens for a reason. In the movie Bruce (Jimm Carrey)feels like the world is against him. He feels like a loser and that nothing is going right for him and hence blames God for his troubles. His girlfriend Grace(Jennifer Aniston) who is somewhat religious confronts him and tells him to trust God anyways and stop complaining. But her words fall in deaf ears. He somehow meets God where God endows him with all his powers and tells him to take charge of his job. Bruce like every selfish human being thinks only about himself. He becomes the I, Me, Myself kind of a guy. He uses his powers to manipulate people and circumstances but then he cannot affect anybodys free will which is the only thing God has given us as our own. Everytime he thinks of answering peoples prayers he does it half heartedly only for the heck of doing it. He doesnt really pay any heed to peoples needs. There are some real touching moments in the movie. Like the time Grace intercedes for Bruce and the time Bruce walks out on the highway all drenched up, crying out to God and saying I surrender to your will. All along Bruce had been a selfish human being but at the end he makes a selfless prayer to GOd for the one person that matters to him the most. The cast is good with Jim carrey, Jennifer Aniston and Morgan Freeman. The movie is funny but with a little profanity. If you want to consider some soul searching the movie is a must see. You will not be disappointed at all. That's a guarante
larry. ripped pantsjellyfishingF.U.NSB-129texassomething smellsdying for piewormythe graveyard shiftclub spongebo
Brilliant acting by Roth and Ormond. I stumbled upon this video very late one night about two weeks ago, quite by accident.  I was drawn in immediately and held absolutely spellbound by the performances of both Tim Roth and Julia Ormond.  Since then, I have purchased the video and rewatched it more times than I can count, each time loving the movie more.  This is a love story against all odds, a tender, heart-wrenching, passionate love story, of two people drawn together by lonliness, need, and desire.  I agree with one reviewer who said this was one of the most erotically charged films ever seen.   I have never seen Roth portray this kind of character and, I must say, I have become an avid fan and only hope he will take on more roles of this nature.  His performance was riveting, i.e., tender, sensitive, poignant, and very human.  I certainly don't mean to downplay Ormond's performance, it was superb as well.  The chemistry between the actors was incredibly real, both of whom conveyed so much feeling through their eyes, facial expressions and body language.  Since discovering this gem, I have read a lot of the reviews, and I totally disagree with one movie critic who said Roth was miscast in the part. The fact that he does not look like Brad Pitt makes it even more believeable for me.  Roth may not be handsome in the classic sense, but he has a unique look, very sexy, intense, charismatic and sensual.   This movie touches me deeply, I only wish that the ending had not been so rushed.  I would love to see this movie make it to DVD
Battle Royale. Fast shipping, and arrived in great condition, I am extremely content with my purchase
Arguably Oliver Stone's best film. Wall Street is the story of young, naive stockbroker Bud Fox (Charlie Sheen) who is too impatient to go through the right channels to success and instead lets him impatience get him in trouble. Sick of cold calling, Bud Fox goes straight for the big fish... in this case, Gordon Gekko (Michael Douglas) an entrepreuneur who is often written about in Fortune magazine, aka the Bible. When Bud gets involved with Gordon, before he knows it he's losing all his inhibitions, caring nothing about the consequences of his actions, and is involved in an insider trading scam that threatens to ruin his family.Wall Street is arguably Oliver Stone's best film, and has the solid acting, stellar film quality, and impressive use of light and sound to earn itself the title. It's even more relevant in the insider trading obsessed climate of the early 21st century, and I think its tale of backstabbing and betrayal will--sadly--always have a place in modern society. Charlie Sheen shines as a naive, impatient young buck who refuses to take the necessary time to achieve success on his own and instead is willing to cut any corners on the path to fame and fortune. Michael Douglas plays the villain perfectly, without remorse and with no qualms about who gets crushed in the process. For anyone who enjoys Oliver Stone films or impressive drama with a solid cast, I'd recommend Wall Street
NOT BAD - NOT BAD - NOT BAD - ACTUALLY-------. With the title Shoot to Kill -- I was waiting for Jonathan Knox to pull out his rifle [like in Sniper] but ah well.FBI agent Warren Stantin [Poitier] had the obnoxious attitude that went with twenty years on the force, believing he could keep up and survive in the wilderness with Knox.The lead up to our villian's disappearence into the wilderness was quite excellent.  His evasion tactics were unpredictable. [I didn't see it coming].I could see Sarah becoming his hostage and she did a good job of trekking through the mountain byways to a highway.Still had to hold my breath for her safety.Climbing the rock walls and living through the blizzard added a depth to the bonding of these two men.  So different from each other in their outlooks on life, yet they were there for each other.  Stantin on a horse?  Oh, Oh!Them poor ole fishermen, their outcome was inevitable - the finding of them a bit eiry?I had to chuckle at the method of making Mr. Snobby talk - and switching boats? Yep! I was with them on that [almost].Well, once again, Knox saves Stantin - Yep! thoroughly enjoyable - beautiful wilderness scenes - good action - well paced story - not a classic but worht seeing [adults]I will admit that I am a very independent chooser of movies - I go with what I like and not on the advice of others.This would not be for everyone - but is entertainment
One of John Wayne's Best Performances. This post-war made film (1951) about WWII is rather retrospective and honest in its telling of the tale. Wayne is very good here in an uncomplicated role. Mixing, submarines, lurking enemy, and old flings or ex-flings with a lot of macho dialogue (without preaching) along the way, this film does not fail to entertain. George Waggner's direction give a lot of freedom to get his story across.
The History of Goku's Pops. DBZ is one of those mainstream anime that has been able to reach a huge audience of people, namely for its past run on Cartoon Network as well as attempted runs on other networks over the years (I used to watch it on Sunday mornings on Fox, I think, when I was a young kid). Now, it's become a world-wide craze that is only now slowing down because there are no more episodes to see or release on DVDs. DBZ stays alive through movie releases and re-releases.Though Bardock: The Father of Goku wasn't exactly a theatrical movie, but was actually a special previously shown on Japanese TV, it still runs very much like the other movies, acting as a stand-alone adventure. It runs nearly fifty minutes, and follows the exploits of Bardock, a relatively week Saiyan warrior who only barely acknowledges the recent birth of his son, Kakarot (a.k.a. Goku). When Bardock obtains a certain ability to see the future from an enemy on a distant world the Saiyan's have slated for destruction, he begins to see strange glimpses into the future. In these visions, he sees the death of his friends, his own death, and the possible future of his son. Inspired to revolt by these visions, Bardock fights to save not only himself, but the entire future of his people.This movie is probably my favorite of all the DBZ features. It doesn't struggle to fill time with epic, yet redundant battles, seen in later DBZ movies. It actually allows itself to play out and has a surprisingly emotional lead character. Bardock, though certainly not a good guy, learns of the mistakes of his race and tries his hardest to change his ways before he dies. This movie also reveals a little of why Goku is the way he is, why he's willing to die to protect those around him.Like all DBZ movies, though, Bardock is extremely short, and a lot of the time is taken up by the useless screaming and powering-up seen in the series (though not nearly to that extreme). This is a constant problem with all DBZ movies, which is why none of them really ever catch my interest for long. If you aren't a fan of DBZ, avoid this. If you are a fan, then pick this up because it is perhaps the best of all the stand-alone DBZ adventures
Excellent movie. The one line in the movie that made it a hit for me was,"you are worth it." After that, I just sat back and enjoyed the fun and sweetness of this movie
The film is not perfect, but very interesting. Combining different elements of giallo in a highly rational way for sure is strange and disorientating. If you want a mind-puzzler, this is it. DVD quality is very good, and you find the original soundtrack, too
Quirky and bizarre. Bottle Rocket is not a movie you're going to like.  Trust me, you'll probably hate it.  It's comedy is not over the top funny, it's very very subtle.  It's basically just a Wes Anderson movie.  Owen Wilson is a wannabe criminal who has plans to get the local mob boss, his former employer, to notice him and his friends by pulling off a heist at a bookstore.  They go on the lam and hide out at a motel before circumstances send them back home.The funniest lines aren't likely ones you'll notice the first time through.  Talking about tipping the help at the motel, why they wear white tape on their noses when pulling off the bookstore job, Bob Mapplethorpe's description of why he should be in the gang, Dignan explaining why they didn't rob his mom's home...  It's subtle and incredibly funny.This is a comic treat of a movie, but it's one that most people aren't going to like the first time through, unless you've already familiarized yourself with other Wes Anderson flicks like Rushmore and The Royal Tenenbaums.  It's certainly not my favorite movie, but it's really good stuff."She says you're like a piece of garbage...  It sounds better in Spanish.
Can I give this film 6 stars??!!. I have always thought of Diane Keaton as one of the best actresses out there, but her talents are also in directing.  The movie was touching... and amazing performances by Reese Withersoon, Beau Bridges and Patricia Arquette.  I highly recommend this movie.  I bought the movie here on Amazon because it is not at any of the video stores in my area... what a shame.
Mansur's Chappelle Show Season 2 Review. This season was off the hook!  I couldn't believe how hilarious it was.  I was laughing like crazy on almost every sketch.  The bonus disc with unedited interviews with Charley Murphy and Rick James were by far, to me, the funniest!  Definately worth your while
HOUSE OF CARDS. I found it amazing that this set has not been brought more obviously to the attention of the American viewing public, at least those of the PBS ilk. I only found it thanks to a recommenation by Netflix (which alone makes that service worthwhile).  The HOC trilogy is about a ruthless MP who manipulates the system that he is supposed to serve towards his own ends, to say nothing of the people around him. The trilogy happens to play out in decending order in terms of excellence of the script, the first being easily the best. The bite of the satire is sharpened by the device of having Francis Urquet break through the fourth wall to address the audience, often in front of other characters. Face-framing close-ups are used which accentuates the man's menace. And it works because its so bleakly funny and black. Proof that political cynicism as part and parcel of govenment was fully in flower a long time ago
Dana Carvey's best film. Dana Carvey plays a small time conman named eddie whos about to hit the big leagues. He breaks into a house and is mistaken for the housesitter. That's when the movie takes off. He has to play it cool to keep his cover  and not let the girl he loves know he is a fraud
Book & Movie!. The Firm,it`s a great story, and an amazing movie.i`v read the story, and just now, i watched the movie. it`s great to read the story and then watch its movie, you`ll be able to see what you imagined while reading the book!i recomend the firm to all! and if you can get the book and read it first, it`ll be more fun! Trust me!Enjoy
A must see for music/history buffs. The Red Violin is an awesome experience for the lovers of music and history. The scenes, costumes and interplay between the past and the present are so well done, it is a source of non-stop entertainment.Each time I view this movie, I am more impressed with the fascinating, and plausible concepts expressed there in. I recommend it, very much.George M.Hawai
Quick and effective!. I just bought this one recently and tried it today for the first time. I did the first two segments for a total workout of 20 minutes.It's quick, effective and gets your heart rate right up there. There is very little warm-up and no cool-down to speak of (of course, with only 10 minutes per workout, you can't be cooling off half of that time), so just reminding everybody here (especially if you are new to working out) to make sure to take the time to bring down your heart rate after you're done, by walking in place and moving around. Do not stop moving until your heart rate has come back down to normal.It's great and effective. I really enjoyed this DVD and I will be using it regularly
Loan sharking, movie industry? Same animal!. If you take your humor blackGrab your Kona and sit backWatch Chili Palmer work his hustleAs Ray Barboni's hired muscleHe's looking for Leo DevoeA dry cleaner who ought to knowThat when you've markers that are due,You pay them off - that's what you doHe missed a fatal airplane crashFaked his death and took the cashFled Miami for LAAnd Chili goes to make him payHe takes a side job, Harry Zimm(Gene Hackman, remember him?)Who makes a deal with Chili P.To co-produce his next movie.Now Chili Palmer's really hookedWhen at the movie biz he lookedHe even had a movie themeAbout old Leo's crazy schemeBefore they even film one take,Harry Zimm, that sleazy snakeinvolves Bo Catlett with his goonpromising the guy the moonNow Bo Catlett's a slimy catDealing drugs is where he's atHe's got drug money stashed awayWhere the Feds watch it all dayBut then he made another blunderThe delivery boy is six feet underIn comes Mr. Escobar,a caricature of a big drug czarSo now it's all about the doughBut Mr. Lovejoy's still a goKaren Flores used her linkFor Martin Weir to sign in inkWeir's a major movie starShort as cake, below the barIt's called "Get Shorty" after himVapid, vain and oh so dimWith Gandolfini and Bette MidlerThis one's no boring finger twiddlerBig on laughs and full of actionYou'll find it to your satisfaction.Amanda Richards, September 11, 200
Terrific dance video and great exercise!. I bought this dvd because I was out of shape, looking for some variety in my workout routine, and because it was so well rated.Well, I tried it out starting with the intro to African dance moves, went on to the warm up, and barely made it through the first dance, huffing and puffing (I said I was out of shape!). It really felt like a good workout, and had me moving every part of my body.Not only is it a fun workout, but it's a great dvd to watch.  My 89-year-old mother, was so entertained by the video, that she was too absorbed to laugh at me as I tried to keep up while still learning the moves.  In addition, I'm so sure that my eldest daughter (and grandaughters) will love dancing along with this video that I'm back at Amazon to order one for them to enjoy.You really can't go wrong with this dvd.  Even if you're not in good enough shape to really dance along, you can do whatever moves you can to the beat of the drums while enjoying the visual stimulation of the dancers
Four soldiers of fortune on a rescue mission...with a professional code of honour!. The ProfessionalsI recently watched a rerun of this entertaining action-packed movie on cable TV. I remember I had watched it in the theatre during the late 60's while I was still a young college student. It was my second movie with Lee Marvin in the lead cast. The first was Point Blank. Since then, I have always been impressed by him & have seen most of his action movies, including The Dirty Dozen.The Professionals is definitely one kind of a movie about which I can truly say: They don't make them like this anymore! Yes, to me, it is a truly great Western classic.It has a relatively simple plot with a terrific story, even though there were some twists & surprises right through the very end: Four solders of fortune, each was regarded as a specialist in his own chosen field, were hand-picked by a rich Texan businessman to rescue his wife, who had been captured by Mexican rebels. The ransom was US$100,000. The setting was the aftermath of the Mexican revolution.The four soldiers of fortune were Rico (Lee Marvin), a cool & principled tactician & gunnery expert (he was really cool with his pump shot-gun); Bill (Burt Lancaster), a wise-cracking adventurer & dynamite expert; Hans (Robert Ryan), a sensitive & compassionate wrangler; Jake (Woody Stroke), a sharp scout/tracker & archery expert. It was obvious that these were brave men who lived by their tactical expertise & sharp instincts. They were paid handsomely - US$10,000 per head - to carry out the mission.The vast scenery in the movie was magnificent: colourful rocks, barren desert & rugged terrains. Against this enchanting backdrop, many of the action sequences took place, as the four specialists had to skillfully out-manoeuvre a bunch of Mexican desert marauders &/or rebels.The dialogue was often crisp & witty. There were some very memorable lines e.g. as Bill was putting a load of dynamite on the rock, he said to the others: "You light this fuse, you got thirty seconds to run like hell, & then dynamite - not faith - will move mountains into this pass. Peace! Brothers."The most cruel scene was when the four specialists witnessed a gang of Mexican rebels, led by Raza (Jack Palance)  massacred a train load of Mexican soldiers. [In the movie, Bill had explained to Hans the rationale of the rebels' merciless attack. The soldiers were sadistic torturers.]The most exciting part of the movie was probably the surprise attack, planned with military precision, on Raza's fortress & the rescue of Mrs Grant (Claudia Cardinale). It was at this scene that Rico & Bill, seemingly bewildered, began to realise that something was wrong. To their astonishment, Mrs Grant turned out to be Raza's mistress. They were caught in a moral dilemma: Rico & Bill had apparently fought alongside Raza during the Mexican revolution. Both had respected Raza for his ideals. On the other hand, they had to honour their contract to the letter from the rich Texan businessman, Mr Grant (Ralph Bellamy). Rico quickly stopped Bill from killing Raza & eventually rescued Mrs Grant, with Raza & his rebels hot on their heels. The ensuing scenes were beautifully choreographed as Bill set out a diversionary measure to slow down their pursuit, while Rico, Hans & Jake with the rebellious Mrs Grant took off for Texas via a different route.The most touching & climactic scene in the movie was actually the closing scene, when Rico, Hans, Jake & Mrs Grant eventually crossed the border into Texas for a rendervous with Mr Grant & his men. The next scene showed Bill appeared out from a trail of dust at the rendervous with the wounded Raza. Mrs Grant rushed forward with Raza falling into her embrace. Mr Grant then told Rico, Bill, Hans & Jake that they had fulfilled their contract & asked them to leave. Instead, amidst a short scuffle with Mr Grant's men, they quickly put the wounded Raza on to a wagon with Mrs Grant taking off into Mexico. They then rode off into the sunset, with their professional code of honour intact.I have really enjoyed watching this entertaining  action-packed movie once again. The four specialist-characters played very well in the movie, especially Lee Marvin as Rico & Burt Lancaster as Bill who stood out. Jack Palance, a fine actor (I enjoyed watching him in the Bronk TV series), as Raza did his part well too. Claudia Cardinale as Mrs Grant provided some eye candy to the movie.
Amazing!. I was totally amazed with this movie experience. "Piccadilly" was released in l929, just as talkies were coming into vogue, but when you watch this beautifully restored movie, you'll be amazed at what genius/producer E.A. Dupont and his cast and crew did. Cameraman Werner Brandt and set designer, Alfred Junge, stun the viewer with the intricate camera shots and movements. The camera passes over a row of women in the club's dressing room as they put on their make-up...then the camera tracks former Ziegfeld hotcha dancer, Gilda Gray, as she performs her routine. Later, you see Anna May Wong, dancing down in the scullery of the club, and to no one's surprise she is transformed into an Oriental beauty and becomes a smash hit. While all the attention from film buffs and historians is being lavished on Wong, I thought the voluptuous, beautiful and sexy Gilda Gray was just as good. She was famous/notorious for her Shimmy Dance and which made her millions before the Great Depression wiped her out. Here, you watch her in ravishing gowns, dresses, jewels, hairstyles, furs and she comes across bigger than life. A real woman and not one of those flat-chested flappers who were all the vogue at the time. Wong plays the quiet, deep ShoSho with fascinating mastery. In many shots, she looks exactly like Louise Brooks with her page boy hairstyle. The movie itself is enormously expressionistic, surreal and lit magnificently. Each scene is like a painting by a master. One of the extras is the clumsy, akward ten-minute spoken prologue--a nod to the talkies. The movie begins with striking elan as the credits are painted on the sides of double-decker buses in London's Piccadilly Circus. TimeLine has done another masterful job of bringing this long forgotten treasure out into the real world. Another extraordinary movie treasure presented by TimeLine is "The Olive Thomas Collection," another must-see for fans of all persuasions--whether you're a silent buff or not. Bravo to Gilda, Anna and Piccadilly
Great Intertainment!. Great Plot!  A crooked president who only thinks of himself and his needs; a good hearted man named Dave who thinks about others, and the only thing they have in common is their outward appearance. Dave is called upon to sit in for the president and do his job for a while.  Two of the presidents regular staff try to get Dave to do things that is contrary to Dave's character.  So the story goes on from there.  Who will win the battle of crooked verses good in the White House. This dvd  picture was good and clear, the sound was great, and the case was in excellent condition.  If you like warm hearted type movies, then this is the one for you.  I know I have enjoyed it over and over.  To me, Dave is about character, good or bad, and the choices we make in life that can affect others around us.
How far would you go?. Personally, I don't think I would resort to murder, but for the four brothers in this movie there was no doubt how far they would go. Set off by the police force's lack of effort (in their eyes) in finding their adoptive mother's killer, the four brothers take vigilante justice to a whole new level. Nearly lost in the plot of killing, corruption and revenge though is a story about family, loyalty and love, even respect (for the woman who raised them mostly). I was touched by their Thanksgiving meal where they each saw her, except Bobby, who finally saw her at the end. Josh Charles plays another smarmy, dirty cop (like he did in SWAT) and Garrett Hedlund does an amazing job as the troubled, youngest brother who tries so hard to make the older ones proud. A well done piece by Singleton for sure, it could have been set in any large city but he picked Detroit. Interesting. This movie is very gritty and violent, but I was drawn right in and everytime I thought I had it figured out there was another twist
FROM THE "BOSTON TEA PARTY" TO "PAUL REVERE'S RIDE" JOHNNY TREMAIN ENTERTAINS!. "Johnny Tremain" is among the most entertaining historical films ever produced.  Disney's American Revolution films, such as "Dr. Syn Alias the Scarecrow," "The Swamp Fox" tv series, and "Johnny Tremain" are not only enjoyable feature films, they give the viewer a history lesson in the bargain.  Young Hal Stalmaster plays Johnny, who is the son of a rich aristocratic woman who dies, leaving her son a sterling silver cup with the engraving LYTE on it.  Johnny Lyte Tremain is secretly the heir to an English noble family of great wealth.  As the story unfolds, he's caught up in the early stages of the coming American Revolution, with the Boston Tea Party and the Ride of Paul Revere to be played out with great performances by all.  This movie was made for tv, however, plays as a theater release.  The dvd transfer has some glitches and the color is not as vibrant as it should be.  I taped this movie from the Disney channel and my vhs tape copy is more clear and the color has more depth.  I highly recommend "Johnny Tremain" to fans of "Dr. Syn Alias the Scarecrow," "The Swamp Fox" tv series, and to all Disney dvd collectors.  "Johnny Tremain" is a definite essential to American history buffs and makes a great addition to any dvd library.
A Christmas Classic. I am so happy that I found this Christmas Classic, The Year Without A Santa Claus on DVD!  It brings back so many wonderful childhood/Christmas memories!  Plus it has 2 other classics on it.  The quality of it is amazing!  As if they filmed it yesterday!  A great Christmas classic to add to your collection
bad rap. I read some of the revues and was a bit apprehensive about purchasing this set. However, after purchasing all of the other available sets, I think Vol.3 definitely received a "bad rap" as far as quality and content. I have a Magnavox combo dvd/vhs player that cost $89.95. I had absolutely NO problem viewing the double sided discs. There were no skips or freezes. Maybe the problem has been corrected by the manufacturer of the dvd's but I really think that you can buy with confidence. My second "bad rap" is the episode of Mrs. Columbo that is a bonus feature on the set. Any episode with ventriloquist dummies freaks me out (since I watched Twilight Zone and "Dead Of Night". I think that this episode (although probably misplaced on this set) is well worth a watch. All in all, the collection is well worth the purchase and no collection would be complete without it. I can also recommend Vols. 1,2 and 4. I'll let you know abot Vol. 5 in the near future.
1 of the Best Gay Films Ever. ...thanks to a stellar cast. It`s sad, humourous, cynic... but all in all... It isn`t difficult to fall in love with the main characters or even understand the "villain"(read "mother").To me it says: "Make your own happiness. U and u alone are responsable for your life. It`s all u got. Now go on and LIVE IT and don`t sulk!
A Great Christmas Story. My daughter read this story in 2nd grade and now as a young working professional enjoyed it all over again.  There is a lesson to be learned by both young children and adult viewers alike.  I recommend this as a story to be shared with families at the time of year when our attention turns to how many and how much, but this story jolts us back to the real spirit of sharing and caring
Different, but good entertainment. This is an entertaining movie for SCI-FI buffs,but still has a silly and comical kick to it as well.
FACING THE GIANTS. This was an old movie and I was excited to be able to get it.I have watched it at least 5 times it is a great movie
Bringing back childhood memories. Really enjoyed this serial. I'm 56, and can still remember going to the Pitt theatre on saturday mornings to catch the serials. Watching the Phantom brings back a time before America lost it's commom sense and the phrase "politically correct" wasn't heard of
Wuthering Heights. It is one of the best movies you will ever see and one of the greatest love stories of all time. The passion is breathtaking without being sexual and it truly shows the depth of personal emotion on all levels
&quot;THE MAN&quot;. If u want a hella lot of good movies then buy this set.  Thats why i got because al is the man.  So many good roles, not all as good as antonio montona, but by far my favorite actor.  Even though he edged out DeNiro for the top spot, they both are good but the only way to show how good al is, is to get this collection......Just do it..............Forget about i
Amazing, Exciting, Heartbreaking--Just Don't Call it Inspirational. Murderball is a documentary about the US Paralympic Rugby Team and their quest for the 2004 Olympic gold medal, and its also the story of several men, wheelchair-bound for various reasons, from injury to polio, and their struggle to live a normal life in the face of their challenges.  The documentary focuses most closely on one of the star players, Mark Zupan, and the former star player who now coaches the Canadian team and has a strong yearning to beat his former teammates, many of whom consider him a traitor.  Most affectingly, the movie also features the struggles of a newly quadraplegic man who is starting out from the place these athletes once did.  We see him slowly work his way through rehab, learning to use his chair and perform basic tasks all over again.  It's thrilling to see the way he comes to life when he meets Zupan and has his first try in a rugby wheelchair.I saw the movie several weeks ago but it has stayed with me, particularly the story of the newly injured young man and the glimpse of Iraq vets in rehab taking their first stab at wheelchair rugby.  While the drama of the medal quest is exciting and suspenseful, the parts I remember are the private glimpses into these men's lives:  the slow and painstaking process of dressing and getting in and out of the chair, the discussions of whether and how "quads" have sex, the relationships between the men and their loved ones.  It was an exciting and eye-opening movie.Be sure to check out the extras and commentaries, especially the Jackass special with several of the rugby players taking part in the same goofy, painful stunts that the Jackass guys usually engage in--almost as much fun as the movie itself!
Excellent. This is an excellent movie about love and how easy it is to fall in love, literally
found it at last. my wife has always talked about this movie she saw when she was still young. she was not sure what the title was but remembered that it was a musical about a girl and a pirate prince and that the songs were very good. wanting to please her, i've made it my mission to find "that movie". the search obviously started in video stores, yard sales, and friends. i discovered amazon while looking for books about airguns. and, lo and behold! there was a video section so i checked it out. the rest, as they say is history. i'm a happy man with a very happy wife
Great episodes. HelloI am really enjoying these releases. Only 1 complaint. There is over 190 episodes to be released. If Lions Gate continue at this rate, it would take about 15 volumes to complete the whole set.Could they not release complete Season boxsets for this show or the releases will just go on forever?But yea loving reliving these episodes.AARO
funny movie. next friday was so much better than the first one. with much more funnier scenes. and this movie is reccommended for everyone
Great video. My kids age 2 and 5 love this video.  They both want to practice fire safety now and are much less scared.  It is a good platform to jumpstart a very important topic
Great Movie, But Rather Violent. I and my children loved this movie, however I'd like to caution parents who have smaller/sensitive/impressionable children. The movie has quite a few violent spots and the "authority figures" display a LOT of bigotry. The bigotry the police have towards the gypsies is prevalent throughout the entire movie and there are some spots where they brutalize the children's father as well as the horse. If your children are sensitive towards animal suffering or physical violence, you might want to view the movie by yourself first and then make sure you sit with them or skip those parts.Overall, great movie -- just take care with the viewing
Below the Radar. Many people have never seen or heard of this movie, but it's great with a killer cast
Beautiful!. Many say that books are always far better then the movies. I agree with this. I read the whole entire series; from Anne of Green Gables to Rilla of Ingleside. I devoured every single one, enjoyed all the characters and was sad when I finished reading them.But I have to say that the movie is very, very good!Megan Follows did a superb job portraying Anne, Jonathan Crombie was so good being Gilbert. Every single actor did a beautiful job and made their personalities come alive.I have heard myself say, "They shouldnt have made a movie from the book, they ruined everything by doing so."But when I watch Anne of Green Gables, I can say that this is different.They only brought more to the story in a different way.Anne of Avonlea is another continuation to the story, and I loved that one just as much.I will have to say though, that Anne of Green Gables The Continuing Story disapointed me very much.They changed the plot, the characters were still what you loved but the joy you usually felt when you watched the first two isn't felt when you watch this one.It was so different from the book that it made me mad.The part I do like about it though, is when Anne and Gilbert get married, its a bittersweet yet lovely part of the movie.And at the end when Anne finally finds Gilbert, its a beautiful moment too.So my opinion is this: Buy Anne of Green Gables, and Anne of Avonlea, the story is told in a beautiful way.But only rent Anne of Green Gables The Continuing Story, don't buy it
Stiff Upper Lip Action Adventure. ZULU is a good stiff upper lip Military action adventure film directed by Cy Endfield. The battle sequences and their buildup are spectacularly staged. This is a suspenseful and very moving film thanks to an outstanding cast including Stanley Baker, Michael Caine, James Booth and Nigel Green and John Barry's incredibly dynamic score. I just wish this copy was in stereo.
A tangled web of breaking social codes. This was Winslet's pre-Titanic post-Heavenly Creatures film baed on the Thomas Hardy novel. It's a story with very shocking social themes for the period setting: cousins in love, one being married to a woman who has committed bigamy, illigetimate children, fratricide, social exclusion, poverty, adultery, and all sorts of class struggles made harder by very unpopular social choices. The film is long, detailed, complicated, and there is an unusual chemistry between Winslet and her co-star. It's hard to day what the theme or "moral" of the story is but does lend itself to social commentary. The characters are victims of many social demands of the time and prove that doing everything in the name of love can be a very bad thing. They just can't get ahead in life because of their choices. In the end the love destroys both of them with Winslet turning to religion in repentance and her cousin/lover forced to live alone and in yearning for her
One of the best movies ever made, one of the best DVDs ever made. "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is one of the best films ever made and Fox has recently released a fitting two disc DVD edition of the film. Fitting because the DVD is one of the best I have ever seen.Directed by George Roy Hill and written by William Goldman, the God of screenwriters, "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" stars Paul Newman, Robert Redford and Katharine Ross. How could a film with this pedigree be anything but good?What you may not realize, or know, is that this film made Robert Redford the star he is today. Paul Newman, already an established star having appeared in "Hud", "Cool Hand Luke" and "The Hustler", among others, was a bankable star and the film was made because he agreed to make it. Initially, he wanted to play the Sundance Kid, but eventually settled on the role of Cassidy. Robert Redford was not new to film, but he was nowhere near the icon he would become. He had some early success which was followed by a few clunkers. The pair became a match made in heaven and would go on to appear in more films together. On screen, they appear to be friends, much like their characters, and this adds to the charm of their relationship.Redford clearly recognizes the influence this film had on his career. His famous film academy and film festival are named after his character in the film.Butch and Sundance decide to rob the mail car of a train owned by a powerful rail baron. Butch is tired of the work and wants to retire, but he needs one or two big scores to set him up. After blowing up the rail car, they run off with the loot and hide out in a small town, at a brothel they frequent. Meeting up with the rest of their gang, they quell a revolt and decide to do one more job. They will rob the same mail car on the same railway, on its next run through the area. It is the perfect crime, no one would suspect the same train being robbed, so it will probably be loaded with money. After blowing up the car for a second time, they notice another locomotive speeding towards them and a crew of men on horseback alight from the car and give chase, chasing Butch and Sundance, and their two accomplices, for days, across many terrains. Finally, they realize the rail baron has hired a famous Indian tracker to help a band of men, including a former sheriff who is now a famous bounty hunter, catch the duo. After the chase, they return to the home of Ella (Katharine Ross), the Sundance Kid's girlfriend. Tired, they decide to leave the country and travel to Bolivia and begin robbing banks there.As I watched this DVD of "Butch Cassidy", two things quickly became apparent. This film is virtually timeless. With the lone exception of the song "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head", the film could've been made yesterday, the images are so clear. The second is that the DVD print is one of the most beautiful transfers I have ever watched. The cinematography by Conrad Hall (who would later work on "American Beauty" among others) is simply stunning and brings out all of the rich detail of the landscape. Everything is crisp and clear, when it is supposed to be, colors are bright and vivid, it's just beautiful to watch. It doesn't hurt that the stars are two of the most handsome men to ever appear in film, at the prime of their careers, and one of the most beautiful women to ever co-star. How did anyone get past all of that eye candy?The key to becoming fully invested in this film is William Goldman's screenplay. He introduces the characters in action, we learn as we go, and they are almost always moving, or doing something. Goldman fills their mouths with witty dialogue, showing us how their relationship works, and they are instantly likeable to us. This is basically a love triangle with Ross' Ella playing the go-between. The two men have a very close friendship, enjoying each other's company. But Cassidy loves Ella as well, even appears slightly jealous until he realizes his friend is the recipient of this woman's love, so they get along. Then, there is the famous chase. The railway baron's men chase Butch and Sundance for days, taking up a significant chunk of the film. But this scene proves to us how committed the two men are to each other and makes their future trek to Bolivia all the more believable. We have to believe there is a real threat and these men never let up on the chase, if they catch Butch and Sundance, they will be killed. As soon as they reach Bolivia, Goldman has a lot of fun with the characters again, exploring their relationships, rebuilding them in a way, and making them light hearted again. It is almost amazing to watch this film because if a studio executive were presented with the same screenplay today, it would probably not be made. It doesn't hit plot points at pre-determined pages, it tells an unconventional story, and we never actually see the villains. Goldman had the luxury of writing this film during a period in which studios were still able to work with somewhat unconventional screenplays. Of course, they wanted to make money as well, but they still considered film an art form.George Roy Hill is an underappreciated director. I think a large part of this is because many of his films are very humorous. Comedy is not as highly respected in Hollywood as drama, even though making a good comedy is much more difficult. So I suspect the humorous elements of most of his films made him less respected in Hollywood, but when your films are as good as "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" and "The Sting", you deserve some respect. He made his share of duds, but when he passed away a few years ago, Hollywood was robbed of a talent ready to make at least a few more classics.During this period, big screen Westerns were becoming unpopular. Perhaps the dearth of television westerns was keeping the public out of the theaters, but this genre was considered risky at the time. Recent films starring Burt Lancaster and others were failing to light the box office fire. The second disc contains a new "Making of" feature including interviews with Newman, Redford, Ross, former studio executives David Brown and Richard Zanuck and more. Zanuck reveals that he took a real chance in greenlighting this film, but fought for it all the way. He also haggled with Hill and the filmmakers, in an attempt to keep the budget under control; he became concerned when the film was projected to cost about $7.5 million (consider the average studio film now costs at least $125 million). But the film would go on to be a big hit. Such a huge hit the filmmakers followed this with the equally popular "The Sting".The second DVD also contains some archival interviews with the stars, some trailers and more.In the "Making Of" documentary, they discuss the inclusion of the song "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head". People fought against it but Hill and composer Burt Bacharach felt it would be the perfect accompaniment to the scene of Butch and Ella riding a new-fangled bike through her barn yard. It does work, but it is clearly not a fit for the period depicted in the film, and is the most dated element within the film today. It just seems silly today."Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is a superlative example of the treatment all classics should receive on DVD. This is a film every DVD library should have
IT'S NO &quot;ANALYZE THIS&quot;, BUT FUN ROMP THRU A DOOZY SITUATION. Witty theme, darker than you'd expect and with some dead-serious undertones (Burt Young's character, for example, is *scary* without a trace of humor) but this is totally appropriate in context and gives the movie a punch that many comedies lack. Hugh Grant's comic timing took me by surprise, as did Jeanne T's convincing rendition of a mafia don's daughter. James Caan was actually the reason I picked this DVD up and did not regret it. Very worthy spin for an evening if you like atypical comedies in general or mafia comedies in particular
"We're on the island of misfit toys.....". He's not just a misfit you nitwit!  Go Rudolph and Herbie
A Good Movie. Like Halloween 3, people were disappointed that the famed killer doesn't make an appearance in the film, but people also forget that the original movie didn't have Jason in it either. Overall, I really do enjoy this movie and I found it really well reason. At the end of the film, they actually give a reason as to why all of the killing in the movie happened, and it is very similar to the reasons Mrs. Voorhees had in the original film. No, Jason is not in this movie, but it is still very interesting and good. However, if you are looking for Jason, you won't find it here.
Still an unbeaten classic. Still a favorite movie, the story of a small-town couple trying to break into the big time in the big city.  Jack Lemmon is George, seeking that big job that will launch his career and his family income to new heights.   He is supported by his wife (Sandy Dennis) as they both struggle to adapt to a very different and less than friendly environment in New York city.   The situations and hardships they must endure set them up for some classic Neil Simon comedy.A remake with comedic giants Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn, and John Cleese is fair but still cannot improve on the original despite the stellar cast.  In addition, the ending of the remake is not nearly as satisfying and "right" as the original. Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis are still the best out of towners
wonderful Crawford and Huston. the first time i saw the film was when i saw it in the sale in virgin mega stores.so i picked it up and  put it on straight away a soon as i got home and i was totally amazed with Crawfords wonderful performance and also was amazed with Hustons performance too.in RAIN Crawford plays a prostertute called sadie tompson , who has ran away form her old life in  san francisco.but as soon as she arrives at this hotel at pongo pongo she already gets into trouble as soon as she  enters the hotel by this preachers wife .but later she has a run in with the preacher (huston). which isn't  good for her . huston  hypnotises her with prayers and it makes her want to go to san francisco.but huston in the ends slashes his throat and sadie turns back to normal.its one of the best films crawford has ever made
are you next?. Joanna Eberhart has decided to get away from the chaos of the big city and moves with her husband and kids to the town of Stepford. at first, it seems like a perfect, quiet, and just to good to be true. everyone is friendly, the town has all the accomidations, and its family friendly. but theres something off about the town. for one thing, the wives are to...perfect, to bland, and just seem content with living in a kitchen. as Joanna meets another woman who suspects something odd, they begin to investigate but there investigation will lead to the towns most darkest secret and for Joanna, she will soon realize that in a matter of time...she's next. the original version is definently more close to Levin's novel were nothing is what it seems and the director keeps the film in a taut sense of dread. the actresses also bring exeptional performences and the ending is so shocking, it will leave people breathless. so if your looking for a frighting film, this is the one for you
An Original Nail Biter!. This is, in my opinion, the best movie of Summer 2004!  Way better than that overrated "Dukes Of Hazzard" [...] of a movie.  This is a totally original idea, and the action keeps you on the edge of your seat without ever dying down!  It's not one of your typical crash or hijacked airllne movies.  It takes a different direction in airplane movies with a large amount of great suspense!  Great "spine shivering" script too
My favorite. I've watched all seasons of the Gilmore Girls, and while I enjoyed the first season and managed to live through the Jess seasons, I found season 4 to be my favorite.  Rory grows up a little bit, gets a haircut, goes to college and I enjoyed watching her struggle with that (perhaps b/c I liked college.)  I wasn't crazy about the Jason/Lorelei thing at first, but it grew on me.  I did not like the choice Rory made to sleep with ex-boyfriend/now married man Dean, but at least Lorelei did not respond positively to it, and we saw the negative repercussions of this choice.  The characters grow, which makes a difference.  This is definitely an enjoyable season to watch.  (The fifth and sixth seasons were all downhill storyline-wise.
Rebus DVD. There is nothing like a good British mystery. The Rebus series of mysteries is full of twists and surprises. Rebus is very believable and homespun and quirky. Great watching for a cold evening
The Bosnian Apocolypse Now!. One of my half Serb, half Croat friends recommended this movie to me.  This movie really paints a picture of life surrounding the 93-95 war.  It reinforced a lot which I learned when I was over there, after the war.  May be difficult for some in the West to fully understand.  It made Apocolypse Now look pretty tame.  There was nothing held back in this movie.  I recommend it to anyone interested in recent events in the Balkans.
Best actress, best picture. I very happily give this movie 5 stars.  It is wonderful.  Barbara Stanwyck steals the show with her wit and her charm.  She's amazing.  The supporting cast is great too, and I include Henry Fonda in the supporting cast, because it is Barbara's film and Henry is just the foil she plays on.One of my favorite scenes comes early when Barbara takes Henry's head in her hands and toys with him, driving him crazy.  Another wonderful scene is just before she meets him, when she is analyzing all the other women who are ogling him on the boat.  But I can name pretty much every scene in this film as a special one.So many of the old time movies are overrated.  This one isn't.  This one doesn't miss a beat through all the intervening years, and if it was released today just as it is, it would deserve the Oscar for Best Picture of 2005, while Barbara Stanwyck would easily win Best Actress of 2005.  There is no one today who could touch her in this performance
BRAVO!. I really don't know what I could add -- especially to the cogent comments of earlier reviewer Ms. Anna Wolfson and Amazon's own Mr. Joe McLellan -- to help you decide whether this is worth your while. ...Except to write BRAVO!"Bravo!" to the producer, writer, and editor of the documentary, Jason Starr -- it really is a revelation in how a DVD can meld with music and the other arts to produce something extraordinary. And on my home computer! THIS is what I have waited a lifetime for, to see technology woven with art woven with theology and philosophy. I can only smile at thinking what Mahler and his friends, and Wagner and the Wagner Societies 100 years ago, would have thought ... if only. They thought art - and its prophet/artists -- had the power to change the world. Perhaps it does; perhaps it has. Perhaps it is the reason we are still here, today, despite all that has happened at our own hand so catastrophically, tragically, this century ...This DVD is such a work of inspiration and love, itself, that I pity the intellect so calcified as to remain unmoved, who refuses to rise to the challenge but instead reverts to ossified, abstract thought to reduce art to its entertaining qualities. The DVD, like Mahler's symphony, attempts to unite multiple elements of art toward a whole, to recharge minds and spirits. Both media succeed, here, on the strengths of the other.I only wish there were ways of featuring this selection on the classical CD side of Amazon.com, so the music listeners there might also have opportunity
Steve is great!. I agree with the comments about bad musical arrangement in "Beacon Theatre", but the band is 50 times better in BT than "Pull Over". Russ Kunkel is absolutely atrocious at the drums and extremely un-versatile, while Steve Jordan is running around the stage trying to get to his different precussion instuments. There may have not been enough classic hits in BT, but Steve entertained us through it. Also, what's up with "Junkie's Lament", "4th of July", and "Frozen Man" being in here? There's no energy or tempo in them, they're too loungy and Panera-ish, and they were never hits. "Pull Over" is great, but get "BT" first. Steve will amuse you, and you get the very-entergetic song "Jump up behind me" which will have you jumping up behind people for days with energy. Great concert!
great. An absolute absurd, ridiculous and fun movie. Elizabeth Shue at her most beautiful, clever, if silly, script and not even bad filming. All in all. Great popcorn stuff
are you ready to SLAM?????. Ok, I just got into slam recently... I live in Rhode Island so I am very into the Providence poetry scene. This documentary is wonderful for anyone who wants to know what Slam is all about and how a national poetry slam works.... Taylor Mali is awesome in his performance, as well as Jack McCarthy, Patricia Smith, Saul Williams... anyone intersted in any aspect of performance poetry should go get this movie!
It rubs the lotion on its skin or else it gets the hose again. I can't believe I never reviewed The Silence of the Lambs yet, simply because it is in my top 10 favorite movies ever made. Despite my father's best efforts to keep me from seeing it when it released, I still got my chance and I still love this movie like no other in my collection. I've always been fascinated with serial killers and this movie fueled my fascination even further.If you haven't seen this movie yet, I can only assume you've either been living in a cave this whole time, or you were too young to watch it when it came out. Either way, if you're one of the few people on this planet who has not yet watched it, go now. With so many reviews covering the plot, I won't go there, but if you like thrillers and serial killers and you've never seen this, you won't regret it. It's one you should own, not rent. It's timeless and amazing and it's worth it just for Hopkins' performance alone. Red Dragon and Hannibal were interesting and fun as well, but they have nothing on Silence of the Lambs. It will always stay in my top 10 favorites.
Awesome movie. Great movie with an awesome cast.  It is a great portrayal of historical figures with a great story line & cast to carry the film
A Must Have... Great Movie. A must have for any fan of gangster films. Check it out..
Hitch. This movie was hilarious! Although I thought with Will Smith in it, it would have been a little better. I would definitely recommend this movie to anyone who wants to have a laugh
Excellent story, score, setting, & actors. I've had the VHS tape of this for years & I pull it out everyonce in a while to view it again.  I bought the DVD as the tape was getting a bit worn.  The score sounds even better.  I guess that's what really cements this movie together for me is the John Williams score.  Recently, I've even bought the CD Sound Track.The world politics has changed, but it's still a damn fine Le Carre novel
Good movie. Was a great movie watched it with my son. And really is entertaining for adults and children
Kind of Makes Me Wish I Had A Sister . . . Foremost, I gave this film four stars because the end-product is pretty impressive considering the fairly scant budget (I'm thinking Mimi Rogers probably took about a quarter of that five mil). So, while it is not the quality of higher budget films, it does take some significant risks . . . which is tremedously refreshing.Both Emily Perkins and Katharine Isabelle (who play sisters) do a fantastic job with their roles! And, like others said, their chemistry is surprisingly vibrant. Likewise, Kris Lemche (who plays Sam, a young "horticulturalist") is shockingly engaging. (If anything, I'm actually glad to see him in a role which demonstrates his immense talents . . . Final Destination III nearly destroyed his career!!) As far as "the talent" is concerned, there are no "bad" actors here . . . in fact, Mimi Rogers' dedication to this indie-horror was AMAZING! (Her portrayal of a well-intended, but completely oblivious suburban mom was spot-on!)As others noted, the special effects are, well, not good. BUT, that's okay!! Because special effects do not reside at the heart of this film (who needs another Sky Captain and the World of Tomorrow?!) Instead, we have a film which catalogs the (potential) trauma of being an adolescent with striking honesty. And while the comparisons to De Palma's Carrie are legitimate, it is VERY important to note that Carrie's telekinesis was triggered by the onset of menstruation (it was DORMANT, waiting to awake), Ginger's transformation is not the result of a dormant power . . . she is merely a victim of circumstance. I think this is a REALLY important distinction . . . and each  are equally as interesting!! Each makes its own statement about adolescence.Moreover, I appreciate how this film addresses the science behind folklore. This is a new trend in horror . . . and contributes an element of realism to the most unrealistic of situations (We see this is 28 Days Later and in the Dawn of the Dead remake). The idea of "infection" is a very appealing one!! And, the explanation of how the "cures" work, very interesting!!This film is an overall success. The script is solid, the acting is great, the premise is "smart," . . . the cinematography is adequate at best (but don't let so-so filming deter you!!) It shows the complex bond between women in a respectful way (especially the relationship between the mother and the daughters). If you approach the film as "low-budget horror" I think you will be pleasantly surprised . . .
Mao Tse Tung. A&amp;E Bibliography captures the essence of Mao's life and the chinese people of his time.  This video provides insight into China's communist government and the peoples reaction to it by interviews with chinese students, peasants, and former goverment officals all who knew Mao.  The bibliography of Mao Tse Tung gives a living history that is a must see
Very interesting movie about a true story. I think this is a fascinating movie. It is based on a true story and I think it should be watched because it is about fighting terrorism, a major American and global issue of our time.The movie takes place in the seventies or eightees. Sword of Gideon was a famous covert operation of the Mossad, the Israeli secret service, to find and kill terrorists hiding in various European countries who were responsible for previous terrorist attacks that killed civilians, particulary the attack on Israeli athletes at the Munich Olympics in 1972.A group of agents, led by an IDF officer named Avner, is sent to Europe to locate and kill the terrorists. The terrorists are hiding throughout different cities including Rome, Paris, and others. Each of the agents has special skills. One is an expert in making explosive devices, another in creating documentation, another is a former race car driver (getaway expert), and another is a good agent for securing the scene.At first, the mission is going well but as time goes on, the agents are somehow being discovered and also killed off one by one while also killing the terrorists.At the end, relations between Avner and the Mossad deteriorate as the issue is raised: was all the bloodshed worth it.
"I'm Sorry I Just Do Cigarettes"  ~  The Quest For Immortality. `Close your Eyes' released in '01 is an expertly crafted occult tale dealing with the possibility of transferring individual consciousness from one body to another, from the old to the young, from generation to generation thus achieving a form of personal immortality.While conducting a hypnosis session aimed at curing police officer Janet Losey (Shirley Henderson) of her smoking habit, Dr. Michael Strother (Goran Visnjic) experiences a brief but vivid vision of a young blonde girl floating just below the surface of a body of water. He inadvertently mentions the girl to his patient after the session only to discover that she had been thinking of the girl. Her name is Grace (Claire Rushbrook) who just happens to be involved in an ongoing investigation dealing with a series of kidnappings and ritualistic killings of children in the London area.Against his better judgement Dr. Strother agrees to assist in the case and hypnotizes the little girl who has been mute since her escape from her kidnapper. During the session the Doctor envisions a sinister, bald Crowleyesque individual surrounded by occultic signs and symbols. It appears black magick maybe involved.Is there an evil sorcerer or black magician loose kidnapping children for some dark, unknown purpose? Does this evil person really exist and if he does will the psychic abilities of Dr. Strother be able to help find him before any more children turn up missing?`Close Your Eyes' is one of those undiscovered gems that film fans love to stumble upon. The storyline is well thought out, the sets excellent and the film exudes an eerie, unsettling atmosphere absolutely perfect for the subject matter. As for the acting, Goran Visnjic is excellent. He is fast becoming one of my favorite actors. Another personal favorite is Paddy Considine who has a small but important role as Elliot, an occult expert who helps decipher some of the markings and sigils discovered during the investigation.If you're in the mood for a good scare and a sleepless night give it a try
A pleasing little English comedy from the middle of the Ealing pack. With a little stretching, Ealing Studios traces its origins to a studio set up in London in 1896.  An Ealing Studios currently exists and is boasting, even as I write this, of a remake of "The Belles of St. Trinians" to be released later in 2007.  To most movie fans, though, Ealing Studios is vaguely remembered as the home of a handful of respectable dramas, such as "Scott of the Antarctic" and "The Ship That Died of Shame."  Its fame comes from a series of excellent and intensely British comedies that defined a genre: the Ealing Comedies.The great days of the Ealing comedies were crammed into little more than a single decade:"Hue and Cry" (1947)"Passport to Pimlico" (1949)"Whisky Galore" [US: "Tight Little Island"] (1949)"Kind Hearts and Coronets" (1949)"The Lavender Hill Mob" (1951)"The Man in the White Suit" (1951)"The Titfield Thunderbolt" (1953)"The Maggie" [US: "High and Dry"] (1954)"The Lady Killers" (1956)"Barnacle Bill" (1957)I have a few stirrings of memory relating to the first run of "Kind Hearts and Coronets" in my hometown of San Francisco.  I certainly remember a junior high school friend being bowled over by what must have been a revival a few years later.  He recited the whole plot, along  with stretches of dialogue.  When I first saw it a, not so very long after that, I was surprised to find how accurate he'd been.When "The Lavender Hill Mob" and "The Man in the White Suit" turned up, I saw them at the first-run theaters.  "The Man in the White Suit" was the first movie I ever returned to a theater to see again in the same run.  The later films were far less prominent, but they all made it into San Francisco and I saw them.  Each one of them, however, cut by--oh, say 200 commercial breaks, became a staple of daytime, local television programming, as often as not in the 3:30 to 6:00 PM after-school ghetto."The Titfield Thunderbolt" was Ealing's first comedy in color--something that was still a big deal in 1953.  It is a mellow little picture, lacking the sharp, go-for-the-jugular wit of the Alec Guinness vehicles, "Kind Hearts and Coronets," "The Lavender Hill Mob," "The Man in the White Suit," "The Lady Killers" and even the lesser "Barnacle Bill."  "Thunderbolt's" Ealing peers were the Little-England-oriented, ensemble outings, "Passport to Pimlico" and "Whisky Galore," in which small communities spontaneously come together in the face of some (preposterous) necessity.  In "Thunderbolt," semi-rural villagers living not far from London face up to the closing of their branch line rail service by running their own one-train system."Thunderbolt" is on nobody's list of great pictures but it is unquestionably a good movie.  It had the misfortune to appear at about the same time as "Genevieve," a truly brilliant comedy (also in color) from rival Pinewood Studios.  "Genevieve" mines the same veins of nostalgia and good heartedness, but with much tighter script and sharper focus.If you must choose between the two, go for "Genevieve."  Nevertheless, "The Titfield Thunderbolt" is warmly amusing, good to look at and well worth seeing.DVD Minutia: When I looked at this edition in a friend's collection, it appeared to be a good print in a barebones presentation.  Yer pays yer penny an' yer gets yer movie, that's all
It's almost time to lock up the house and then your party will really begin. I wonder how it will end... This was a very good movie that I watched in my "Horror Classics Collection: 50 Pack" (ASIN: B0001HAGTM) that I got from Amazon (for under $20.00!).  So first off, I would recommend buying the 50 pack where you get 2 other Vincent Price movies (The Bat and The Last Man On Earth) and 47 other good movies for almost the same price as buying this movie by itself.  As far as this movie goes, there are a few suspenseful parts and you wonder what is going to happen.  Mainly, the movie will give you some memorable quotes, as Vincent Price will always deliver with that great voice of his.  All of the characters do a good job acting (and the typist has a great scream!).  Some parts seem to be a bit unbelievable and some questions don't seem to get answered, but who really cares?  At only 75 minutes long, this movie is better than most of the horror movies that come out today that are unoriginal and go for shock value.  So while this might be more of a murder mystery than a "horror" movie, it is worth a watch and you'll be satisfied at the end...unless of course, you do not like black and white movies, and if that is the case, then you probably wouldn't be reading this review.  P.S. I love in Gary F. Taylor's review when he says: "Price plays it in a slightly prissy, very high-camp manner with a tremendous dose of the black humor for which he was so famous."  That's so true
A  Cool Masterpiece!... It was really a pleasure to see this DVD and realise the renewed personalities of drummer Roger Taylor and guitarist Brian May. If you remember after that Freddie passed away (RIP), they were really in a dark, gloomy mood. I don't remember their tranquility and peace of mind in an interview, since all happened, 6 years ago.This DVD really is illustrative with an extensive analysis of the recording process song by song with Roy Thomas Baker and Brian May (I don't know if it had would been better to add the comments of Roy Thomas Baker about the making of "Bohemian Rhapsody" that appear in "THE MAGIC YEARS" vol. I), special Roger's drum demostration (almost a clinic!... If you aren't a drummer, with these tips you can understand better the Roger Taylor style), with good introspective interviews (and the reason of the John Deacon's disappearing of the musical scene), with people that lived the bankrup of the band in '74, and finally, the making of an extraordinary masterpiece: the A NIGHT AT THE OPERA album. It's interesting see the live footage and performances between one and another interview, and a good example of this is the live track "SWEET LADY" from the DVD LIVE AT THE HYDE PARK, '76... Good Luck!
Brilliant. One of the best movies ever.Val Kilmer and Micheal Douglas were a fantastic
Judy Davis is INCREDIBLE!!!!. Ms. Davis gave (in my opinion) a flawless performance. I have seen this movie many times and Judy Davis portraying the incomparable diva, Miss Judy Garland, grabs me everytime. She is just perfect. ALL STARS for Judy Davis!!
Way Ahead of Their Time!. The content this DVD brings to the table is absolutely hilarious. Rodney does small stand-up bits in the beginning and then introduces a killer line-up of young comedians. Ironically, each person Rodney showcases is a big star now. You will be surprised when you see talents such as: Tim Allen, Jerry Seinfeld, Jeff Foxworthy, Andrew Dice Clay, Bill Murray and many more.Rodney transitions between acts by performing skits (usually off stage or on set). These are equally if not more entertaining than the bulk of the program.I highly recommend any one of these DVD's from this collection. However, I must warn you that even though these are dated, the content is still very questionable for this day and age.Happy Viewing.
Don't Bother With The Miramaxe Version. One in a long list of films that have been butchered by Miramax in an effort to make Hong Kong films more palatable, SHAOLIN SOCCER suffered doubly due to shifting release dates (it was pushed back for over a year and a half).  In its native country, SHAOLIN SOCCER was one of the most successful films and for good reason.  It takes the typical "ragtag underdogs teaming up to fight against insurmountable odds" adding Shaolin kung fu and special effects to the mix for a perfect combination.When the formerly formidable soccer star Golden Leg Fung (Man Tat Ng)--now a limping lackey thanks to his teammate Hung (Patrick Tse)--loses his job, he hopes to start his own soccer team.  He happens upon Sing (Stephen Chow), a cleaner who has been charged by his former master with spreading the techniques of Shaolin kung fu.  Sing has been searching for a way to repackage Shaolin in a new, exciting, and socially viable form.  It takes a bit but Sing finally realizes that his "Iron Leg" technique would be a perfect fit in Golden Leg's dream soccer team.Golden Leg and Iron Leg set out to convince Sing's five other brothers to join in their venture.  They discover that Iron Head (Yut Fei Wong), Empty Hand (Kwok Kuen Chan), Weight Vest (Lam Chi Chung), Hooking Leg (Chi-Sing Lam), and Iron Shirt (Kai Man Tin) have let their confidence and skills lapse.  Can they regain the spirit from their idealistic days of youth?  You better believe it!  After some hilarious training sequences, the brothers come together as a team and begin to make their way through the ranks of the soccer championships until their showdown with Hung's appropriately named "Evil Team."Along the way, Sing meets Mui (Vicki Zhao), a master of Tai Chi and bread making.  When the two meet, Sing's infectious optimism and singing create chaos in the streets and results in a dance sequence highly inspired by Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video.  This moment is typical of the uproarious tone of Chow's film.  As much as it took from other "losers banding together" films like THE BAD NEWS BEARS, REVENGE OF THE NERDS, and THE REPLACEMENTS, Chow's film helped pave the way for other Asian "extreme sport" films such as Fumihiko Sori's PING PONG and Yudai Yamaguchi's BATTLEFIELD BASEBALL.A word of warning: in all, nearly twenty-two minutes of the film were eliminated for the long-delayed, limited US release.  Things missing include the backstory between Fung and Hung.  Avoid this version at all costs.  Region free NTSC versions with English subtitles are readily available via innumerable web vendors.  Shun this (and any other) Miramax re-cuts like the plague
Amsterdam!. Yes yes yall! This was a goodie. Luda out there In the dutch capital. Puff puff passin! Kickin It with the fine working girls of amsterdam. Doing It up big. I can't get Into details. But I'll tell ya this "It's da red light district"
Love and Basketball.....love love love. I really love this movie.  I can totally relate to the feelings between these two people, especially since she waits for him all of those years.  I know what it's like to love someone that much.  Wonderful movie, wonderful cast, 4 stars
One of Manilow's best!. I saw this performance on PBS & loved it, so I was very excited to a copy to watch at home. Each song takes you back to the first time you heard it. Great memories!
Nemo. Great, fun movie for all ages. Especially the kids. Hard to find good movies for kids like this, let alone adults
A feast of colour and fun. FANTASTIC!. The hugely talented director, Gurinder Chadha (of "Bend It Like Beckham" fame) has excelled herself. I never expected to enjoy this film so much. The dialogue, humour and fun of the film are fantastic. And the Indian take on the original Pride & Prejudice so cleverly done. The dancing is so energetic and the delightful songs really catchy. (I challenge you NOT to be singing "No Life, Without Wife" for many a while afterwards!
20th C. Fox, What took you so long?!. You either love the movie or you don't. If you're a VoD lover, the Special Edition 2-disk release is worth every cent. The film is beautifully restored to its "Color by De Luxe" and Panavision widescreen glory. (My VHS tape is on a barge making its way to the Staten Island landfill as I type this). The second disk includes karioke renderings of songs along with several documentaries and featurettes (all listed above). My favorite of these is "Jacqueline Susann and Valley of the Dolls," which has generous film clips depicting the chain-smoking failed-actress-cum-bestselling-author speaking for herself and coming across as, more than anything, a highly committed and indefatigable professional writer (who used a different color of typing paper for each of her six drafts of the manuscript). It's easy to see how this no-nonsense, get-it-done schlockmeister got under skin the procratinating perfectionist and celebrity syncophant Truman Capote. (I was surprised to see no mention of their long-standing public rivalry anywhere among the DVD extras.)The missed opportunity among all the extras was the commentary track on Disk One. It was great to have Barbara Parkins (although her memories seem to have grown rather dim over the years). One would have liked to hear from Patty Duke (or even Leigh Grant) as well, though we can only guess why Fox wasn't able to make that happen. But the commentary could have been greatly enriched if Fox had nixed the use of gossip columnist Ted Cassablanca (who stole his nom de plume from a gay character in the novel) and engaged a truly informed movie critic or film historian to co-comment with Ms Parkins. Casablanca badgers Parkins for "dish" on the other actresses, Sharon Tate's murder, Judy Garland's walking out on the Helen Lawson role; and when he's not badgering, he cooing about her perfume or comparing notes with her on which actors in the film they each found "do-able." (Parkins just closed her eyes during her love scenes and thought of singer Cat Stevens in England.) Both Parkins and Casablanca are surprisingly ignorant of basic facts about the film. I found myself frequently shouting at the TV screen, "Watch Disk Two--it's all explained there!"Among the things I still don't understand: Why do so many people dimiss or discount Hayward's performance as the Merman-inspired Helen Lawson? Hayward comes solidly out of "the women's picture" tradition and seems to be perfectly cast. Her singing voice, supplied by veteran big-band singer Margaret Whiting (that's Mrs. Jack Wrangler to you, Ted Casablanca), was a perfect match (raw with years of backstage smoking). But, the only explanation I can come up with is that Ms Garland's fans so much wanted to see her in another singing role they shun Hayward's performance out of perverse loyalty to Garland. (Garland died two years after the release of VoD, perhaps adding a degree of fierceness to her fans' loyalty.)The Special Edition DVD overemphasizes the camp and cult elements of the movie (the "bouncing ball" in the karioke rendering of Lawson's "I'll Plant My Own Tree" is really a red wig that ends up in a cartoon toilet on the final sustained note of the song). Such thing make for fun viewing ONCE. But the movie, the movie is a delicious treat that lasts forever
Trans-Generational Idea. I'm 54 years young.  Some of my more vivid childhood memories are of huddling on the couch at age 5 or 6 and watching things like "One Step Beyond", "The Outer Limits" or Rod Serling on "The Twilight Zone".  Little wee B&W TV with rabbit ears.  I'll never forget the way those shows made me nervous; when you're a kid it seems like anything is possible.I have a 7 year old daughter now.  Our "Twilight Zone" compendium arrived last week and we watched the first few episodes last night.  Big Screen, Surround Sound.  She sat curled up in my lap.  Because, when you're a kid, anything's possible.An Excellent Bargain, too
Loved it. My husband and I have been together since we were 15. So we have had some ups and downs in our relationship. Whenever we have a down we watch this movie and it makes us look at our relationship. This movie has saved my marriage more than once!!!!! Its a must have!!!
Consider it art. Heaven is a fantastic film filled with beautiful air shots and tear jerking suspense.  This film is art at its best!  I am quick to judge and though I try and find the best qualities of each movie I watch, Heaven needed no searching.  A little known film, this movie is a must see for those that look for a little bit of heaven in the films they watch.  Don't let the title fool you.  This isn't a happy popcorn movie.  Melancholy, subdued and quietly passionate.  The mood of the film is what drives it to the end.  And at the end you are left trying to find your way back into the world you entered from
Great movie. This is a great movie and one of my favorites. I watched this movie back in 2002 and bought it a couple of months ago when I saw it at Wal-Mart. The acting is great-- Reese Witherspoon & Mark Walhberg. Highly recommended.
Have DVD, will watch. Simply great television from the fifties.  Richard Boone was never better than as Palidan.  You get some really superb writing from many of the best.  Gene Roddenberry wrote around 20 episodes of HGWT.  Didn't he start some other franchise series, say Star Trek?  Into this mix add some really great guest stars like Charles Bronson.  This is not just a shoot-em-up western.  Many issues of that day and this one are explored in the episodes.  Topics of racism or women rights get some really toughtful treatments.  Look for some good action, too.  Hard to believe you can get that in a 30 minute show but the writing is just that good.   If you have seen this before you know what is in store.  If this is new raise your expectations and watch this
REAL DREAMS OF  BASKETBALL HOPEFULS. I love this movie.  It's a true look at what is really going on for two young kids trying to do something with a talent God has given them.  A up and down look at a journey thats isn't always as easy as some NBA players make it seem to be.  A real look at how it takes more than just good stats to make it in a Big Man's Game.Every person whom ever told me their child's dream was to play in any sports for a living, I have told them to check out this movie if they are serious.This is a well put together movie, and worth the money, and it actually is pretty timeless.  Even after 10 years, it still hold truths that is real for everyone who thinks they have the next 'MICHAEL JORDAN' in their home.I truly believe every high school coach should make this movie a requirement, but more importantly, every parent should make it their personal goal for their child to see a 'real life' situation of the ups and down and far and near of dreams of becoming Pro
Great Movie. This is one of the funniest movies I have seen in a while.  While I can see some people not being drawn to the absurdist humor that makes up this movie, for the fans of shows like Stella or shows like Tom Goes to the Mayor or 12 Oz. Mouse on Adult Swim, this movie is an instant cult classic.  Definitely check this one out
Judith Brown & Pam Grier!. What a combo. 'Ladies in Prison' movies is the best idea next to breast  implants, and we all know Pammy don't need those. Nudity, violence, one liners, sex, and the great cat-fights. Pam is the star, but Judith don't take no back seat! When farmer man wants to feel Pam's melons through the bars, he get's more than what he bargained for. Talk about plowing. All these characters pop up again and again in the 'Pam Prison' series. SOmetimes she the prisoner, sometimes the warden, and sometimes the revolutionist. Why does every 'woman in prison' film have to have a revolution anyway??? Well no matter, Pam and Judith like I said are a pair that can't be beat
The Power of Song as  a Gateway of Understanding. Writer/director Christian Carion ('Une hirondelle a fait le printemps' aka 'The Girl from Paris') is unafraid to write and create cinematic tales that touch the heart as well as the mind.  'Joyeux Nol' is a story of war and its effects on soldiers that goes far beyond sentimentality (or the opposite emphasis on brutality as found in American films) and offers the viewer insights to the responses of young men's minds to the monster of war and how they cope.Based on a true story, the film opens with the usual callous killing among three groups of soldiers - German, French, and Scottish - who face an oncoming Christmas Eve in the trenches, the realities of fighting have precluded their getting time to retreat for air.  But a miracle happens: among the Germans is a famous opera tenor Nikolaus Sprink (Benno Frmann) who has aligned with his fellow troops in the trenches, hoping he can bring some minor sense of Christmas and understanding to them.  His soprano partner Anna Sorensen (Diane Kruger) finds a way to be with him in the trenches on Christmas Eve, 1914.  Meanwhile the disgruntle troops of all three sectors are planning meager festivities and a bit of relaxation even in the trenches as the bodies of the day's plunder lie in the snow of no man's land.  We get to know the French Lieutenant Audebert (Guillaume Canet) and his orderly Ponchel (Dany Boon), the German head of the regiment Horstmayer (Daniel Brhl), and the Scots - especially the priest/medic Palmer (Gary Lewis).Christmas Eve comes and the voice of Sprink (in reality the tenor Rolando Villazn) sings 'Stille Nacht', rising out of the trenches to sing in the open of no man's land.  Soon he is accompanied by the Scottish bagpipes and the 'chorus' of the Germans, the Scots and the French.  They all emerge, share gifts of champagne and other libations, and agree to a cease-fire in honor of the holiday.  It is in this magic moment that the true personalities of these warring men surface and each is seen as a vulnerable puppet of the WW I, exchanging addresses to meet after the war.  Anna Sorenson has managed to enter the scene and during a communal mass led by Palmer she sings (the voice is Natalie Dessay) an Ave Maria (composed by the film's composer Philippe Rombi): the lovers have previously sung a duet version of Bach's 'Bist du bei mir'.  For that moment in time the horrors of war melt and the camaraderie of the men glows and is carried into Christmas Day when all three groups of soldiers agree to bury their dead together.  Of course the brutality and ignorance of war re-engages and the leaders of the three groups enter camp and threaten courts martial and punishment for the troops' lack of military discipline.  The film ends in a manner that leaves the audience able to integrate the happenings of that Christmas Eve on the futures of these men.The script is superb, the cast is uniformly excellent, the sets and cinematography are creatively moody, and the musical score by  Philippe Rombi is one of the finest in years: the ending song 'I'm Dreaming of Home' deserves to become a standard.  Would that everyone could see this film, a bit of global hope in the cloud of the destruction that shadows our world right now.  Highly recommended. Grady Harp, November 06
Great Movie for the Cougs. Any movie which contains the fight song of the greatest university on the face of the Earth, no doubt, is worth five stars if not more. Besides that, it is just a great movie. Go Cougs!!!!
A Great Portrayal of Life on the Seven Seas ca. 1805. This movie was a fairly realistic representation of life aboard a British Navy ship in the Pacific Ocean west of South America. You could almost smell the stench of the crew, and their food looked less than appetizing. The cinematography, editing, costumes, story, acting were all top-rate. I highly recommend this movie to everyone. There is little if any offensive language or sex. There are realistic battle scenes with appropriate violence which may not be suitable for children. The humanistic side of the movie was wonderful, for example the captain and doctor playing their music. Russell Crowe was a brilliant captain who has to make tough decisions
If you like pick-me-ups, skip this. This movie excellently explores the psychology surrounding trauma.  The acting is superb and the tone is perfect - if of course you don't mind heaviness. All in all it is one of the best movies in years.(I wish they hadn't given it a misleading title though as it probably scares off the churchy crowd. It is not about sex!
A  great   movie. I my self i like the movie.it was good from start to the in .good docmentary for any one to relate when they where young.and the kids are so funny. and the film says being strange can be fun when your young.
Rediscovered for the First Time. I had seen a brief bit of this when I was younger and always wondered what movie that was where a guy just sits there talking to a camera. Well luckily, I accidently discovered it again. I wasn't sure a movie like this could actually carry more for 2 hours but when it was over, I was amazed that time had passed so quickly. Spawlding is a great storyteller, and you will not be bored, guaranteed. Now, how much of it is true? That I wonder. But who cares, 'cause movies aren't usually true anyway, even when they claim to be
Another take.. This is a TRUE GEM of a DVD I used to watch this on LASERDISC "yeah those things" when I was a kid. I used to watch it at the time really to see JACO'S solo which at the time seemed alot longer than it actually is but I was young and I suppose in my minds eye and imagination it went on forever. Nonetheless a few of my musical mentors are featured on here with the likes of Metheny, Mays and of course Jaco it's truly an all star line up which includes the likes of Micheal Brecker on Sax as well as Don Alias on drums and percussions not too mention a cameo appearance by The Persuasions. If you're only wanting to buy this because you want to see Jaco and or Metheny get up and do their thing remember that the cover of the DVD is entitled JONI MITCHELL shadows and light. She hired these guys to do just what they did accompany her and they do just that. Joni's sound comes off very differently with these guys behind her, the melodies and her tone are augmented beautifully with the chord structure and bass harmonics of both Metheny and Jaco and lest we forget about Lyle Mays who futhers that foundation with his own hauntingly beautiful chords and runs that rest underneath it all. There are solo's by both Metheny and Pastorious but again you are not watching a solo perfance by either. My suggestion is to BUY IT kick back and check out this historic outdoor concert (day into night) who knows you may even find a new love for Joni. PS: For all you hardcore JAZZ fans out there you may want to take note that CHARLES MINGUS had requested that she a (FOLK SINGER) complete his last works.. she was as shocked by this as some of you may be now.. but it's a fact he found the soul to her music and so will you if you give it a chance!! Enjo
Eddie Murphy's film debut. Eddie Murphy's popularity on NBC's Saturday Night Live led to a film career. The same applied to his predecessors such as Dan Aykroyd,the late John Belushi,the late Gilda Radner,Chevy Chase and Bill Murray. Here is Murphy's starring film debut overall,opposite Nick Nolte about a cop and his apprentice about to apprehend wanted criminals. Plain clothes cop Jack Cates(Nolte) and his apprentice Reggie Hammond(Murphy) are just the right pair for the job. There was a catch:they had only 48 HRS. to do the job. Also Jack has been having disputes with his girlfriend Patti(Annette O'Toole). However,the police job landed Reggie in jail since he was a criminal himself and an escaped convict. Great support from the late Brion James who was Jack's co-worker Sgt. Ben Kehoe. This popular film inspired the 1990 sequel ANOTHER 48 HRS. In between the two films,Murphy starred in other popular favorites such as TRADING PLACES with Aykroyd and Jamie Lee Curtis,BEST DEFENSE with the late Dudley Moore,BEVERLY HILLS COP,THE GOLDEN CHILD,BEVERLY HILLS COP 2,COMING TO AMERICA and HARLEM NIGHTS with the late Richard Pryor. Also in between,Murphy became a recording artist and released an album in 1985 spawning the Top 20 hit PARTY ALL THE TIME. This film and the sequel were directed by Walter Hill and distributed by Paramount Pictures
Love eventually conquers all. Gene Tierney stars as the young and attractive Ann Sutton, wife of a wealthy and prominent Los Angeles psychoanalyst in the worthy Otto Preminger directed tale of deceit and intrigue, "Whirlpool".  Unbeknown to her husband Dr. William Sutton played by Richard Conte, Tierney had been suffering from lifelong bouts of kleptomania.  She was apprehended for the theft of a broach at a chic department store.  This commenced a chain of events that would drastically alter her life.Happening to be nearby and coming to Tierney's rescue was a persuasive Jose Ferrer who convinced the store manager to drop the charges.  Ferrer the star of the film played David Korvo, a suave and smooth talking charlatan and hypnotist.  Ferrer eventually gained Tierney's confidence by using hypnosis to cure her sleeplessness born out of guilt about her secret afflition.  When Ferrer failed to use his charm and power to seduce Tierney during their sessions he proceeded to use her as a pawn in another fantastic scheme.Ferrer had seductively bilked a previous "patient" Theresa Randolph played by Barbara O'Neil out of $60,000.  She had threatened to expose him to the police.  Ferrer strangled her and then hypnotized Tierney into certain actions and being present at the crime scene to implicate her as the murderer.  Ferrer had set up a very clever alibi and convincing evidence that Tierney was his lover.A devastated Conte and a skeptical and craggy police lieutenant Colton played grumpily by Charles Bickford collaborated together to prove Tierney's innocence.Preminger did well in setting the tone of suspense in this effective film noir based on the novel by Guy Endore.  Tierney was decent as the femme fatale but the villainous Ferrer was excellent in his role aided also by the very solid performance of Bickford
Tense, and unpredictable. This was a good movie, and I don't want to ruin the ending because it should be a surprise, as I was. It's about a guy(Travolta) working on low wage, as a security guard at a church. He gets fired! So, he can't get Ms. Banks to listen to him. So, he comes in with a gun and a bag(you'll find out what's in it!) He's surprised to find a class and a teacher on tour there. A media guy(Dustin Hoffman) is in the bathroom reporting to a girl outside. He thinks Sam(Travolta) is taking hostages, but Sam's not. Sam goes to get his job back. Ms. Banks still doesn't listen to him. Sam shoots and accidentally hits his good friend, the other security guard for the church. Which gets the media even more involved. Things keep on packing up until the end, where the girl switches to the story, and Max(Hoffman) realizes the truth. Great story, startling suspense, so WATCH THIS!!!
Scary, Original, Fascinating. Flatliners is a horrific exploration of after-death experiences, directed with taut suspense by Joel Schumacher (The Client, Batman Forever, The Lost Boys). It's about five medical students led by Kiefer Sutherland (The Lost Boys) carelessly experimenting with death.Each wants a turn as one at a time they bring each other to the brink with their medical know-how, reviving the volunteer within seconds - at first, then daring each other to go for longer periods of minutes.  After Sutherland's experience he finds a child from his past haunting him, but hides his hallucinations from the others.  William Baldwin (Backdraft) goes next, and after his experience he sees reflections of his sins - selfish promiscuity, primarily - everywhere around him.  Kevin Bacon (The River Wild, White Water Summer, A Stir Of Echoes) is next, before the results of the first two are revealed, then Julia Roberts (Pretty Woman, Conspiracy Theory), who insists on her turn in spite of the growing fears of the others.  The fifth member of their group is Oliver Platt (Simon Birch, A Time To Kill).The original idea, at the time the film was created, is fascinating as well as scary, and a precursor to such later efforts as White Noise.  Unfortunately there's a great deal of foul language, considerable violence, and unnecessary sex with partial nudity (particularly in illustration of Baldwin's case). I say "unfortunately" because otherwise I'd like to show the film to everyone, the idea is so good, and effectively delivers a good message - "everything we do matters."  But as it is, it's not suitable for children, and certainly offensive to many older viewers.  If you're not bothered by the very R-ratedness, or will dare to watch in spite of it, I recommend the movie whole-heartedly
a world war II thriller that delivers the goods. this is an exciteing war thriller of the "behind enemy lines missions" movies,only the people going behind the lines are germans. michael caine is great as the leader of the germans who are in england to kidnap or kill winston churchill from his country get away. the germans arive in town dressed in british uniforms and as they wait they get chummy with the people.now we get to my one problem with the plot,in saving a boy one of the germans rips his uniform and has his german one on under it. like i said that part is far feched but as the movie is so good i let it slide.this is a great little action thriller and belongs with your other great war movies
A spectacular documentary. The details that Amazon.com has on display for this DVD has several mistakes in it.  Their list of the running time being "120 minutes" with "30 minutes of exclusive behind-the-scenes on the road footage," is completely incorrect.  The DVD package clearly lists the running time for this documentary at 180 minutes, or 3 hours.  Yes, this DVD does contain "Bonus Features", but Amazon.com didn't correctly list them in their description of this DVD.  The bonus features are hidden easter eggs that lead to additional out-takes and deleted scenes, band and director commentary, "Soundcheck" segments, out-takes, and 3 music videos.  This DVD does NOT include the CD with all of the songs that Lamb of God was filmed performing for this DVD.  That is available for purchase separately, but I don't recommend buying it because the CD only contains live versions of songs from "Ashes of The Wake" and several of Lamb of God's previous CDs.  So, you really can skip the live CD altogether.  This DVD is all you need."Killadelphia" was produced by High Roller Studios, NOT Sony.  However, it is manufactured by and distributed by Epic Music Video (A division of Sony/BMG Music Entertainment).  "killadelphia" was directed by Doug Spangenberg, who is under contract with High Roller Studios.  He also directed the documentary "The Making of Sacrament", which is the bonus disc included in the "Deluxe Edition" of Lamb of God's current CD, "Sacrament".  Another very good documentary that you should check out."Killadelphia" can be viewed two (2) different ways.  You can choose to watch ONLY the concert footage by itself or you can watch the feature documentary movie "Killadelphia", which is a combination of behind the scenes footage of the band while their out on tour promoting the CD "Ashes of The Wake" and doing a lot of other stuff during the tour and between gigs.  There are numerous informal and semi-formal interviews with band members, the tour manager, and members of the road crew.  There are also some very good examples of "Direct Cinema" style documentary filmmaking in several scenes.  However, this documentary would was actually mostly filmed in a "Cinma Verit" style.(Filmmakers, film students, and film nerds will know what the terms "Direct Cinema" and "Cinma Verit" mean.  If you don't know what they mean, but you want to, please look them up.)I highly recommend this DVD to all Lamb of God fans, heavy metal lovers everywhere, and aspiring documentary filmmakers too.  The director, Doug Spangenberg, is a good director and he did very good job with this documentary.  This is one of my favorite DVDs in my ever-growing DVD collection
A nice sampler of very early films. Although some of the films on here do overlap with some of the other early film DVDs out there (such as the Edison set and 'The Lumire Brothers' First Films'), there are also some films on here that can't be found anywhere else, and it provides a very nice introduction to the subject for someone who's just getting into these very early short films from the dawn of motion pictures.  Categories include the Edison films, films by the Lumire Brothers, a Keystone short (featuring the charming Mabel Normand in the leading role), a Biograph short, a Max Linder short, short French films, short documentary-style films, and the two very early film classics 'Le Voyage Dans la Lune' and 'The Great Train Robbery' (the latter with beautifully select hand-coloring).  Basically, it gives the viewer a good sampling of the various different types of films being made from the 1890s to the early Teens.  These very early films are like literally looking back in time, at this bygone world, a world where the moving image was so new and revolutionary that people didn't care the movies only lasted under a minute and showed things like employees leaving a factory or two babies quarreling, since they'd never seen these miraculously moving pictures before.  It also opens with the short 1994 film 'Homage to Eadweard Muybridge,' who invented the zoopraxiscope, which projected a series of pictures in a way that suggested movement.  He was one of the pioneers in the invention of the motion picture, even though here we're seeing series photography (from 1877-85), not actual motion pictures.  (Those who are offended by such things should be aware that the woman in these series photography "films" is naked, at times partially and at other times fully, though there's absolutely nothing sexual or pornographic here; it's just a series of images of a woman who so happens to not have any clothes on.)My one complaint about this disc (other than the mislabelling of 'I.B. Dam and the Whole Dam Family' as 'The Whole Dam Family and the Dam Dog') is that most of the films don't have any dates given.  Even if one is already familiar with the films from this era instead of a new fan, it's still nice to have them placed into historic context and to see the years they were all made.  Some bonus features also would have been nice, to have provided, say, some background to the films, the people who made them, the restoration process, and what film-making was like in these very early days.  It's always nice to have supplemental information to enjoy and appreciate these antique films even more
Pretty Good Snake Flic.... Kidnappers hold boy and family hostage in their English townhouse.  A foolproof plan has been set up. But there's just one little catch!  A venonmous Black Mamba is running loose in the house and is not in the best mood.  Makes for some tense moments and a gripping finale.  Definitely worth a watch
Do you have a moment for a little Chit-chat?. This is a great overlooked movie, for the sake of movie. Cinematographie, scenes, locations, all beautiful.Stallone and Bandaras are a hoot. There scenes together were great, their scenes seperate...o.k. Julianne Moore is great. She is the person in this movie that really helps sell it.It's a good movie for passing the time. Rent it, buy it, or just sit at home and pray no one has put a hit out on you. Cause either one of these guys would happily finish you if paid enough. Sorry, I should't talk that way to a lady. My bad
The gang's all here. Well here they are - all four of the Batman films made circa 1989-1997, all of them slicked up with trailers, audio commentaries, archive interviews, music videos, making of documentarie, character profiles, overview of Batman, everything die hard fans could possibly want. Even those who hate the Joel Schumacher helmed "Batman Forever" and "Batman & Robin" will find something interesting in the behind scenes material, chronicling the long, strange journey of Batman through the cinematic age.
One of Tom Hanks Funniest. This movie is great!  Very subtle humor but if you watch it you will be laughing out loud.  Love it
Great remake of a disappointing orginal. This is just another great remake of a very unscarey orginal. I have seen them both and think that this one is far superior. It is more scarey and more graphic than the orginal. The remake also holds more of a story line than it's previous
luminousity on film. I will go out on a limb here and declare this movie the most heartbreakingly beautiful film I ever saw. I went to see it when it came out, and it continued to haunt me until I obtained my first VCR, whereupon it was one of the first movies I purchased. The story is told pretty much visually, and it is such an old story that the viewer doesn't need any more dialog than there is. One reviewer addressed the issue of Linda Manz's New York accent when the trio of protagonists is supposed to be from Chicago; but after multiple viewings, it became clear to me that these guys have been nomads since day one, so it's quite plausible to me that they, in fact, did come from New York originally (Richard Gere also has a decided Noo Yawk sound) and in the way of migrant workers, had only recently called Chicago home. The opening of the movie - old turn-of-the-century stills - is rife with the melting-pot faces that, mostly, started out in New York and went where the work was.When I need an example of absolute perfection - my opinion - in cinematography, this is the film I would always choose. So many isolated shots come to mind - a wine glass sitting on a riverbed underwater with a fish swimming by; five guys, conversing quietly in another language as they walk, bundled against winter; the panic of animals in a brushfire, a burning tractor coming out of a fire at night like a machine from hell - as well as spooky, ghostly sights of people around a campfire at night on a rivershore; faces that you would not normally consider beautiful taking on a luminous quality because of the talent of the filming. The story almost takes a back seat to the filmwork, although it is nearly a Greek tragedy; Bill, Linda, and Abby, migrant workers scraping to survive and stay together (Bill and Linda are sister and brother; Abby is Bill's lover) escape a situation in Chicago (Bill has inadvertently killed a bullheaded boss) by jumping a train loaded down with immigrants and ride to the wheatfields of the Texas Panhandle, where they become just three more harvesters until the owner, played with a sweet vulnerability by Sam Shepard, catches sight of Abby in the field and falls in love with her. Bill sees this in his unfocused mind as a way for his little group to advance, after he overhears a conversation between Shepard and a doctor which suggests that the young landowner is dying. Bill persuades Abby to accept the owner's offer of marriage - which, to her credit, she seems initially reluctant to do - reasoning that she can make the guy happy for the little time he has left and then the fortune he has will be all theirs. His plan hits a snag over three things; a suspicious foreman, who loves the landowner like a son and distrusts the trio of migrants right now; the landowner seems to hit his second wind after marrying Abby; and, the biggest bad thing, Abby falls in love with her new husband. Left out frustrated in the cold, suffering unending animosity from the foreman, Bill does the only intelligent thing he can think of and leaves, only to return some time later. From there things go very badly.This movie gives a real flavour of what the early 1900s must have been like - the serendipity of a travelling circus, apparently out of gas, who land on the owner's property and give performances in exchange for room and board (and probably gas)- these things happened then, impromptu little entertainments that seemed to have little relevance to the surroundings but which were eagerly looked for - diversions were few and far between, folks - and at one point, the newformed family group runs to meet and wave at Woodrow Wilson's passing train. The ordinary people doing the harvesting, though only touched on, are clear and real; you've seen these people in town, working, playing, fighting. And the pathos of the underclass comes out in something Linda Manz's character says halfway through in a voiceover: "You're only here once, and you should have it nice."This movie is tragic and beautiful, with good performances, especially from Linda Manz as the hapless younger sister who is at the mercy of circumstances she is powerless to control, and who learns the cruel lesson so many like her had to learn in those days; how to survive on your own. Ms. Manz pretty much disappeared from film after that and returned to private life. Too bad - she was a breath of fresh air in a lot of ways. In fact, the only people who really advanced filmwise after this were Richard Gere and Sam Shepard - although Gere isn't as good yet as he could be (again, my opinion) and Sam Shepard is underused or too preoccupied with his writing. I highly recommend this movie to cinematography aficianados and to anyone who likes a good period piece told with great sensitivity and minimal dialog.
Good for a movie. If you have read the book then you will probably be disappointed in this film due to how they change the plot to git in the time allotted for the film. However if you enjoyed the play, and did not read the book, then you will probably enjoy the film. The casting was fantastic and the scences were well done
Could very well be Brad Pitts Best work!!!!. As much As I would love to give Brad Pitt all the credit for his outstanding performance in this movie, I just can't. He was Perfect, He can almost make a horrible storyline seem interesting with his skill. But you see this story.... This Story + Brad Pitt made one incredible movie. Well done....... Good enough to make a grown man cry. It needs to be watched
A must have for metal fans. Highly recommended!  A fun and entertaining DVD from beginning to end.Disc one has full length live performances from many of the tour's bands.  Highlights include three classic Megadeth tunes, with pyro effects included, rare Dream Theater tracks, Fear Factory debuting brand new material, and high speed versions of two newer Nevermore songs along with the best singles from the second stage bands.  It's a blast to watch the rabid fans in action in the crowd.Disc Two is packed with interviews, back stage footage, praks, a Pyro lesson, tour bus tours, and a tribute to Dimebag Darrell, and the Gigantour softball game featuring commentary by Mike Piazza
You will either love it or Hate it. People who watch this movie either love it or hate it.
More here than can be grasp in one viewing. I found the movie as accurate as can be imagined.  Having lived through the experience as a veteran of the cold war, my feeling at the time were mixed.   PATH TO WAR, is about the Murphy Law factor in all wars, where if anything can go wrong it will.  The mounting casualties, and longivity destroyed much of the idealistic resolve, and we were faced with the best hopes for an honorable peace. Being a native Texan, I thought the script was most kind to LBJ.
A great tool to learn how to knit. Excellent dvd.  I thought I was knitting ok and then made myself sit down and watch all of this.  Well, I learned I was knitting wrong.  She even explains how we make the mistakes which is an important part to being able to see if you are knitting and pearling correctly.   You will be very happy with this choice if you are a new knitter.
Must watch for all Americans. Anyone who owns stock in any company should watch this documentary. It will show you what monster you're feeding. Furthermore, it is wonderfully produced and so interesting it's hard to look away from the screen
Love both of these workouts. I am taking yoga classes but wanted to do more at home. I found this DVD and LOVE it. Sarah is an excellent instructor. She has allowed me to perfect my poses - she gives great cueing to help you get the most out of your workout. This DVD offers a great mix of two great workouts. Highly recommend any of her yoga DVD's
From a Novice. I have been using this DVD for about 6 months.  I have tried a variety of Yoga and Pilates DVDs but this is my favorite.  It takes about 20 minutes in the morning or afternoon and Baron Baptiste is very easy to follow.  Nothing complicated or difficult.  Great DVD for a beginner or novice like myself
brilliant!  - so good you should NOT buy this DVD!. This is a brilliant film by a master filmmaker/storyteller.  Dark, moody, exciting (and FAST!), THX-1138 is an amazing example of style AND substance.  So whatever you do, DON'T BUY THIS DVD!Instead, spend just a few bucks more and get the 2 DVD version which delves into the making of the film, the early days of Lucas and Coppola, Walter Murch's involvement, and the whole story about American Zoetrope.  It also has a little segment made back in the day about the actor's getting their heads shaved.  All in all, it is a spectacular DVD set and worth the extra few dollars.  (The 2 dvd version also has a much better cover.
Unfortunately, a key missing scene. I don't understand why this version cuts out the key scene in the church were Sean Connery stands up in his pew and challenges the priest sermonizing against violence and saying something like "what about the violence against the miners?"In fact, they appeared to have purposely edited the movie to make the audience think that the comment that Richard Harris makes after the service about "talking back to the priest" refers to the pleasantries that Sean Connery exchanged with the priest after the service on the way out!I remember this scene vividly since it when I saw this movie almost 40 years ago now, it was cool to see someone stand up in the church and stand up to the church's hypocrisy.The cut of this scene also distorts the movies development of the close friendship that the priest held with Sean Connery and how each could act within their roles while retaining their bond.Odd.Any insight from the fans?- D
Better or Best?. A very good video even though it is not scripturally correct in a few  places. One has to remember that it is based on a novel and not directly from the Bible. Magnificent scenery, excellent character selection, and very well produced. This is a video suitable to be shown to christians or non-christians alike
Only Bergman could produce such despair. Hauntingly depressing Bergman film about three sisters, one of whom (Harriet Andersson) is dying, while the other two (Liv Ullmann and Ingrid Thulin) stand watch. They are cold, forbidding women, Thulin so much so that she can't stand to have anyone even touch her. We learn that they have experienced infidelities, self-mutilation (Thulin), suicide contemplations and attempts, the loss of a child. Bergman uses long silences and close-up shots of the actresses faces to achieve his affects; it is magnificently acted. But the silences are actually filled with ethereal sounds - the cries and whispers of the title - which add to the emotional impact. But the despair is just so intense, so godforsaken, that it becomes almost unbearable to watch. It's a movie you will either love or hate - there's no inbetween
Bear Rocks. Bear does it again teaching children the shapes, sounds, & colors while entertaining at the same time. This is a good way to keep you child busy while they learn. Bear teaches values and helpful information such as seasons, shapes, colors, potty training, brushing teeth, bathing, sharing, friendship, and alot more
I was there!!!!. The BEST honeymoon anyone can ever have and truely the best music festival I have attended.  I enjoyed the song selection and the behind the scenes interviews on the DVD.  It was shot perfectly.Only a couple minor glitches though.  The DVD could easily have been expanded to a 2 or maybe even a 3 DVD set, being that Telluride is one of the major music festivals in the country, and the song "Nine Pound Hammer" by Telluride Cluster Jam could have been shown in its entirety.
Planet Earth -Mother Earth. What a great work of love, of craftsmanship.This is spellbinding, in the  truest sense of the word. Once you have started viewing this fascinating work of art, time, all sense of time, is frozen.It is a transcendent experience,  as you are drawn into the looking glass in front of you for a peek at our world. what a marvel, how so much fits conceptually into the little screen in front of you. it is as breath taking on a small screen as it is on a large screen .it is all just a peephole allowing you to gaze upon our earth. Every shot is beautifully framed. Reverence abounds,and craftsmanship guides you as one marvel after another is revealed .This is an 11 part series each featuring a different aspect of planet earth ."from pole to pole" "caves" "desert" "forests""jungles" great plains""shallow seas" "ocean deep""ice worlds""seasonal forests""fresh water".This is not just point and shoot pretty pictures. It shows the beauty for sure, but also the synchronicity.  Those fine lines of interdependency as well as the many obvious interconnections and interdependencies.We all should know what a powerful medium film is, and at it's very best I feel it can stand with the bestof the "arts" in Music as well as paint and sculpture .I do think this work has proved that point .I was as elevated watching this film as I have been listening to a Beethoven symphony, or a Bach fugue, or viewing the paintings of the masters.I cannot even begin to guess how they captured so much on high resolution film. The time exposures, the vistas , the rituals , and some of natures best kept secrets, , the many forms of unusual life occurring in every corner, nook and cranny, of this beautiful planet so full of life .I cannot wait to view this with my grandchildren, nieces, and nephews,I am sure  it will create memories for them, I am sure of this .There is so much wonderful and wondrous information presented here in this set. knowledge, and the most glorious visuals, capturing our amazing planet earth .This is a most enjoyable experience. share it ,create around it, teachers, families, friends this should be an event not just a film .My wife and I are seriously thinking that we will for one night a week throughout the summer show this on our front lawn. prepare a few simple snacks have the grandchildren and family over and open this up to the neighborhood some lawn chairs, popcorn, blankets, and you have a wonderful summer event .I am sure the children as well as the adults will look forward each week .Yes it is that good.Even if you have never really enjoyed a nature documentary this may well be the exception .If only for the stunning visuals .But I find that the new, odd, often exciting and amazing facts that seem to fill every minute of this great work thrilling .Again I wish to state that the vision of those who put this masterpiece together must be on par with the works of the masters of ages past. this is an achievement in film that boggles the mind in scope and succeeds !It would seem that in our age we also have those who future generations will likely look upon as Masters of their crafts as well. Thank you, thank you, thank you.
Season two delivers more fun and more twists!. If you loved the first one then you'll most likely want more!  The show is incredibly addicting, because it's so well done, fun dramatic writing and acting.  What's different with this season compared to the last one?  The actors have grown more into their characters, before it had made more teen angst; this one has more adult angst.  Sandy and Kirsten are by far still the central unit in The O.C., but even they begin to have some obstacles and troubles thrown into their rock solid relationship.  Kelly Rowan "Kirsten" does some of her most finest acting work for the show in this season, taking her character to dramatic heights noteworthy of critical appraisal.  Ryan ended the second half of the first season by becoming a little too meddling into everyone's affairs, and making bad relationship choices, but he then slowly gains a little bit of your trust on him again in the second season, by taking it down a notch.  Seth was once the most entertaining one has now become a little on the annoying side in this season.  You want him to stop rambling and back away, let the other characters shine.  Marissa's character actually gets better in season two; she becomes much edgier, a little more self aware and much cooler.  You get the feeling she is completely in tune with what's really up with everybody.  The gay rights activists should applaud "The O.C." and Mischa Barton for crossing the gay line to a huge teen audience in a positive way.  Julie was the ultimate villain in season one, now you almost feel like maybe she doesn't mean to be so bad, and actually does have heart, but then you hesitate to make that assumption, she teeters on that fine line of being good and being bad, making it all the more fun to watch! This season is darker, more drama, more twists, and more added characters to complicate matters, a definite must see if you enjoyed the first season
Second World War - the Soviet point of view. An excellent movie ! You really feel that you are there in Stanlingrand. Superb performance by Jude Law and Ed Harris. Unforgettable ! See it, Buy It, Own it
A superb, easy-to-follow resource for both individual study and physical education. Youth athlete coach Marty Schupak and the Youth Sports Club present 34 Soccer Goalie Drills, a no-nonsense DVD guide to techniques for improving one's goalkeeping skills, intended for soccer goalkeepers of all ages and skill levels. Subjects covered include goalkeeping conditioning drills, diving skills, breakaway goalie defense, lateral skill techniques, punting techniques, games, bonus tips and more. A superb, easy-to-follow resource for both individual study and physical education, recommended for aspiring goalies age 10 and up. 34 min., color
Funny but true. Loved this movie...this is a perfect movie for what's going on in America right now
Elephant Walk. It was a long time since I last saw this great movie and it was a pleasure to again watch it and bring back memories of how the old time actors out performed the current day performers
Would have been a "5" except for the LAME commentary. If you like Lewis at all...even if you dislike his films...this is one that you may be able to enjoy.  Great "widescreen" edition and clean copy of the film.  The worst part about it is the dissapointing commentary track.  Here you have Lewis and singer Steve Lawrence (!?) providing the commentary...and I must admit, I could not get through it.  Jerry seems to enjoy watching the film and Ed McMahon-like Lawrence seems to nothing but kiss Jerry's rear end the whole time.  All he does is laugh and say.."Jer...that's just great...funny stuff."  While Lewis chuckles and gives such insight to those comments as "yeah."Worth having at this price for the film, but do not expect too much from an "extra" that really could have made this a gem
Male pregnancy has never been so funny!. TWINS director Ivan Reitman reunited Danny DeVito and Arnold Schwarzenegger with him for this film. Before I saw this film,I assumed it would be a sequel to TWINS. The untypical male pregnancy is so hilarious that it will relentlessly tickle any viewer's funny bone! This film was probably inspired by the 1989 episode of NBC's The Cosby Show where Bill Cosby dreams that he and his male co-stars Malcolm Jamal Warner,Geoffrey Owens and Joseph C. Phillips are simultaneously pregnant. Supporting DeVito and Schwarzenegger are Emma Thompson. Great film
Brainy Baby Right Brain. My son has grown up on Baby Einstein and was captivated by them but now that he is 22 months old and talking he prefers the the Brainy Baby Right Brain over any of his Baby Einstein. He will sit and watch most of this video which is a feat for him because he is very active.  I have just ordered 2 more of the Brainy Baby videos from Amazon and hope they are as enjoyable as Right Brain
Excellent early Fritz Langs. Both very fine films, and 'M' is indeed the 100-minute version, not the 75-minute version listed on the case, so that's a bonus - and the film quality is fine, too. As for the cartoon, is it there ecause of the name Fritz, or to replicate some old-fashioned double-feature-with-cartoon experience? I don't know, but the films are wonderful. Peter Lorre is amazing
The Dirty Dozen. This HD DVD version does a great job at cleaning up the picture of a movie that is now almost 40 years old. This clasic was enjoyed, being watched in the house even by our kids that have never seen it before. I'll have to say the DD+ audio track was in overdrive on this movie in the battle scenes, the sub woofer and 7.1 surround sound was definetly rattling the house
Golden Oldie. In the days of the Arcades there was a good movie that came out (and funny enough had a great Arcade game) called Krull. Now mind you, I really had no idea what this movie was all about before i saw it (when i was a whole bunch younger) just saw the 5 bladed "glaive" and was sold but now as an adult i find i still like this movie and it reminds me of a true dungeons and dragons style adventure then almost any other movie (including those terrible scifi D&D movies ugh) it starts off with a prince and of course a princess yes been done before many many times but then in come the Slayers and from then on its a totally different experience. with such ultimate favorites as the Emerald Seer, The Widow of the Web and the Cyclops and of course the shapeshifting (a bit daft too) wizard with some very strange habits (i dare not tell you so as not to ruin it) but this is a classic movie and it will be good for generations to come.Pros: cool effects (for the time) good story well done plot and themescons: may be a bit too old for some and not flashy enough. but remember it is a tad old.its a 5 star easily some may not agree but judge the movie on its merits and not against those of today and anyone can see the care and detail that made this movie great
Another Great 80's Movie ;P. Girls Just Want to Have Fun is One My Favorite 80's Movies,,'tis Romantic,Dancing,Comedy as well,I Own The dvd,you Wont regret buyin' it :)
Engrossing from the first 30 seconds. Clooney is a marvel.  This story was so captivating that I sat on the edge of my seat straining to hear all the dialogue.  Althought the scene shifts make it difficult to track at first, I was drawn in and held spellbound
Emotional tour de force. Anthony Quinn is outstanding as the man who's place is taken by Jesus at the cross.  It is a brilliant tour de force for the gifted actor with unequalled pathos for the part he played.  It is an intriguing question historically and theologically - what happened to Barrabbas the zealot?  This movie provides us with an answer that is moving and dramatic and a perfect role for Mr. Quinn.
Very Important Pamela. VIP was the greatest show ever. mindless entertainment, campy action and good looking stars. Hopefully the other 3 series get released soon, I wouldn't hesitate buying them
All right, Mr. DeMille, I'm ready for my close-up!. What a fabulous gem of a movie and worthy of a spot in every movie collectors library!! "Sunset Boulevard" was nominated for several Academy Awards in 1951 including Best Picture. Unfortunately "Sunset Boulevard" lost the Best Picture nomination to "All About Eve"! Both movies were great, but I definitely felt after seeing both movies that "Sunset Boulevard" should have won the Academy Award for Best Picture instead!"Sunset Boulevard" draws you in from the very start of the movie. "Sunset Boulevard" really starts with the end of the movie if you will, because the lead character & movie narrator, Joe Gillis (played by William Holden), is found dead floating face down in a swimming pool.Gillis is a down and out screenwriter having a difficult time making ends meet. His car is about to be repossessed, so Gillis attempts to ditch his car by pulling it into a driveway leading to what appears to be a run down and abandoned mansion on Sunset Boulevard. He hides his car in the garage. Gillis soon discovers the mansion isn't abandoned, but occupied by now forgotten silent screen actress Norma Desmond (played by Gloria Swanson) and her butler.Norma Desmond is an eccentric, reclusive, self-absorbed and delusional woman. She allows Gillis to live with her rent-free & for an indefinite length of time--- The only string attached is that she wants Gillis to write a screenplay based on an idea she has about a movie. She wants to return to acting & sees Gillis as her way back into the movie industry. Gillis hates the idea Desmond has for the movie, but goes along with it anyway.Gillis and Desmond have a very odd relationship. He becomes totally dependent on her financially and she is very possessive of his time and whereabouts. So he ends up spending much of his time with her either writing the screenplay or sitting around watching all of Desmond's old silent movies on large movie screen with her in her home! Gillis becomes resentful about being tied down to Desmond. So Gillis begins sneaking off to write his own screenplay with another woman with whom he is attracted to instead.All in all, this movie is enjoyable. This movie is very witty and has a lot of fabulous dialogue between the characters! The acting is exceptionally fantastic. I love the set design and the costuming is splendid as well. A must see film
Before Ginger snapped, Lon Chaney Jr. was... ...The Wolf Man. Obviously, because this is a fourties movie, there wan't all the special effects that we are used to seeing in films like Ginger Snaps, An American Werewolf in London, The Howling, Silver Bullet, or the upcoming Van Helsing. George Waggner's The Wolf Man was excactly what the title states...a wolf-man. He stands up on two legs and has the bodily structure of a man, but has the hair, teeth, claws, feet, howl, and bite of a wolf. Whenever the moon rises poor old Larry Talbot turns into a werewolf after being bitten by the first werewolf he already killed named Bela (Bela Lugosi). This film has perfect make up work for it's time. You can really feel sorry for all that Larry Talbot is going through. This film uses great use of light and music to really creep you out. Even today, The Wolf Man still stands up to the current werewolf films because it it's atmosphere, cast, music, and plot and characters. This is only one of Universal's classic monster films that despite it's age, I (as a young twenty year old) absolutely love. The Universal monsters will never die
A lot of pleasure and a lot of laughs. 'Amazon reviewers' have already pointed out the dramatic change this show brought to sit- com TV. They have also indicated the specific episodes included here. They have said something about Archie and dingbat Edith, Meatball and little sweet Gloria. My only addition is to point out how much pleasure this show brought to my own parents, of blessed memory.It was waited for and anticipated each week.
This is the one to watch. Red Lantern is a carefully crafted story centered around a young woman named Songlian, played by the ever-brilliant Gong Li. Songlian's hopes and dreams of college and a better life are cruelly cut short by the sudden and unexpected death of her father. With no money for school and at the insistence of her mother, Songlian is forced to marry Chen, a wealthy landowner who already has three wives of his own. Each of the wives reside in separate wings of his centuries-old castle estate. The living quarters are extremely upscale and come complete with a personal servant and maid. But, like the storied bird in the gilded cage, their lives are sad, empty and lonely.Although the wives command respect and obedience from the hired help, they are nothing more than chattel to the wealthy Chen. Each day, the wives, along with their respective servant, stand at the entrance of their quarters waiting to see at which door the "red lantern" will be placed. This is how Chen chooses his wife for the evening. The "lucky" chosen wife is treated to a ritual foot massage by one of the older woman servants and her apartment is filled with large glowing red lanterns which burn brightly through the night. There are so many lanterns set up both inside and out that it, at first appearances, seems romantic but quickly ends up underscoring the true nature of the rite. It's a custom that quickly becomes apparant to be nothing more than lewd, sadistic sexual subjugation. It's not romantic, it's not passionate ... it's just a cruel game for Chen's entertainment. As the story progresses, we see struggle in almost every scene. There are secret alliances between the wives, the servants and the elite that frequent the master's estate. There is continual animosity between the wives as they plot and scheme to stay viable and remain in the master's good favor. There is an oversupply of backstabbing, betrayal and class struggle to be found between all of the major players. We also see the formation and disintegration of relationships between the wives. And, although the master tries to present himself as a peacemaker, it is gradually realized that he is actually the instigator of most of the hostility. Having the wives scratch and claw (metaphorically, that is) for his attention only serves to satisfy his own massive ego. Cycles of abuse are perhaps no more apparant when we see the wives, who are clearly victims in their own right, begin to victimize each other in an attempt to elevate their standing within the social order of the castle. The film is rich with many moments that are both sad and poignant. For example, although Songlian did not originally welcome the ritualistic foot massage, she grew to like it and missed it tremendously on those nights when she was not selected to be the "wife of the evening". She, along with the other unchosen wives, had to endure the very loud rattling sound of the foot massage from across the courtyard. It only further reminded them that they were unwanted and that they were not special. Did she miss the actual foot massage or what the massage represented? It became nothing more than a cruel Pavlovian experiment on the part of Chen. Chen seems to enjoy manipulating the women. Alternating between reward and punishment, he carefully trains them as if they were pets. The castle is a cauldron of sorts and it's only a matter of time before everything bubbles over. Without giving too much away, I'll only say that the storyline moves along resulting in tragic consequences that could hardly be seen as being entirely unexpected.The heart of this film is in its exploration of the indomitable female psyche. The film continually centers around very strong female characters struggling to survive under horrific conditions both psychologically and emotionally. The ability of the female psyche to maintain personal identity and spiritual freedom within the male-dominated Zeitgeist of feudal China is intrinsic to this story and although this sort of struggle is not really unique to Asian culture, it is handled in a very deliberate unapologetic fashion that makes this film not only special to watch but, necessary as well.I've been working backwards through director, Yimou Zhang's body of work and, in the process I unwittingly saved the best for last. Just kidding ... well, maybe a little. Yimou Zhang is certainly a director who likes to experiment. It seems like he's not content to make the same film over and over no matter how good the recipe is. Each of his films has a unique and distinct quality. This film is lensed in a very traditional straightforward fashion with equal amounts of closeups and far shots. The storyline is engrossing and carried along in a rich narrative style. The dialogue, although integral to the story seems almost secondary to the unspoken communication in the form of facial expressions, body language and other physical interactions between the characters. The film had many long visual sequences which seemed to tell the story better than any carefully worded text ever could. In my opinion, this is Gong Li's finest performance to date and I highly recommend seeing this film
Cain Mutiny. The acting was excellent by all actors. You almost felt you were there.In an non computer age of fim making the special effects were realistic. and of all things the story line had a moral.
Exquisite. Make no mistake, this film is (seemingly) long and (achingly) slow (in the positive sense of the terms): it would be deadly on a caffeine high or during a restless mood. If you can stand something that's virtually plotless but nonethless "transcendent" as a piece of art, then I heartily recommend this film. Otherwise beware, as evidenced by the rather negative opinions of other reviewers, but to them I ask: What on earth else were you expecting from a Bresson, a marginal and explicitly Catholic filmmaker?
Surprisingly Good Viewing. After having seen the Extreme Makeover program with demonstrations of the workout in generic looking gyms, I was surprised to see the beautiful Island of Maui in the background of all the workouts on the DVD. A little different perspective on each segment kept me interested and happy to be doing a workout.Although the movements are easy to do, and not difficult to learn, the intensity is what you make of it. When you are able to handle more resistance, the workout will still be a good fit. The variety of a different sequence of exercises each day helps stave off monotony.I bought the DVD because of favorable reviews here, and I was not dissapointed.
WOW,  AMAZING  EPIC!!. WOW!! I just rented this flick, and LOVED it!!! Great camera shots, good solid acting and cast, I thought "Quentin tarantino", direct this jam-pack action, because the style and killing and shooting part is amazing!!! Love the sound track! Every bit of this movie is SUPER!!! Insane & violent shooting and action mafia scenes, real good directed & shot!! Defiantly check this out FOR SURE!!! B+
A Look Forward Into The Past. This 1981 film offers an intersting glimpse into what is starting to become commonplace 26 years later. A company is having models obtain plastic sugery to make them look as perfect as possible. They scan the models into a computer and use thier digital likeness in commericals. The film directed by Michael Crichton, which was his first, is very good and still holds up for today. Especially the graphics that were used on the display terminals. For it being 1981, they still look somewhat cutting edge today. The only gripe is that one must suspend all belief to think that a very young Susan Dey would want to be the girlfriend to a much much older Albert Finney.
Great series - amazing value. Anyone who does not own the Evangelion series would be well-advised to purchase this set.  The original collection costs over $100, and suffers from numerous mastering defects in the video.  This set costs $30-$40, features newly remastered video that has removed some of the previous defects, and has 5.1 surround sound.As far as those who have never seen Evangelion, you are missing out on the best of the best.  Many fans consider Cowboby Bebop, Evangelion, and Trigun the best animes ever made...  While Trigun may be more deserving of a top 10 recommendation than a top 3, Cowboby Bebop and Evangelion easily compete for the top spot.One last point...  For those who have never seen Evangelion, keep this simple idea in mind when watching it: the series is not primarily about giant monsters fighting giant robot looking things.  If you remember this as you watch it, I think you will appreciate the ending of the series, which has little to do with the action sequences during the various episodes.  I've read numerous reviews where fans indicated their disapointment with how the series ends, but I truly feel they have missed the point of the show
Delightful Film - Cher's Best!. This is a charming film with a great cast. The story is the perfect blend of bittersweet and endearing. And the countryside of Tuscany is a star itself! Cher, Lily Tomlin and Maggie Smith give phenomenal performances. Everything about the picture is first rate: the writing, the acting, the visuals, the soundtrack. One of my very favorite films of all time
V - The Original TV Miniseries. Its a good thing that the old series is on dvd, and i am glad to get it
Understated. I enjoyed this movie very much. True it's not a classic war film but it stands out among the run-of-the-mill TV type of fare. The ending was curiously muted but it made the film raise itself a few notches. The weaponry was accurate (although I doubt the silencers used on both pistol and carbine were WW2 issue) and the uniforms tally with the photographs I have seen of USMC reconnaisance units. Definitely Hugh O'Brian's best work
See this in it's original French version, if you can. If you haven't seen this in the theatres, you are really missing out. My daughter and I went to see this film, and loved it soooo much, we had to own it! Unfortunately for us, we did not realize the copy we purchased  would be dubbed in English. The theatrical release was in French, with English subtitles, and was SO much cooler! The dvd version we purchased just seemed stupid. Yeah, the action was all there, but the actors sounded ridiculous! I don't know who they got to do the English dubbing, but they sounded like cartoon characters! It is impossible to take anything they say seriously! In the theatrical version, the characters sounded tough, strong, confident, in charge...all the things one associates with action heros. Hearing them sound like they had inhaled helium and taken up a childish version of English was a huge letdown... In short, the movie is excellent, but the dvd version is pathetic
Well... There was a ton of hoopla over this movie, and I just don't get it.It is okay, a decent modern film...I just don't think it was so great
Real men, not props, a great, gritty, marvellous film. This film is hilarious, moving, exciting.  Here the men are not backdrops to beautiful women.  This is the kind of film where guys can almost see themselves in one or more of the marvellous characters that end up making up this cast of would be male strippers.  But if you're thinking perfect bodies, think again... this is gritty, not beautiful.  The only beauty is in its absolute capacity to shake you and move you and it does that brilliantly without a doubt.  Another film in this genre is Tap Dogs and I'd recommend both as films that will equally appeal to men and women, straight and gay alike
If you're a fan get the Aussie edition!!!!. I love this movie and I can't really add anything else to the reviews already posted. But I will say if you love this movie get the Region 4 version from Australia. Yes you will need a region-free DVD player but it is well worth it. I found one for $35 that I can honestly say is one of the best pieces of electronic equipment I have ever owned. I can watch any movie I want without the powers that be telling me what I can and cannnot watch based on my geography. The previous poster is incorrect. There are scenes that have chopped. Part of one can be seen in the trailer. Nothing was taken out that will muddy the plot. But I have to ask Miramax, why, at a short 90 minutes, would you bother taking out more of the fun? And I truly have a dislike for the voiceovers done to change Aussie references to American. Don't underestimate the viewing audience Miramax! If we are going to watch this movie, most of us will look up any words or phrases we aren't familiar with. Thats part of the fun.There are 2 versions of this film available in Oz. There's the standard version and The Pool Room Edition. It comes complete with a fuzzy slipcover to imitate a pool table, a lovely keep case with pictures of the cast, sheet music to "We're Goin' To Bonnydoon", and a top 10 list of the Kerrigans best deals from the trading post. Ahhhh, the serenity
This helped when nothing else did!!. We tried so many things trying to help our speech delayed child. Nothing helped until we found this video/dvd!! Now our child can say the words taught on the video and KNOWS what the words mean!
The RNC , Arnold,  and Me. While watching Arnold give his excellent speech at the RNC (Republican National Convention) a couple of weeks ago, I started to think about what movies I had seen him in. I had only seen him in two, and both of them were mediocre, at best. But I was in an "Arnold frame of mind," so I went to the video store the very next day to take out an Arnold movie.I couldn't decide between "Twins," and "Junior." I really only wanted one, because I know his movies usually aren't that great. But I just couldn't decide between them, so I rented both.I watched "Junior" first. I was so pleasantly surprised - I really liked this. Not deserving of a full four stars; more like 3 and-a-half. I liked it so much I watched it twice, enjoying it even more the second time. Read Amazon's editorial review -- I agree with every single word written there.Then I watcheed "Twins." This I didn't care for. Too much crime/action, not enough comedy, and a very weak script. It just did not live up to its very promising premise.I think "Junior" is a great "date video." (Well, my gentleman friend liked it!
HAIR RAISING FUN. THE BIG TEASE is the second movie I've seen in the past year about a hairdressing competition.  The other is the likewise little known BLOW DRY.  BLOW DRY is a little more accessible as it has a more in depth plot line and characters.  However, THE BIG TEASE is a "mockumentary" with soul and a droll sense of humor.  Craig Ferguson marvelously plays stylist Crawford Mackenzie, a Scotsman who mistakes a form letter for an invitation to participate in the annual Platinum Scissors award competition in Los Angeles.  Once there, he finds out he's only invited to be in the audience, and the competition's officious chairperson (a delightful Mary McCormack) refuses to let him enter.  Mackenzie stumbles onto Sean Connery's agent, played very nicely by Frances Fisher, and one thing leads to another and kaboom, Mackenzie finds an ally.  The supporting cast is top notch:  Donal Logue as the wannabe actor with his own limousine; David Rasche (Sledgehammer) as the Norwegian three time champion; Ted McGinley (underused) as Rasche's buddy; and some nice cameos from David Hasselhoff and Drew Carey.  The outcome is predictable but the movie has such a nice low key approach to its subject matter, it's delightful.  The final four hairstyles are priceless, too!A charming film that entertains in an entirely different way
Curb Your Enthusiasm - The Complete First Season. Even though the DVD contains only ten episodes we found the collection to be worth every penny.  We watched them over the course of a few month so as not to waste the laughs all in one day
Jerry Seinfeld at his best!. This DVD was really funny!  As a fan of the Seinfeld show and stand-up comedy in general, it was great to see Jerry return to his roots, where it all began and prove that he is still a master at stand-up comedy.  Some of the jokes were expanded versions of his best material from the stand-up portion of the early TV shows and others were totally new.  All were hilarious!I saw "Jerry Seinfeld: Comedian" a while back and was actually quite disappointed but this DVD "Jerry Seinfeld Live on Broadway: I'm Telling You For the Last Time" was outstanding
It's Jake and Elwood!. Ah, The Blues Brother! A Cult Classic that tops the list!Our son owns a much viewed (and enjoyed) VHS tape of the Blues Brothers. One we have borrowed many times.When we saw this DVD and noted that it was a Collector's Edition, we knew we had to add it to our own DVD collection.Dan Aykroyd and John Belushi were destined to star in this movie.Jake and Elwood are an 'Unholy Pair' on a 'Mission From God'.There will never be anyone like the Blues Brothers, again.Too cool for words! They speak in Jack Webb/Henry Morgan 'Dragnet' style, clipped and dour.They want 'action' and along the way they not only get it, they give it!You'll be in for one toe tappin', finger snappin', racin', chasin', shoot 'em up, bang 'em up, hell's a poppin' time!Enjoy the ride! ~ Mrs. B
Steve is hilarious!. Steve Martin at his best on SNL. His quick wit and timelesss comedic attributes make this one a no miss. The kids will want to watch "King Tut" over and over
Great Time Saver. I love this tape because you can do seperate segments that are only 10 minutes each. You can hit your abs while waiting for pasta water to boil or get a good stretch b4 bed. You can break it up and use it with other workouts to boost your metabolism. I love i
Carole Lombard in elegant Depression Hollywood. Universal Home Video does so many things that film collectors hate, including no labels on disks and no bonus material, like Warner Home Video always does and Paramount Home Video often does.  And for the same price.  Now Universal is daring to bring out a six-episode KATE AND ALLIE season one with bare-bones bonuses for a ridiculous SRP of $30, instead of perhaps adding season two and charging $40.  Fans are rioting on Amazon.com, but Universal Home Video executives don't seem to give a damn.  They are also daring to fleece baby boomers by charging $50 for an admittedly complete and remastered season two of LEAVE IT TO BEAVER with no bonuses.But once in a while Universal Home Video does something very right and deserves credit.  I have in front of me a very elegantly and attractively packaged CAROLE LOMBARD: The Glamour Collection.  It still does not have labels on two disks and no bonus material at all, like an audio commentary by a scholar, but it DOES have no less than six very enjoyable Depression era programmers in shimmering studio prints for a SRP of about $25 (I paid about $17 at Amazon.com).The earliest of these Lombard films is MAN OF THE WORLD (1931), which has a very young Carole blackmailed by William Powell.  It is a Powell vehicle, with Lombard in the supporting cast.  I will let you guess how it ends.  And the latest of the six movies is TRUE CONFESSIONS (1937), which is probably the weakest, even with Fred MacMurray and John Barrymore billed above the title with Lombard.  But it's still watchable for Lombard's elegant gowns and the Paramount gloss from ace cinematographer Ted Tedzlaff.The other four titles in this collection are all sophisticated romantic gems, with fun blendings of comedy and mystery.  Several co-star Fred MacMurray.  The films were made almost back to back, from 1934-1936, mostly at Paramount.  They should be familiar to film scholars: WE'RE NOT DRESSING, HANDS ACROSS THE TABLE, LOVE BEFORE BREAKFAST, and THE PRINCESS COMES ACROSS.  Novice Depression era audiences should also greatly enjoy this B&W quartet.Joining this Carole Lombard set in The Glamour Collection from Universal are Marlene Dietrich and Mae West with, I believe, five movies each.  With no bonuses, like new documentaries and audio commentaries, they are not worth much more than $20.  But if they are as enjoyable and visually beautiful as the Lombard set, these other two are worth investing in for $15-$20.  And certainly well worth renting at Netflicks.
A Russian Classic Comedy. I have read one negative review about this film and I would like to clarify the statements made in it. I am Russian so, obviously, I like this film. It has typical Russian humor, it is a farce, so do not look for higher meanings in the jokes, it makes fun of the social standards of the Soviet regime as well as the people who served it so well. It features some of the best Russian actors that we love seeing and acting; they sing in the movie and it is lovely as well. If you are a tough judge of movies, then please make sure you know Soviet history a bit and understand that the humor differs from what you see in American movies before you call it crap.I do not see why there should be a problem with characters not talking for the first ten minutes of the movie. In fact, it is just a few minutes during which you are shown the premise of the movie. And as for cyrillic letters not making sense: this is a Russian movie and you are bound to see everything written in our gibberish alphabet. Besides, the movie begins with a cruise in a foreign country (it was shot in Baku, Azerbajan but is supposed to be Turkey). The language spoken by the locals as well as the signs on buildings are gibberish - it was made up specially for the movie.That said, I want to say a few words about the plot. Semen Semenovich is a diligent Russian economist goes on a cruise, where he gets acquainted with a mafia mob's right hand, Kozodoev, whose assignment is to pick up diamonds from the supplier and deliver it back to Moscow via a cast on his arm. During one of the last stops, Semen Semenovich gets mistaken for Kozodoev and ends up with a cast and jewels inside it. As he returns to Moscow, Semen contacts the police. Now, he has to pose as bait and escape the traps elaborately planted by the mafia.As I already said, the movie is fantastic. Just remember that it is a farce. And no, there is not slapstick humour. Be open-minded and enjoy! Oh, and by the way, all the jewelry you will see on the screen is authentic. It's mentioned in the beginning that the film crew would like to thank all Soviet individuals who lend their gems for the filming.
Very nice family watch. Big Momma is back and he's better than ever before!Martin Lawrence steps back into the fat suit and seems to have perfected his role as Big Momma. I have heard a lot of people say negative points about this film, but I disagree with them (mostly). It is a comedy and is not meant to be took seriously.Big Momma's House 2 seems to be more of a family film, but saying that there are elements that will appeal to all ages. They was not one scene in the film that I found distasteful or lame and I thought that the cheerleader scene at the end of the film was comical and adorable
"If you were a man I'd punch your dirty face in.". D.O.A. (1950) is one of those films I try to watch about once a year (a lot easier since purchasing it on DVD) as it's a classic American film-noir mystery/drama with quite a bit going for it, along with a few, minor flaws (the minor flaws tend to stand out a little more here because most of the other aspects are so strong).  Directed by Rudolph Mat (When Worlds Collide, The Violent Men), an accomplished cinematographer prior to moving into the realm of directing, the feature stars Oscar winning character actor Edmond O'Brien (The Hitch-Hiker, The Barefoot Contessa, The Wild Bunch).  Also appearing is Pamela Britton ("Blondie", "My Favorite Martian"), Lynn Baggett (The Time of Their Lives), Luther Adler (Voyage of the Damned), Beverly Garland (The Alligator People), William Ching (In a Lonely Place), Laurette Luez (Prehistoric Women), and Neville Brand (Halls of Montezuma, Stalag 17), in his first credited feature film role.  For fans of the television show "Green Acres", keep an eye peeled for Frank `Sam Drucker' Cady, as he's got a bit part early on as a bartender.As the film opens we see a man entering a large, metropolitan police station and head towards the homicide division.  Upon arriving, we learn he's there to report a murder...his own!  Turns out the man's name is Frank Bigelow (O'Brien), and he's a accountant from a small, Californian town, to which we move into a lengthy flashback as he relates his tale.  Frank works in a small, podunk town along with secretary/girlfriend Paula (Britton), and it seems Paula's a little put out by the fact Frank has announced, on very short notice, that he's taking a trip to San Francisco to get a little time for himself.  As Frank arrives at his hotel, the joint's jumping with conventioneers, a group of them Frank ends up hooking up with...after a night out on the town Frank returns to the hotel and wakes the next morning feeling rather poorly, enough so to cause him to see a doctor, which he's then informed he's been poisoned!  Not only that, but the poison is fatal, and he's got perhaps a week, at the most, to live.  Some vacation...anyway, Frank eventually discovers his predicament was deliberately caused, and sets out to discover the whos and the whys.  The trail leads Frank to a minor business dealing he had some time ago with a character named Renoylds, one involving the sale of some precious metals.  As Frank delves deeper into the mystery he stirs up a hornet's nest of trouble, mainly for himself, as there are those who don't appreciate his sudden interest their affairs, and runs afoul of some thugs, the result being if the poison coursing through his system doesn't kill him, the various bullets thrown his way might...I think one of the more interesting aspects of this film for me was how O' Brien's character just wasn't an entirely likeable fellow in the beginning, one that I found myself rooting for by the end (albeit halfheartedly).  You see, in scenes near the beginning, Frank is portrayed as a sort of philanderer, especially once he hits San Francisco.  That, in and of itself wouldn't mean much to me, except for the fact he's stringing along a swell dame in Paula (Ms. Britton looked incredibly beautiful here, but not inaccessible) who's completely devoted to him, so much so she's willing to put up with his peccadilloes.  Sure she gets miffed, but she always ends up coming around, and, at one point, she basically tells Frank there isn't anything he can do that would cause her feelings for him to falter...probably not something you should relate to someone with a wandering eye.  Once Frank accepts his predicament (that whole dying thing), he does eventually come around, realizing what's important, so there is a strong, moral element involved.  Another element I enjoyed was the character of Chester the thug, played by Neville Brand, who appears later in the story.  It's always fun when they throw a sadistic, wild-eyed psychotic in the mix, especially one who tends to refer to himself in the third person and call his handgun `Baby'.  There's a couple really great lines of dialogue present, one of which I used for the title of this review.  It occurs once Frank begins unraveling the mystery of his murder, and he gets terse with femme fatale whom he believes to be involved (she is), to which she tells him "If you were a man I'd punch your dirty face in.".  Another good one comes just prior to this, as he's strong arming a tight-lipped secretary, played by Beverly Garland, into spilling her guts telling her she's "in this right up to your pretty, little neck!".  I thought the performances, the direction, the writing, and cinematography all very strong, complimented wonderfully by Dimitri Tiomkin's vibrant musical score.  The pacing is quick and leads up to an exciting and engaging climax, one definitely worth sticking around for...there is one aspect I did find annoying, and it wasn't the fact so many fabulous babes seemed willing to throw themselves at a slightly paunchy Edmond O'Brien.  It involved the usage of a slide whistle.  As O'Brien's character arrives at his hotel in San Francisco early on, every time he sees a babe there's a simulated wolf call sound effect created with a slide whistle.  Now this is something I'd expect in a screwball comedy starring Jerry Lewis, but not something that fits in with the material here, especially given the rather dramatic opening sequence.  I'm unsure who decided to throw that particular sound effect in, but they didn't do the picture any favors.  It certainly doesn't ruin the film, but I thought I should warn those interesting in see it, as it may draw you out of the feature as it did me, eliciting a "What the fudge?" response.  Despite that minor point, the rest is gold, especially if you're a fan of noir.It looks as if this film has been release onto DVD various times, by a few, different companies, but the version I own was released by Image Entertainment, as part of The Wade Williams Collection.   The DVD case states the source material used was a restored producer's negative.  The picture, presented in full screen (1.33:1) does look clean and sharp, but there are minor imperfection throughout (no frames seem to be missing, though).  As far as the Dolby Digital mono audio, it seemed to me the levels weren't entirely consistent, as I found myself regularly adjusting the volume (maybe my ears are going bad, I don't know).  There aren't any extras included, but there are chapter stops.  I haven't seen the other DVD releases so I can't compare this to them, but I'm familiar enough with Image Entertainment's DVD releases to feel comfortable in saying the overall quality here is probably better than on some of the less expensive releases.  I did notice a Roan release available, and I've found their releases to be solid, so if your looking for a less expensive version but still better than average quality, that might be a way to go.Cookieman108By the way, I've seen the 1988 remake featuring Dennis Quaid and Meg Ryan...it's not bad, but comes up lacking when compared to the original, in my opinion.
Beautiful box-set. To any giallo fan, this stunning limited edition box-set is a must have, mine arrived today so I have not had time to view the two films, but so sumptuous is the packaging I feel to open the thing would be a violation. If you are considering this gem, then you'd better hurry as there are only seven thousand of these. Thank You Noshame
A romp thru an Era. I am not sure one would have to have lived through the Cole Porter, Rogers & Hammerstein, Jerome Kern, Hoagy Carmichael era to fully appreciate this movie, but I DID and I DO. The use of Jonathon Pryce as Gabriel to shepherd the movie thru the story and all the songs was pure genius. It also allowed greater insight into Porter, the musical genius, and Porter, the man. I, for one, could not have asked for a more talented cast singing and acting some wonderfully witty and sometimes salacious lines. For me and many others, this is not just a DVD, but one to be played over and over. Kevin Kline becomes Cole Porter; Ashley Judd becomes his wife and his muse. An excellent choice of performers to bring Porter's life and music (as he wrote it) to life rounded out a wonderful movie. If you love Cole Porter, this one's for you; otherwise, forget it.
Scarlet and the black. A wunderfull film, a good an true story. It's so sad that there is no german sound, for me and my family are living in germany.If somebody has a german sound for this movie (Im Wendekreis des Kreuzes)I would be very glad to heare about and maybe to buy it
Great Movie. From the moment the stuffed dead rabbit ripped the nails out of his paws and spit them out I was hooked.  This is a hilarious movie. Even more so if it was made for kids.The narration style get's a little annoying, but overall it's a great movie
Review for Image Entertainment's DVD of "Caligari". I've seen this movie from time to time since about 1970, but, with Image Entertainment's DVD, I feel like I'm seeing it for the first time -- it's that good!The picture on my public domain DVD (which I just threw out) basically looked like a few light areas (faces, lamps, etc.) surrounded by large black areas with no details - actually, I should say large dark gray areas with no details. It was often hard to see where the characters were and what they were doing.The picture on Image's DVD has a much-closer-to-normal gray scale and shows much finer detail. You can see things in the shadows. The gray scale still isn't quite up to modern standards, but I'm sure that's not Image's fault. You're watching an 85-year-old movie. They used the best print they could find, and it's a vast improvement over anything else I've seen.There's a string quartet score which works very well with the movie. If you didn't know better, you'd think it was the original score.They recreated the expressionist style of the original intertitles, and even added some "digi-dirt" to make them better match the rest of the film. The translation doesn't use obscure words like "mountebank" and "fakir," like my public domain copy did. (Yes, of course you can look them up, but who wants to run to the dictionary while they're watching a movie?)Plus, it has been tinted to match the original. That helps this movie a lot, because with its odd sets, it's often hard to tell if a scene is set indoors or out, or if it's day or night.As picky as I am, I didn't find the frame line to be too distracting! It's not in that many scenes. I'm glad they allowed us to see the whole picture, rather than cropping the shots.I haven't seen Kino's version, so I can't compare the two, but I can recommend this version without reservations
Some Sudanese boys'  view of America.  Fascinating!. The young boys of the Dinka tribe in the Sudan herd goats.  That's why they were not in their village when the murderers came in the early 1990s.  They had to flee. It was a long and harrowing journey with little food.  Many of them died.  And yet many managed to cross the river to Kenya and make their way to the refugee camps.Ten years later, they had grown to young manhood, sharing a sense of family with the other refugees. In 2001, sponsored by various Christian groups, 4000 of these boys came to the United States.  This is that story.We meet them first in the refugee camp where they hope to be chosen to come to America.  Then we see them on the big airplane.  A half dozen are sent to Houston.  Others are sent to Kansas City and a other states.  We watch them learn to cook on an electric stove, shop in the supermarket, and attend church services.  They stand out, even among African Americans because their skin is almost coal black.One of the boys in  Houston gets a job in a factory.  He sends money back home and also buys a car, which he needs to get to work.  We watch him take his driver's test, fail it, and then receive tickets for driving without a license.  His small salary also pays the rent.One of the boys goes to Kansas.  Here he enters High School as a junior.  We see him among his (mostly white) classmates and see him try to make friends.  He tries out for the basketball team, goes to parties and feels lonely all the time as he is so very different from those around him.We see all the boys meet at a YWCA summer camp, where they go swimming, sing songs from their homeland and share stories about America.  They were all surprised how hard it is to work and go to school and pay the rent.  It is especially hard because they do not have families and are completely on their own.This film really succeeded in showing me America through the eyes of these Sudanese boys.  They all work hard and are pursuing the American dream.  And they miss their homeland too.I found this film fascinating.  Don't miss it!
School Sports Needs to Be Reexamined. I watched this movie in the theatre in 1999 and have to say that it was a good movie.  It made me cry a bit because I at that time I was out of work and wondering how I was going to make ends meet.  Let's not get personal here.The movie begins with four boys playing football.  They are having fun.  Then it goes back to the present.  The same boys are now teenagers and playing high school football.  It's not all fun and games.  It's about winning the championship and glorifying the coach.  I can't believe that they even have a statue of him!  He is no Abraham Lincoln.  Give me a break.As I was saying, the main character Jonathan "Mox" Moxon, played by James Van Der Beek (with dyed brown hair) plays high school football and reads literature on the side.  He is more concerned about his academic abilities than he is about the game.  When the QB Lance Harbour, played by Paul Walker (Fast and Furious series)is injured, Moxon has to take his place.  The spotlight at first, is engrossing.  But he realizes that it will jeopardize the person that he--trustworthy and understanding.  The last thing he wants is to steal his best friend's girl.The movie doesn't only focus on Moxon, but his friends--Lance, Billy Bob, Charlie Tweeder, and Wendell Brown are also affected by the pressures of football and their relationship with the coach."Varsity Blues" focuses on the pride of school sports in small-towns that sometimes gets out of control.  Parents have high expectations of what their son or daughter should be--an athlete or a cheerleader.  And Mox's father wanted his son to live up to his expectations because he was never able to live up to his dream.This movie is a cathartic.  Whenever you feel like life is throwing you a curveball, watch this movie.  Jonathan Moxon never allowed anyone or anything to get in his way.  He knew what he wanted and was determined to go after it and also help his fellow teammates
Best Movie Ever Made. Major Payne is the greatest comedy movie ever made for all age
Tantalizing Tina Times Two!. Both of these concerts serve as amazing recent chapters in the long, impressive performance history of Tina Turner. The voice, the legs and the energy have not yet seemed to wither!  The Amsterdam concert is a little more slickly edited in that "music video style," but the songs are great!  Tina really rocks (most notably during her heavy metal version of "I Heard It Through the Grapevine," and the climactic "Nutbush City Limits.") The second great concert at Wembley seems more fashioned as a theatrical performance - with Tina taking a seat onstage for the first time that I can remember!  She sizzles during her seated low-key version of "Steamy Windows," but also cranks it up for the famous "Proud Mary" hair flip dance number! This is a great opportunity to have both of these great concerts TOGETHER!  Now how about releasing a COMPLETE Tina Turner music video (video, not live performance) anthology on DVD???  Like the song says, Tina is simply "The Best!
Terrific Edition!!!!!!. The ultimate edition of this movie, lots of extras and the image and sound are great
Great old Arnold Schwarznegger Movies!. An untypically good barbarian guts & glory, muscle & mayhem, treasure & trysts duo of films!, Arnie does a bang up job in this the "Complete Quests" set
SO THIS IS FILM NOIR... Rarely, at my age, does a 5-star drama get past me that has been out for 57 years. Well this one did. Seeing it for the first time last week was a rare, refreshing treat.After reading many of the fine reviews here, I became intrigued with what was described by many reviewers as "a strange noise", "whistle", or "music", every time Frank Bigelow [Edmond O'Brien] saw an attractive woman. I watched it alone, with my spouse, and with my daughter, and we all found it rather unsettling when indeed the strange music, like whistling glissandos, followed Frank Bigelow's stare toward young females in San Francisco. We believe that the strange sound was to show the contrast between Bigelow's original demeanor of just another "typical" guy out for some capricious fun in San Francisco and the one we saw later in the movie. Once he knew he was a walking dead man, this "glissando effect" was abruptly absent to show his new outlook and his maniacal focus on discovering who in fact had killed him. That's right, "who HAD killed him". That is what the movie is about -- Frank Bigelow's investigation of his own murder.WOW!Once the happy-go-lucky scenes passed early in the film, the scenes became very intense and the movie's pace really booked! Sub-plots and new co-stars like Luther Adler and Neville Brand were introduced and given three-dimensional characterizations through action, which is something to see. Edmond O'Brien very believably depicted a man who became strengthened by his freedom of fear of death, which made him into an almost-irresistible force. He was certainly a far cry from the milquetoast accountant out to sow a few wild oats during a trip to San Francisco before getting married as which he began the film. All of this intrigue happened in only 83 minutes. I have watched D.O.A. five times in the last 4 days. The only modern film that compares is "Point Blank" with Lee Marvin from 1967.This DVD played without fault but had NO features whatsoever, but for $6.98 through Amazon that was more than I expected.
Travolta does it again... ... he battles against the greatest obstacle an actor can face and almost pulls it off. What's that obstacle? you ask. Well, it's having a script that's so paper thin that it must have been written on toilet paper. Travolta proves over and over again that good scripts are not neceesary to prolong a career in Hollywood.I once met John Travolta at a charity event in Bel Air. I said to him, "Hey Travolta, who the heck is your agent and why do you keep taking these cripey roles?" I give him credit though, he looked back at me very cooly and said, "I fly airplanes and I'm married to Kelly Preston, you're wearing an enormous sombrero and spandex bike shorts -- who are you to judge me?"Touche, Senor Travolta. Touche.
Very good. I will buy this movie on DVD.  They said it was supposed to be like Mean Girls...which it didn't quite live up to.  However, I felt good the whole movie, laughed a lot, and was interested the whole time.  It is better than Talladega Nights.  Fun movie. Go see it
Best TV drama. If you are into politics and drama of the cerebral kind, then this is for you. In my mind this is one of the best to date. Great acting and a clintonesque president (minus the scandals) make for great TV
Act as though you have faith, and faith shall be given to you. His words to the jury, a petition for strength for them against great odds, for himself against greater odds, for a system sometimes blind to justice, and for the victim of negligence who has no voice, puts a lump in your throat today 25 years after the release of 'The Verdict.'TV bytes and news reports of lawyers' greed today have surpassed the image of scoundrels as nearly all of us now just leave them to their money-grubbing best. And the courage and brilliance of "Brown v. Board" and "Heart of Atlanta" exemplifying courageous men and women doing what is best fade into a distant past. But once in while a movie ('Mockingbird') comes along and moves powerfully to recall what it was that attracted us to the beauty of this ancient profession: to do what is right, or even better, to do what is right against great odds.Frank Galvin, drunk, ambulance chaser, liar, failure, had that dream once but a mistake, an error of judgemnt, a naive trust in loyalty that was gravely misplaced led him to where he is now, sucking on breath mints and bourbon, handing out cards, working for booze money.His old friend Jack Warden handed him a case, a no-brainer, a lovely Irish girl who went into labor and came out brain dead. The Defendants? A squeaky clean, Chaired, lauded, published and handsome OBGYN and  . . . . the Diocese of Boston. And Frank's going to cave. Hell. It's the eve of trial and he's been drunk through the 24 months of discovery. And then he prepares for the Settlement Conference with the Dfense Lawyer, James Mason (just positively brilliant) and goes to the girls hospital room where she is machine fed and takes photos. But a funny thing happens. Lke Marcellus (Burton) winning the Robe in the lottery at the foot of the cross or a drunk at his first AA meeting, Frank's not sure but something's different. And he begins to wonder if maybe this time he won't cave.Great, morbid, wry, ironic, gallows humor. Warden says after the Settlement Conference, "whadja' think of (Mason)?" Galvin: He's good. Warden: Good? He's the  [. . . . .] Prince of Darkness.A cast that you have heard of and seen a thousand times and some that you would never see again all working together to bring you a blue collar story of the good thief. I don't know that there is a better trial movie.People say that Newman lost but wasn't robbed for the Oscar because Ben Kingley was so wonderful in Ghandi.He was robbed. 5 stars. Larry Scantlebury
Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House. A great old movie, probably not unlike building a house today except a lot cheaper.  Lots of dry humor which I really enjoy.  A very mellow movie
Christmas at the Biltmore Estate. This video was absolutely marvelous.  Eveyone should not only enjoy Judy Collins beautiful voice, but the  beautiful Christmas songs she chose to share with everyone.  The great pictures of the Biltmore Estate were breathtaking and a place that I plan to visit at some time.  It it my hope that there will be a multitude of people who purchase this DVD, and take the time to just sit back,relax, and enjoy the beautiful music and Ms. Collins back up orchestra which was excellent. I am so happy that I purchased Christmas at the Biltmore Estate.Barb Hall, San Angelo, Texas
Funny Farm. Another great film by Chevy Chase. The entire movie provides laughs and lite entertainment.  Great for all ages
South Park - The Complete Sixth Season. excellent stuff. what can i say about it to sell this to you. its southpark. its hillarious, its politically incorrect, it rocks. buy it, buy it now. captain chaos rules. in fact why are you even reading a review - your wasting time, it could be in the post to you right this minute...
gymkata its unique. a dvd that was long overdue a mix of martial artsand gymnastics far as i know there is no other movielike it which is a shame imagine if there was a moreup to date version. anyways remember it is an old 80'smovie.it has a good story line and i would recomend i
Sally Field At Her Best. Sally Field is a wonderful actress, especially in a comedy such as this when everything goes awry with her romantic life
Great workout!. I love all the Ellen Barrett workout DVDs and use this one regularly, switching days with the "burn & firm" pilates--also a great workout! She is easy to follow, not boring/repetitive.  Lots of leg lunges though, so go easy on knees in beginning if you have bad knees. But it doesn't bother them and is a really good workout. I highly recommend it
one of my favorites. This film is one of my all time favorites. I think it's because these kids remind me of my friends and I as kids - riding our  bikes, going on little adventures, etc. The cast is absolutely perfect. Wil Wheaton was the best crying kid of all time - with the exception of Ricky Schroeder in The Champ. LOL. River Phoenix was excellent in this film, which is an adaptation of a Stephen King short story. Part road film, part coming of age tale, all the elements are here to tug at your heart strings.
A cheap price to pay for memories. Staying over at my house in high school almost always meant The Wall would make its way to the VCR. Not only because it was a great movie, but also because it had been stolen from every video store in town. By the time I was out of high school, the tape was literally worn out, and the weekly viewings had ceased.I'm not sure how I missed the first release, but I picked up the 25th Anniversary version the week it came out, and it brought back tons of memories.I'm not sure about some of the reviews here, as some claim that the transfer and audio aren't improved, and others claim it has been. While I can't comment on the differences between DVD's, I can say that the transfer was about what I expected, but the extras on the disc were a very nice surprise.That all said, I think the video transfer could have been improved. Obviously, the picture quality was better than VHS, but it was still rather grainy and dull. Though purists may disagree, I think a "Deluxe Edition" should show a little more work
GREAT MOVIE!. I am amazed at all of the people who didn't enjoy this movie. My boyfriend and I laughed the entire time. I thought this was although not original, well done to say the least. If you can laugh at stereotypical comedies you will enjoy this movie. Ryan Reynolds was great
Money *can* buy this Gift. "Money Can't Buy It" alone is worth the purchase of this DVD, which makes a great Gift
If You Give Metamorpho a Surprise Birthday Party-Please Don't Invite these People.... Yes People. I finally arrived to my castle in Scotland. Somewhere in Rhodes- but don't ask the address. It is reserved for only special people. Not that I am denying that you all aren't special. But, being inundated with tons of special requests is terribly hard -even for a reknown Seer (like myself!). I've had the chance to relax and watch a few videos that would relax my tired brain synapses. And I picked this one! I must have been crazy! But, not unlike the characters in this movie, believe me. Anyway, I have branched out to movie reviews and, after all, it is an art form like music- only more visual than audible. Needless to say-your Metamorpho has been well-versed in all the inner soul machinations. Thus, I take my crafty hand at reviewing this considerable movie.I have been quite taken with it since it explores the human psychology in many vast and revealing ways. I seek answers. Why do people act the way they do? Certainly, we can all take behavior on a surface level only. But there is much, much more.But first - let's talk about the acting here. It is perfect casting. Elizabeth Taylor has, absolutely, without a doubt, given one of the finest performances on screen ever. And, Richard Burton, is not far behind. With George Segal and Sandy Dennis completing the cast, it is about as perfect as it can be. Superb!However, you must have alot of energy to view it because it will drain you. Why? Because the characters, George and Martha, who it seems are constantly at war, will exhaust you beyond your limitations. It is distasteful. It is crude. And, as your Metamorpho will testify, there really are people out there exactly like this.There are many themes on display here. And, just like that miraculous onion universe - there are layers upon layers of revelations to discover.  For the most part-on the surface - is the question of reality and truth. And how people make contracts to perserve their illusions to  avoid reality.It also makes the big statement of how we all hurt each other because of that illusion. How the illusion must be protected at all costs.             .But, in all this, it is revealing. It is a mirror to ourselves and begs us to answer within; how much of this are we complicit with? It is an examination- but also, an unveiling. And, those with introspection would be amazed at all the wealth that this movie contains.I cannot reveal all the inner workings and levels that are within this  movie. And, Edward Albee (the writer) has invented lines of sheer genius that, if you blink, and your ears don't hear for a second, you will miss entirely. So, BE AWARE my public!The plot is so complicated that all I will give you is the scenario. George (Richard Burton) is an associate professor at a college. Martha (Elizabeth Taylor) is his wife and the daughter of the head of the college. They have constructed an illusion of having a son to make life more acceptable. But, this is a fantasy only between the two of them. And their bitterness surfaces at inopportune times. When Nick (George Segal) who is a new teacher of Biology and Honey (Sandy Dennis) are invited over after a college social gathering, the tension between George and Martha really starts to escalate. Why? Because the "pact" between George and Martha was broken because Martha spoke of their son to Honey.  Information is gathered about the couple, then George and Martha include them in their illusion, turning Nick and Honey into victims as well.   Understand, there are so many themes here and so many aspects to view this movie. The more you watch, the more layers of insight you are able to decipher.In my mind, Edward Albee has created a masterpiece with this and should definitely be watched by those who seek to avoid illusion in their lives  and those who need a mirror into their own lives. Absolutely superb. A dialogue and introspective movie which rates with the greatest.I realize I have only touched on a very small part of this movie. But that only begs further examination on your part. Illusions are barriers, walls, if you will, to breaking through to reality and discovering your genuine own happiness in the world. But, like any other barriers in our lives, you can break them down and find a whole new world or richness within yourselves. That old adage is true. There definitely is a thin line between love and hate.That is it for now. Your Seer always strives for true happiness in his life. This is a sacred right for me and everyone. Don't let anyone stand in your way for this quest because it is one of the very most important things in your lives. These characters deserve your understanding rather than derision. After all, it could be you.Thank-you for listening. Now I am off to change the light bulbs in my library. I am currently reading a book and using only full moonlight doesn't cut it anymore. Wait! Is that Elizabeth Taylor on a broomstick, streaking across the sky? Or is it--illusion?Who's Afraid of Metamorpho's spoof? - thumbs up- Metamorpho
Best Show not on TV. It's too bad the TV viewing public is more satisfied watching According to Jim than a truely great show like Arrested Development.  AD is a smart, quick and hilarious show.  Fox really dropped the ball
Enjoying the set very much.  Where's seasons 2 & 3?. I wish more people would purchase this wonderful set so we can get the last 2 seasons released.  It's rare to find good entertainment with a 30 minute runtime. But, this show, with Steve McQueen's star quality, is really enjoyable. I love to wake up on the weekend and watch a western, but with 2 babies in the house I don't have the time for a full movie.  This show completely gives me my fill.  The video, sound, and extras are top notch.  It's getting really rare for this type of release to have extras at all. Please check it out
"Harry Jackson, a cowboy singer and a painter...". Great inside look at some legends from our youth.  Those were great times in which to live.  There was so much hope that we could make a difference and Dylan became the poet/catalyst for a generation of individuals who became a movement for social justice.  We could use some of that power today.peace and love,Harve / Miami, F
Give us "Cambridge Spies: the Moscow Years"!. This gripping, well-acted film launched me on a reading odyssey, beginning with Philby's "My Silent War" and including Seale and McConville's "Philby: the Long Road to Moscow," G. Borovik's "Philby Files," Yuri Modin's "My Five Cambridge Friends" (Y.M. was one of their KGB handlers),  Philip Knightley's "Philby, the Life and Views of the KGB Master Spy", and Miranda Carter's "Anthony Blunt, His Lives", among many others (some of which are less than sympathetic). As a result, I can appreciate the intense research that went into this outstanding TV series.The portrayals are brilliant: the subtle nuances of Toby Stephens' Philby; the ambiguity of Samuel West's Blunt; the vulnerability of Rupert Penry-Jones' Maclean; and finally, the brilliance of Tom Hollander's Burgess. Hollander's portrayal of the outrageous original is so convincing that when one reads Guy Burgess' actual quoted words, one 'hears' Tom Hollander.Moody and suspenseful, the drama dwells on a theme worthy of Sophoclean tragedy: the conflict between the obligations to oneself (friends and family) and the obligations to the State. Each of the characters, tragically flawed, reaches what seems to be the pinnacle of success, only to suffer a reversal of fortune and be cast down by outside events (here, the intrusion of the Cold War). The tragedy in Mr. Moffat's drama rests not in the fact that Philby, Blunt, Maclean and Burgess spied for the other side. These are mere plot points in an Aristotelian sense (although the repercussions on the State cannot be denied). The tragedy derives from the fact that as each man is compelled to betray his ideals, friends or family, he recognizes the enormity of that betrayal.The film is enhanced by a riveting musical score and by remarkable camera work, which not only effectively depicts England of the 'thirties and 'forties, but also defines the characters with a sinister juxtaposition of shadow and light. The lighting is especially effective in scenes portraying the enigmatic and (some say) duplicitous Anthony Blunt, whose face is often half-masked in deep shadow.The commentaries accompanying parts one and four of the series are equally fascinating, providing us with nuggets of information, such as the fact that Trinity College, Cambridge, would not allow its premises to be used for making a film about four of its most notorious graduates (The company was forced to film at King's College, next door.). Similarly, the Reform Club, the haunt of Jules Verne's fictional Phileas Fogg, refused admittance to the film company, because it did not want to advertise the fact that it had once named a double vodka and grapefruit juice a "Double Burgess", after one of its most irrepressibly rambunctious members, Guy Burgess.We can only hope that Mr. Fywell and Moffat are planning a second series (The film-makers have already hinted at Philby's affair in Moscow with Melinda Maclean.). There are at least four more absorbing episodes: Philby's relentless grilling in London by MI5, his subsequent adventures in Beirut, his defection and miserable reception in Moscow, where he, like Burgess and Maclean, had to face the even colder reality of Russian Winters and the frost-bitten remnants of his utopian dreams, and finally Blunt's secret confession, promise of immunity, and eventual unmasking in London. Then the tragedy will be complete.
Entertainment at its best!. 11:14 doesn't try to be too smart and delivers just what the audience wants: great entertainment! With a star-studded cast (Patrick Swayze, Hilary Swank, Barbara Hershey) and a clever, hilarious story, I enjoyed this film from beginning-to-end. The movie is pretty short (less than 90 minutes) so it'll REALLY fly by. But I guarantee you'll get your dollar's worth on this; it does not disappoint. The characters you'll come across while watching 11:14 are so funny that you'll probably find yourself laughing just at their mannerisms. This is a great situational thriller/comedy that will even keep you guessing up to a surprising and fun twist in the end. Check it out
Underrated by Critics. Critics who were just trying to kill Slater's career as they do with many actors, actresses and directors rated this a horrible movie. But this movie is so hilarious. The drugged coffee? "I like my coffee cold." The chief's car. The part when Slater answered his front door with a gun pointed at whoever was standing behind and that guy who threw his arms up and fainted! "Why are we doing all this running? Aren't we all going to be in cars?!" And Milla is the definition of sexy
One of the very best of the French New Wave. My life to live is movie which breaks all of the rules of movies... From the opening shots the darkened profile of anna karina, to the opening scene in which the backs of the two characters in conversation are filmed.. this is Godard a man who loves to confront his audience and to challenge his audience.. But My Life to Live is more than just experimentation in celluloid, it is also a tale of a woman who falls into a life of prostitution.. and it delves into such topics as philosophy, religon, and poetry.. This is a perfectly paced film - each chapter illustrating something the director wants to tell us of the characters..It is one of the rare gems of the new wave
Brilliant film, brilliant acting!. I have never seen a Daniel Day Lewis film that wasn't a true piece of art. His acting is brilliant. Every role he plays in is so believable. Being Irish an a huge boxing fan I truly loved this film. It gave accurate information on the turmoil that is to this day going on in Ireland. A must see, even for the non boxing fans
Yes, they messed-- but they did add---. I too was surprised that the new, improved DVD version of The Best of Eddie Murphy was not the same as my old VHS version.  Sure, James Brown doing Hot Tub and Bu'wheat and Velvet Jones were there; but there was only 1 Mr. Robinson's Neighborhood instead of 2, and it was missing a few gems like the discussion of the Emancipation Proclamation and a sketch with Stevie Wonder.  But where the DVD redeemed itself was on the inclusion of a Gumby skit (I didn't care which one, I couldn't believe they didn't include one on the VHS and I wanted Gumby, dammit!), the prison film in which the poet recites the ever-popular and billiant poem, "Kill My Landlord" (C-I-L-L my landlord), and Stevie Wonder playing a nerd trying to do a Stevie Wonder impersonation, only to be taught by Eddie how to do Stevie.  So they taketh away with one hand, and giveth with the other.  Could they have included ALL of them, and then some, on a new DVD?  OF COURSE THEY COULD!  And why didn't they?  Good question.  But to be fair to the DVD, I welcomed the new inclusions.  Just don't get rid of your old VHS.  If it was ALL in one, it would be 5 stars.  But just having Gumby ordering a Morey Amsterdam sandwich again made me feel good all over (dammit).  Not perfect, but I'll give it better than a C (a bouncy C)
Interesting movie. This is by far an interesting movie. I am a huge fan of Baum and the Wizard of Oz movie and my boyfriend bought me this DVD for Christmas one year. It is a little weird but I love it because Baum directed it
DVD - 'The Forbidden Dance is Lambada'. DVD arrived in perfect condition & the family enjoyed watching it.
Awesome!. A large cast of well known actors such as Cicely Tyson do an outstanding job in this movie.  Tyler leaves you with that warm and fuzzy feeling
Basquiat a treasure worth owning. This movie has a wonderfully talented cast.  Jeffrey Wright's portrayal of Basquiat is very subtle and quite moving and I enjoy taking in something new in his portrayal of the ill-fated Basquiat each time I view this work.  David Bowie as Warhol, Christopher Walken as the interviewer, Benicio del Toro, and even Willem Dafoe as a sculptor/electrician. Wow! Dennis Hopper in a very unusual role for him, stands out as an art collector/dealer.  The casting agent has my taste in talent as they cast all of my favorite actors and personalities in one movie!  It is definitely worth owning
Definitely Not Impossible to be Entertained by this Film!. M:I:3 had a tough year. It had a lot of difficulty being a satisfieing blockbuster for the moviecompangy Paramount. This had to do with Cruise's acting in his personal life which made a lot of people skip this movie. Now, I think that is totally unfair. Mission Impossible III has become a fantastic adrenaline rush, and has become the best in the series. So put aside all those thoughts about couchjumping and give M:I:3 a change, cause it highly deserves it.The third mission of special agent Ethan Hunt is both impossible as spectacular. J.J Abrams, the director, shows everything he has got and squeezes this all in a timeframe of two hours. So expect a high pace throughout the movie which gets the adrenaline pumping. But eventhough the pace is fast, this doesn't mean that there isn't any time left to meet the characters. Between the actionsequences, there are situations thats lets us know Ethan Hunt, like Abrams said, as a humanbeing, not as just a spy. This gives nice dramatic, romantic scenes which feel nessessary to catch your breath after each action sequence.Once again, put all your negative thoughts about Tom Cruise aside and then watch him. One thing is forsure: The man sure can act. He shows an emotional side to Hunt, which wasn't seen before which leads to great acting. And you gotta agree, he does most of his own stunts in the film, which is very brave and worth to see as a result in the film.Next to Cruise there is a fantastic supporting cast. In his team there is once agian, the funny and cool Ving Rhames, the sexy Maggie Q and the also funny and cool John Rhyes Meyers. They all give the film a nice sense of what real teamwork is about. Then as the badguy there is Philip Seymour Hoffman. Trust me, he does such a great job that you want to step into the screen to punch him in the face personally, thats he great he is as the bad guy. As Ethan's girlfriend there is Michelle Monaghan, who also does a good acting job, but was for me the one who was the least satisfiening. Also starring are Keri Russell, Laurence Fishburne, Billy Crudup and Simon Pegg (who is absolutely hilarious) who all give a nice performance.The film, considering the technical aspects, looks fantastic. Every scene looks spectacular because of the lighting, maqnificent locations and the spectacular editing. Because of this editing, the actionsscenes get even more tense than they already are, which is great entertainment of course. The locations, from Shanghai to Rome, they all look alive and are delicious eyecandy. Then there is the music that helps feeling that adrenaline pumping through your vains.So M:I:3 should have been the biggest summerblockbuster of the year, but it is a big shame that it hasn't become that. Cause with Fantastic suspence, action and alot of spectucular moviemagic, this film is worthwhile to see and makes it not impossible to be entertained to the max!
The best drama on television that never got the ratings it deserved. When Once and Again first began I dismissed it as a show for just women. But after watching just one episode I found myself hooked. This was unlike any show I had seen before. I actually found myself drawn into the lives of these two families. Once and Again is not just a show about two divorced people who find each other and start to fall in love. It goes much deeper than that. Once and Again follows the lives of two divorced people and the lives of their children as well. But then it goes a step further and it follows the lives of their ex spouses as well. With the first season we see how the relationship begins to develop between Lily (Sela Ward) and Rick (Billy Campbell) and how their ex's still play a factor in their love lives and how their blossoming relationship has an effect on their children. Once and Again was one of the finest dramas on television and if given the respect it deserved could still be growing strong today. Even thought it's time on television was short Once and Again showcased the acting talents of Sela Ward and Billy Campbell and launched the careers of Shane West and Evan Rachel Wood. I am just glad that we are able to enjoy this fine show on DVD and that they have finally decided to release Seasons 2 and 3
Ciaran Hinds at his best. This film adaptation of Hardy's most seamless tragic novel is superb, with Hinds leading the way.  James Purefoy is also excellent.  Jodhi May has her problems (see earlier reviews) but she does know how to cry.  The supporting cast of villagers, the wonderful art direction, and the scene direction all make this very watchable, despite the sadness from beginning to end.  Like Ethan Frome, this is not something to rent if you want lots of weddings at the end, but as a work of art based on another work of art it is well worth the time.  One of the very greatest modern tragedies.
Loved it!!. I got the DVD for my birthday and absolutely loved it.  I've been a fan since the beginning and this DVD has put a goofy grin on my face.  I highly recommend it for any Cheap Trick fan
"A young beautiful stranger washed on to our friendly shores with only death as a companion". Found this while I was browsing the cult cinema section. Never heard of it before. Never seen a Jess Franco film that I can recall. Figured any movie that shares a name with a song from the first Velvet Underground album was worth a look. Am I glad I didn't buy "Freaks" instead? As Larry Flynt might say, "You bet your sweet  ass!" What a psychadelic trip, and another notch in my quest to watch every weird movie made between 1959 and 1979. What's the story, morning glory? A jazz trumpter finds a dead girl washed up on the beaches of Istanbul. He seems to remember some strange goings on involving her at a party he played at. Freaked out by the experience, he runs off to Rio de Janeiro, and falls in with a foxy singer named Rita. One night while he plays an engagement, the dead girl walks through the door. And of course he follows, as do we. Nothing seems to make any sense. Another figure from the Istanbul scene arrive in Rio, a redhead named Olga who favors wearing a fur coat topless. What does all of this have to do with a mysterious fakir who lives in the palace of a fallen sultan and an art dealer? Our trumpeteer, Jimmy, eventually returns to Istanbul, but the answers he finds aren't exactly the ones he expects. The score is haunting, the imagery and colors a feast for the eyes. An added interview with director Franco, who reveals the inspirations behind the script, is just the delicate frosting on a multi-layered cake. The crystal ball says more Franco films in my future. This one should be in yours
classic war drama. Excellent black and white british film! Had forgotten "old" movies were so interesting
A sweet story that pulla at the heart strings. Calling all "black sheeps of the family" - it is never too late for your family to come around.   In this simple yet powerful story, April and her mother learn that sometimes, those we have the most conflict with are those who are MOST like us.  Painful as it seems, we must all come to terms with dissapointment and overcome our personal fears of rejection when revealing our true selves.
Best Christmas Movie EVER. I really can't say anything new that hasn't been said about this great movie, except read Jean Shepherd's novels...you will get a whole new appreciation for the movie and the characters that have become a part of so many of our lives.Thank you Darren McGavin for giving us the best Christmas Present ever
A down-and-dirty Wild West story. Cocaine Cowboys is an aptly-titled 2-hour documentary about the cocaine economy which built modern day Miami.  The documentary covers the flashiest crimes and personalities in the cocaine explosion of the 1980's.  Director Billy Corben tells the story of the city built on cocaine via interviews with smugglers, hit men, and dealers.  This isn't a socio-political look at the drug trade, rather, it is a down-and-dirty Wild West story, complete with a Godmother who could give Scarface a run for his money.It does drag in parts, and could have been told in a more streamlined fashion.  Even at 2-hours on length, the DVD has another two dozen deleted scenes, for anyone who wants more time with the men on the street.  Anyone who enjoyed Scarface or Blow needs to pick this one up, as does any armchair economic historian
A big adventure whetts the appitite of our little einstein. Our 2-year old daughter loved Baby Einstein and this dvd was plugged on those. We loved the fact it featured famous works of art and classical music in a contemporary way. Martha loves it and often fishes it out of the dvd crate for us to put on for her. The interactive part of the disc is a great hit with her.A hit with little ones and grown up ones in our house at least
don't offer these women a cherry pie!. One has to wonder about Henry Jaglom's mother, when he dedicates a film about women suffering from eating disorders to her. This is one of Jaglom's more successful efforts since there is some dramatic conflict amongst the cinema verite talkfest that is his trademark. One might even mistake this film as a documentary with all the to-the-camera discourse. Otherwise his camera is thankfully still, aided by the excuse of a Frenchwoman making a documentary at an exclusively female (and enormously populated) birthday party. Maybe it's a very &quot;L.A.&quot; thing but it's shocking how so many beautiful women have food issues, and the association they make with food and sex, and food and love, makes for a compelling (for Jaglom) social study. He begins uncertainly, as the women gather. Jaglom gets a little carried away with cross-cutting, and there is a definite lesbian subtext which turns out to be misleading. But as the film develops our initial judgment of the women presented, as shallow and stupid gives way to depths of feeling and marvel at the openness and emotional accessibility of the female species. As the eldest of the group and the mother of Helene (Lisa Richards), who resides in the house where the celebrations occur, Frances Bergen represents the voice of reason and the sounding board for the confessions. Jaglom cleverly maintains our empathy for her, aided by Bergen's wonderful naturalness, even when her reaction to news of an infidelity defines the survival strategies of women of her generation. In spite of the heaviness of the subject, there is much humour to be found, partly from the women's own insight into their behaviour, and also from the idea of having Helene seek out the mistress under the guise of mingling. Richards' performance improves considerably after she stops pecking. As her predatory best friend, Gwen Welles adds some amusing spite to the proceedings. Her demonstration of the use of a present of anger-releasing padded poles gets a big laugh. It's no surprise to learn of Welles' bulimia since she looks anorexic, and she is about the only one who doesn't seem to think they are &quot;fat&quot;. When the birthday cake is cut, no-one wants to eat it. Since the cast is so large some actors get lost in the mosaic, but mention should be made of Toni Basil in Carmen Miranda get-up as an actress quitting her agent (&quot;If Michael Jackson can fire his father ...&quot;); Aloma Ichinose who has a great riff about smoking; and Mary Crosby looking like a fawn and being very I-shot-JR in a bathroom confrontation. I particularly liked the line &quot;I'm looking for a man who can excite me as much as a baked potato&quot;
"It's not like it's for life.". Middle-aged Parisian Jacques (Jean-Pierre Bacri) is recently divorced. The film begins with Jacques waking up in his apartment. The place is a mess--unwashed dishes, piles of clothing, and Jacques--even in his depressed state can't stand it anymore. He sees an advertisement for a housecleaner, so he gets the number, calls and arranges an interview. A young girl, Laura (Emilie Dequenne) applies and confesses that she's new at this, but Jacques doesn't care, and he promptly employs Laura. The plan is that she'll come one day a week while he's at work, but soon Jacques arranges for more hours. Apparently, Laura has money problems, and tearfully confesses she has nowhere to live."The Housekeeper" charts the gradual shift in the relationship between Jacques and Laura. She appears docile and pliant, and she very quickly adapts to Jacques' pickier requests regarding housework. She seems a little too good-to-be-true--especially when she makes statements about how much she loves to clean. It's a tactic that works, however, and soon, she's fully ingratiated into Jacques' life, and it's not too long before she's sharing his bed.The fun begins when Jacques takes Laura on holiday to Brittany. Previously, there have been a few signs of trouble in paradise. Jacques wants to listen to classical music, for example, and Laura's music blares his out-of-existence. But the real troubles begin on holiday. Laura, who's wheedled her way into Jacques' life and is now working on conquering his heart, begins to show a different side of her character. A Hollywood film would center on the sensual, titillating delights of the older man-younger woman relationship. Director Claude Berri, however, chooses to concentrate on the subtle conflicts that leave our hero--Jacques--a much wiser man at the end of the film. "The Housekeeper" is a pleasant surprise, and its light funny romance turns into wry, amusing reality. Watch for director Catherine Breillat who appears in a small role as Jacques' ex-wife Constance. In French with English subtitles--displacedhuma
One of the best movies ever made!. I laughed so hard, especially when the guy got stuck, that was funny!! JLH was awesome again!! This is one of the movies she didn't have to save, she just made it better!! The acting was top notch, even the main actor was good in this! Curtis and Pollack were great as the parents. This movie is due to be one of the best ever, I just rented it, and soon I'll buy it! It's awesome, get this movie, it rules!! I love Jennifer(LH), she's so amazing, and funny! Pollack is an awesome actor! Curtis just shined! And the rest of the actors were amazing, get this movie, it's the best!
Garfield, Odie, John..Pookie!. If you love Garfield, then this is the perfect DVD for you.  I found this DVD a couple of years ago, and just recently bought a copy for myself.  There is actually four or five volumes in this collection.  Do you remember getting up on Saturday mornings, and watching the morning cartoon?  I loved Garfield, and I was so sad when it was no longer being show on tv.  How about the farm where Orson the pig and Roy the rooster lives?  Yes, of course!  They are on this collection too.  If you love Garfield, then you must have this DVD!  I highly recommend buying
At last on dvd. Thank you criterion for restoring and releasing some of the masterworks of this great director - i have waited in such anticipation for mouchette..Mouchette, it has been said, is a crossroads among Bresson's works.. Once again he returns to another catholic - the author Georges Bernanos (diary of a country priest).He made a film that equals his previous one, 'au hasard balthazar', in its immediacey and subtlety and moreover, deep sadness...Mouchette is the ultimate Bressonian figure - she does not fit in with her society- and bears many hardships with almost christ like perserverence.. But ultimately, like christ, she succombs to the evils of this society.. Her suicide, while it might be considered wrong by some, is the ultimate statement of self.. here.. she is, like Balthazar, saintly and pure..Bresson's cinema is timeless and haunting.. this is one of his greatest films.
Very well designed. This is the ONLY baby einstein video I have ever thought was educationally valuable at all (I have a doc degree in child psych). I admit I am not a baby einstein fan, since it seems that most of them demonstrate little awareness of how children acquire language. The other ones I have seen are slow paced, with little thought towards helping infants make logical connections between words and concepts, the baby Noah is fantastic. It follows a predictable format that repeats names of animals with multiple images of those animals set to upbeat music, as well as shots of interesting toys and cute puppet shorts. The dvd is fast paced with lots of repition, and the overall tone is humorous and exciting. My 8 month old son is fascinated by this one, while he has never given any of the others more than a passing glance.
A Boffo Production!. This video is one of the most amazing performances i've ever witnessed. This behind the scenes look at recording one of the best musicals ever with a high voltage cast shows the whole creative, artistic process at work. Some egos are bruised along the way, tempers flare, but it is obvious that everyone wants this to work-and it does. The music is timeless and never sounded better. The interplay between Mr. Bernstein and the cast is fascinating, particularly between him and Mr. Carreras.Mr. Carreras stumbling over the word "coming" -he never did get it right-finally led to his storming off the set uttering epithets in Spanish! But he prevailed in the end, hitting a burnished, softly held "Maria" that would raise the hairs on anyones neck. Overall, a very fine performance by all involvedincluding a "pick up" orchestra that could hold it's own withanyone. I highly recommend this video. You'll smile when you hear it!
Wholly beguiling and never vulgar. Loosely based on the Little Red Riding Hood fairy tale and arguably the best thing Neil Jordan ever did, this film -- love it or hate it -- stands alone in its class.Cast to perfection (with a particularly arcane performance by Angela Lansbury as the granny), beautifully produced and expertly directed with an inspired music score to match, it was made to last -- which in viewing terms translates into renewed pleasure with every repeat.Incidentally, the film's apotheotic finale, superbly realized, left a strong impression on sensitive Pink Floyd's Roger Waters, who went as far as to acquire the rights to project the final scene during concerts, to great effect, on one of their "The Wall" tours.Only criticism must go to the digital video conversion itself, with its overblown sound effects and music, a problem already noticeable on the American VHS tape. The original film, much subtler, never sounded like that
My least favorite of the seasons but still worth it. I love this show.  I started late watching it (season 4) so caught up on it through the DVD's, saving the 2nd season for last after reading how bad it was, but, it's not THAT bad.  The Kim storyline gave me a little comic relief and the rest of it was your usual heart pounding, watch as many as you can in a row type of experience
Cute video. My kids (boy and girl) both love to watch this video...it has a lot of good footage of different types of tractors.  I think it helps that it is narrated by a young boy, so the voice is something the kids can relate to.  There are also a lot of cute songs that go along with the video
One of the representative and fantastic film of  Akira Kurosawa. If you have never seen his films made in 1950's, you should see them ASAP. You could feel his aggressive and challenging spirit for the movie.The title "Ikiru" means just "Live". This film obviously lets you know what "Live" is.The first time when I saw this movie is 20 years age. In that days there were no video, vcd or dvd player, it was very difficult to see his films even in Japan. But now DVD have been released, How lucky we are!
Intermediate Pilates users, delight!. Intermediate Pilates students will appreciate RAEL PILATES SYSTEM 17, which covers 17 poses for strength and flexibility. Ten additional poses are added to the basics: leg circles, cat stretch and more. Any with the basics down will easily move beyond with SYSTEM 17 on the box
Excellent Movie !!!. No Wonder Michelle Rodriguez was recognized for this role, she was amazing.  Because of the content of this moive, I'm glad the director chose a local girl to play Diana Gzman.  Michelle's acting, thought relatively new, was sincere in every aspect of the word.  A girl who is trying to make something of her life at a young age is very rare now-a-days.  This a great movie for the younger generation. It portrays hope, desire, ambition, drive, whatever you want to call it.  The directing was great: the city scenes, the fighting scenes, and the family scenes sucked you into a world of struggle and survival. I recommend this movie with all sincerity.
Tops notch portrayals of Holmes and Watson. Personally, I can't take seriously the old Basil Rathbone Sherlock Holmes movies -- although Rathbone was a competent Holmes -- because Nigel Bruce played Dr. Watson as a buffoon. In the books, Watson was not a bufoon but rather an educated, intelligent man, and the fact that Holmes' thoroughly surpassed him simply helped to indicate Holmes' genius. In my opinion, it is essential for Watson to be portrayed correctly for a Sherlock Holmes adventure to be correctly done. In these adventures David Burke played Watson to perfection -- the finest portrayal of Watson ever done, in my opinion -- and thereby enhanced Jeremy Brett's reputation as an outstanding Holmes. These three adventures of Holmes and Watson are among the finest ever made
Beautiful footage!. Since this DVD is only 40 minutes long I passed on buying it, but it is absolutely worth the rental fee. The footage is up to the usual breathtaking IMAX standards. Crytal clear and with vibrant colors even on the small 19 inch set I watched it on. If you've watched any number of undersea documentaries, you're probably already familiar with most of the sealife that is covered, but again it's the visuals that make this so breathtaking as well as the message that much of this life is being destroyed by man (as usual) and most be conserved. I highly recommend it. The only reason I rate the DVD with 4 stars rather than 5 is that it's not even an hour long and there are no bonus materials what so ever. But the 40 minutes are well worth the a rental
Yep, this one is a classic. The scene in the outdoor cafe is delicious and the scene in the fountain is now a standard (see "Boxing Helena"). Fellini hit the big-time with this movie and helped develop the future of film. A classic - never goes out of date
Haunted by the Past. Jack Nicholson knew no one could ever equal the masterpice of Polanski's "Chinatown" so he didn't try. What he did make when he took over this troubled production from Robert Towne (Polanski still claims he had to re-write much of Chinatown) was a visually beautiful portrait of 1948 Los Angeles in a boom that is a meditation on the past and how it haunts us.From the smoke ring filled opening of Peggy Lee's "Don't Smoke in Bed" to Jo Stafford's "Haunted Heart" at the end, Nicholson frames the colorful orange and blues of 1948 Los Angeles against the darker internal memories of the past. Gittes is a successful P.I. who works on divorce cases and plays golf. L.A. County is filled with orange groves created by the water so sought after in "Chinatown." But Gittes is about to be reminded you can never really forget the past.Los Angeles of 1948 is booming with housing going up everywhere. But just as in "Chinatown" nothing is ever enough. Oil is the new water and some people will even kill for it. Harvey Keitel is great as the 'other' Jake and Perry Lopez is on hand once more as Gittes' old pal Lou Escobar. Some of the best exchanges in the film are between these two. Rueben Blades and Frederick Forest give nice support as does Richard Farnsworth as weathered oilman Earl Rawley. Madeline Stowe nearly steals the show as the outwardly prim and proper but inwardly frustrated nymph Lillian Bodine.But it is Jake's meeting with the softly beautiful and vulnerable wife of the other Jake that triggers something. Meg Tilly is terrific as Kitty Berman, and Gittes can't quite understands why she gets him thinking about the past until he revisits it himself in the form of Kahn (James Hong), the Mulray's former servant. There is something about the flowers....As things come full circle from the past to the present Gittes will have to revisit the past more than he wants to, and in doing so will find all the closure he will ever get and maybe a chance to help Evelyn Mulray in a way he could not before. This is a great film that stands on its own yet is also a nice companion piece to the noir masterpiece "Chinatown."My favorite line from this film comes when Gittes rebukes a woman in a restaurant. He tells her: "I may be the town leper, but I'm the town leper with the most fingers." This is one you don't want to miss. It really is terrific and a must see for Nicholson fans.
Great Treatment of an Iconoclast. Jon Lovitz was added to SNL right after a strong season.  His troupe was castigated as poor in comparison to what had happened the season before, and, as a result, he sank with the ship (as it were).At last we have a chance to see what a genius he was.  One thing I really appreciated about this DVD was the inclusion of his "forties" productions.  I share Jon's love for the period, and his ability to slip into a forties smoking jacket went far beyond "the Master Thespian."And don't get me started about the Pathological Liar...yeah, that's the ticket.I'm hoping to see more of Jon in the future;  he was pretty much wasted in "Rat Race" and while I like his cartoon voice work, it's his physical comedy that adds so much
Must have for Jet-Li fans. Very,very good movie, on top of that it's a greatmartial arts flick. Any Jet-Li fan needs to havethis in their library.A different reversal of roles, he plays a doctorwho looks like a monk helping people and fightingoccupation over territories in China.His character Wei-Fong is well layed out, he hassome flaws, but he is great when the time comes.The martial arts stunts are really top notch,I can even list all the stunts but the fightswith the White Lotus bunch is outstanding.Pretty good acting too all around.
I HOPE THIS HELPS!. THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE DO NO LISTEN TO ANYBODY INLESS THEY HAVE 5 STAR REVIEWS 'CAUSE THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE
Rome. What really good fun!! My whole family enjoyed these Dvds to the fullest.  Really wonderful, with the feeling of Rome and a personalized view of the history.  We often travel to Italy and this was a "taste" without the trip
Good but start with season 1. Good season I liked it some of the jokes where no where nears as funny as the first two seasons but all in all a good last season.  Attack of the fever heads is a great episode and who can forget marco's encounter with scuba ninja's this does save the season considerably
Rare and unrare. Overall this is a great DVD for the HIM fan. I love it! Many hours of HIM videos and interviews, however, if you use a Playstation 2 as your DVD player you will not be able to see all of the videos because they become pixelated and such. I'm guessing the  playstation is not totally compatible with the DVD or the other way around. So just a heads up to those buying this DVD. Happy Watching
SCAM OR BE SCAMED. Holy cow does Amanda Peet look good or what, she does an excellent job on this film. Writer/director/producer Peter M. Cohen did a really great job. The film is very funny, and pitts men's hunger for more women vs evil women[ha ha]. On the real thow, this is a very good comedy and needs your support because some [people]like to hate
Argghhhhh. What a wonderful twist on the classic Treasure Island. Silver is a cyborg and young Jim is a typical teen looking to find his place. Morph is a wonderful addition and will grab you and pull you into the adventure and fun.
Lange at her best!. This has got to be the best adaptation of a play I have ever seen. I was a five year old kid watching this when it first came out on Showtime! I loved it then, and now I love it even more and fully understand it! Lange has never been so sexy nor great. Besides being the best actress in the world, her performance in here really displays her dramatic talents. Jones was born to play Brick and he does a great job. The settings in this version are so well designed and set-up it makes you wonder if they are in a REAL plantation home! And the rest of the cast, particularly the wonderful Torn, do an outstanding job. Besides the scenes between Jones and Torn being overly long and you find yourself missing Lange's prescence, this is a high recommendation
What's Better than a Spring Break?. Being on a Beach in the days of George Hamilton's golden tan! Great movi
A Funny Funny Film. I didn't intend to watch this film.  My family had just begun to watch it when I walked through the living room.  I didn't make it across the room until the film was finished.  The story is charming (though not as charming as the original).  The slap stick reminds me of "Airport" or some similar style movie.  The references to fairy tales and pop culture kept me interested from start to finish
Wigstock - A Love Letter to New York. Wigstock:The Movie is a colorful entertaining love letter to New York.  It's all about drag, but it's also about one of the most unique cities in the world where crazy underground culture can flourish. It's a lot like the movie Woodstock but with better hair
"That's when they call on me. Oh yes, name is Drake, John Drake.". Tighty controlled, these episodes are only 25-30 minutes in length, but retain the sound plot development that would later characterize the hour long installments of "Secret Agent" that would be released a few years later--an improvement in my opinion.In "Danger Man" Drake works for NATO rather than MI6 and his character is more impulsive and less defined than in later episdoes of "Secret Agent." We see this as the writers and directors sacrificed character development for action and the fast-paced episode plotting. Similarly, in "Danger Man" we witness some lower production values--the same sets were redressed at MGM Studios in Borehamwood, Hertfordshire (now demolished)although fans didn't notice.McGoohan would return to this location to shoot "The Prisoner" later. Some episodes really stand out; for example, "Bury the Dead" and "The Relaxed Informer."  These are enjoyable to watch, but I prefer the hour-long "Secret Agent" episdoes that can withstand repeated viewings.
Go Toby!. This is a really good family movie!Great for anyone~~especially the Toby Keith fan!
Very memorable. This movie was more than I expected. I was astonished at the amazing graphic and effects, and especially, the robots. You are kept wondering who the true villian is until the very end. I did not expect it to be who it was. The reason why I rated this movie a four instead of a five was for the almost constant swearing from Smith. I was not prepared for it, especially since the movie is not rated PG-13 for language. Other than that, I highly recommend this movie.
I could not help myself from enjoying this movie - a total surprise. Something must have appealed to me about NEW YORK MINUTE for me to add it to my TiVo list. As someone who managed to miss all of the previous efforts by the twins it wasn't an attempt to capture any nostaligic feeling. It wasn't also based on anything related to the story - teens get mixed up in series of mishaps in big city has been done many times before, such as Elizabeth Shue's ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING. You know what I think it was, most possibly a clip of two totally hot looking blonde actresses (let's face it they are) and the chemistry and comic timing they seem to have together.No, high-class art NEW YORK MINUTE is not. It's not the funniest movie out either. But what is lacks in what some perceive as it flaws it makes up for with good natured fun. Yes, this is a fun movie. It's fun to see the two go from one misadventure to another initially with a mutual contempt that becomes a realization on the importance of family and family ties.The movie features Jane Ryan (Ashley Olsen), a straight-A uptight Long island high school student who organizes her entire life around her day planner. She's driven and ambitious and determined to win a scholarship to go study at Oxford in England. She has her speech/pitch ready to be delivered in New York and seems as preapred as anyone could be. But fate has a cruel twist in store for her. Enter her sister Roxy (played by Mary-Kate Olsen), she's about as different from Jane as possible. Roxy is with a rock-band and acts with spontaneity that Jane would find scary. She also has made a habit of playing truant, something that has brought her to the attantion of Nassau Co. truancy officer Max Lomax (played by comic genius Eugene Levy.)Roxy is tasked with getting her sister to the train station, but she has her own plans for the big city, determined to deliver some demo tapes to record producers on hand for the videotaping of a new rock video. So, the two head for the big city with the bumbling Lomax in hot pursuit. Through some crazy machinations they become entangled up with some music and video pirates (including the hilarious Andy Richter as a goon who thinks he is Chinese) and the son of a U.S. Senator (and her dog) and are soon running through the streets of New York City in little more than bath towels.I've read a lot of reviewers on her dissing the acting of Ashley and Mary-Kate. Well, it's true that they are not going to be winning any Oscars for their roles here, but they deliver their performances with an infectious enthusiasm that had be lapping up every minute of the movie. I enjoyed it, I simply could not help myself.This movie comes recommended, and I really didn't think it would be. I surprised myself by enjoying every zany moment of it. And those girls are too cute
ROBERT Mugge, ROBERT Johnson... coincidence?. Finally, a real movie about Robert Johnson and the myths that surround him (instead of a fictional &quot;Karate Kid At The Crossroads&quot; or a self-serving John Hammond bio.) In one movie you get to: decide for yourself about the alleged RJ film snippet... hear Steve LaVere and other  scholars be, well, scholarly... and best of all enjoy the music of Blues  and rock greats like Robert Lockwood, Honeyboy Edwards, Keb Mo, Alvin YB  Hart and Rory Block. If RJ the man or myth interests you at all, you should  check this out. And while you're at it pick up a couple copies of the newly  re-released &quot;Deep Blues&quot; also by Robert Mugge. (Trust me, it's  been out of print for too long... Don't risk it again.) Enjoy
Very well made anti heroe movie. I was really surprised by this film. Its so good to see this kind of movies with such beautifull stories behind them.
"yes,well we just went a bridge to far". this is a fine movie about the post d-day raid into holland that was to end the war in 1944. as planed by field marshal montgomery the allies would drop behind the lines,take several bridges and hold them as ground forces race to link up and relieve the airborne troops. the problem was that it ment al the airborne troops would be out numbered and had to link up to live,and the ground forces had to make a dash down a one lane road to link up and the germans were waiting for them. really the problem was that "monty" as they called him was still smarting over not being given more power and he hated the fact that ike was in overall command. his ego and refusel to listen to his own people ment that everyone was afraid to say no to him.well enough of that lets get to the movie,which is one of the better epic war movies made. with a cast like this,james caan,sean connery,robert redford,michael caine,anthony hopkins,and many more this is one great war movie. besides the epic scope of the movie,it also takes time to give every actor so great little bits to play(i really like anthony hopkins packing for his jump,"pack my dinner jacket and golf clubs please!!) so if you like war movies this is one you need to hav
Beautiful Makarova, a chilly Dowell. Natalia Makarova defected to the West in 1970, and for ten years or so Western audiences were enchanted with her distinctly Russian style of ballet. It's become pretty familiar now, the "Russian" school -- boneless arms, a very fluid, arched back, hyperextensions, an emphasis on upper body movement.Makarova's Odette/Odile was legendary, and I feel lucky that it's now preserved on dvd, although she was 41 when this Swan Lake was filmed at the Royal Ballet. That's certainly "up there" for a ballerina (the famously ruthless Paris Ballet's system demands that all etoiles retire at 40).Overall, Makarova's portrayal is enchanting, and for once the legendary status is justified. Not that it's perfect. For one, not to be shallow, but she looks her age in this video. The harsh lighting does her no favors, and she was never classically beautiful anyway. Makarova is also weak at fouettes -- as Odile she actually does the 32 fouettes, but theyre slow, they travel a lot, she doesnt throw in any triples or doubles, and they lacked momentum and excitement. She IS 41, and I noticed that often her leaps, spins and turns are done with a shade of hesitation.On the other hand, one of the pleasures of this video is Makarova's obviously disciplined, classical training. She has excellent form, never bending her legs or flailing her arms. She has a wonderful ability to hold balances -- the Act II adagio is taken almost at a snail's pace, in part I think to showcase the way Makarova can keep a balance and hold it. She also never wobbles on pointe, and I like her determination -- although traveling quite a bit during her fouettes she finishes the 32 anyway. Makarova is better as Odette -- her arms flap bonelessly like real wings, and she brings such a soulfulness and pathos to Odette. I've seen wonderful Odette/Odile's, but Makarova is certainly one of the most beautiful portrayals I've seen.I'm not so nuts about Anthony Dowell. To me, he has great technique, but brings so little joy and romance to Siegfried that great romantic moments (like the White Swan Adagio or Act IV) fall flat. His face is unexpressive and stern throughout.The general production values are good. The Royal Ballet production is simple and classical, without the tacked-on happy ending of the Soviet productions or the fanciness of many modern versions. I was disappointed that in Act II there was no mime -- a great ballerina can make the mime heartrending. The corps was excellent, although not at the standards of the robotically perfect and uniform Paris Opera Ballet corps. I also like how unlike a lot of historical Swan Lakes this one isnt hideously cut.I'm very glad I have this dvd in my growing ballet collection. Makarova's Odette/Odile isnt perfect (which ballerina is, in this notoriously demanding role?) but she is enchanting
Sad story, but in a feel good way. More than meets the eye. This movie may not be for everyone, but to me it's highly memorable.POSSIBLE SPOILER ALERT:This isn't your ordinary "travel back in time to alter the futures of people you care about"-flick (Back to the Future--although, granted, it was better made and more entertaining).Butterfly Effect is really about (in alphabetical order) acceptance, chance, charity, choice, grownup love, hope, identity, opportunity, regret, and sacrifice.Some reviewers mentioned the quality of acting.  Here are my thoughts:Kutcher to me always seemed an innocent, caring, small town fellow more than the fun guy most of us might know him as, and that's why I wasn't surprised to see him pull off this role.Amy Smart was good mostly, but glaringly off-key at times (granted she had to show more range the the other actors)
Intense and fraught with fear. Burt Lancaster stars in this tough, grim noir-drenched prison flick, in which a sadistic prison guard (a young Hume Cronyn) manipulates tensions and weaknesses to produce an explosive situation.  The film's liberal message butts up against its obligatory &quot;crime never pays&quot; ending; the convicts are sympathetic, but doomed from the word &quot;go.&quot;  A little stagey and lurid, but overall tense and suspenseful -- the ending is a real nail-biter.  Recommended
Great Concert Footage and Music. Haven't seen this since it was in the theaters almost 20 years ago. This is an excellent concert DVD. The documentary footage is the usual rockumentary stuff, going to Graceland and seeing Elvis's grave and talking deeply about the meaning of the music (which the band actually mocks and laughs about doing). But the music and seeing U2 in their prime as this monolithic juggernaut of musical talent, charisma and stage performance is just magical. The music is great and Bono is the air apparent to the thrown of Savior of Rock and Roll. He is THE MAN. One highlight that was not actual concert footage is them working with B.B. King. Also love the beginning, "Charles Manson stole this song from the Beatles... we're stealin' it back," as an intro for Helter Skelter. The first half is in black and white for all the new songs that they were introducing. Then when they get to most of their big hits in the second half it is in color
Entertaining Series. I was a fresh eyed reviewer when I popped in the first DVD from the second season of Family Business. Fresh-eyed in meaning I had never seen the series. I was more into the Showtime series' Soul Food and the L Word and and knew very little about Family Business. The show is very easy to get into. In the first episode from the second season Adam gives a little background on his life, he was born in 1964, he is a single father and he works in the adult entertainment industry. Edgy and risqu are two perfect words to describe the show. You will see lots of breasts, asses and other body parts during the course of an episode. During one day at the office Adam is seen getting his supplies ready for the work day, er. video shoot. Adam is seen getting several douches and enema's for his workers. Family Business is not just about the porn industry, hence the word Family. Adam works with his family and they have their own aspirations. The mother, who also serves as Adam's book keeper has her own desires. She wishes to publish a cook book and to find a nice Jewish woman for her son. Adam's Uncle Stevie is hilarious, although he might not mean to be funny at all times. Family Business is an addictive show that is very easy to get into and the soft porn touch is sure to make this a favorite show for many people to watch on DVD. The two DVD set from the second season includes all 10 episodes from the 2004 season. There are no extras. It is really good that this series is being released at a quick pace. Season one is also in stores. Season three premieres soon
Incredible results!. I rescued a 6 week old puppy about 5 weeks ago and this is the first training I've gotten my hands on that works!  I have read Ceasar's book (and like it a lot).  And I've also ready Shelby Marlo's book (another great find).  But none of their tips helped me with the "nipping" problems I've been having with Sierra.  Now, after only 2 days of working with her using Paul's methods Sierra's behaviors have drastically changed and we're able to have fun with behavior modification rather than it feeling like punishment.
Not your average Hollywood movie. David Lynch has never been known to make movies for the masses. it seems like, you either love his work, or you hate it. This movie is a prime example. I have never seen a reviewer with mixed feelings about Mulholland Drive. Either you think it's garbage, or you think it's genius. I happen to be in the latter group. I will freely admit, it took two viewings for me to fully 'get' this film. and even now, a couple of years after i saw it for the first time, i am picking up subtle 'clues' and aspects to the film. that is rare in this day and age of 'cookie-cutter' hollywood movies. The plot is far too complicated and twisty to get into, and frankly has been gone over with a fine tooth comb already on this site. But, i will point out that one of the main highlights of this film for me, was the performace by Naomi Watts. She literally plays two different characters...completely different from each other, but the same. She is able to convey more emotion with just her facial expressions towards the end of the movie, then some actresses can with their entire body. This movie is a revelation on many levels. One of the best movies ever made. Period
Not scary, but very entertaining. I didn't think it was scary, it's was kind of funny, I think it needed way more blood and killing
Great Movie. One of Mel Brook's best movies ... a must have for any Eml Brooks fa
Change of heart  . . . This is a gently heartbreaking film set in Tehran, a city flooded with Afghan refugees during the time of Taliban rule in their homeland. It touches on several themes, including the plight of the refugees, and those of them who work illegally as laborers in the construction industry. Much of the story takes place at a construction site, where the central character, a young Iranian, a short-tempered lad full of complaints about his lowly status among the other workmen, gradually discovers within himself a heartfelt compassion for the refugees in the person of a girl masquerading as a boy to support the family of her disabled father, injured at the work site.The young man's compassion is ignited by the love he begins to feel for this girl, and there begins a series of selfless sacrifices that he makes for her and her family. Though they never exchange a word in the film, she leaves a deep impression on him, and he is utterly changed by his experience. A story that is about the transformation of character, the film sometimes struggles to externalize this process, often observing the main character as he watches from the sidelines, wordlessly ponders his situation, or goes in search of the girl and her family. Director Magid Magidi compensates in part by revealing the working conditions of the men, the difficulties of the contractor in charge of them, and the unforgiving weather (snow, rain, cold) in which they all labor. Recommended for the window it opens into a world rarely revealed by the cinema or the news media
Not as good as CSI Vegas, but better than CSI New York :-). Admittedly, I don't love this as much the original CSI set in Las Vegas, but I don't like CSI New York and don't watch that at all.  I really like this cast (and in the first episode of this season we lose Tim Speedle (who I thought was pretty good in it - maybe a little dull but a nice guy).  That was a sad episode but his replacement Ryan Wolfe (who's so cute) does a good job in filling the void.  He's an ex cop and takes some time fitting in with the team.One thing you'll notice if you watch all three franchises is the colour they use for each show.  I find Miami is the most colourful.  Their lab is sleeker but the outdoor shots are stunning and use vibrant colours - often a lot of yellowy orangey tones (whereas New York is dull and blue and grey and Vegas is somewhere in the middle).There are 24 episodes in this season and I'm always impressed with how they keep it fresh and different.  Someday I'm expecting them to run out of ideas, but in the meantime it's always interesting and really keeps you guessing.  There is a little more personal looks into the lives of the CSI agents which you don't see in Vegas, and it's a nice mix.Overall, this is a great series but I do still prefer the original.  Either way, this is a smart and intelligent show that gets me watching every single week.  I really like it and hope you enjoy it as much as I do
Good setting and atmosphere of 1930s Shanghai violence. This 1995 Chinese film is set in the flamboyant gangster era of the 1930s in Shanghai.  We see it through the eyes of a 14 year old boy who is a distant relative of the gang leader and comes from the country to work as a servant to the gangster's mistress played by the beautiful Gong Li.  She's arrogant, harsh and demanding and it's easy to dislike her.There's a gang war going on and suddenly the boss, his mistress and the boy have to go into hiding on a small island where they can't be found.  The only inhabitants are a widow and her young 9-year old daughter who is endearing to everyone.  But there is no escaping the violence around them.  Soon, everyone is caught up in it.  The inevitable ending is sad and disturbing.Acting is universally good, especially the roles played by the boy, Wang Xiaoxiao.  He's wide eyed with wonder and very believable.  The director is Yimou Zhang.  I've seen several of his films and they are all good, but this somehow misses the mark.  It was well done well but I was uneasy throughout and found it dragged a bit.  Shanghai Triad is successful inasmuch as it depicted a time and place and atmosphere. I recommend it for its style and introduction to Chinese film.  However, I save my higher recommendations for some his other films such as Raise the Red Lantern, House of Flying Daggers and Hero.
Its sad that the hell raiser debut and hellbound were the only great hell raisers. For Kirsty Cotton (Ashley Laurence), the nightmares never end. Still fresh in her fevered memory of her father's skinned corpse, the evil machinations of her uncle Frank's reanimated body and the unspeakable perversity of the Cenobites. But the worst is yet to come. From beyond the Outer Darkness, from the darkest regions of the imagination comes Hellbound: Hellraiser II. Don't bother with the other hell raisers their just plain crap & boring
The Self Delusion of Prevailing Ideologies. "I gather there are some people beyond that darkness out there, but if I don't look you in the eye it's because I don't see you, I only see the darkness."That quote is found toward the beginning of "Manufacturing Consent" and is taken from a lecture Chomsky was about to give in an auditorium where apparently no house lights were available. I'm unsure if anything more revealing was intended by Chomsky's opening comment, although it's impossible not to read something more into it.The breadth of information offered in "Manufacturing Consent" is manifold, shedding light on two primary subjects.One: Noam Chomsky, his life, childhood, his anarchist convictions which fueled his decision early on to place a lesser degree of import on an easy going, comfortable career in linguistics in favor of an uncertain, often tumultuous life of political activism and dissent.Two: The oligarchy in which existence is ensnared. The necessary illusions which are implemented to deceive and brainwash the populace, tricking them into believing that they actually have a representative form of democratic government and indeed have a hand in decision making policy.And of course, the media; a broad apparatus used to manufacture the people's consent, ensuring that an appropriate percentage of the populace will be effectively indoctrinated and hoodwinked into supporting the agenda of the ruling class and its military power, or, will be effectively depoliticized, tuned out and away from crucial matters which directly impact the quality of social and individuated life.Most of what is seen on television, be it news, sports, situation comedies, movies, whatever the programming, serve as little more than an advertisement for a specific mindset resulting in a strategically wished for outcome.At one point someone asks Chomsky "how do the elites control the media?" He replies, "how do elites control GM? ...because they own it." Look at institutional power as an entity: they have their own "news" division. In fact, it's THEE news division. Naturally those who comprise this power structure at all of its various levels understand that to serve the proper role, especially if one wishes to "get ahead" is *not* to actively undermine the structure's agenda by telling the truth and revealing its own crimes."Manufacturing Consent" is a remarkable film. You see Chomsky interacting with all sorts of people, students, interviewers, average people who he's inspired, and even those who obviously despise him for daring to speak a truth which conflicts with prevailing (media induced) ideology, one that their own self deceptive belief structure demand be untrue in order to maintain a delusional, happy consciousness.As Chomsky asks, "do the facts matter, or don't they?"For him it comes down to a single question: Can you look at yourself in the mirror?Another telling moment comes when Chomsky is asked to recall a childhood incident which left an indelible impression. He tells of a time where the standard fat kid was being picked on at the playground with everyone taunting him as someone's older brother was on the way to beat him up, and Chomsky was impelled to do the right thing, so he went and stood next to the fat kid as a display of solidarity, but was eventually intimidated and walked away. He says the shame he felt for doing so never went away, has always stayed with him, and that the lesson learned was to never do that again, and that you always stand with the underdog."As any change must begin somewhere, it is the single individual who will experience it and carry it through." ~ Carl Jung
More info on the SF Press Conference... ...can be found by googling 'Dylan Press Conference'.   Look for the Dylan Pool link.  There you can access the pictoral article entitled 'A Closer Look'.This DVD is a must have for any serious Dylan fan
Well Worth Owning. The Wedding Banquet received little attention when it was first released and for years was unavailable on DVD.  Fans of director Ang Lee won't be disappointed with a look at his first film.This tightly plotted story revolves around a Taiwanese-American businessman.  He's handsome, successful, and in a committed relationship.  Yet he can't introduce his love to his parents - not because his love is a blond American but because his love is a man.  Our hero isn't ashamed of being gay.  Yet his father has a heart condition, his parents are conservative, and he is their only son.  The pressure to get married increases as he turns thirty.Most of the film is madcap comedy culminating in a full scale Chinese wedding banquet.  In one traditional game guests line up to kiss the blindfolded bride on the cheek.  Where the goal is to identify her husband, she mistakenly picks a ten-year-old boy.  The story shifts to serious drama without missing a beat.    This isn't a gay tale or a Chinese-American tale: it's a human tale.  Ang Lee gets superb performances from a cast of unknown actors.If you enjoy uncovering little known film gems then this should make a good discovery to share with friends
Short, effective lower body routine... As Lisa Kay says, "We have 30 minutes to shape your legs!"  This video definitely accomplishes that.  Lisa is joined by 4 fellow Firm Master Instructors including Libby who demonstrates beginner modifications.  You will need a Fanny Lifter, or stool/step and assorted dumbells.The majority of the workout is strength work, there are 3 sets of leg presses, some of which incorporate some calf raises, squats, lunges, dips, plie squats, curtsy dips, plus some cardio segments to give the legs a brief break from the weight work while keeping the heartrate up.This video was quite challenging for me, Lisa does a good job instructing here.  For those looking for short lower body workouts, this is a good choice.  You will work the legs from every angle and then some.  It should be noted that it is all standing leg work, there is no floor work here.  There is another  Firm video available called Lower Body Sculpt II which is all floor work.  Overall a good lower body strengthening routine
Disc 1 Rocks, Disc 2 is a Frisbee. From beginning to end this movie is captivating and engaging.  The performances are astounding and the quality is unsurpassed.  I had never heard of Mashmakhan before but loved their performance as well as Janis, the Dead, the Band, and on and on.  If you don't get excited seeing Janis sing this version of Tell Mama, you would probably would never really love Janis anyway.As for the "Bonus" disc, I liken it to a "Bone-Us" disc with absolutely no added value whatsoever.  I could throw it out without blinking an eye
Rooster Cogburn. Good scenery form Oregon, typical JW style, and typical Kate H. performance.  Perhaps, too much violence in some places but also has good humor.
I love it when a plan... You can tell which cars are marked for destruction (probably the roll-over), the cutting torch is never adjusted right, the bullets fly and no one ever gets hit, the plots are pretty much the same, and you can almost guess the dialog as the actors are speaking it- I love this series! If you're looking for entertainment, and not some lame liberal social commentary, this was the best TV from the Reagan era. Go ahead, hire the A-Team..
Two jive-talkin' DVD's for one low price!. If you're a Bee Gees fan,and own a DVD player,this item is an absolute must! You'd pay more if you purchased these DVD's,if they were packaged separately. You get the ONE NIGHT ONLY concert,whether or not you were in attandance at Las Vegas' MGM Grand Hotel and Casino on November 14,1997. You'll hear songs and a few spoken words that didn't make it to the album. Although the trio no longer had their brass ensemble,The Boneroo Horns,they had Celine Dion,who performs IMMORTALITY,with the trio supplying the background vocals. We also see Olivia Newton-John in attendance,when they perform GREASE,Barry Gibb's personally penned hit song from the 1978 Paramount musical of the same title. Also the trio performs OUR LOVE(DON'T THROW IT ALL AWAY) with previously recorded vocals of their late former teen idol baby brother Andy Gibb. "This is our song for Andy.",quipps Barry. The Bee Gees themselves later recorded the song after Andy(from Andy's 1978 album SHADOW DANCING). The song also appears on Barbra Streisand's new album,GUILTY PLEASURES,which commemorates the 25th anniversary of the release of GUILTY(GUILTY and GP were both produced,with others,by Barry). The trio also perform GUILTY,HEARTBREAKER(a hit for Dionne Warwick),and ISLANDS IN THE STREAM(a hit for Kenny Rogers with Dolly Parton). They also have their fans getting down to YOU SHOULD BE DANCING,from 1976's CHILDREN OF THE WORLD,and from the 1977 Paramount film SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER,STAYIN' ALIVE,HOW DEEP IS YOUR LOVE,NIGHT FEVER and MORE THAN A WOMAN. Stephen Gibb joins his father Barry and Barry's brothers fraternal twins Robin and the late Maurice in this concert. Maurice introduces at one point in the concert,the members of the trio's back-up band. An excerpt of YSBD precedes ALONE,from the trio's 1997 album STILL WATERS(SW was released six months before the recording of ONO). ONO is a sequel to HERE AT LAST...LIVE which was recorded in 1976 at the Los Angeles Forum. The second DVD,The Official Story,is a documentary of the group. Barry got his first guitar a half-century ago. He was nine years old at the time. Before the Gibb brothers made it big,they would perform at various talent shows. Barry played his guitar and Maurice and Robin would sing(Barry sang as well). Robert Stigwood was to the Bee Gees what Brian Epstein and George Martin were to the Beatles,the group's business manager and producer. The trio's association with Stigwood ended in 1981 though. The Manchester,England natives lived in Australia for a few years,returned to England and in 1967,made their debut,musically,in the United States. The Bee Gees were a quintet then,the other two members being Australians Colin Petersen and Vince Melouney. One was the drummer and the other was the bass guitarist(I'm not sure who played what). Robin left the Bee Gees in early 1969 and returned to the group around the summer of 1970. Minus Robin,Barry and Maurice put out CUCUMBER CASTLE and Robin released his solo debut ROBIN'S REIGN. Petersen and Melouney were out of the group by then,and the Gibbs carried on as a trio. In 1975,with disco still in its infancy,the Gibbs released MAIN COURSE,spawning one of their biggest all-time hits,JIVE TALKIN'. The brothers had then entered the world of R&B.  By the way,Otis Redding was supposed to record TO LOVE SOMEBODY,but was killed in a plane crash before he had the chance to do so. So the Gibbs recorded the song themselves. The brothers spent the next four years in the R&B world,releasing COTW,their songs for the SNF soundtrack and SPIRITS HAVING FLOWN. In that time period,they jumpstarted Andy's career which would falter due to drug use(Andy's drug addiction led to his death in 1988). As the 1980's began,they took time out to write and produce songs for GUILTY,Warwick's HEARTBREAKER album and Rogers' EYES THAT SEE IN THE DARK album. However,the brothers released LIVING EYES in 1981. In 1983,the same year that ETSITD was released,the brothers put out five new songs:THE WOMAN IN YOU,I LOVE YOU TOO MUCH,BREAKOUT,SOMEONE BELONGING TO SOMEONE and LIFE GOES ON for the STAYING ALIVE soundtrack(SA was a not-too-popular sequel to SNF). Also Barry and Robin were recording and releasing solo albums throughout the 80's. The Bee Gees also wrote and produced songs for Diana Ross. 1987 saw the brothers' Warner Bros. debut,E.S.P. which spawned only one Top 20 hit,YOU WIN AGAIN. Following E.S.P. two years later is ONE,with only one Top 20 hit,the title track. HIGH CIVILIZATION followed in 1991,and again,only one Top 20 hit,SECRET LOVE. The brothers were dropped from WB afterward and moved to Polydor,the label that bought out RSO(Robert Stigwood Organization) in or around 1984(both labels were divsions of PolyGram). RSO originally released MC,COTW,SNF,the GREASE soundtrack,SHF,LE and SA. RSO also released the SGT. PEPPER'S LONELY HEARTS CLUB BAND soundtrack(the 1978 film,based on Beatles songs,starred the Gibbs and Peter Frampton). Polydor distributed,originally,SIZE ISN'T EVERYTHING in 1993 and STILL WATERS in 1997(sorry,the documentary stops at 1997 since this documentary was released then). The Bee Gees legacy died with Maurice Gibb in January 2003. The cause of 53-year-old Maurice's death was an intestinal blockage. Maurice died at a Miami hospital(the Florida town where he last lived). Barry and Robin are Miami residents as well and have been since the 70's. The Gibbs' mother,the former Barbara Pass,gave interviews on the documentary also. Barry and Robin are continuing their musical careers today,but not under the Bee Gees name. They believe that without Maurice,there is no Bee Gees although the group once briefly existed without Robin. I dedicate these items to the memories of Andy,Maurice and the Gibbs' father Hugh
"A Swallow A Makes Spring?" An Admirable First Feature Film. OK, OK... So The French title doesn't translate well but the rest of the movie sure enough does!!!Computer programmer and teacher, Sandrine, played by Mathilde Seigner of "Venus Beauty Institute", a 30 year old Parisienne, decides to leave the city and make her odd, albeit lifelong dream come true-to become a farmer. Adrien, aptly played by a very familiar yet aged Michel Serrault from such films as Diabolique & La Cage Aux Folles I & II is an old and crusty goat farmer who half-heartedly agrees to sell his land before his quickly approaching retirement days. Since Adrien hasn't anywhere to live for the next 12 months, Sandrine agrees to let Adrien stay on in his homestead farmhouse for an extra year.With her boundless energy, Sandrine takes over the farm and begins implementing her own innovations and city ways. Sandrine succeeds where Adrien was sure she would fail; she earns a good living in the spring and summer by opening up the farm, making a bed and breakfast called " Balconies Of The Sky" out of remodled barns to tourists, elementary school field trips & overnight guests and by selling her goat cheese over the internet.However, the quickly approaching winter changes tide and time and brings with it very conflicting emotions between the characters of Adrien and Sandrine. Sandrine faces the harsh isolation of the Rhone-Alps, but an odd but growing attachment to the ailing Adrien are unexpected complications. Between curiosity and misunderstandings, Sandrine and Adrien live side by side when the only thing they can truly share without letting each other know their true and genuine feelings for one another, is their intense love for the mountains, God's creatures and the beautiful and harsh Mother Nature.Nominated for 2 Cesar Awards in France, including Best First Feature Film, The Girl From Paris was a box office smash, grossing over $12 million US dollars. The directorial debut of Christian Carion, the film powerfully evokes the spectacular Rhone Alps, the beauty, simplicity and hardships of farm life, taking chances and dealing with necessary sacrifices, the ever present conflict between city and rural, past and present, and the neverending cycles of nature, death, birth and life.Highly recommended!
Going to London. My fiance is just learning to cook and moving to London ... this DVD was the perfect gift since it gives the vibes of British culture while at the same time teaching how to shop and cook on the London streets.  Great buy! She loved it
Came because of Sela Ward.  Stayed because it was a phenomenal show. There are very few shows in my lifetime that I have been fiercely loyal to, but the now defunct `Once and Again' without question, topped that short list.I will admit that my lifelong crush on actress Sela Ward was my main interest in this series, originally.    Single, with no kids, and in my late 20s during O&A's debut, I was far out of ABC's target demographic for this show.    I didn't expect to like the show very much, but I got sucked in not because of Sela, but because the show was nothing less than fantastic.Superbly acted and superbly written, ABC never gave this show a chance to find its audience, and it bounced around from time slot to time slot until it's all too early demise.     Even the best shows need to be pitched correctly to viewing audiences to have a chance.      The premise of the story is of Rick Samler and Lily Manning, two fortysomething single parents who re-enter the adult dating scene after their divorces. They fall head over heels for one another, and find that life and love in the (then) late 1990s is far different than what they remember.     Adding children, careers, parents, and ex-spouses to the mix just adds different layers of complications and challenges for Rick and Lily.Most shows `jump the shark' at some point during their lifetimes.   While some could argue that the hostage episode in S2 was that point for O&A, I disagree.   Once and Again always presented two kinds of television : good, and better.     The stories and characters could fill you with hope, heartbreak, or both every week almost without fail.    And best of all - everything about this show was real.    Very little, if any, suspension of disbelief was required.Perhaps the best thing I can say about O&A is that it is the only show that I was so passionate about saving, that I sat down and wrote a letter to ABC, asking them to reconsider their canceling of it (as part of an organized campaign with other fans).     While the campaign wasn't successful, the release (finally) of the series on DVD will allow those who loved this show then to enjoy it forever, as well as allow those who didn't get to view O&A during its run to discover it, and they too, might find out why we who followed this show from the beginning understood that this was just a beautiful story
was surprised how good it is. saw this film a while back and it was a great one.  especially for a direct to DVD film.  awesome lookin shadow creature with a great story.  definitely a movie worth the price.  even some pretty good suspense in this film.  all in all a very well put together movie, a must see for horror fans in my opinion
Exotic world movies. French, Chinese, and Italian -- three different countries, cultures, and worldviews. Two tragedies, a romantic comedy, and a character drama. This is the &quot;Best of World Cinema Volume 1,&quot; collecting four of the best and most beautiful non-American films together.&quot;Amelie&quot; makes life a little better for everyone. The entrancing, whimsical story centers on the sweet-natured, shy Amelie (Audrey Tautou) who finds a little box of treasures in her apartment, and returns it to its owner, now an old man. She changes the man's life, and decides to continue doing good for others via benevolent meddling. But then when she encounters her soulmate, will Amelie summon the courage to help herself as she's helped others?&quot;Malna&quot; is the heart and soul of this lush, riveting film. The sensual Malna (Monica Belucci) moves into a small Sicilian town in the 1940s, and immediately captures the adoration of all the men, and the disgust of all the women. Preteen Renato (Giuseppe Sulfaro) begins to develop pure, worshipful feelings for Malna, but as he grows toward manhood, he sees that not all her beauty is on the outside.&quot;Farewell My Concubine&quot; gives a breathtaking look at Chinese history and culture. A prostitute manages to get her young son Cheng Dieyi (Leslie Cheung), into the world of the Peking Opera, and falls in love with his costar Duan Xiaolou (Fengyi Zhang). But Duan takes a beautiful courtesan as his wife, and thus begins Dieyi's fall from grace.&quot;Cinema Paradiso: the New Version&quot; is the expanded version of the classic film, a film about film. A famed film director returns to his old hometown and reminisces about his life, and the path that set him towards cinematic fame. As a boy (Marco Leonardi), he befriended a blinded projectionist (Philippe Noiret) -- but did the old man give him fame and glory at the cost of his love?&quot;The Best of World Cinema&quot; covers different cultures, characters, and ways of directing. And they deal with each topic in their own ways -- fate, love, jealousy, hate and gossip. Is it depressing? In a majestic, melancholy way, some of the films are depressing, although the gorgeous &quot;Amelie&quot; will uplift you if you watch it last.The acting in these films is almost uniformly superb, from Belucci's silent temptress to Leslie Cheung's tragic young singer to Tautou's elfin sweetheart. And the direction ranges as well -- &quot;Farewell&quot; is starker and grittier, &quot;Amelie&quot; is fantastical and wink-nudge sweetness, and &quot;Malna&quot;'s warm sensuality.Four beautiful movies. Four magnificent stories. And four modern classics of the cinema, each a work of art in its own way. Highly, immensely recommended
Great bargain, but a mixed bag. This is a great bargain. Don't get me wrong! I would buy this again if it got lost. Can't beat the price for 4 good Christmas flicks.Although I do wish they had included a newer edition of HOME ALONE in here. This one is the older letterboxed edition that is not enhanced for widescreen TVs. If your DVD player/TV/projector has the picture zoom option like mine, you can escape the problem with the black frame all around the picture on a widescreen TV, but the resolution/picture quality is still poor, of course.JINGLE ALL THE WAY was the same thing, despite the deceptive cover which stated that the movie on the DVD was included in both Full Frame and Anamorphic Widescreen versions. Not so! The same crippled leterboxed frame.No complaints about either the MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET, which is presented here in beautiful Anamorphic Widescreen, or A CHRISTMAS CAROL, which, as a made for TV movie, is presented in Full Frame, maintaining the original aspect ratio.All in all, a great deal for the money.
Extras features a-list celebs and hilarious extras. Extras is the kind of show you sit down and watch and then when it ends you sit back down and watch it again. There are so many subtle facial expressions and jokes involved in every episode. Ricky Gervais's new character, Andy Millman, is (as the name implies) a sort of everyman who is constantly working as a "background performer" on movie sets, although he fancies himself a "real actor". Trouble is, he's never had so much as a line in anything. This is due in part to his inept agent, played with brilliant daftness by co-creator and co-director Stephen Merchant.All six episodes feature cameos from actual celebrities who are more than happy to mock their media perceived personas. The episodes feature Kate Winslett, Ben Stiller, Samuel L. Jackson, Patrick Stewart, Ross Kemp, Vinnie Jones, and Les Dennis. All are clearly having a great time skewering themselves to the benefit of the viewer. Kate Winslett is crass and just out to get an Oscar, Ben Stiller is rude, self-centered, and insecure, and Patrick Stewart is dim-witted and slightly perverse. All are hilarious.But the celebrity guest stars aren't the focus of the show. The show is really about Andy and his friend Maggie (Ashley Jensen) and their interactions with other people on the sets and in their day-to-day lives. Maggie is often trying to woo any man on set to go out with her, while Andy is always working at getting himself a line in the film or tv show of the day.Although Extras does feature some Merchant/Gervais social awkwardness humor, it's not as uncomfortable as The Office, and often it is the characters around Andy that make the situation uncomfortable and not Andy himself. Overall the show is hilarious and a joy to watch.I'm not sure why it's on a 2 DVD set, since there are only 6 episodes. There are quite a few special features included, mostly on the second disc. The outtakes are some of the best I've seen, mostly consisting of Ricky Gervais repeatedly breaking character and as take by take go by, we see his infectious laugh causing the other actor in the scene to break character. There's a short featuring Stephen Merchant and Ricky Gervais frantically trying to locate a new actor to replace Jude Law after Law backed out of an episode featuring him. Their failure to locate anyone assoicated with Leonardo DiCaprio (their first choice) is painfully funny. The deleted scenes are funny, but it's clear why they were deleted. Typically they would hvae thrown off the flow of the show.This is a great series to own and these 6 episodes are better than most other shows on television right now. What I'd like to see is Larry David in a cameo here. Maybe for season 3
How Art Made the World. I just love it. It is a great review about art since ancient times through 20th century.  If you enjoy learning about art you have to consider this book for your library
Not one, but three versions of this story on this Special Edition. It's not until you are well and truly wading through the wealth of special features on the 2-disc special edition DVD of the 1947 Christmas favorite "The Miracle on 34th Street" that one realizes that the release features not just two versions of the movie, but three.For not only does the release feature the original black & white version shown in theaters and the circa 1980s colorized version of the same feature film, but also hidden away on the second disc is the curiously titled "20th Century Fox Hour of the Stars: The Miracle on 34th Street," which turns out to be a 46 minute 1950s remake for television that is surprisingly in incredibly good quality.The inclusion of this feature is indicative of Fox's loving tribute to this family movie gem that is this 2-disc release. Prior to its release the studio had no idea how to market what it considered to be an "unimportant program picture" and stuck it in the middle of its summer schedule with a trailer (shown here as 5-minute promotional short) that did not feature one single clip from the movie and went at lengths to conceal it's Yuletide theme.The story is so well known that it hardly bears relating in this review. Suffice to say that it charts the efforts of a man (played in an Academy Award winning performance by British actor Edmund Gwenn) to be legally recognized as Santa Claus, which in fact he is and to persuade a doubting yung girl (played by Natalie Wood in a star-turning performance) and a practical realist (played vy Maureen O'Hara) that he is indeed Father Christmas. Picked to replace a liquor induced Santa as the Macy's Parade Santa he is a smashing success and indeed Gwenn's performance is so incredible that Natalie Wood really did believe that she was acting opposite Santa Claus.Perhaps the best special feature in this release in what is a tough choice given its incredible comapny is the feature length audio commentary by Maureen O'Hara. Recorded at her home in Ireland this past August the DVD warns us that this is merely excerpts of that interview with frequent silent sections, but I must say that this is happily not entirely accurate. O'Hara is clearly watching the movie (discussing elements on the screen as they occur), but also is more talkative than other commentaries that I have listened to that do not have a similar warning.In the commentary O'Hara recounts being forced to remain in the United States following the outbreak of hostilities in World War II and subsequently furious when (after being allowed to return to her native Ireland) on being ordered back to the U.S. to make this film. She tells us that other considered titles were "The Big Heart" and "It's Only Human" and how once she read the script she was determined to be involved in what she saw as a warm and affectionate movie.She also talks about the parade itself and reveals that it was the actual parade with people in the crowd not being aware that Fox was shooting a movie that day.Also included in this release is the 22-minute "AMC Backstory" behind the scenes of the production. Including on-camera interviews with film historian Rudy Behlmer, actress Maureen O'Hara, actor Robert Hyatt (who played Thomas Mara Jr.), actor Alvin Greenman (who played Alfred), Natalie Wood biographer Suzanne Finstad and Natalie's sister Lana Wood, the documentary traces the genesis to the movie back to a fateful trip to a Los Angeles department store by screenwriter Valentine Davies. Fighting through holiday shoppers on 1944's Christmas Eve in an effort to buy a gift for his wife, Davies wondered what Santa Claud would make of the commercialism of Christmas. After working on the screenplay for over a year the project was optioned by Fox, who evidently had no idea what they had.In what was a huge risk the filmmakers agreed, when Macy's and rival store Gimble Bros. said they would withold permission for their names to be used in the film until they had seen the finished film. Thankfully they loved it for if either store had objected Fox would have had to drastically re-cut and re-shoot major portions of the movie.So it was that at the height of the 1946 shopping season over 100 cast and crew descended on the Macy's store in New York City to shoot interiors of the movie and when it wrapped used the likes of Rex Harrison and Anne Baxter (who were on the Fox lot shooting other pictures) to rave about the production. Fox need not have worried though because it was a critical and commercial success staying in theaters for over six months and taking home three of its nominated four Oscars. In fact its popularity is such that it has not only been remade in the included 1950s TV production, but again in a 1970s TV movie and then in a 1994 big budget production (and clips from all three are featured in the AMC Backstory).An archival MovieTone News reel (running 1:42) covers those awards presentations and includes the famous quite from a clean shaven Gwenn when receiving his statue, "Phew. Now I know there is a Santa Claus."But that's not all this bumper release contains. Also included is a 15:30 featurette on the history of the Macy's Thanksgiving Parade and in particular its pivotal role in the movie. This new documentary features on-camera interviews with Robert M. Grippo (author of a book on the parade) and John W. Straus who worked on the parade for 22 years and coordinated with thr studio that the filming of the parade (with their 14 camera's positioned along the route) went off without a hitch.The special features are rounded out with nine posters for the movie.Audio includes English 5.1 Dolby Surround, English mono, French mono and Spanish mono. There are English and Spanish subtitles
A DOUBLE KNOCKOUT OF A TRIPLE DVD SET!!!. I OWN THE BOX SET OF THESE MOVIES BECAUSE I AM A HUGE FAN OF MS. STREISAND'S.EVEN THOUGH I'M GIVING THE SET 5-STARS, I REALLY DIDN'T ENJOY "THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES".  I FELT THAT STREISAND MISCAST BRIDGES IN THE ROLE OPPOSITE HER.  I ALSO FELT THAT THE PLOT DIDN'T HOLD UP."THE PRINCE OF TIDES" IS ONE OF MY ALL-TIME FAVORITE MOVIES.  IT PACKS AN EMOTIONAL WALLOP.  THE ACTING WAS TOP-NOTCH AND I WAS RIVETED TO MY SEAT.  STREISAND'S DIRECTION WAS RIGHT ON TARGET; AND REALLY GRASPED THE AUTHOR'S CONVEYANCE OF THE SUBJECT.  I WAS VERY MOVED BY THE PERFORMANCES AND THE MOVIE.  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND IT."THE WAY WE WERE" IS A REAL CLASSIC TEAR-JERKER.  I'VE SEEN THIS FILM AT LEASE 20 TIMES AND I GET EMOTIONAL EVERYTIME THE 'PLAZA SCENE' PLAYS.  THE COUPLING OF STREISAND AND REDFORD IS A "MATCH MADE IN HEAVEN" EVEN THOUGH THEY ARE DIAMETRICALLY OPPOSED IN SO MANY OF THEIR BELIEFS.  THE BACKDROP OF THE POLITICALLY-CHARGED MCCARTHY ERA KEEPS IT INTERESTING.  BUT TO WATCH THEIR INTERACTION IS VERY SEDUCTIVE--EMOTIONALLY AND PHYSICALLY.  PLEASE CHECK THIS ONE OUT TOO.
Holiday Romance. This is a great holiday romance with lots of old fashioned sentiment.  I have seen it many times, but my parents had not.  I bought it to send to them and they said that they loved it and will watch it every year around Christmas time
Great video!. I'm not too sure why this video has gotten so many bad reviews, but we definitely think it is worth 5 stars in our house.  It's very nice how Wendy surprises Bob with a birthday party and how the trucks make him a "cement" birthday cake.  Wendy even gets to go line dancing in this video since Mavis sprained her ankle.  The trucks get in on the act and do their own special "line dance."  The segment on Spud trying to learn some manners is very cute, with Bob reminding him on how to wipe his mouth and to eat with utensils.All-in-all, we give this one a 5 star rating.  It's very enjoyable, moves very well and is quite educational.
Grisly Gore, and More... I'm not a particular fan of the flesh-eating zombie genre, or Italian horror movies in general. They tend to be grandiose, floridly improbable, often ridiculous, even more often disgusting with no redeeming virtues. But I have seen enough of them over the years (I guess you could call me a zombie-movie diletante) and if I had to pick my favorite, I suppose this would be it. In common with most Italian horror movies of this sort, it's a study in contrasts- sumptuous scenery, ornate mansions and castles, attractive actors (with the exception of the profoundly creepy Peter Bark...I'll get to him), and the most depraved, repulsive activities imaginable (or unimaginable). There's no pretense of a plot or logic here, which, perversely, is sort of what I like about it. There's no set-up, no characterization, no subtleties or nuances. A group of tourists, or friends, or...whomever show up at a luxurious Italian villa. Why? What is their relationship to each other? Who knows? Who cares? Basically, they're raw hamburger for the ravenous zombies. They consist of a few colorless, albeit horny, couples, and a mother (played by the beautiful and sexy Mariangela Giordano) and son. Much comment has been made about the actor playing the son (Peter Bark). Is he a teenager with a bad wig? Is he a sickly 30-year old playing a teen with a really disturbing Oedipus complex? Is he a midget? Don't know, but he's one of the most disturbing and strange looking people you'll see in any film. At times, I found him more disturbing, and scary, than the flesh-eating zombies. And what about the zombies? Perhaps needless to say, the entire "plot" of this film concerns hordes of them (their make-up is convincing and pretty unsettling) attacking the villa, attempting to devour the hapless occupants. That's basically it. Why have they come back to life? Why are they focusing their attention of this particular villa? Where'd those weird monks come from? Whatever happened to Peter Bark? Who knows? Who cares? If you're looking for some sort of intricate storyline, some socially significant sub-text regarding our consumer society, some experienced and inventive acting...you better go back to your George Romero movies. As you would probably expect, there's a ton of gore, blood, mutilation, sexual perversion, nihilism here...if that's your cup of tea, this movie serves a full, overflowing pot of it. Drink away
Surprised. I was really expecting this to be more of a "scandal" documentary showing the missteps and lies of the current U.S. administration in regards to the Iraq war.It turned out to be a documentary showing the war from the Arab perspective (mostly through Al-Jazeera) and the perspective of a Marine public affairs officer who seems to support the current actions of the U.S. There really wasn't much animosity from either side of the  spectrum, rather there was a lot of well-intentioned dialogue from both sides that would give anybody, regardless of political persuasion, better insight into the issues in Iraq and the Middle East
Just Plain Good. I can't think of any reason why someone wouldn't enjoy this movie, let alone dislike it.  On top of its excellent cinematography and a truly fantastic take on Spiderman himself, the amount of heart in this movie is absolutely wonderful.P.S.- Be sure to watch it with the kids. They'll love it and it teaches really great lessons for life
Mike's Review of Kindred: The Embraced. This is a Great show. It's also based on a Great Game. Once you get past the first episode, with its horrid, lame, weak, pathetic et.al acting of C. Thomas Howell, it's quite a show.From the 2nd episode onward, the acting is dramatically improved. Even better though, Howell's character has MUCH less screen time in the rest of the series. (If there are any Howell fans out there, sorry, but his acting was terrible in the pilot)I also own most of the Role-playing books for Vampire the Masquerade, and while yes, it differs GREATLY from the game, this is still a great mini-series.One thing that nagged me though, was how normal Daedalus, the Nosferatu Primogen looked. Everyone has seen Lord of the Rings right? Remember that ugly Commander Orc in Return of the King? The one who side-steps the rock? All Nosferatu are at LEAST that ugly.(Spoilers Follow)I'm not so much whining about the difference between the game and the show here, but in one of the episodes "Night Stalker" Daedalus becomes infatuated with a singer in the Haven, but is afraid to be seen by her because of his "hideousness". The guy is BALD, with some extra cartilage dangling from his ears. THAT'S IT. Otherwise he looks like everyone else.He uses Alchemy to make himself Handsome...and he grows hair. That's it. Hair. Rather Lame right?Besides those two things, the series is very well done. By the last episode you're begging for more, when it really picked up.A Great buy for anyone, I picked this up when White Wolf was still selling Vampire the Masquerade books, for 20 bucks...I check Amazon and it goes for over $200? LOLAh but...I digress.One last point, on one or more of the reviews (when I saw this, it was 20 or so reviews apart) some people seem to think that Julian is also the Primogen of the Ventrue, when in fact, it is his sire Archon. If Julian were Primogen and Prince, that would create such an imbalance of political power. But with Archon being the Primogen, and him and Julian Seeing Eye to eye on everything, it didn't really matter one way or the other.Great buy for anyone who is tired of seeing vampires slicing people up, biting necks, or being turned to dust by some ditsy blonde in High School.As for this "Unrated" business, I would say it lies between PG and PG-1
Haunting Japanese anti war film!. At the end of the WW2, a survivor of a Japanese Command, follows his bliss when he takes a decision: to disguise himself as a monk . He will make a reflexive tour, a powerful insight act, a soul searching journey soul searching back  to those places where his fellow comrades met the death. This redemption fact once more completes the mythical cycle of the life: birth and innocence, maturity and experience and finally wisdom and redemption.If you haven' t seen  yet this acclaimed film, it's time for you to make it, because this is a milestone film about the existence ' sense, and the finding of a superb gem: an original film that you will never forget in the rest of your life.It's useless to tell this is one of my beloved films in my personal collection. Ichikawa was the same director of Fire on the plains.It's absolutely unbelievable this film has not been released yet on DVD format.
Top notch entertainment. I could spend a paragraph or two telling you what the plot/story of this movie is about. Or you could read any one of the hundreds of other reviews for this film, and find out that way. Most of you probably know it by now, as it is. A Few Good Men is on my (and my wife's) list of Top Ten movies of all time....with plenty of good reasons. As it has been said in many other reviews, the acting in this film (from all the supporting actors as well) is excellent. The story is good too....very interesting, actually. It would be easy to look at this movie as simply a "blockbuster" kind of movie....which, essentially, it is. It's got A-list talent in front of, and behind the camera....it made a hell of alot of money at the box office, so yes it's a "blockbuster". But it's also a damn good story, as  mentioned before. Another thing I liked about this movie, was the fact that the writers avoided any romantic involvement between Tom Cruise and Demi Moore's characters....something most other films on this scale would have done. And I know it's been said in many other reviews, but I'm going to say it again anyway....Jack Nicholson really is the cornerstone of this movie. No, not because of that famous "You can't handle the truth...." line. But because his acting really is that good. It seems so natural. His mannerisms are so natural, that he could pass for a real life military leader....I am in the military myself, so I can vouch for this. And even though this movie is over two hours, I was never once bored....you won't be either
THE ROAD IS NARROW, AND DOWN THE MIDDLE. The most unlikely of heroes, Romero, with owlish glasses and demeanor, is reluctantly thrust into a role much like Thomas More almost five centuries earlier.20th century El Salvador, like 16th century England, is enduring bloodshed and havoc. Insurgent Communist rebels compete with paramilitary squads and the oligarchy for control of the tiny Central American nation.  Priests and the flock they lead are caught in the middle.  Those who cry for justice are photographed and marked for extinction because they speak the language of Marxism.Archbishop Romero recognizes that Marxists and the ruling oligarchy are merely obverse sides of the same coin-- ideologies who rule by force contrary to the the rule of God.He is equally harsh with Communist sympathizers as he is with the paramilitary squads who rape, torture and execute advocates of justice and human rights.Like a nail driven into wood, Romero meets each new situation, bewildered at first, but rising to the occasion with increasing faith, anger and determination.In one scene, he arrives at a church which has been turned into an army barracks. He announces that he has come to remove the Blessed Sacrament. A belligerent soldier responds by unloading a round of bullets into the tabernacle and shatters the crucifix hanging above the altar. Romero stands transfixed, astonished at the utter desecration, then leaves. He pauses outside where a crowd has gathered, unsure as he himself is what he will do next.Suddenly, collecting his courage, he wheels around. He brushes past the insolent soldier and stoops to gather the consecrated wafers in trembling hands. The soldier fires another round above Romero's head.  Undeterred by the gunfire, the intimidation, and the soldier who shoves Romero with his boot, he completes his work then exits.But he isn't finished. He returns yet again to restore the church to its rightful owner--the people of God.  The soldiers in their turn stare blandly at the audacity of this meek soldier of God who dares to stand up to their jackbooted authority and in his turn expel evil.Archbishop Romero fights every battle his Redeemer once fought: the apathy of the elite, the treachery of those in power, and betrayal within his own ranks. One of his own priests reveals that he carries a weapon. Romero angrily and loudly denounces him because "You lose God just as the others have!" Another parishioner denounces Romero for betraying their class by "forcing" her baby to be baptized along with "all those indians."This video should stand next to A Man For All Seasons. Raul Julia, like Paul Scofield, has memorably portrayed one of the Church's most celebrated martyrs. Julia carries a heavy load, but the entire cast contribute
The Best Movie in the World. I saw this cinematic masterpiece with my French class, and we were amazed and utterly captivated by the lush story of French teenaged despair. We felt close to Vic, as we could identify with her trauma and her crush on Mattieu. Vic's parents seemed similar to my French class' parents, and so did Vic's school, with its social hierarchy and innocent parties. I feel that "La Boum" truly makes a substantial effort to bridge the cultural gap in between American teenagers and their French peers. This effort is successful in my opinion, as our class found that we were laughing with Vic, crying with her, and screaming with her at her frustrating parents. We lived through "La Boum" in the shoes of a completely foreign and strange girl, and found that we weren't that much different, after all. "La Boum" made an impact on us more than "Goodburger" or "Totoro" ever could.
Glad to have found this DVD still available. Was very happy to find this item still available on the open market
Snake Plissken: A Real American Anti-Hero. Before there was RAMBO, before there was Austin 3:16, Disney kid Kurt Russell came into the scene to portray the coolest outlaw of the 20th century, Snake Plissken. To this day, I enjoy both "NEW YORK: 1997" and "LOS ANGELES: 2013" (Those were the original titles for both films), nevertheless, ESCAPE FROM L.A. will not win an academy award for anything, it's a movie that can be enjoyed by John Carpenter fans all over. What makes Carpenter's movies so cool is there is never a happy ending to them and if you think about it, there's a reality to both of the ESCAPE films: New York or L.A. can really become a island of the damned for undesirables. At least in ESCAPE FROM L.A., Kurt Russell has more activity than he did in NEW YORK, where else can you use Bangkok Rules, jump on a pick-up truck with a Harley Davidson, get capture by mr. Army of Darkness himself, Bruce Campbell, play a 10 second life or death basketball game, surf the strip with Peter Fonda, and shoot up the Happy Kingdom with Pam Grier. What more could you ask for
give it a chance. some might pass over this movie because of of the material on abortion, but I think that would be a mistake. True, there will never be a movie where they show the typical face of abortion, women who have other options but don't take them, but at least this film doesn't ram its views down your throat. Rather, the story is a lot like the music, gentle and relaxed, moving at the pace of the wide eyed innocent, Homer. I love Lasse's movies anyway, and wasn't disappointed with this one. He brings you along without any high drama, infusing things with a sweetness most directors pass over in favor of over the top action and dialogue.Give this movie a chance. It's a deftly crafted piece with a slew of great performances. A nice surprise.
MIGHTY NICE MONKEY BUSINESS. Sure, MIGHTY JOE YOUNG is a somewhat mushy movie.  SURE, it has all the cliches you expect.  Sure, some of the special effects are a little rough. But sure, MIGHTY JOE YOUNG is a wonderful entertaining movie, sure to bring a little tear to the eye, and entertain even the hardest cynic.  In updating the 1949 classic, director Ron Underwood (who gave us the first TREMORS)has pleasantly remade the original to make it more accessible to these ever changing times.  From the opening scenes where little Mika Boorem (Hearts of Atlantis) and her doctor mommy Linda Purl are besieged by heartless poachers to the last thirty minutes where some really exciting climactic action scenes occur, MIGHTY JOE YOUNG delivers the poignant tale of an oversized gorilla who just wants to be loved.  The special effects crew do a fine job on giving Joe his own personality with the especially effective use of Joe's eyes, and ironically, he and Charlize Theron have a remarkable screen chemistry, actually better than her chemistry with co-star Bill Paxton.  But then the movie isn't really about Paxton and Theron; it's about Joe and Charlize.  The dynamic Regina King (from RAY) does a nice turn as the doctor who also bonds with Joe; and even self-centered David Paymer as the conservancy head finally warms up to Joe.  Of course, a movie like this would be nothing without villains, and we have two good ones here:  Croatian actor Rade Sherbedgia wants revenge on Joe because after shooting Theron's mother, he loses a finger and thumb to the then infant Joe; Peter Firth (Equus) is the more compassionate (?) sidekick who claims that Rade is "not a hunter, but a murderer."  The climax in the heart of LA, on the freeways and finally at Palisades park delivers nicely.I wasn't expecting a whole lot when we bought this movie, but it was a pleasant surprise and I recommend it for family viewing
" Nobility Is Born In The Heart ~ The Greatest Mystery Of Life Is Who We Truly Are". After a cursory scrolling through the previous 190 reviews on this film I've come to the conclusion that the '98 release, `The Man in the Iron Mask' is one of those movies you either love or hate. As for me, I love it!The scenery is exquisite, the soundtrack inspirational and uplifting, the storyline epic and filled with pathos and the cast is amazing. Gerard Depardeieu (Porthos), John Malkovich (Athos), Jeremy Irons (Aramis) and Gabriel Bryne (D'Artagnan) breathe new life into Dumas' musketeers mythos. Seeing these four legendary warriors gallantly charge King Louie's muskets as they fire from point blank range was as heroic a scene as I've ever seen captured on film. It gives me goose bumps just to think about it.As for Leonardo DiCaprio, he is magnificent in the dual role of  King Louis XIV of France and his twin brother Philippe. His ability to appear so arrogant, hateful and despicable as King Louie one minute and transform himself into the timid, emotional and caring Philippe a moment later is truly amazing. This is by far my favorite DiCaprio performance.This is a film that can be watched over and over again without losing its emotional impact on the viewer. 'The Man in the Iron Mask' is a keeper, I wholeheartedly  recommend that you add it to your personal DVD library
Amazing Mandy & Beautiful Bernadette. Georges Seurat was totally insane by the age of 32.  Knowing that helps Stephen Sondheim's genius show through. Sunday in the Park with George is an amazing show about the life of this manic artist, and the fictional personalities of the figures in his painting "A Sunday Afternoon on the Island of La Grande Jatte". The first Act is completely devoted to a set of Sundays spanning 2 years of Seurat's life and the end of his relationship with a long-time lover. The dramatic and touching songs make you feel for this hard-nosed painter yet comical points shine through. The second act takes place 100 years later in 1984 with the Great-grandson of Georges (also played by Mandy Patinkin) doing a tribute to the painting that brought his relative so much posthumous fame. Like other Sondheim shows it is at times long-winded, but altogether entirely enjoyable. Mandy and Mrs. Peters' voice have so much emotion and power that, with the correct sound system, you are carried to the brink of pure delight and insanity by their performances. With Commentary from the actors and producers this is an essential for one who collects musicals
SNL First Year. The original cast of SNL was absolutely great. We never missed a Saturday night watching the goofiest comedians ever on TV. We still remember many of the skits to this day. The show today, unfortunately is not worth watching and is not even funny.However Disc 3 of the set of 8 was so badly scratched and damaged it would not even play. This set was supposed to be a new product, but I doubt that it was
Episodes and Summaries. I have loved this show since I was a little girl and pretended that I was a Jeannie myself. Unfortunately, I never could manage to blink the house clean, although it was not due to a lack of trying. I particularly enjoyed the character of the suspicious Dr. Bellows who always believed he was on the pinnacle of discovering the enigma that shrouded Tony; his most popular line, when Tony and Jeannie had once again managed to outwit him and cause everyone else to wonder at Dr. Bellow's apparent stupidity was, "He's done it to me again." I also enjoyed the line he always spoke when something mysterious began to transpire around Tony which was, "It's happening again." Of course, as the show progressed into its second season poor Dr. Bellows once again became the target of Jeannie's misdirected magic as Major Nelson diligently tried to keep his comrades unaware of Jeannie's existence. Despite his greatest efforts, Jeannie still manages to bring trouble into the Nelson home with hilarious and unforgettable consequences!  For those of you who cannot bear to miss one episode of this mirthful show, these are the episodes complete with short synopsizes. Enjoy!- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -1. Happy AnniversaryJeannie transports herself and Tony to the Island where they first met to celebrate their one year anniversary. Unfortunately, Tony discovers another bottle and unleashes the vengeful Blue Djinn, who originally ensnared Jeannie in her bottle for two thousand years.2. Always on SundayJeannie decides to help an exhausted Tony by making everyday Sunday.3. My Master, the Rich TycoonJeannie blinks in extravagantly expensive items to prove to a visitor  that her master has exquisite taste and is immensely rich. Afterwards, the man reveals that he is from the Internal Revenue Service and then proceeds to demand explanations from an unknowing Tony.4. My Master, the RainmakerEveryone believes that Tony can control the weather and they begin to ask him for various preferable weather patterns.5. My Wild Eyed MasterJeannie tries to help Tony see better so that he may pass an eye exam that will enable him to go into orbit. However, her spell goes terribly wrong and Tony's vision becomes very strange.6. What's New, Poodle Dog?Jeannie turns Tony's best friend, Roger, into a poodle after hearing about the date he scheduled for Tony. Tony soon discovers Jeannie's transgression and rushes to the dog pound to rescue Roger, but he is unable find the right dog!7. Fastest Gun in the EastTony makes the mistake of wishing he was in the Old West and Jeannie immediately obliges.8. How to Be a Genie in 10 Easy LessonsBased on a suggestion by Roger, Tony forces the troublesome Jeannie to read a book that will help her to control her unruly magical powers. Tony soon discovers that the book Roger recommended teaches Jeannies how to torture cruel masters, something that Jeannie has begun practicing on Tony.9. Who Needs a Green Eyed Jeannie?Tony meets an old girlfriend who unbeknownst to him is married to a member of an organized crime association. The same night as they are dining, his girlfriend's husband escapes from jail, determined to kill his wife.10. The Girl Who Never Had A BirthdayJeannie becomes depressed that she does not know the date of her own birthday. A sympathetic Tony and Roger begin to search the NASA database for information concerning Jeannie's birth date.11. The Girl Who Never Had A Birthday (Part 2)In the second part of this episode Tony tries to get Jeannie's birthday from Roger, who is stationed in Alaska by Dr. Bellows.12. How Do You Beat Superman?In an attempt to gain Tony's attention, Jeannie blinks herself a rich suitor who proposes to her. Tony becomes massively jealous, as Jeannie hoped, until he discovers that the man is Jeannie's creation.13. My Master, the Great CarusoGeneral Peterson forces Tony to sing in a talent show after hearing his magnificent voice. Little does he suspect that the voice he heard was Caruso's, given to Tony by Jeannie. Sadly, Tony has already made Jeannie promise to never give him Caruso's voice again and Jeannie refuses to break her word.14. The World's Greatest LoverJeannie feels sorry for Roger and casts a spell that causes every woman he meets to fall instantly in love with him. As can be expected, numerous undesirable effects ensue.15. Jeannie Breaks the BankJeannie blinks three million dollars into Tony's bank account which arouses the authorities' suspicions.16. My Master, the AuthorJeannie writes a book on childcare and publishes it in Tony's name. After hearing of the book, Dr. Bellow's and General Paterson leave their niece and nephew with Tony to test his supposed knowledge of childcare.17. Greatest Invention in the WorldJeannie invents the perfect fabric that is resistant to stains, cuts, and burns. Dr. Bellow's discovers this miraculous fabric and attempts to discover the identity of Tony's incredible invention.18. My Master, the SpyJeannie creates a duplicate Tony to send to General Peterson's office while she and the real Tony are dining in Paris. Unfortunately, one of Tony's acquaintances witness him in Paris and reports this to Dr. Bellows. Afterwards, it is up to Dr. Bellows to discover which Tony is the imposter.19. You Can't Arrest Me... I Don't Have a Driver's LicenseDespite Tony's warnings, Jeannie takes the car out to drive on her own. After much trouble and many tickets, Tony goes to the policeman that gave the tickets to apologize. Unfortunately, the policeman mistakes Tony's intentions and sends him to court.20. One of our Bottles is MissingMrs. Bellows sees Jeannie's ornate bottle and insists on bringing it to her home to later have a copy made. However, something goes wrong and her copy is sent back to Tony while Jeannie, who is trapped within her bottle, is residing in the Bellow's home.21. My Master, the CivilianTony decides to retire from his career and accept the position of vice-president of the booster-rocket company. However, Jeannie and Rodger try to convince him that this is not the life for him once they discover, through Jeannie's magic, how immensely successful he would be in his new life.22. There Goes the Best Jeannie I Ever HadIt is Hajji's day, the day when all masters are allowed to rid themselves of their Jeannies if they find them to be unsatisfactory. Happily, Tony realizes that he can finally be rid of that pesky Jeannie of his. Will he change his mind in time and allow Jeannie to stay?23. The Greatest Entertainer in the WorldTony has been selected to locate an entertainer for General Peterson's birthday party. He discovers that the General's favorite entertainer is Sammy Davis Jr. Unfortunately, he cannot procure him as an entertainer, until Jeannie decides to help and make the entertainer appear at two places at the same time.24. The Incredible Shrinking MasterJeannie accidentally shrinks Tony to a minute size and then leaves the house to go shopping. After Rodger locates the miniscule Tony, he brings him home, and then looses him. As the comedy of errors increase, Dr. Bellows brings a cat into Tony's home that mistakes him for a strange looking mouse.25. My Master the PirateThis is one of the worst Jeannie episodes. Jeannie blinks herself and Tony back in time to face the pirates.26. A Secretary Is Not a ToyJeannie gets hired as General Peterson's secretary and immediately starts trying to promote Tony to a general. Her undue interest in Tony's promotion causes Dr. Bellows to become very suspicious; he immediately involves the CIA in an investigation of Jeannie.27. There Goes the BrideJeannie casts a potent love spell on Tony that immediately backfires and causes him to break a bone every time she blinks.28. My Master, Napoleon's BuddyJeannie blinks Tony into one of Napoleon's parties and Tony attempts to warn him of an impending assassination. Instead of displaying gratitude, Napoleon instantly suspects him of being a spy.29. The Birds and the Bee BitTony discovers that once Jeannie marries a mortal that she will loose all of her magical powers. He instantly proposes to her. Meanwhile, Roger and Hajji look into the future and discover that one of Jeannie's children will inherit her magical powers.30. My Master the Swinging BachelorDr. Bellows and his wife invite themselves to dinner at the Nelson house. An infuriated Jeannie schemes to ruin the meal and adds a mysterious substance to the cake to make all of the guest turn into children. When the cake is scientifically scrutinized, a new chemical is discovered.31. The Mod PartyRodger and Tony decide to have a party but inform Dr. Bellows that they are going fishing. Later, the ever suspicious Dr. Bellows learns the truth and decides to attend the party uninvited.- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -To summarize, this is one of the best seasons of Jeannie and contains many of my favorite episodes. Hopefully, the manufactures will continue to produce this series at such a quick rate. Also, it is worthy of mention that this season and all seasons following it are presented in color only. For those of you who are like myself and prefer color television, this is an added bonus.Ravenova "Forever Undead
Great Horror flicks. The 1st one is Excellent, The Second one is BLAHHHH but funny and fun to watch, the third one is better then the second one but not better then the first one lo
Dr Who?. I recall READING about Dr Who's adventures when I was a kid. That was about 14 years ago. I vaguely recall his travelling phone booth and the invasion of the Daleks. I sketched little Daleks all over my textbooks and I think my cousins whom got the books passed down didn't know what the hell they were. Hearing about the BBC's new take of the Doctor made me want to watch it. I didn't watch the older series (as mentioned, only read the books) but I heard nothing but good things about this new series and decided to try it out. It took a while (a short while) to get used to it. But I must say that I'm a fan again. Although the buildup of the entire series was great (my girlfriend particularly liked the episode with Rose's dad), the final episode with... well. The ENDING of the series didn't really go that well with me. Kinda silly. But I had a great ride. For those that are worried that Dr Who might be foreign or even alien to them, you don't have to. My girlfriend loved it and my friends whom I've passed the discs around all love it too. It will grow on you and after that, you'll just want to continue each and every episode until the end. Check out the interesting special features too, behind the scenes documentary by Rose regarding life on the set. BBC's done it right and the only sad thing I must say (other than the lacklustre ending) is that they had to change the Doctor in season 2. I can't judge the new Doctor as I don't get the show over here in Singapore, but after watching Season 1, I hate to see the change. Overall, a fantastic series and well worth the time and money. The rest of the episodes more than make up for the ending. So do check it out. Great price too. Bloody expensive in HMV Singapore.
Informative & funny!. Good flick.  Easy to understand.  Even kids can watch it.I loan this to my architectural clients before they make decisions.It often prevents them from making unhealthy/environmentally detrimental choices.It's entertaining & funny also - always a good tool for getting people interested
Hopefully, Blood Diamond Isn't Forever. Leo, Leo, Leo!  Beside being the sign of my Month, this a name of a brilliant actor in this movie.  He did one of the best job in his career. (Whats eating Gilbert)  I couldn't believe the acting of Leo and Djimon Hounsou.  Outstanding!  How Leo wanted that Diamond and how Djimon wanted his diamond (kid).  Both at all cost were doing everything they could within themselve to get what they wanted.  At times, both needed each other in some way to help them achieve what goal they had.  That was finding Djimon's kid and Leo's diamond.  I will say I was naive and didn't know the great extent to what goes through searching for diamonds.  After seeing this film, I can't believe how many blood was spill for small rocks that are worth to many.  It was a sad movie, but it had a great message of the "truth" coming out of this whole entire business that many lives were lost at the cost of what?  Humans that really couldn't defend themselve. Recommend everyone to watch this!  Love this Movie
On MY Top 10 List, funny!. Funny as can be!Bette Midler and Lilly Tomlin crack me up!! This movie probably never made big money at the box office, or won any awards, but I absolutely love it!Not going to give away the plot, don't want to ruin it for you! You just have to see it! A case of mistaken identities gone amuck!Midler and Tomlin, all four of them, are a hoot! Laughed myself silly! Bette milking a cow... Lilly on the elevator with the dog... eating sushi.. their friend from home.. then, meeting at the hotel, in the ladies room...  Oh wow, it was funny!My dear husband, Norman, even laughed at all the right parts. He seldom stays awake late at night, but he watched this with me, and my little eight year old granddaughter in bed with us, sweet thing, she fell asleep - shhhhh! adorable. Aren't grand kids a miracle?You won't be sorry if you buy, rent, or steal this DVD, watch it!
&quot;Sweet Ginger Brown!&quot;. I confess...I was neither born in the 40's 50's nor 60's, however the thought of a more simple time and place still trancends even the best screenplay.  The Flamingo Kid resuscitates all that was wonderful about  summer on the beaches of Long Island, and the sumptuous feeling of youth.   Matt Dillon's performance is the coolest part of this summer flic, and  should be seen by anyone interested in a whimsically romantic comedy
"A Five-Star Double-Rated Astro-Navigatrix". The 1960's were an era of terrifically beautiful actresses, ranging from Ursula Andress to the starlets of Hammer Film Productions.  Among the highest order of cinematic goddesses was young Jane Fonda, whose performance in the title role of "Barbarella" remains extremely erotic--today's more explicit sexuality notwithstanding.  The film's slight storyline concerns a futuristic "astro-navigatrix" trying to track down a mad scientist and prevent him from using a horrific weapon that he invented.  Hot on his trail Our Heroine encounters all manner of intergalactic beings who do their best to separate her from her unusually frail space-girl costumes; a blind angel, sadistic "leather men," children w/carnivorous dolls, and a tyrannical lesbian queen are all eager to entice Barbarella into their various fun & games.  Finally, when the space-girl does catch up to her quarry (the crazed scientist wonderfully named Duran Duran) he too wants to work out his fantasies on her; he subjects her to his "excessive machine"--a pleasant torture device that supposedly kills by inducing a lethal number of orgasms!  Fortunately, Barbarella's [...] capabilities outlast the machine, causing it to collapse in broken fuses.  And so it goes until the less-than-inevitable, but happy, finale.All in all this film's fantastic episodes are brilliant, inspired.  Barbarella's narrow escape from flesh-eating dolls as well as her many encounters with the lesbian tyrant (played to the hilt by Anita Pallenberg) are truly imaginative sequences.  Other highlights include the film's initial scene--with Barbarella doing a strip-tease in a zero-gravity chamber; and her down-and-dirty defeat of Duran Duran's nasty machine.  In essence there are very few dull moments in the entire film.  Director Roger Vadim--Jane Fonda's husband at the time--was at the height of his considerable powers.  And Mistress Fonda herself was glorious; in such an unlikely role, her extreme beauty blended harmoniously with an essential innocence in a way that made her the cinematic descendant of Marilyn Monroe!  For any actress at any time there can be no higher praise than comparison with Marilyn; and in Jane Fonda's case, such comparison is actually deserved.  My highest ratings.
Great Wartime Movie. During World War II, there were a number of Hollywood movies made about what was going on the front lines. The basic purpose of these films was to boost public morale. Many of these flicks had no lasting value after the end of the war and have since been consigned to the vaults of obscurity. However, there were a few of these movies that proved to have lasting value. One such quality contemporary production from the war years is the motion picture at hand, 1943's Guadalcanal Diary.Unlike most Second World War era morale boosting flicks, Guadalcanal Diary was based on a book of the same name by a war correspondent named Richard Tregaskis. Tregaskis was an eyewitness to the events depicted in both book and movie. This gave Guadalcanal Diary a much firmer grip on the reality of what was really happening on the front lines than most other war morale boosting flicks.The focus of Guadalcanal Diary is on the operations of the 1st Marine Division during the 1st half of the Guadalcanal Campaign. This phase stretched from the capture of the island from the Japanese in August, 1942 to the relief of the Marines by the troops of the U.S. Army's XIV Corps in 1943.As you can expect, the movie portrays the Marines as being the exemplar of the American fighting spirit.Guadalcanal Diary uses an ensemble cast to tell the story of a Marine platoon. The focus of this movie, unlike the vast majority of the morale boosting flicks of WWII, is not on the fighting and battles, but on the soldiers themselves. This movie portrays the war's violence realistically without being graphic. Like most of the other wartime war movies, it was shot in beautiful black and white. Unlike what passes for war movies nowadays, this flick is not a roller coaster ride of slick action sequences coupled with pulsating music and massive vulgarity. This movie depicted the fear felt by the troops and the fact that death can come to even the bravest soldiers. The battle cinematography by Charles Clarke is visually exciting. The language used by the soldiers in this movie is reflective of how actual soldiers spoke including such notions that would strike many ivory tower types today as being politically incorrect such as referring to Japanese soldiers as "monkeys" and "monkeymen."One notable aspect of Guadalcanal Diary is the narration of Reed Hadley who would later be known as Captain John Braddock of the 1950-1953 TV series "Racket Squad." Hadley's narration makes the film's atmosphere gel quite well. The script of Hadley's narration is quite formal and as such contrasts with the everyday language of the soldiers' dialogue.Guadalcanal Diary is an excellent motion picture from the World War II era. It proved a hit at the box office and provided a major boost to many of the actors who appeared in it including Richard Jaeckel (who made his debut in this movie), Lloyd Nolan & Anthony Quinn.Guadalcanal Diary is well worth your time.
historical soap opera. I found this by accident but decided to watch it because it sounded good and i am always looking for something to watch.  it is a great story and has memorable characters.  for anyone who is a fan of historical chinese dramas this is a great one.  and because it is a series there is more character development than in most other movies.  definatly worth checking ou
Great for any day,,,not just a rainy day!!!. First, if your child loves Little Bear on Noggin or Nick Jr, he or she will love this DVD, because it is comprised of many short episodes like on TV, so it doesn't lose their attention. Second, you will love it too because it is a great value! You get about 2 hours of episodes, whereas the usual children's DVD is only 45 minutes or an hour. As you know, Little Bear teaches great lessons about friendship and kindness. This DVD is great for any day, not just a rainy day
2nd time around. This is not the type of movie that you can watch while distracted or doing something else.  I went to the show to see this movie and did not get it at all, so I rented it to see what I was missing. At the show, it just seemed like a lot of shooting, a guy trying to deal with his dramatic girlfriend, a trigger happy brother, a family man who's fighting the bad guy lifestyle, and a very confused brother who doesn't know whether he wants to be a rockstar or a gangster.  The four meet to find out who killed their brother and although the other three realize this may be heavier than they thought, there's always that one testosterone heavy guy who think he's Superman.  Mr. Testosterone is the ringleader in many fights, shoot-outs, and all four unite for justice.  This movie is proof of how brother bond, regardless of race, when loyalty comes into play.  I'm definitely glad I gave it a second chance.Side Note: The soundtrack music is on point.  Classic music by artists like the Temptations and Marvin Gaye play in the background, which makes this modern day western even cooler.  I wish the scene with Angel's character and the bathtub could've been shown in the deleted scenes so I could see whether it looked believable, but I cracked up at the "Bobby teases Jack" scene. I wish that would've been left in the movie to make Bobby's character more human (and hilarious).My only problem with this movie was Mark Wahlberg saying the n-word. I don't care how much or how long his character is supposed to be from the streets: there are still certain barriers not to be crossed.  Other than that, great movie
The Next Set Of Pony Collections. Well, They've Finaly Released The Next Set Of The My Little Pony Collection. This DVD Holds 5 New Stories Which Include:Flight To Cloud Castle.Somnambula.Spike's Search.The Icecream Wars.The Prince And The PoniesThese 5 New Stories Continue Your Collection From The Complete First Season, If Thats What Your Looking For. I Am A Big My Little Pony Fan, So This DVD Really Is Worth It And Completed My Colletion Along With The Other Realese They Had, The Quest For The Princess Ponies DVD.If Your A Big Fan As Well Go For It.
The Undefeated. I enjoyed this movie, a great group of actor's. A little taste of history, and beautiful country scenes through out. It takes you there
Very good picture, showing what others do not... I personally think that this was one of the best Tupac Shakur documentaries out there. Its not like Thug Angel or anything else in the sense that it shows a side of Tupac's mind that sums it all up; explains his views and thoughts, and ultimately transforms his music into art. Must see, definately get it
On The Town 1949. New York , New York , its a wonderful town -especially when sailors Gene Kelly (1912-1996) , Frank Sinatra (1915-1998) , Jules Munshin (1915-1970) have a 24-hour shore leave to see sighs..and when those sights include Ann Miller (1923-2004) , Betty Garrett (1919- ) , and Vera-Ellen (1921-1981) . Co-directed by Gene Kelly and Stanley Donen (1924- ) , based on the broadway hit . On the town changes the landscape of movie musicals , opening filmaker?s eyes to what could be done on location and when brilliant location and Studio production numbers are blended , it could be -as here -embulient , up-and-at-?m perfection . The Bronx is up and the batterys down , butno one can be down after going on the town . Super,Super Musical , your see a wonderful performance and how N.Y looks in 1949 and buildings and people have gone long time ago , it?s a time capsule for nostalgic tours . Transfer in Ultra-Resolution Quality picture . Recommende
Fantastic !. What an awesome talent, I loved it, and put it on when I'm entertaining friends
Goodman is The Babe. I enjoyed this movie. Some of the reviewers don't understand this was not a documentary on the Bambino. This was a movie. The fine gentlemen P. B. Pereira attempt to dismiss John Goodman as a somewhat successful star from the late 80's is idiotic and off the mark. You sir are taking the whole movie too seriously. Babe's rough and tumble upbringing left its mark on him. Goodman is terrific throughout the movie,& I really fell for the lovely Trini Alvarado who plays Babe's first wife, she is stunning. As far as the would have, could ofs and other wild speculation on how good Babe would have been, think about this. Babe didn't use illegal steroids like today's ball players, he rode a train not a jet, fitness equipment did not exist. In addition the old ball parks tended to have greater distances from the plate to the fence. I highly recommend this movie, if for just the "pull my finger" line
Awesome. For the longest time we have had this classic on VHS. At last we have upgraded. The quality is phenomenal and let's face.... Who does not love Indy?????
This pumpkin bites back. Pumpkinhead is  one of those horror movies that didn't get much attention in the theater but took on a second life in video and on TV. It stars  Lance Henrickson  (the poor man's Christopher Walken) and he gives what may be the greatest performance of his life as Ed Harley. Ed is a storekeeper in a tiny little town way up in the backwoods. Ed is a good man-- and that's important for what comes later. He's a gentle, soft spoken man who lost his beloved wife and now has one thing that he lives for, his darling only child, Billy. Well, along come some teenagers (who all look about 25 to 30) from the city who are out riding their dirt bikes and one of them accidentally kills the little boy. The others are horrified and want to do something but the killer talks them into just leaving little Billy and running.Big mistake oh city folks. Very soon the hit and run will be the least of your problems.When Ed finds his dead child he snaps. Lance Henrickson is so good you can actually see the minute the light dies in his eyes and he turns to cold rage.  Going to the sheriff is not enough. Rich city folks have gotten away with crimes before. Ed decides that he needs Pumpkinhead a lengedary revenge demon who punishes murderers. Although his neighbors try to disuade him, Ed heads for the local witch who conjures up the foul demon. The witch is played very well. She's not just some old lady who lights candles and says a few love spells. This hag is clearly an agent of the devil.Driving home after meeting with the witch Ed has a stunning vision. He sees his son Billy sit up, alive again and the child asks in a horrified whisper, "Dad, what did you DO?"This might be the the most important scene in the whole movie. That's the first time when Ed realizes  that conjuring up Pumpkinhead comes with a huge price. Pumpkinhead has a mental connection with the person who calls him so Ed gets to feel and "see" the grisly kilings that ensue. Ed Harley is a good man. Just as his neighbors warned, the way Pumpkinhead does things is too much for Ed to bear and he decides  to call the demon off.  I won't get into the rest of the movie because things go downhill from here.  The movie sags rather badly whenever  Lance Henrickson isn't onscreen and the actors playing the city teens are dreadful. Still, it is worth buying and is a lot of fun on a Saturday night.
best season yet. I hve always loved vampire movies and books, even wrote some, but I have never been so captivated by a story arc.  Well written, well acted.  The relationship between Angel and Spike is so explosive it is hard not to choose sides.  The last battle... well, it has to be seen.  I keep hoping that Mr. Whedon will give us a movie or mini series, something that will continue this fantastic story.  The characters are too frightening, too loveable, too real to lose
Music Made It!. This was awesome mix of teen drama and music that was perfectly placed.  The music made this movie for me and also the enduring troubled characters.It was fun with drama placed in the appropriate places.  It was just an enjoyable fun way to spend some time.Only problem I had was the added scences did not add anything to the original release
an old time favorite movie. and who would think that Tom Hanks was that young just 10 years or so ago.  Good family fun
City of Angels Review. I love the product, it arrived in a timely manner and well packaged, thanks Amazon!Rubie OchoaHouston, T
An offer you can't refuse. The GODFATHER trilogy needs no introduction.  THE GODFATHER, released in 1972 and based on Mario Puzo's novel (at one time the bestselling novel of all time), is considered by many to be the greatest film of all time.  It was directed and co-written by young Francis Ford Coppola, who did an absolutely outstanding job.  Gordon Willis' unflinching and beautiful cinematography is superb, while Nino Rota's sweeping score is unforgettable.  The cast is magnificent.  Marlon Brando, in his signature role as wheezy-voiced Don Vito Corleone, is marvelous, as is Al Pacino as his youngest son, Michael Corleone.  Michael has vowed never to get involved in the family business, but the attempted murder of his father forces him to take action.  James Caan is also excellent as the hot-tempered Sonny Corleone.One of the most debated questions amongst movie buffs is which is better - THE GODFATHER part I or THE GODFATHER: PART II?  Though many will say that THE GODFATHER is superior, just as many will argue that THE GODFATHER: PART II is the best.  Either way, it's an equally impressive film that's even more epic than its predecessor.  About 3/5 of the film follows Michael Corleone's rule as Don in 1958; the other 2/5 follow young Vito Corleone's (Robert De Niro) arrival in New York City in the early-1900s and his uprising as a mob boss.  De Niro is excellent; he won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar for his role.  Pacino's performance is extraodinary, the highlight of his career.  The cinematography, script and directing are as flawless as ever, and Nino Rota's score is even more grandiose than before.THE GODFATHER: PART III is one of the most controversial films ever made.  As a normal film, it's very good; however, as a GODFATHER film, it's quite weak.  The film begins in 1979, where aging Michael Corleone has finally ceased his involvement with the mob and is enjoying a reputation as a philanthropist.  Victor Mancini (Andy Garcia), the illegitimate son of Michael's deceased brother Sonny, comes to Michael seeking a job, and soon after a mob war ensues, pulling Michael back in to the world of the mafia.  The film lacks the power and feeling of the first two films; it just doesn't feel like a GODFATHER movie.  It was made for money because Francis Ford Coppola's Zoetrope Studios was going bankrupt; it was not made because it needed to be made.  Another of the film's biggest flaws is Sofia Coppola as Michael's daughter; as a director, she is quite talented, but as an actress, she is not so talented, and is woefully miscast.  I would recommend seeing the film if only to quell your curiosity, and because it has a truly fantastic ending.THE GODFATHER and THE GODFATHER: PART III are 1-disc sets; THE GODFATHER: PART II is a 2-disc set.  Each film has been remastered in beautiful anamorphic widescreen and with excellent Dolby Digital 5.1 Surround sound.  They are packaged in gorgeous, dark thin packaging, and each features full-length commentary with director Coppola.  Exclusive to this set is a disc of bonus material running over three hours, including deleted scenes (and the footage from the TV versions), alternate scenes, behind-the-scenes footage, and a Corleone family tree.  The bonus disc will knock the socks off GODFATHER fans.If you haven't seen these films - you have no clue what you're missing.  I would recommend that you drop what you're doing and go out and purchase this set right now.  The first two films are probably the best ever made, and the third is good as well.  For the reasonably low price this set sells at, it's an offer you can't refuse
If you were a fan then, get ready to be a fan again!. Finally WrestleMania has come to DVD. While the WWE has really screwed up the current product, the DVD releases are simply amazing. Ever since the Hulk Hogan 2 Disc DVD, they have been batting 100% at least in my opinion. I just got the first 3 volumes along with the Jake Roberts DVD. Needless to say I am in 80's Wrestling heaven.The WrestleMania Anthology volume 1 is an incredible step in getting many of the older PPV's out on DVD.To put it simply, this is amazing. While I initially skipped over WM I & 2, I went straight to 3 to watch Steamboat vs. Savage, Piper vs. Adonis, then put in WM IV to watch Strike Force vs. Demolition and the WWF Title Finals with Savage vs. DiBiase. So I didn't get through the entire set and I didn't watch every second of each event, but for a fan like me, to see these matches in DVD quality....well I don't think it gets any better.Like everyone else I totally enjoy the fact that the Jessie Ventura commentary is there. During the Steamboat Savage match to hear him say "1, 2, 3.....WHERE IS THAT REFFEREE??!!!!" Makes me laugh every time. I can say the music changes that I noticed are minimal at best and I could really care less as it's all about the matches that gives Wrestlemania it's reputation. The quality is great. The menus are designed very basic, allowing you to pretty much pull up any match, segment or interview from the evening.I only purchased the first 3 volumes because I have the rest on DVD already, and I have no desire to own some of these titles twice. Great set for any fan that was there since the beginning, or still watches today because of how good it used to be. Fair-weather fans that only recently started watching because of Cena, will find the matches boring, but if you watch wrestling because of John Cena, you have other situations you need to take care of. The next set I would like to see would be SummerSlam!
The Marx Bothers Collection. The perfect companion to the Marx Brothers "Silver Screen" Collection.If you own one, you must buy the other. The genius of the Marx Brothers will live forever to the viewer of these collections
It's As Bad As They Say, And It's Hilarious. The Postman: A movie so atrociously stupid, so egregiously absurd, so stunningly idiotic, it is easily one of my favorite films. I agree with the featured reviewers in one sense only: you really should see this movie.I was astonished to see the vast number of glowing reviews on this page. I'm guessing most of them were written by America's postal carriers. There's a reason the critics savaged The Postman when it first came out. Its script is ridiculous and its drama beyond maudlin. The underlying theme - that a restoration of the postal service is the first step towards bringing freedom and justice back to a destroyed USA - is simply laughable. Kind of like the entire film!Costner is at his worst as the Postman, an aimless drifter who spins a web of lies to get a free meal and then runs from his post as soon as the downtrodden start to feel better about themselves. Olivia Williams plays his love interest, yet another woman seeking Costner's seed in a postapocalyptic future. Supporting cast includes Larenz Tate as the Postman's sidekick Ford Lincoln Mercury; Daniel von Bargen, a classic "that guy" who delivers the great line: "RIDE, POSTMAN!"; and Tom Petty, who at first appears to be the mayor of a village on the Hoover Dam, until the Postman says "Hey, aren't you famous", and Petty replies, "I was, once." That's when you realize that TOM PETTY IS PLAYING HIMSELF. It's the kind of jaw-droppingly awful moment that typifies this film.The very entertaining villain, General Bethlehem, is played by Will Patton, who apparently was living on a diet of scenery during the shoot. Try keeping a straight face when he bellows lines like "I was AT the Battle of Georgetown, I saw the White House BURN to the GROUND!!!"But it's really the small moments that make this film a horrid spectacle worth laughing at again and again. When the Postman inspires a small village with his...postal carrying, a small girl begins to sing "God Bless America". Say what?! Another horrid scene involves a young boy hoping against hope that the Postman will pick up his letter - this later becomes the astoundingly dumb denouement of the film. Just imagine a three-hour-long movie packed with idiocies such as these, and you've got the Postman. An unintentional comedy classic
"I feel like I've been handed a new life.". What makes `The Talented Mr. Ripley' stand apart from most other thrillers is that it's ultimately an extremely smart film.  Not only is the cast superb but the script is brilliant, and that is due to the amazing novel written by Patricia Highsmith in which the film was based.  Set during the 1950's, the film follows Tom Ripley (played with every bit of underlying menace by Matt Damon) as he enters a new life, a life he could only dream about having as his own.The film starts with Tom, a con-artist, borrowing a Princeton jacket during a Manhattan garden party to play the piano for guests, and he inadvertently strikes up a conversation with an older gentleman who's seeking someone to retrieve his son from Italy.  He offers $1,000 and so Tom plays along, claiming to know this mans son and agrees to fetch his son from his debaucheries life.  Upon arriving in Italy Tom immediately becomes absorbed in the lifestyle this man, Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law in his finest hour), is living.  He attaches himself, to the point of annoyance, to both Dickie and his fiance Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow).  This attachment that borderlines obsession finally climaxes in Dickie claiming Tom should leave, go back to the states.He's boring.And with those words Tom kills the man he loves in a fit of rage, and in an attempt to cover it up he assumes the identity of the man he murdered and from that point on the film changes pace to that of a cat and mouse tail and Tom switches between playing a role and living a life.  To cover his tracks Tom tells Marge that Dickie was scared off by her pressure to commit himself in marriage and thus has fled the country.  She doesn't believe it for one minute and she starts to put pieces together, realizing that this man is not the kind hearted fellow he claims to be.  As Tom starts a relationship with a wealthy woman under the alias of Dickie Greenleaf, yet falls in and out of contact with Marge and fellow friends of Dickie who know Tom he has to keep changing his identity and forging letters and his voice in order to stay ahead of the game.Brilliantly crafted, like a fine sculpture, each frame fits together beautifully and creates a piece of art like none other.  The acting is astonishing, most notably by the two male leads, Jude and Matt.  I will say that I am not a Matt Damon fan, and actually other than this film I feel he's a wasted talent, but here he exuberates every emotion that makes up this madman he embodies.  We feel every emotion that he needs and wants us to feel.  He is pitch-perfect.  Same with Law, who plays the playboy type brilliantly.  His constant growing annoyance with Tom is seen all over his face.  In scenes like when he walks in on Tom wearing his clothing or when Tom asks him if they could share a bath, Jude's face says more than his words ever could.Gwyneth was another delight, as the confused and suspicious fiance of the deceased she plays the misunderstood yet defiantly insistent card brilliantly, convincing you that she's either 1) crazy or 2) right on the money.Philip Seymour Hoffman and Kate Blanchett both have very small roles, but there roles are strong none the less, and they deliver each line effortlessly.  This was my first glimpse at Hoffman and I'm almost tempted to say he deserved that Oscar nod over Law only because he was PERFECT in the few moments he graced the screen.  My favorite scene in the film involves Hoffman's character catching Tom in the act of watching Marge and Dickie make love on their boat.  "Tommy, Tommy, are you peeping Tommy?"  It's brilliant.So I've praised this movie quite a bit and I hope that my review has helped convince you to 1) see this movie if you haven't already or 2) if you have seen it and can't decide whether or not to purchase it, maybe this review helped remind you how purchase worthy a film like this really is.  Kudos to everyone involved, from the brilliant acting already raved about to the wonderful direction Anthony Minghella took while making this exceptionally extraordinary film.Pure cinematic brilliance
More relevant than ever. An excellent film, Good Morning Vietnam, brings to the screen the story of a US airman that gets transferred from Crete in Greece to Saigon in South Vietnam as the war in S.E. Asia is escalating.It is 1965 and the USA is sending more and more troops to S. Vietnam in an effort to live up to its commitments and treaty obligations (SEATO), and turn the tide against communism.  The US Army, worried about the G.I.s' morale, flies in Airman Cronauer from Europe to be a radio deejay and entertain the troops.  Things get a bit more complicated when he begins going around the censors by playing Rock and Roll and giving the news as it is...The plot has elements of both comedy and drama making it rather difficult to label it as one or the other; it's actually a bit of both.Robin Williams, Forest Whitaker, and the rest of the cast, have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are outstanding to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)! Very well written and very well presented, it allows for a highly entertaining movie that can be watched over and over again!  The film does a great job of describing war-ravaged Vietnam as well as people's (including soldiers') every day lives and the problems they face under such conditions.The setting, the plot, the dialogues and the MUSIC are all wonderful!In short, Good Morning Vietnam is a movie definitely worth watching and one to seriously consider adding to your movie collection!Recommended along with The Quiet American, starring Michael Caine and Brendan Fraser.
Ginger does it again !!!. This is the third installment of the Ginger Snaps trilogy.  I saw this one before I saw the first Ginger Snaps.  I was impressed and am glad I watched it.  Actually, it was recommended to me by my sister.  I enjoyed the movie.  So I decided to get Ginger Snaps.  Now all I'm missing is the second installment "Ginger Snaps 2".  One thing I'd like to add is that the werewolf scenes are EXCELLENT.  I didn't expect this when I first saw the title.  All in all, a good movie to watch late at night with the lights out and some buttery popcorn by your side.  Good plot, good acting.  Watch and enjoy
A magnificent performance of Trane's masterpiece. Branford Marsalis' new recording of Coltrane's masterpiece, A Love Supreme, is superb on many levels.  If you're a fan of Trane, and even just luke-warm on Branford, I'm confident you'll find this to be a very worthwhile purchase.Competent but lesser musicians playing ALS would try to channel Trane and the classic quartet.  Not Branford.  He is a mature artist with a fully-realized style.  He sometimes lovingly quotes Trane, or puts his own spin on a Trane riff, but he is clearly his own man on this recording of A Love Supreme.Jeff Tain Watts understands the essence of Elvin and Elvin's contribution to ALS.  But, like Branford, Tain is his own man here.  He's great as a sideman, and plays a great solo at the end of Resolution.Joey Calderazzo - an outstanding pianist who has done excellent and original work with many of today's top jazz artists - falls into McCoy mode in his first solo, but then plays like himself in his second one.  Both are great solos, but I think it shows a real maturity and confidence to be yourself rather than emulate the masters when playing their great works.The bassist, Eric Revis, is very good, but I'm partial to Robert Hurst's performance on Branford's earlier recording of ALS.It's worth comparing that earlier performance to the new one.  Branford first recorded ALS ten years ago for a CD compilation called "Stolen Moments:  Red, Hot & Blue".  That version is much shorter - only about 25 minutes, compared to the full-length version on the new DVD/CD combo.  On the older version, Branford's quartet went into the studio, didn't rehearse much (they were all fine musicians and all knew ALS), and started the tape rolling.  It is a wonderful performance, and well-worth having in your collection.  But it sounds like they are not trying to record anything original, just to have a fun time playing Trane's music.  (Be warned, though, that most of that CD contains acid jazz & hip hop.)In contrast, the new recording does have a bit more of Branford's personality and interpretation.  For example, the chord changes in Acknowledgement are clearly different than on Trane's original recording - not so different to be annoying or trite - but different enough to let you know that Branford has something new to say.  Plus, in the 10 years since the earlier recording, Branford has grown from a very good but young musician to a true master in his own right, and this is evident on the new recording.The sound & picture quality are PHENOMENAL.  I have about a dozen concert DVDs covering various genres.  This is easily the best sounding & looking of them all.  My TV/DVD player is plugged into a mere bookshelf stereo (albeit a good one), and the sound was SUPERB.  Then, I took the DVD over to a friend's house who has Dolby 5.1 home theater sound, and my God, I thought I was in the club with the musicians!   The picture quality matches the sound quality.  I viewed this DVD on a high-definition wide screen TV, and it was really quite thrilling.The DVD includes a bunch of interviews.  First is a 30-minute interview between Branford and Alice Coltrane.  She talks a lot about Trane, his music, his relentless pursuit of perfection, some reminiscing about when he wrote ALS, and she and Branford have interesting exchanges about the nature of jazz and other topics.  Then there are a bunch of shorter interviews on various aspects of ALS, including some with Michael Brecker.  I think the interviews are insightful and add value to an already great disc.Finally, there's a brief segment called "Branford Casual" that shows Branford walking around town, working out at the gym, practicing some classical music on the soprano, rehearsing with his quartet, and misc backstage tour footage.  Neat, but not essential.Amazingly, you get all this for the price of a CD.  And the package includes an audio CD of the concert performance as a bonus!
Physical Comedy  At It's Best. This is indeed a great film for LN fans. Everything we have come to know and love about his movies are once again used in this film with laughs at almost every minute, they are non-stop. You gotta love the Weird Al opening song, that really does set the mood for the film and gives a hint of what to expect. Andy G. does a great job as the villian of the movie, it's good to know that he can poke fun at himself for the sake of the movie and it works! If you are a fan of LN and you haven't seen it yet, then you truly are missing something. If you love the Naked Gun films, then you owe it to yourself to see this!
BBC Comedy at its Finest!. I am hesitant to classify "Father Ted" as a Brit-Com, as it is primarily Irish actors and set on the Emerald Isle.  It was a BBC offering, though, so one can apply that label if desired.  I, personally, prefer to think of Father Ted as a comedy for the world, especially those that don't mind jibes towards the religious community.Unfortunately, Dermot Morgan, who plays the title role, died a day after the last episode was filmed.  Doubtless, there would have been many more seasons of this outstanding and absolutely hilarious series.  Fortunately, we are left with this great set of the complete season, a living memorial of an amazing comedic actor.  It certainly helps that Ardal O'Hanlan (from more recent 'My Hero' fame) plays the increasingly empty-headed assistant to Father Ted.  The rest of the cast round out brilliantly, and guest appearances (including Graham Norton on two episodes) add to the amazing acting throughout the series.Set on Craggy Island just off the west coast of Ireland, the three priests fight off boredom, competing parishes, strange allegations, and religious oppression (strange, I know) in all manner of zany circumstances.  It is part visual humor, part slapstick (light on that front, thankfully), part dialogue/verbal humor, and mostly situational hilarity and parody of itself.If you are very sensitive to religious issues, specifically mockery of the Catholic Church, then this series is not for you.  While all done in good-natured fun, it does take many shots at the Church from the Vatican all the way down to the lay community.  If you are open-minded to such jokes, or if you are merely a fan of britcoms, Irish humor, religious humor, Dermot Morgan, Ardal O'Hanlan, sitcoms, or any similar genre, then this is a must-own DVD.  You will be laughing hysterically, I assure you!(Also, the DVD quality is nigh perfect.  There aren't an extremely large number of special features, but there are enough to round out the DVDs and the episodes have a high level of replay value)
Iconic sci-fi action. A great movie. Buy it. `The Road Warrior', directed by Kennedy - Miller, and starring Mel Gibson, is one of those movies which seemed to appear out of nowhere and become, much to critics' embarrassed admission, an important work of fantasy / science fiction / adventure, thereby making its title actor into an important cinema star.The importance of `The Road Warrior' has grown with the years, as it has spawned numerous imitators, most especially Kevin Costner's `Waterworld', none of which are quite as good as the original. Even the sequel, `Mad Max, Beyond Thunderdome', with its higher production values, iconic presence of Tina Turner as the primary heavy, and somewhat more interesting story manages to quite match the raw impact of `The Road Warrior'.Most of the movie's success may be due to the same effective mix of two or more genres that we see in `Alien' and `Blade Runner'. While both have strong elements of science fiction, where the back story is driven by a fictional scientific premise, which the authors run with to see what may happen, if only .... And yet, these two movies are more the traditional horror movie and the traditional thriller, but elevated to a higher level by the great mix of qualities.Of course, `The Road Warrior' is itself a sequel to the original `Mad Max', however the connection is tenuous both in story line and in shared back story. I was never really sure `Mad Max' was really supposed to be happening in some post-apocalyptic Australian world (told by survivors of an `On The Beach'), or just in a run-down corner of Australia, which happens to be experiencing a bit more motorcycle gang outlawry. The mythic road warrior character certainly shares enough in common with Max of the first movie to see a continuity, but unlike movies like `The Matrix' trilogy and the `Lord of the Rings' series, one looses nothing from `The Road Warrior' if you did not see `Mad Max'.Just as `The Road Warrior' may be borrowing some cachet from `On The Beach', it also seems to owe something to `Lord of the Flies', another `lets see what happens in a post-nuclear holocaust' movie. One can interpret this as the way things end up if the lost boys of `Lord of the Flies' grew up and got wheels.And, unlike `Mad Max, Beyond Thunderdome', `The Road Warrior' benefits from a very simple story, exquisitely scripted, if not to excellently acted by the supporting cast.Just like `A Hard Days' Night', `The Road Warrior' manages to transcend the conventions of its genre, the say way as an Andy Warhol silk screen of a Campbell's Soup can turns something ordinary into art, thereby becoming a new paradigm of artistic expression, to be imitated by its successors.
A Seasonal Must For Every Family !. 'Santa Claus the movie' is a huge childhood favorite of mine. There are not many christmas movies out there that tell such an original story of how Santa Claus came to be. It is not only a mesmorizingly creative fairy tale that leaves you feeling like a warm chocolate chip cookie just taken out of the oven on christmas eve but it leaves all the religous aspects of christmas out so everyone can enjoy it,wich is the way the holiday truly deserves to be. My baby brother is 11 years old & although he is trying very hard (for his age) to hold on to the magic he has been asking alot of questions this year. So on christmas eve I read him Verginia O'Hanlons famous "yes verginia there is a Santa Claus" letter,afterwards we watched 'The Polar Exspress' & finished the night off with this classic & when it was all over the first thing he did was run out to the kitchen,grab some of the left over christmas eve cookies we had made earlier that night along with a couple of carrots,poured a tall glass of milk & wrote a note to Santa that said the following "Hello Santa! Even though my friends at school don't believe in you Don't you worry because I still do. Here are some cookies & milk for you & carrots for your reindeer. I love you Santa Clause". If for only one more year I could help him to believe,well then "mission acomplished" & I definitely thank the makers of this little holiday classic for assisting me in my magic capturing endeavor.
good treatment of theme, slowed by tedious action scenes. I found this a surprisingly engaging treatment of the clone/dysopian theme. I would have given it five stars if they would have explored that a little more and given us a little less of the inevitable tedious car chase/smash up stuff which I tend to yawn through.  Too much of that in the end of the film, almost enough to make me want to walk out, it went on forever.  It would have been better to see more of the clients and the clones' end -- the scenes with Stillweather and the surrogate mother were quite chilling.  Nice touch too, with the bounty hunter finallyidentifying with the clones.  The two actors were nothing exceptional, but reasonably competent and more engaging than you'd expect.  The director of the institute was good.Worth seeing even if you fast forward through some of the "action" scenes  that really slow down the story about 3/4 of the way through.How disappointing that the sole "extra" feature on the DVD had to do with the ridiculous action scenes and nothing whatsoever about the story itself.  If I could, I'd take off a half point for that.  Why should the whole of the viewing public be regarded as 10 year old boys, who think of nothing beyond the car crashes?  In spite of that they did a surprisingly good film if you can sit through the interminable obligatory "action"
Good for Review of the Basics of Grammar. This DVD takes you at a rapid speed through the basics of grammar.  There are three more DVDs in this series that deal with grammar and punctuation.The DVD may be best used perhaps for a review of grammar -to brush up on what you know.If you're starting from scratch,it may also been a solid introduction - getting acquainted withthe elements of grammar.  If words like "adverbs" or "adjectives" sound like mystical language to you - they will be demystified here.On the other hand, if you're struggling with conjugating irregular verbs, you'll still have to pick a good grammar book and to memorize the verbs you don't know.And, as a matter of fact, this DVD is best used in conjunction with a good grammar book.  DVD only helps to learn and memorize areas of grammar faster, but it does not replace the need to work separately on the areas that may be challenging for you.
dvd availability. I'm not sure about THE HILL, but the other 5 titles in this collection have NOT been on DVD--at least legitimiate disk.  AIR FORCE, THIRTY SECONDS OVER TOKYO, and COMMAND DECISION are all wonderful war or combat films (there's a difference between the two--see the books on the genre by Mike Mayo, Thomas Doherty and Jeanine Basinger).  It's great that other classics such as THE PURPLE HEART and even the less stellar SO PROUDLY WE HAIL are finally being released this spring on DVD.  Collectors and film historians should appreciate all of these titles that really reflected the country's mood between l94l and l945.  Propaganda was such a vital component on the home front and these movies show us the nationalistic side of the American people at the time
Coming of Age Story!!. Very cute movie and a lot more fun than I thought it would be.Set in Britain, you have Jess, a teenage girl of Indian descent, keenly interested in playing soccer (or football in Britain) and very good at soccer as well! She idolizes British soccer player David Beckham and dreams of one day becoming a professional player herself! Unfortunately, her parents are very traditional and don't want her playing soccer as girls of her age should no longer be interested in playing sports.Jess secretly joins a girl's soccer team after being spotted by another female soccer player, Juliet, who helps recruit Jesse to play for her team. Jess's parents don't approve, but Jess decides to play on the team anyway and not tell her parents anything about being on the team.Jess excels at playing soccer, enjoys playing soccer as it is her passion, and becomes fast friends with the girls on her team as well as her coach. She also does a lot of funny things in order not to be caught playing on an all girl's soccer team by her parents, but still gets caught anyway. It doesn't help that the coach for the team is a male!Pros: Cute, funny movie, with great storyline about friendship, family, love, and finding the inner strength be fight for what you believe in and following your dream.Cons: Predictable. Hard at times to follow the British accents and British slang
All my favorites on one CD!!!. I was hoping for this to happen one day and now is here!  This is a great value CD with Kathy's best weight and cardio complete programs consoildated on one CD!  Great job and thanks, Kathy
Bringing 1886 to the Modern Era of 1932. The outlandish nature of the characters in the 1932 version of the film adds to the charm of the piece.  Don't watch this movie if you're looking for a cinematic masterpiece.  Rather, enjoy it as a fun look at the incredibly two-dimensional characters who (as in the novel) are driven by Stevenson's famed dichotomy of character.Unlike the novel, the 1932 movie introduces several changes-including a different point-of-view, many entirely new characters, and a surprise ending.  Likewise, little is left to the imagination (as Stevenson aimed) regarding Jekyll's baser half.  The theme shifts from one of sin to fidelity as Jekyll attempts to remain faithful to his fianc and deal with his intense (and somewhat artificial) desire for the flesh.  Without a doubt, my favorite aspect of the film is the (unintentional) portrayal of Hyde as a rather farcical character, aided by the cheesy cinematographic techniques
NATE & HAYES - One of the Best Action adventures. Although not a "Box Office Hit", this is one of my all time favorite movies.  I have waited years for it's release on DVD.  It takes place in the mid 1800's, while Pirates still prowl the South Pacific.  The movie has something for everyone; A Love Story, A Comedy, Pirates, Cannibals, Swords, Cannons and an action adventure in a "Historically correct setting".  Memorable performances by Tommy Lee Jones & Michael O'Keefe in the title rolls.  A must have for anyone's DVD collection
Keep still, you young devil, or I'll slit your throat!. I must admit, this film was brilliant.  I have never been so captivated by such powerful acting, intense storytelling, and such beautiful landscapes ... all created in the 1940s.  The work that I witnessed in this film could rival that of most modern films today.  For once, the acting was perfection.  David Lean, the director, has this direct sense of finding the best actors for the roles.  It is as if the actors really want to embody their characters.  This was an acting driven film.  Without strong players, I don't think it would have had such a big impact on me, but everyone involved surprised me.  From the larger roles like Pip played by John Mills (flopsy, but filled with charisma and charm), to the smaller roles like Miss Havisham (Martita Hunt) and Mr. Jaggers (brilliant portrayal by Francis L. Sullivan), everyone seemed in tune, prepared, and excited about their part in Lean's masterpiece.  You just don't see acting like this anymore.  My mind's eye, from reading the books, seemed to even been excited by what they saw.  It was nearly as if Lean was reading my mind and casting accordingly.  It was impressive, honestly, to say the least.From my previous adventures into Lean's work with Brief Encounter (a personal favorite of mine) and Blithe Spirit (another immaculate tale), I knew he could tackle the voluptuous story of Great Expectations, but what I wasn't prepared for was the gorgeous scenery and ability to capture the sensation of the film.  For many directors today, the lack of proper cinematography can sometimes ruin the themes or feelings of a film, and even sometimes disrupt the power of the actors, but for Lean this was no problem.  His eye for filmmaking is unmatched, and his ability to create is on of Hollywood's greatest treats.  Lean has this power to pull the right people, the best scenes (even with a black and white structure), and create the most intense themes that will continue to pull you deeper into a picture that you may think that you are not going to enjoy.  There has yet to be one David Lean film that I have found distracting or below par.  Lean's passion for creation is obvious with the work that he has done, which I think was rather visionary for the time.  You can see it in Brief Encounter, and you can especially see it in this film.  I cannot speak any higher of Lean because his work speaks for him.  If you want to see cinema in its best form, I always suggest a David Lean film.Finally, this film's structure was exactly what this story needed.  While I will agree that it is a love story (and future adaptations would say it was more of a love story than anything else), Lean transformed it more into a story of discovery.  This is a story about Pip, and his ability to be a person that many of us long to be.  While some would have fled in the sight of an escaped convict, or at least turned them into the police, you see a very humble human going beyond that and reaching out his timid hand to help.  This is what will change Pip forever.  Even if we think we are going to loose that person throughout the film (when money enters the picture), we eventually see that Pip's honesty is true.  Lean develops more of a relationship between Magwitch and Pip than he does Pip and Estella.  This worked perfectly for me, because it allowed me to see Pip for who he was, and the heart that he had developed.  While I am very happy with the ending to this film, the direction that Lean pushed us was perfect.  The balance was never tipped and our foundation never broke, a rarity in cinema today.Overall, I was more than impressed with this film.  David Lean continues to prove that he was a formidable director at his time, and I cannot wait to immerse myself in more of his work.  This film wasn't just about Lean though, it was the actors that carried it and built such a solid story.  The reason this movie is so enjoyable to watch is because you don't see the actors, but instead the characters that they represent.  They carry this film on their shoulders and never let it fall or slip.  Whether you have read the story a million times or just once, or even never, this is a film that will capture your attention and excite your mind.  I read a review that stated it was "intelligent", and I couldn't agree more.  Lean forces you to think and commands your attention.  I just wish more films were made like this today.  If I could have experienced cinema in the 1940s, I think I would have been a very happy man!Grade: ***** out of ****
Aladdin is Diamond in the rough. One of the better Disney Classics... maybe the second most entertaining after the Lion King.This is the best plotlines that Disney has come up with (after the Lion King.Overview:Aladdin is a poor street rat and the hero. He falls in love with Princess Jasmine. But evil Jafar is trying to become the sultan and the most powerful person in the world. Aladdin gets the geni and must try to get the girl, and defeat Jafar.Why it is GoodFunnyTHIS MOVIE IS FUNNY!!!!! Geni is Robin Williams. Iago is Gilford Gottfried. These two are sooooooo hilarious!!!! I'm an Adult and after years since I first watched it is still hilarious. My 2 year old neice also laughed her head off. I think that it is one of the funniest disney movies. The comedy is perfect!!!Plotline and DramaThis is an amazing plotline. It doesn't slow down. There is no part where the movie drags or you start to feel like the drama is just going on. It moves at a awesome pace where you just keep watching. The story is great. Its original. NOT DULL.SONGSThe music is not as great as the lion king. But it doesn't take away from the story or slow it down. I mean there are no musical numbers that the story line stops and the characters start singing. The music helps drives the plots and is funny to. The better songs is the classic "A Whole New World" and "Prince Ali".ENTERTAINING my verdictTHIS IS THE TOP ECHELON OF DISNEY MOVIE. IT TRULY IS A CLASSIC. IT IS ENTERTAINING FOR ADULTS AS WELL AS CHILDREN. ITS FUNNY. THE PLOT DOES NOT DRAG ON AND GET DULL. MUSIC DOES NOT TAKE AWAY FROM THE MOVIE. THIS IS AN AMAZING MOVIE!!!!! I LOVE IT!!!
Dante's Cove. Two hot guys in love with a softcore love scene. This guy was trying to help his boyfriend to recover in a horrible curse of this hot warlock guy, who got cursed by his ex-girlfriend? He got locked in a dugeaon which changed his apperance and made him wrinkled.
SLOW BUT BRILLIANT. If you are looking into buying thid DVD, i would certainly recomend that you hire before you buy. It's one of them films where you either do like it or you just can't stand it. Me, i don't normally hire before i buy because i choose most of my films with the actors i like in them but when i saw it, i realized it'ss not all that good for some people. Firsty, a man hires a woman to do a book with him for 30 days or if he dosen't get it finished by then he will be in serious trouble. Anyway she and him think in the end of doing a story basedin the days ages ago, a romantic story. Finally when they have done the book, they fall in love with each other. Great romantic film
A Tradition in our home!. It's a ritual for my 5 year ld daughter and her dad to watch Samurai Jack before bed. Back when she was 3, and it was played on Cartoon Network, they made sure to watch it together. Now that Cartoon Network is retarded and they don't play it anymore, I've bought Seasons 1 and 2. I just wish it was played on Cartoon Network like it used to be. ...Jill Henrichse
Great DVD. I Strongly recommend this DVD. Great 6 short but pretty hard workouts. Not a single second waisted. No annoying advertisement.Just straight to work on your abdominal muscles. Quite hard, burning, working.I've been doing just one 8 or 9 minutes workout every day for a week and I see the result already
speilberg has scored again, big time!. This movie is a definate winner. Spielberg did a great job with this movie! I like it as much as his indiana jones and jaws! Spielberg has a gift, and took it to the max to make this movie. Tom curse did a pretty good job acting in this movie. Dakota fanning got a little annoing in this film. But above that it's great. I love all of this movie. It's great speicial affects made the movie even better!Over all I'd give this a two thumps up! You need to get it, and watch it if you havn't.Warning! I wouldn't let anyone uder the age of ten watch this movie. But that's just me. Still a great movie
A fun Spanish dark comedy with strong women. Pedro Almodovar is Spain's greatest contemporary filmmaker.  His movies are marked by strong women characters and a rich visual style.  VOLVER (To return) has the dead comically coming back to life in a film set in La Mancha, which has a high suicide rate because of vast empty plains and strong winds.  I don't really understand the plot of VOLVER, which got Penelope Cruz a Best Actress Oscar nomination a few months ago.  We have an aunt who dies, is buried, then comes back to life.  She was never really dead, it was someone else.  And we have a teenage girl raped by a man who may or may not be her father; she murders the man after one attack too many.  Cruz plays the life-affirming Raimunda, who takes care of the body--by dragging it to a nearby empty restaurant meat freezer!  (Hitchcock and Chabrol would love this movie.)  But then a film crew shows up in town and has need of catering for a crew of thirty people.  So the restaurant reopens, and Raimunda goes to all her friends and the local open-air market for tons of food quickly.  And since she needs a real freezer, something needs to be done with the freezer with the dead body in it.  Meanwhile, auntie keeps showing up alive to people who helped bury her!VOLVER is in Panavision, with yellow English subtitles below the letterboxed film image.  They are easy to read, but the film is talky so I missed maybe every other title.  Almodovar says, in a very good bonus interview, that he grew up in a family of women in La Mancha and is an agnostic who does not believe in reincarnation.  Hence, our one and only life is to be used to the fullest and death is not a sad occasion.  We see women cleaning grave markers and sweeping dust off tombs in a cemetery in the opening scene.  Anyway, I am not sure who is who here or who is really dead.  Almodovar fans should know that it is a wonderful, almost lighthearted dark comedy; and that Almodovar regular Carmen Maura is in it.  And Penelope Cruz deserved her Oscar nomination.Besides the Almodovar chat (in Spanish), DVD bonuses include two English-language interviews with Cruz and a Spanish-language one with Maura.  Viva, VOLVER!
So much fun I contemplated trying it!!. John and Jeremy party hearty crashing weddings, until, of course, the inevitable happens: They fall in love themselves.I watched this flick while planning my wedding and enjoyed it so much I've been tempted to try it...kind of sorry nobody crashed mine!Great romantic comedy. THe added features, which include Chaz' Rules Of Wedding Crashing, make this DVD well worth the buy
A bit confusing at first, but then I got really into it. Awesome movie. Nolan is a genius. Mind-boggling thriller that changes your reaction since it's told in reverse.
Rushmore. Another favorite by Wes Anderson. Mr. Anderson writes a great story and hires the right actors to make it work perfectly. This movie is the only one without Owen Wilson
Arsenic and Old Lace. How can anyone go wrong with a Cary Grant comedy?  He was dazeling, his supporting cast wonderful.  A flat out good comedy with no bad language, and no sex.
Must see video on the hazards of genetic engineering of food. If you didn't know that 60% of food sold in North America contains ingredients of genetically modified plants and that the ingredients are hazardous to human health and the planet, you will really know it after seeing this video."Bad Seed - The Truth About Our Food" is a relatively low budget but highly effective documentary with a gripping story and credible information. The video contains interviews with a wide range of experts as well as just activists and farmers.Unlike many documentaries this one doesn't include a bunch of cheesey footage from public domain stock footage from the 50s and 60s. Intead it uses parodies of Monsanto ads to add a little spice of humor.The animation sequences are good and there is a segment on the evils of Monsanto that really brings the message home.This video is not nearly as polished or as boring as the other documentary on GMOs "The Future of Food" and focuses more on the health consequences of GMOs rather than the impact on agriculture.If you eat, you must watch this video, otherwise you won't really know what you are eating or the consequences of your eating choices
Though not a masterpiece, a movie worth watching!. A very good movie, Kiss the Girls, sheds light on a series of disappearances of young girls in North Carolina.There are slight hints of Seven, The Bone Collector, Resurrection, and The Silence of the Lambs so the movie falls into the action/adventure/mystery/thriller/horror type of category, though it is way far removed from that level of gore and horror.Morgan Freeman, Ashley Judd (who is GORGEOUS!), and the rest of the cast carry out their performances very well!Overall, though not a masterpiece it is definitely a movie worth watching, as it will surely provide for an evening's entertainment.
"Alex, I'll take 'No Friggin' Way' for $200, please.". Preposterous.  Totally.  Completely.  Professional "driver" and transporter Frank Martin is one awesome dude.  He can dodge bullets.  Take a jet ski over dry land (can't we all?).  Jump from one building to another in his souped-up Audi.  Even jump out a window, land on a car, and not even wrinkle the lapels of his jacket.And you know what?  It's darn fun to watch.  Jason Statham, as balding and as grim-faced as my accountant, reprises his role as super duper action hero Frank Martin in Louis Leterrier's TRANSPORTER 2.  After watching this sequel, it immediately and readily became apparent the makers of this film decided if they were going to make an action film, they might as well make it (the action) nonstop--and they might as well up the ante on the "Oh, wow!" scale.  And they have succeeded, as we watch brooding Frank take on a scantily-clad femme fatale (Kate Nauta is very, very wicked, you good girl), make a most curious entrance into a jet about to become airborne, and do some amazing things with a fire hose.Forget the plot.  (Was there even a plot?)  Alessandro Gassman is a passable villian; Matthew Modine as wimpy as usual.  Just take in the action--there's plenty of it.  TRANSPORTER 2 is a cartoon disguised as a live-action movie.  Preposterous. . .in a good way.--D. Mikels, Author, WALK-O
Plus & Minus. + It's one of those "I don't know why I like it because I know most of it is horrible but I do like it somehow anyway!" movies.+ The simplistic, light, peaches-and-cream storylines are enjoyable to watch and allow for the use of imagination to add to them.+ The music is admittedly catchy. The tunes can't touch the songs of Disney classics, but this *is* more of a series of after-the-fact Cinderella cartoons; wouldn't it have been slightly embarrassing to waste outstanding music?+ Pom Pom the white cat attacking `Sir Hugh' is very funny when seen in slo-mo.+ So is the bit with the King and the elephant.+ In the previous film, the prince had wanted to have as many choices as possible at the ball, so of course everyone--including commoners--had been invited. In the first story (and the best story) of this movie, you see what life is like in the castle & the strict royal rules that must be enforced until Cinderella gets away with shaking things up. Luckily for her, the King is easily persuaded (just dump some chocolate pudding on his head), and basically says, "S'alright, this ish is acceptable." Yo.+ It gets laughs at parts that I think were intended for laughing. `Hyah!'+ Rather interesting characters for a sequel. Beatrice, Daphne, Prudence, Pom Pom, Sir Hugh, and yes, that Countess LeGrande.+ The Grand Duke gets a girl! He and Prudence--a perfect pair.+ So Anastasia is redeemed in this movie! How nice. Though when they took up the task of doing the ugly stepsisters, they really took the ugly part seriously. Even Drusilla seems to be enlightening toward the end. Only thing is, Stacy's change into a romantic person who falls very suddenly in love with a random village baker doesn't seem totally genuine. He doesn't have much reason to just hook up with her, but he does.+ There are a number of couples in the movie--Cinderella and the Prince, Jacques and Mary, Lucifer and Pom Pom, Prudence and the Grand Duke, the Countess and Hugh, & Anastasia and the Baker. Great if you like that sort of thing. Only problem with that is, you end up feeling much more for other couples than for the one that was supposed to be the focus of the movie in the first place, which was Cinderella and her `true love' prince.- It isn't so much a sequel as a string of cartoons  la the Jasmine and Ariel videos.- It doesn't attempt to be very profound, like "The Lion King II," but at least it isn't a complete disaster like the sequels to Tarzan, Lady and the Tramp, the Little Mermaid, and so many others.- The lack of Prince. Cinderella apparently has her happy-ever-after without him. It might be "Into the Woods" ringing in my head but I'd bet he's offscreen for almost the entire film probably messing around with someone else. 'Sorry I have to rush off on important matters of state' my foot. Not only is his relationship with Cinderella made out to be superficial, but his flat personality is too.- The movie builds up to an ending where all Cinderella does is read a poorly crafted book of stories that happened to them all in the castle, made by her rodent and avian friends with some help from the Fairy Godmother.- For the most part the animation and writing are decent, at least, but there are instances where this quality drops and it's pretty laughable (ie, some of the mice dialogue, Cinderella's two-pinprick nose in the beginning, Gus's quip about a `big chair' for Princess Cinderelly, the `at least I can stay up past midnight,' and the whole Anastasia/Baker thing.)- The second story is about the Fairy Godmother transforming Jacques the dissatisfied mouse into a human (Sir Hugh--in his attempt to say, "I'm human," he's cut off and thought to be called Hugh) to prove to him that he won't be more useful just because he's bigger. (He's doomed to a life of uselessness regardless of his species.) This plot kind of screams Saturday morning cartoon instead of the Cinderella sequel most were probably hoping for, no matter how amusing it is.- The lack of babies. (Probably not for long, but still, you might not be able to tell if there are any in the movie.)- What's with that baker? Seriously.- Lucifer's relationship with Pom Pom is over much too quickly.
Totally stunning, poetry on celluoid!. Firstly lets be clear about thing, this is not a martial arts movie  though it has some incredible martial arts scenes that will take your breath away and leave you looking on in stunned wonder.Also it is a foreign language film, fortunately not dubbed but with subtitles, not everyone's cup of tea but this will not stop you from enjoying ever single second of it, from the opening credits to the blood splattered ending.The Curse of the Golden Flower is a sumptuous tale about family secrets, revenge, lust, desire, incest, adultery, power, and corruption, all wrapped up in a beautiful but very flawed package that is the Forbidden City of 10th century China.Never before has one come across such a dysfunctional family as the Tang dynasty, the exquisite but deadly Empress Phoenix, played by the gorgeous Li Gong, the thoroughly amoral Emperor Ping, a glorious Yun Fat Chow in his element, his three sons, the weak Crown Prince Wan (Ye Liu)who has been having an affair with his stepmother, the Empress, Prince Jai, (Jay Chou) brilliant solider, and loyal son to his mother, torn between duty and love, he will make a fateful decision that will herald the beginning of the end for his family.  And last but certainly not least the spoilt and unloved Prince Yu, (Junjie Qin) whose hatred of his family is cunningly disguised by his seemingly placid nature and acceptance of his lowly third son status.Add to this mix, an Imperial Physician (Dahong Ni) with a wife (Jin Chen) whose connection to the royal household is a closely guarded secret, her daughter the lovely Chan (Man Li) who is is in love with the Crown Prince and you have the ingredients for a tragedy on a scale that can only be imagined.With breathtaking scenery, the carpet of golden chrysanthemums has to be seen to be believed, fantastic costumes, atmospheric background music, coupled with stunning fight sequences between assassins and royal guards you will be left with your jaw hanging down as you witness the golden warriors go into battle against the Emperor and the twists and turns in a film that is none stop action and intrigue throughout.The overall acting is without doubt perfection on celluloid, its a shame it didn't win an Oscar but sometimes Hollywood gets it wrong, and boy did they get it wrong this time
made me laugh. I've enjoyed the black humor of the various Texas Chainsaw movies, but the gas was running out when this one was made. Still there are some fairly funny moments and in-jokes. Matt's performance is a definite highlight. It's worth a look
Follows the story but feels like a drama. I studied Christmas Carol in school and to see it in a movie was excellent. The story was retold with accuracy but the acting seemed to me a bit too dramatised, maybe it was the norm in b/w days, and our eyes have got used to sleek and evolved acting forms.
5 STARS: Truly Excellent Documentary - Stunning visuals; Shows what really happened during Operation Iraqi Freedom. Impressive!. First of all, it would appear that the reviewers who gave this wonderful DVD low ratings are either incredibly uninformed about the world in which they live, or they are just leftist anti-American "activists." Whatever their excuse is, their reviews are misleading at best. It seems clear that none of them actually watched the DVD. This isn't an issue about opinion; it is more an issue about integrity. I will explain what I mean later in this review.While I would agree that soldiers who served in Iraq might find this boring (but only a few; this is a very thorough DVD with enough action and explanation of events to have truly historical significance in a way that most documentaries can only dream of). Those few soldiers who might find this boring would probably feel this way due to the fact that showing video of Power Utility linemen doing their jobs to Power Utility linemen wouldn't be particularly exciting, unless it was a bloopers/big mistakes documentary. Fortunately, 21 Days to Baghdad is an excellent documentary, and this DVD doesn't show American Servicemen being blown up, nor does it show them riddling terrorists with bullets, blood spraying, either.It does, however, do an excellent job shedding light on the activities of our servicemen in harm's way, which is the entire point. For those of us who haven't served in Iraq (which would be most of us), it is an impressively thorough and truly cool documentary. And while the DVD "extras" aren't all that impressive, it has so much to offer for so many people that to call it boring would be disingenuous, not to mention blatantly dishonest, for the vast majority of people. For someone who isn't very familiar with the military, it gives valuable insight into the lives of our active-duty Troops overseas. For those who are more familiar with the way the American war machine operates, it is still informative, and quite interesting. It is also quite a relief to see American servicemen portrayed as they are, not demonized  la Fahrenheit 9/11 (I strongly recommend that if you have seen Michael Moore's dishonest documentary, that you watch FahrenHYPE 9/11, and/or Celsius 41.11 as a counterbalance).Only those who are used to the leftist American media will find it "boring" or "subpar," as it isn't nearly as biased against America as most nightly news broadcasts are. In fact, this DVD shows the Iraqis celebrating in the streets upon the Americans' arrival in Baghdad, which is something that the vast majority of liberals will deny ever happened, and would do just about anything to keep the public from discovering. So if you're looking for a hack job denigrating our servicemen, you will be pretty upset after seeing this documentary, because all it contains is the truth, without nearly as much of a left-wing spin as al-Jazeera, the BBC, CNN, ABC, CBS, NBC, MSNBC, NPR, the NYT, the LAT, the WP, or any of the other "mainstream" media outlets. And for a liberal activist, that means it is highly offensive. Almost as offensive as Fox News Channel. LOL!Now as for the DVD, it has stunning visuals. It begins with President Bush addressing the U.N., shows preparations for war, including training of our Troops, it shows some of Saddam's atrocities, and shows President Bush's ultimatum to Saddam and his Sons to leave Iraq within 48 hours. It shows the troops waiting anxiously to receive their orders, and the surprising confidence of our youngest soldiers. It discusses the Rumsfeld doctrine, our war strategy, the controversy of using so many special forces and so few regular troops vs. the Powell Doctrine. Leftists will hate this DVD because it reminds them of when President Bush had over 90% approval ratings, and it shows him leading us into war to remove the murderous Saddam Hussein regime, and having amazing success in doing so.This DVD also includes a nice dose of shock and awe. It is amazing how precise the American GPS bombs are; the Republican Palace is absolutely decimated inside, completely gutted, while the exterior is largely undamaged, and the sidewalks outside are clear of rubble or debris. Only smoke damage near broken windows makes it obvious at first glance that anything at all happened inside. It shows a nice balance of daytime and nighttime activity, including a lot of special forces night vision footage including the rescue of PFC Jessica Lynch. In fact, this DVD pays a surprising amount of respect to our Special Forces; it is a nice little teaser to get you interested in learning more about our Special Ops forces.The progress of the U.S. Military is stunning; our Troops advanced so rapidly on Baghdad they the supply lines were strung out to a dangerous degree; fortunately, we didn't lose very many lives due to this fact; we could have lost a hundred times as many people many billions of dollars of equipment had Saddam been able to attack our supply lines effectively. This DVD gives excellent, varied perspectives into the happenings involved in Coalition forces taking Iraq and the Capital, Baghdad, including both civilians getting caught in the crossfire/failing to stop at checkpoints (later to be found carrying AK-47s, etc.), to the Iraqis celebrating the Americans' arrival in Baghdad once they feel confident Saddam's henchmen won't step out of the shadows and mow them down for supporting America. It is cool to see the footage that most newsrooms refused to air, and you can imagine it really upsets liberals to see this bit of truth in undisputable video footage.This DVD shows the 10-year dust storm that engulfed Iraq during the beginning stages of the assault, it shows American Naval forces clearing mines from harbors using dolphins, American Naval vessels launching cruise missiles, F/A-18 Hornets & Super Hornets, F-16s, F-117As, A-10 Thunderbolt IIs, AC-130 Spectre Gun ships, B2 Stealth Bombers, B1-B Lancer Bombers, B-52 Bombers, RQ-1 Predator Drones, M1A2 Abrams Tanks, M2A3 Bradleys, Humvees w/mounted TOW anti-Tank missiles or machine guns, Amphibious Assault Vehicles, JDAMs, Cruise Missiles, AWACS/JSTARS planes, refueling tankers, Blackhawk & Apache Helicopters, etc. etc. Oh, and LOTS of explosions. It's quite entertaining, and unlike Hollywood's creations, it's real.It also tells the story of a helicopter pilot/officer who is lost in a Blackhawk going down during the war, it devotes a respectable amount of time covering this aspect of the war; it is surprisingly fair. Although it doesn't show leftists in America protesting our fallen heroes' funerals, spewing their vitriol and hate against military families, it at least treats the deaths of American servicemen with respect, IMHO. It really stays away from politics, which is refreshing from an organization such as National Geographic, whose documentaries routinely parrot leftist propaganda re: scientific studies.A lighter moment in this amazing documentary touches on the Iraqi Information Minister (Mohammed Sayeed Al-Sahaf) denying reality, which will make many liberals uncomfortable, for obvious reasons.Near the end, it shows the celebrations where Saddam's statue is toppled by Iraqis (with the help of American Marines) in the traffic circle (can't remember the name), and it ends with a brief review. This documentary contains a surprising amount of real footage (the entire documentary is real war footage with about 10 minutes of talking heads commenting interspersed across the DVD. I hope you will find this review helpful in gaining the understanding that this is truly a top-notch documentary. An action movie it is not, but it comes close, and there are many adrenaline moments. For a documentary, it is exciting, informative, entertaining, and enlightening, not to mention very well done. The five stars I awarded to this DVD are very well earned
For Your Princess. It's so wonderful to live in a time when Disney's strange behavior of taking their classics off the market can be circumvented by great Internet marketers like Amazon. I was able to buy this 5 Star Disney Princess classic recently for my young princess through one of Amazon's third-party sellers. And without that opportunity, my little princess may have outgrown Snow White by the time Disney released it again.Let me just say that my little one was absolutely captivated by Snow White, and to think that she would be deprived by Disney itself from seeing it at her perfect age is criminal.The story is familiar enough to any parent, so I won't go on about that other than to say that of all the Disney Princess classics, Snow White and Sleeping Beauty have some scenes that might scare a young princess under the age of 5.But you should take advantage of purchasing Snow White or any of the other "off-the-market" Disney princess classics like Beauty and the Beast now via one of this site's resellers if you have a little princess of your own that might not appreciate it as much when Disney decides that it's time.And indeed, you will enjoy Snow White or any of the other Princess classics as thoroughly as your young one.Side Note: The Amazon description says that this page is for the REGION 2 release which will not play in most US DVD players. Search Amazon again for the REGION 1 release.
The original "300" (with a bit less melodrama and a lot less blood). "300 Spartans" is one of those movies that used to run a lot on Saturday afternoons on local stations.  By that, I mean it's a bona fide classic, but not enough of one to reach a timeless status.  That doesn't mean the movie has aged poorly (it hasn't); merely that it has vanished from the public consciousness by and large.But thanks in part to the publicity surrounding "300", the new movie based on a graphic novel that is based on both the historical event in question and this classic film (without proper credit given), "300 Spartans" is getting new attention.  That's a good thing.While this original version lacks the comic-book style of the new version, it also is probably more historically accurate, and honestly, it's a better movie.  Not that the Frank Miller version isn't good, but this one is better.  It's better written, with a tighter plot and more well-rounded  characters.  It's better acted.  And it has a lot less sensationalism.To be fair, the two movies are opposite extremes in a lot of ways.  "300" has over-the-top, almost cartoony violence and gore, while "300 Spartans" pretty much bloodless.  They are very obviously aimed at different audiences many decades apart, and both have been fairly successful at what they set out to do.  But for my money, "300 Spartans" will always be the definitive version of the tale
Gret, but see this before the "American Experience" DVD. This is a great documentary about the Till case, as director Keith Beauchamp clearly cares a lot about this subject and it shows. It does feature a few people who were not interviewed in previous Till books or documetnaries (some who appear only in shadows and under assumed names on camera) and one lady witness even reveals one of the biggest mysteries of the Till case-the name of the Black traitor who told Milam and Bryant about the alleged "wolf whistle." (This appears in the director's commentary). We also see some post-production footage of the Till case being reopened because of some of these interviews.However, I would have to give the edge to the "American Experience" documentary DVD on this subject, as that one does a better job of getting the viewer to know who Emmett Till was as a person before the murder and as he grew up in Chicago.Both are good, so I would recommend to those who want to know about the Till case to watch both of these DVDs.
Best childrens movie in a long time. If you like the Little Rascals from the old day you will love this new and improved movi
great all around workout. love this workout,real combination of cardio and weights ,feel great when im done,as my strength increases I add weight and step risers
Third Season, Best By Far. The third season is the best of One Tree Hill so far.  It is in this season that you experience a world of heartache from each and every character, feeling and experiencing everything along with them.  I am pre- ordering this season without owning the other seasons as of yet.  Youwon't regret buying this if you enjoy teen soap peras such as Gilmore Girls, The O.C., or any other WB show :
Philosophical apocalypse or just carnage?. A beautifully animated anime, told with its own hypnotic type rhythm drawing you into the narrative. But what the hell is that narrative saying or about? Is there a moral or message in any of it? Why r there different qualities and flaws in different characters?This much is intentional anyway...in Lukkas there is feeling and passion, different groups/classes of people, law of the jungle making it especially hard to survive without throwing your lot in with sum party, loyalty and betrayal, jealousy.ON the surface(of the earth) it is the opposite, a monolithic group of living dead bureaucrats who are all controlled by a radio and incapable of any personalised interactions.That part at least i get! There is also technolyzation of body parts that esculates to apocaplytic consequences, a seer, something called raffia which is exported to the class on the surface world and mayhem mayhem mayhem.It's an constantly stylishly told tale but whether there's anything to pin that tale to is not so obvious. Leaves one wondering is there something i didn't get or missed or was there nothing there in the first place?A director's commentary would b supercool for an anime like this and could make all the difference for what is a great show
A Mystical Journey for Love. I totally dig this movie.  And, I'm a big action movie kinda guy!  C'mon folks.  It's not meant to be taken seriously. It's just a light hearted adventurous romp travelling throughout a different side of Europe.  Involving a sundry cast of funny and interesting characters, it takes you along and away with them.  Take a chance and have a fun night watching this movie.  Much better than some of the garbage that passes itself off as "hip and edgy".My next question is where can I find the soundtrack?  There is some excellent music being played throughout the background of this movie.
JUST DO IT. I REALLY DINT BUY DIS DVD.. I STOLE IT FROM SOMEONE..AND IT WAS WORTH EVERY SECOND OF THAT DVD FORGET THA QUALITY IF U ARE A BTNH FAN NO DOUBT U'LL GET DIZ ON
Einstein's Big Idea -- a masterpiece of a documentary. What's most impressive about this story is the presentation of science as a human endeavor, undertaken by people who struggle with issues of class, gender, politics and ego, just like the rest of the world does. It's a bit reminiscent of the James Burke "Connections" programs PBS ran years ago in that each element of the famous equation (E=mc2) has a fascinating story behind it involving fascinating people. This is groundbreaking work for NOVA, and I hope it indicates that more programs of this quality are in their production pipeline
The funniest show in the history of television. The funniest show ever.  Enough said
Excellent Collection. SNL- 25th Anniversary really shows the best of the best. Running about 2 hours and 40 minutes long, you get the history of the show for sure. The musical guests were excellent, and the tributes to the ones that have sadly passed on were touching and times very sad especially when Jon Lovitz can barely speak when having to give an intro to the memory of Phil Hartman because he is literally holding back tears.This is a loving tribute to the first 25 years of SNL and I really do pray that it will go on for 25 more, and I really do think it wil
Unforgettable... Good films are unforgettable... and here's one. On the surface it's a quirky little story about two Italian brothers running a restaurant in New Jersey in the 1950's. One is ridiculously passionate about cooking superb food while the other tries to make his brother's passion commercially viable despite the fact that customers don't want what he cooks. Both are up against their more successful Italian neighbour who gives the customers exactly what they want. Not much then... but it's what goes on beneath this deceptively simple tale that makes it so good.The tense, sincere and often very funny interactions between the two brothers are so believable that they make you really want them to succeed with the "Big Night" on which the future of their restaurant and their relationship depends. Against this background, the preparation of the dishes themselves becomes an all-consuming event, infused with the drama and expectation of a chef in full flight cooking, of necessity, the meal of his life. And, the subtle plot with its inevitable denouement is understated and, as a result, extremely effective.Brilliantly acted, charming and, in the end, quite moving, "Big Night" is a superbly reflective exploration into the dreams & hopes of two immigrants in an alien world where their values don't apply and where this threatens to destroy the most important relationship they have. Over-hyped on its release and now increasingly forgotten it's an unmissable gem of a film.
Queer As Folk- The Fifth Season. I love this show and am so glad it ended the way it did.  Look out for Rosie
When the Surfers were good but not at their best. The post of "Erik Denning" pretty sums up what I want to say.  We definitely have the same thoughts on this.The Surfers started out as a mediocre generic punk band and currently are a cheezy pop industrial dance type band.  In the middle (before their fall from greatness with Independent Worm Saloon) they were one of the best and most unique bands of all time.   Kind a of big s**t sandwich.  The outer 2 pieces of bread being the s**t and the inside being the good sandwich food.This is the 2nd best part of their career and I am very happy to have it on this dvd.  It was interesting and enjoyable.  However, the BHS best years were directly after this, the Locust Abortion Technician and Hairway to Steven period.This is when I saw them many times in concert and what I most want to have to remember on dvd.  Then they had a lot of screens set up and they would have all types of weird video clips playing in the background.  The sex change footages were the most memorable.  Topless women would come and dance.  And Gibby would light his hand on fire for a second and quickly put it out (as if it were some amazing trick!)However, despite prefering this era, the period they caught on this dvd is a very good era as well.  It is before I learned about them so I was not familiar with their shows of this time.They have 2 drummers.  There is not the twisted elaborate stageshow I was used to but the members do have plenty of antics.  They also utilize a massive tuba, a horn or saxophone (I forgot as I didn't view this recently) and a megaphone.They also have interviews where Gibby just goes off on nonsensical drug induced stories.It is overall a very entertaining dvd and makes me wish I had learned of the BHS a couple of years earlier.
An unconventional but undeniably sweet romantic comedy. It goes without saying - or maybe it doesn't - that this is not your typical romantic comedy.  Most people fall in love and then get married, but Imagine Me & You starts with a wedding and ends with true love.  And most married men worry about their wives leaving them for another man - not another woman.  Truly, though, this film should not be pigeon-holed as one of "those" films, for it's a really sweet story that says more about true love than most of today's raunchy romances.  Love and sex are not the same thing, and it's always nice to find a film that reflects that.  Don't go into this film expecting to see two lovely ladies rolling around naked in the hay, as there's no nudity whatsoever.  This is a sweet film, not a prurient one.I love Piper Perabo, especially now that's she proven she's just as talented as she is gorgeous.  She's an unusual choice for the leading role in this film, an American actress surrounded by an impressive British cast, but her accent feels natural and makes for a most comfortable fit.  Her character, Rachel, seems the picture of happiness as she marries Heck (Matthew Goode), a true good guy who has long been her best friend.  Walking down the aisle, however, she happens to exchange a life-changing glance with Luce (Lena Headey), the florist who supplied the flowers for the wedding.  She soon strikes up a friendship with Luce, initially trying to set her up with one of Heck's friends.  Even before she learns that Luce is gay, though, she finds herself thinking about her more and more.  Never having believed in love at first sight, she doesn't know how to react to these strange but powerful new feelings she is experiencing for the first time.   Naturally, a distance seems to develop between her and Heck, eventually forcing her to choose between happiness and stability with Heck or true love with Luce.  Luce, for her part, is also torn; as much as she loves Rachel, she certainly has no desire to break up a marriage.As the movie progressed, I really wasn't sure how this story would end, knowing that one side of this lovers' triangle was destined for unhappiness.  The filmmakers delivered a better and more meaningful conclusion than I ever expected, however - even though it does go a little too far in trying to make everyone happy.The entire cast is excellent, contributing a couple of meaningful subplots, but special mention must be made of two individuals.  Boo Jackson is utterly charming as Rachel's young sister H (there's a great explanation for her name), while Anthony Head (Giles of Buffy fame) turns in a memorable performance as Rachel's long-suffering father, whose tendency to mumble and dodder around seems directly related to his less than perfect marriage to Rachel's demanding mother.  Both Jackson and Head really step up to make the film's sentimental conclusion particularly effective.Imagine You & Me is a disarmingly sweet and entertaining romantic comedy.  The nature of the romance between Rachel and Luce does much to explain the film's R rating, but this same-sex romance is in no way "mature" in terms of its content.  When you come right down to it, the fact that Rachel and Luce are both women is almost incidental.  This is, purely and simply, a wonderful love story
More great Columbo. Series 6 and 7 of Columbo contain some great episodes.Series 6 only had three episodes, but they are all terrific.  In 'Fade In To Murder' Columbo is on the trail of a TV detective (William Shatner)who murdered his blackmailing producer. In 'Old-Fashioned Murder' a museum curator is willing to kill in order to prevent her brother from selling off her beloved collection of antiquities.  And in 'The Bye-Bye Sky-High IQ Club Murder' it won't surprise anyone to find that Columbo is smarter than the average genius.  In all three of these episodes Columbo establishes a close rapport with his murder suspect, the exchanges between him and William Shatner are particularly enjoyable.My favourite episode in series 7 is 'Try and Catch Me' in which Ruth Gordon gives a superb performance as an crime writer who murders her niece's widower, who she believs was responsible for her niece's death.  Another great episode is 'Murder Under Glass', in which Louise Jordan plays a ruthless restaurant critic who murders the chef he has been blackmailing when his victim threatens to expose him.  I would advise you not to watch this particular episode if you happen to be hungry,or on a diet, because Columbo is tempted with delicious food in almost every scene, and it may prove too much for you.However, whether you are hungry or not, this set should satisfy your appetite for watching Columbo solve another batch of cases in his unique and charming way
Fistful of Dollars. Totally sweet.  If you ever hear a negative review concerning this movie, it is undoubtedly a woman or a girly man afraid of guns and the use of guns in general.  People totally die all over the place, and Clint Eastwood doesn't care about their families or anything
To be perfectly honest... I am 15 years old and I've only seen this movie 2...3...4...times? Something like that. We have a crumby tape recording of 4 songs of the movie. It doesn't matter to me how crumby the recording is; I've listened to it religiously for years. That's how good the songs are.It has been noted here that "Never Talk to Strangers" is a favorite song of many. It's my favortie as well. It's absolutely incredible how the werewolf is developing his own personality. He is warning the girl, quite literally, of himself. He seems exasperated when she doesn't listen - of course the carefree Red Riding Hood doesn't take anything anyone says seriously. I have wondered whether he is honestly hoping in a hidden heart (unlike his truly heartless master) that the girl will be able to stay away from him, or only slyly winning her trust. That's only a tiny, twisted piece of how great the plot is.All in all, it's very true what the other reviewers have said - this is nothing like the original story we all know. It's better. It's been expanded into a world of lifelike characters, the simple life of the harvest (Green in the Blue), Corrupt politics (Red's uncle, naturally), war (her father was fighting)... and everything else you could hope for in a fairy story. A wonderful tale to grow up on. I know that from experience.One last thing I note, is that it does not portray the wild wolf, a natural animal quite as badly as the old tales because it is a summoned werewolf, not a natural wolf, who does the evil. This is a winning point in my book since I'm a majorly pro-wolf person. :
well done work. I own /love this Jurassic Park & Lost World Limited Collectors Edition Box Set,,It rocks :
So excited... Finally this hidden 80's movie is coming out! For some very cool reason so far 2 of my favorite 80's movies are getting the DVD treatment this one and The New Kids! Wow, this is so great. The next one I'm hoping for is Modern Girls. Anyway, I have this movie on VHS but it plays horribly now. Now I can watch it perfectly again and again and again
Convincing and thorough anti-war journalism. A revealing examination of the Iraq war, with substantial support from Intelligence and military sources.  It challenges the heretofore accepted accounts that bad intelligence led to the U.S.-led invasion to pre-empt Iraqi WMD deployment.  Chapters are - unfortunately - not provided.
Pretty cute video. This is a pretty cute video.  It's basically about Pilchard and Tommy the Tortoise so it definitely drags a little.  My little one got ancy before it was over which is very unusual.  We love Bob in our house but really, this one could have used a little pick-me-up in the writing department.  It was a great idea, but it definitely needs expanded and reworked.
Excellent performance by Streep. Since the late 70's till the late 80's it seemed that every other movie had Meryl Streep in it.  She's a top drawer actress even though lately her movie choices have been less than impressive.  She really deserved her Oscar for this movie. The movie contains all the horrors of contration camps that you've seen in scores of other similar themed movies, but it is her riviting performance that will really impress you.
Cat DVD. Very good DVD. My cats really enjoy watching it and try to touch the animals on the screen.  Music on it is also very good.
Right up there with Office Space. I had very low expectations going into this movie, as it had Jenny McCarthy in it, but it was a nice surprise.  What a great date move! Rented it on a friends recommendation and bought it the next day.  It is a must for your movie collection.  Consider Crazy Little Things as the romantic comedy version of Office Space
It's great to finally have the original cuts on DVD, but are they really worth the $30 price tag?. Last month, Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment released the original Star Wars trilogy on DVD. This is not the first time the classic trilogy has been released to the DVD market. In 2004, released the Star Wars trilogy gift set, complete with commentary tracks for each movie and a bonus features disc. But there was a huge outcry from many "purists" among the Star Wars fans clamoring for the films on DVD. These films were not the original theatrical versions of Star Wars, The Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi released in 1977, 1980 and 1983, respectively. These weren't even the Special Edition versions released in 1997 to commemorate the twentieth anniversary of the original film. No, it seems that George Lucas ans his crew at Lucasfilm, Ltd. had further enhanced the films, both touching up on the special effects and bringing in actors from the prequel films to make these movies flow more smoothly with the newer films.During the fall of 2005, Fox issued a three DVD set which contained the Star Wars films, minus the bonus features disc and with some different artwork for the slipcase. But that was not enough to placate the purists who continued to demand the release of the original theatrical versions of the films on DVD. Lucas had publically expressed his reluctance to do so, and stated repeatedly that the newer, enhanced versions were the definitive versions of the story.Finally, in May of this year, Fox and Lucasfilm announced that the original versions of the films from the classic trilogy would be released to the DVD market on September 12th. Each movie has been released as a two-disc set, containing both the enhanced and original versions. The discs containing the enhanced version (Disc One) also contains the commentary tracks recorded for the original DVD set. The video and sound quality is not the same as the newer versions. Jim Ward, a spokesman for Lucasfilm commented "It is state of the art, as of 1993, and that's not as good as state of the art 2006." These DVD's are available only for a limited time before they are pulled off the market on December 31st.So, do you prefer Han shooting first, or Greedo? Ian McDiarmid or Clive Revill as the Emperor? Temeura Morrison's voice or Jeremy Bulloch's for Boba Fett? Sebastian Shaw or Hayden Christiansen as the redeemed Anakin Skywalker? Do any of these things really matter? Does anyone with a life really care?In all seriousness, it would been so much better for Fox and Lucasfilm to have just made the original theatrical versions availble by themselves rather than using this two-disc set to shove the newer versions down the throats of fans who just wanted to buy the originals. I would mainly recommend these DVD's for those purists absolutely have to have the original theatrical versions, or for someone who is such an avid Star Wars fan collector that he has to have anything and everything with Star Wars on it. Otherwise, I'm really not sure it's worth the $29.90 price tag on each DVD set.
Infinitely improved by being on DVD. Now that Rattle and Hum is on DVD, the brightest moments shine so much brighter and the low lights are eliminated through the magic of the fastforward button. The menu allows you to pick which song you want to see performed and oh what performances. The versions of "Exit" and "Sunday Bloody Sunday" are nothing short of awe-inspiring. Both are liable to send a chill down your spine. The live versions captured here of Bullet the Blue Sky, With or Without You, Running to Stand Still and others are also excellent. In 5.1 sound, it's nothing short of brilliant
I'm Hooked... I am 34 and a chronic "on again/off again" exerciser. Lately I've been "off" and my flexibility has sunk to nothing. I would practically pull a muscle turning over in bed. So I decided before I started up exercising again I would have to stretch regularly and get my body prepared. I'm young but I'm not THAT young! I have issues with my hip flexors and sometimes my upper back and neck area, as well as my feet. And anytime I start exercising after a down period, I am extremely sore and stiff and it takes awhile for my muscles to stop rebelling so I can give it my all during the workout. I'd been told by my doctor to start a stretching routine and I never knew what to do on my own, so I did a search for a DVD and found this one.A mini testimonial: I only started using this DVD a few days ago and have been faithful with doing both a.m. and p.m. routines. Yesterday I played flag football and was very nervous because the last time I played my hip flexors were so uncomfortable I could barely walk for several days. I'm happy to say that this morning I woke up not only pain free but able to walk! I can still "feel" that I worked my flexors from running during the game, but I honestly believe that if I had not used this DVD I would not be walking this morning! Madeline does great hip flexor stretches, which I  also used during the game in between plays.Another reason I bought this is because I am going skiing over New Years and want to prepare my body for that as well. Based on how I feel this morning I'm confident that if I continue to use this, I will not only be more flexible in time for skiing, but also stronger when starting up a new regular exercise routine.As far as the stretch routines themselves, they are very easy to follow and the scenery is extremely pleasant on the eyes. The music is soothing and soft, and Madeline's voice-over instructions are also calming and easy to listen to. I highly recommend this for anyone who wants to start up exercising again like me or anyone who wants to improve their flexibility. I wouldn't put a "level" label on this because you only stretch as far as your body allows you to go, and there aren't any complicated poses like in yoga. So it can be good for you regardless of your flexibility level
Trully Fantastic!!. Yes, I AM a Huge Pethead, well fan that is not [FAT].  These guys rise to the top - Every Single Time - EST.  The fact that I absolutely find their music, lyrics
Worth the hype. ok even for a guy, I thought the hype might be a little more than it was worth, but to my amazement I thought is was a great story and lived up to all that I have reviewed.  I would suggest the movie to all.
The thing about physical comedy is... Before I watched this film I was not sure who Patton Oswalt was.  I watch a lot alternative comedy like Mr. Show, David Cross, and I love comedians like Bill Hicks and George Carlin. Patton, Brian, Zach and many others are carrying the torch.  This video is without a doubt the very best comedy DVD I have ever seen.  I liked this video so much I wouldn't let Netfilx have it back.  When I saw the video it could not be purchased anywhere, so I "lost" it.  I play this video in the background at parties in my, and it is fun to see how many people take time out to listen to comedians like these guys with no context.  I always hear the inevitable, "who is this?"  These comedians are the best on the planet it's great more people can see this DVD now.I liked it beary much
My little nit to pick... I think there's already enough reviews on this complaining about the lack of DVD features, the quality, and the awfulness of the movie (that's the POINT, people!!!). But I LOVED IT! It was hilarious! Except...my roommate and I were disappointed that there was no making out at the end...only the beginning, which was COMPLETELY irrelevent to the rest of the movie
Amazing. This is one of my favorite movies ever. It really captures life in the 1800's slums and you really get attached to the characters. There are parts that you can barely watch because you feel for the characters. This is a great story about people who hit rock bottom and become much stronger people by becoming tougher and working their way up again to achieve their dreams. I've seen this movie about 3 times and each time I see it, it is just as good
The Best For Last. I'll be brief.  It's rare that a TV series has some of its finest episodes toward the end of the run, but DANGER MAN is a rare show.  And as far as I am concerned, the debate as to whether Drake is Number Six is really no debate at all.  Of course he is.  The Number Six character is never named otherwise.  McGoohan had to deny it for legal reasons, but the continuity of character is there (snapping fingers when nervous, same inflection of speech, even an old friend of Drake's with the same name appears both in DANGER MAN and THE PRISONER).  Enjoy these Final episodes, then watch THE PRISONER.  Such a pair of series, and such a great actor to make them work, will never come around again
I'll have-a this one and he'll have-a that one!. "There sure are an unusual amount of people from Ohio!"I'm 24 and just got the urge to go looking for Big Bird in Japan down in the basement of my parents' house. The happy childhood memories, and a few inside jokes with my sister, came flooding back as I watched this relic from my past.It's funny how at such a young age certain things are imbedded into your brain. I remembered all the songs, and how eerie and beautifully sad the story was. I remember how red and glossy the princess' lips were when she sang her song to the moon. I remember all the Japanese words they taught me, my early fascination with chopsticks and raw fish. And I remember the glowing bamboo stump at the end credits. I think this movie might have been my introduction to the dark side of the moon. Thank you Big Bird
The first Rock and Roll war... A great movie, loosely based on the Nam tour of the real Adrian Cronauer, as others have said.Adrian is a respected member of the Vietnam Vet community and a number of Vet friends have mentioned his take on the movie - 'If I'd done half of that stuff, Id have ended up in Leavenworth'.The movie is both a Robin Williams vehicle and a look at the first major build-up in the War itself. As for it being a 'police action', the irony was not lost on entertainers like Bob Hope, who often greeted his Nam audiences with "Hello Advisors!" even when there were more than 500,000 troops in Vietnam.In many ways this excellent movie was the first real indication of the caliber of Robin Williams as an actor. He simply shines in this role and it led to a well-deserved Oscar nomination and on to greater things.Highly recommended
Kyle's favorite. My 6 year old is non-verbal and a movie fanatic.  He had Elmo's Cookbook years ago and wore it out - this year that was all he wanted from Santa - 1 hour after opening it he accidentally cracked the dvd - and was heartbroken.  Thus the reason for re-ordering - this is a wonderful movie!!!!!!!
Grandpa Can Still Rock!. What can I add to what's been said below?  H. Laser has already said much that I wanted to say.  My very tolerant wife bought this set for me as a birthday gift, but makes me turn it off when she's in the room--Ginger, Jack, and Eric give her a headache.  Well, no marriage is perfect.Cream gets my vote for the best Rock band ever.  Not that they made no mistakes.  Actually, perhaps 50% of their recorded output is unlistenable ("Blue Condition"?  What were you guys thinking?)And yet, with these DVDs, I even enjoyed "Toad" and(Do I dare admit this in writing?) "Pressed Rat and Warthog."  The overproduction that marked some of their studio recordings is thankully missing; It's just the three of them playing their songs.  I had never realized how good a song "Deserted Cities" was until hearing this version.I suppose they could have given me a call to ask how to make the reunion concerts better.  I would then have dispensed my wisdom, and told them to play "Tales of Brave Ulysses," and "Strange Brew" or "Lawdy Mama."  I'd also have attempted to get Clapton to pick up a Gibson guitar, go back and listen to his absolutely brilliant, singing solo on the live "Crossroads," and try to play it more like that, and less like the Strat-Weilding guitar god with the "Behind the Sun" tone.  And perhaps he could have tracked down the "Fool"-painted psychadelic-freak-out Gibson.  Last I heard, Todd Rungren owned it.  Perhaps he'd lend it out for a show or two.Finally--and this is a matter of religious principle with me--"White Room" is played with a Wah-Wah pedal, or not at all.  (It's my Catholic upbringing coming through, I know.  But you don't eat meat on Fridays during lent, and you don't play "White Room" without the Wah-Wow-Wah-ah-Wow sound.Otherwise, I was thrilled that they have reunited for some shows; stunned that Jack and Ginger actually looked happy to be sharing a stage; and ecstatic that Ginger isn't dead.  Although it was he who gave me the biggest surprise:  I (honestly) thought he was doing a funny accent, a la Monty Python, on "Pressed Rat."  Turn out, that's how he talks.  AND . . . he wears dark socks when he drums.  Nerd?Who cares?  Great songs, and great musicians.See you in another 40 years.
The American President. This is a great movie - not the typical love story, but can easily adapted into our own busy lives. Michael Douglas as President and Annette Benning are just wonderful in this movie. It makes you believe in love again. I highly recommend this movie
energetic movie with powerful scenerio. brilliantSurandon is captivatingTommy Lee Jones is ruthless in his rolethe movie has some funny scenestouching and sad scenesand is just an all out powerful movieThis is one powerful drama movie with a bit of humor at timesit's really sad what happens at the beginning. but the ending is great. I love the cast. the director adapting the movie from book is great. not an easy book to do an adaptation to. the young boy who plays Mark is very stylish in his role. you can figure out what I mean by that if you want. I saw this in 11th grade in my American Legal Systems class and got hooked on it. yesterday bought it on dvd and will watch this one over and over again. it's really a classic drama.
My all time fav war film. It took me many years of looking but I finally found the film I had been looking for since I first saw it in 1976.I read the book a few years ago, and the film goes well with it. It is a film that always leaves a tear in the eye as the city of Paris together with its many political factions rise up against their nazi rulers in August 1944.Filmed in black and white and cleverly interlinked with original film footage, this film is made even better by a fantastic musical score which I always sing to my self everytime I visit Paris.The all star French cast were excellent, but I found the sympathetic portrayal of the german soldier and his officers a refreshing change from the goose stepping fanatics we see in many other World war 2 war films.It was interesting to see major american stars in minor roles, and i think anyone watching the film would have known just what was going to happen to Anthony Perkin's character,..."I wonder what it's like to die..."A film well worth waiting all these years to watch again
A very serious and  enlightening comedy. This is the perfect guide to understanding how every democratic government works. It makes you think of past and present political events. It is a must have movie and a great tool to teach your children about the political world they live in. The acting, ect. is great. In this same category I also recomend "Being There" with actor Peter Sellers.
Knit Fashions in Motion is AWESOME!. The holidays are com'n up and if you're looking for trendy project ideas to give as gifts or keep for yourself then you should definitely check out this DVD.  I knit my grandkids socks every year so I thought I'd change it up a bit now that they're a little older and w/ the help of this dvd I learned to make a purse, fingerless gloves, a cellphone holder and a scarf set=) Knit Fashions in Motion is a "must have" for gift ideas and the patterns you'll learn are soooo cute
Why all the hate?. Look obviously the person who wrote the review on how bad it is wasnt really paying attention to the movie.  Snipes, and Harrelson are Transit Cops and brothers.  Harrleson is a compulsive gambler, and Snipes is his goody goody brother.  This movie of full of great action, and If you are a Snipes fan check out Blade, Blade 2, New Jack City, and Demolition man
Great Movie, but it's sadly untrue in real life. Quite coincidentally, this movie was on television last night, right after I broke up with my boyfriend and he left.  We broke up because he doesn't want to leave his 25 year marriage where there are now adult children, only to enter into my family (consisting of my little boy and me), and take on head of household, parental responsibilities again.  While I was single a long time until I married (at the age of 38) he never had prolonged single time where he could be mostly self-centered.  He wants that time now.  So he left.Unlike this movie, he doesn't walk the streets like Billy Crystal, thinking how great it is to be alone and, allegedly, a free spirit, only to "see the light" and come racing to his girlfriend to tell he that he loves her, and "when you love somebody, you want your relationship to start right now"!No, in my case, he left and he hasn't called (even though I asked him not to), and I'm fairly certain he is not coming back.  Very sad.But a great movie
Must Get This. This documentary made me cry. It's an incredible addition to the Titanic history but also a supreme achievement in the world of documentary filmmaking. I just ordered the VHS set and am on the edge of my seat waiting for my copy
You can watch it over and over again!. Great movie about when life throws you "lemons", you make "lemonade".  A wonderful story about a man not letting anything get in his way of raising enough capital to pay back the back child support that he owes in a very ingenious way.  A modern take on the old fashioned notion that family means everything.  Deals with the subject of the terrible emotional effects of unemployment, and how it erodes one's sense of self-esteem in a very positive manner, showing the characters reacting to their situation in a constructive way
A good way  to relax after fighting the forces of stupid. When I have had a bad day or I am feeling down then its time to get a Dirty Harry fix. While the series had a long run and some of the scenes and themes were a bit on the far side, its great escapism.So go ahead and make my day
Almost awesome!. This edition includes a song sung by Gerald Butler that was not included in the movie, in a mood not reflected in the movie.  I think they were right to leave it out because it just didn't fit with the rest of the movie, but Butler singing it as the Phantom is to die for.  Also includes footage on the background of the play and the making the movie.I would like to have seen some outtakes and other omitted scenes,which would have made me omit the "almost."This is a must for any Phantom collector or Butler fan
Brainless and Wonderful. I remember watching this movie in high school and absolutely loving it.  I think there was a fair amount of squealing whenever Charlie was on screen.  Watching it now, several years later, it's amazing how horrible some of the acting is.  But it's still great to watch the dancing, and sappy though it is, it's a lot of fun.  There's a great bonus on the DVD: a scene where Charlie "shows off" to the rest of the class
Holiday Classic. I watched this movie as a child and now my children love it!  The story is sweet, the music is catchy and the characters are funny.  The bonus outtakes are really funny as well.  I was very excited to find this movie
Adam Sandler shows surprising depth. Punch Drunk Love gave Adam Sandler a chance to show that he can play a serious role.  There are plenty of laughs in this  picture but one can never laugh AT the main character.  He is faced with what appear to be insurmountable odds, and he is a "nice guy."  Therefore, the audience is hoping that somehow things will work out for him, but it is very uncertain what will happen!  This picture is a bit dark, so be aware that you may find yourself shocked at times, but hang on to the end.  It's worth it!
Michigan's Best Kept Knitting Secret!. Lori Sheffied is southeastern Michigan's best kept knitting secret! This knitting teacher extraodinaire has been teaching her knitting skills to those fortunate enough to know about her for over 25 years. And now, her new DVD makes it possible for everyone to partake in Lori's great teaching style, as well as her abundance of knitting skills. Enjoy
My favorite film!. This film only gets better to me with every viewing.  And now, with this great new release from Criterion, I can see it in an even clearer light.  A great transfer accompanied by fantastic extras that give you insight and information on this film that is hard to find elsewhere.  It's like Seven Samurai Film School in a box.  There will never be another release to top this one and probably never another film.  A must have for Kurosawa and film fans
fighting is alright,but Great story. they change the art, ken really didnt do much but I like there new style, I think its not about the fighting,but getting more into the story of Ryu.wish it was longer. but this isnt the end but the beginning of another generations. I still think streetfighter 2v is the best.also really cheap for 4 disk of hardcore actio
I Spit on Your Grave. This is an awesome movie. It is the ultimate in drama. What those men did to that lady , humiliating her the way that they did. They got what they deserved. JUSTICE. Camille did an excellent job on her character. You would almost think that it was really happening. An excellent movie for adults. Wouldn't advise it for teens or below
Awesome. The other guys must be on a piece of crap computer,im on a 1.8ghz AMD sempron with 512 of ram,this game never hesitates.The game is great,VERY graphic,never seen a game or movie this graphic. I love it,you also get to bang hookers. X
Heart-warming. This film warms my heart, makes me laugh, provides some good points for teaching and sermon illustrations.  I am surrounded by people who have forgotten who they are.  Tinkerbell's push to help Peter remember has deeper meaning than perhaps it's meant to have, but it's true nonetheless
good condition. I got the DVD on time and it looks as good as described
A Massive Achievement. What is left to say about this remarkable film ? Make no mistake, Director Tim Hines is a very special talent. I should imagine Spielberg himself has probably praised this film to his friends in private. I should also think that the Master H.G Wells would have been very happy with this accurate portrayal of his classic novel. The FX department at Pendragon deserve a mention for the terrifying martians. The martian machines ''rolling motion'' that Wells describes is accurately reproduced throughout the film. I was shocked to the root of my soul when the martians first appeared from the cylinder. But I knew without even seeing the invaders that that they were going to be shocking by the expressions on the faces of the talented cast, they looked utterly disgusted when standing on the edge of the pit. Throughout the film the tension continues at a very steady pace which was enough to keep me on the edge of my seat. The wonderful finale where our hero, Anthony Piana, seems almost crazed with joy at the strange death of the martians must surely reflect the relief at the massive effort that he put into his triumphant role. I watched the movie with my grandfather who sadly past away a few days after. It's comforting to know that the last film he saw was this.
Change of Seasons done very good!!. A Change of Seasons was a great movie! It was a follow up to &quot;Christy: The Movie&quot; and it details Christy's life durning the time when a flood comes to the small town of Cutter Gap, many things are lost but at the end of the movie everything turns out alright! It's worth seeing and it's a really good movie
A real tear-jerker. This movie was so very well done, and so very sad.  It will reach-around from behind you and pleasure you in a way you didn't expect, but will leave you feeling very sad at the end.  Sad, but inspired - and that is what this movie is about.  Inspiration.  Morrie was a great, stand-up character who was always "pitching a tent", so to speak.  I highly recommend this movie
Not Alone........ What a awesome movie!! Halle Berry gives us a unforgetable performance as Dr. Miranda Grey and Robert Downey Jr.! is excellent in his role as a fellow co-worker of hers. Miranda's life seems perfect until it all comes crashing down around her. Miranda is a criminal psychologist in a psychiatric ward at a penitentiary for women. All is fine in her life until she leaves work one night and has to make a detour due to road closure. When Miranda sees a girl standing in the middle of the road, she crashes her car but is unhurt and concerned about the girl. After rushing over to the girl and speaking to her, Miranda's whole life changes. She awakes to find out that she is being held in the same psych ward she works at accused of brutally murdering her husband. Miranda must now do everything possible to prove her innocence. She herself must try to keep her sanity while being heavily medicated while seeing ghosts and being visited by spirits. This movie is edge of your seat entertainment from the very beginning. An excellent, well written movie with great surprises and twists. For horror fans, thriller fans and suspense fans, this is a movie to own if you haven't seen it yet. Simply a great great movie!!
ER Meets Nip/Tuck. This is one INTENSE medical show. The details of the medicine are as sharp and up-close as those in ER, and the personal relationships are as in your face as those in Nip/Tuck. An excellent one-hour drama
Entertaining. Life not typical of the Irish, but another Cillian Murphy movie who completely out shines Colin Farrell.
I like it. Jack Black is truly a hysterical human being. Underneath all of the hilarious comedy there lies a message. Whether everyone agrees or not is optional, but it shows the truth about beauty. Many people overlook others based on looks alone, when in reality, we are all equal! This movie portrays a serious message in a very funny way. I love the combination done here. It will be in my DVD collection forever.Pros:Hilarious, Unique, Good messageCons:Not exactly realistic, I don't think it's actually possible to slip someone into a trance as Mr. Robbins did, but I think there's a deeper meaning behind the whole trance saying, "sometimes we do actually think this way.
Good Workout. I like Kathy Smith alot and have been using her videos off and on over the years. This is a great low-impact workout. I like incorporating weights in the workout as well. My only complaint is that she isn't consistant throughout the workout, doing the same thing on both right and left sides.
The Platinum Group of Silly Symphonies. If you've seen any of Disney's video compilations from the 1980s, then you've seen these cartoons.  That doesn't mean that they're bad.  Honestly, all of these cartoons represent the best of the Silly Symphony franchise presented in bright, restored colors.I'm a Super Disney Cartoon Fan, however, so I expected a completest package along the lines of the Mickey Mouse sets and the Goofy set.  I was looking to get a glimpse at many of the more obscure cartoons in the series that are rarely shown anymore (except maybe early in the morning on the Disney Channel).Good set, though, that I would highly recommend.I hope a Volume 2 is forthcoming that will fill in the remaining cartoons
PALANCE CREATES AN IMAGE !!. This movie is extraordinary as bible epics go! Really fine acting. The movie draws you in deeper and deeper as it moves along. One of the most fun things to watch is Jack Palance as he actually creates the despicable psychopathic character he used in so many wonderful films. That is until in later years he became the loveable one hand pushup cowboy!!! This is a must watch movie!!
Art is complicated. 4:02 PM - The 400 BlowsI finally got around to seeing a movie I bought called, "The 400 Blows".  It was said in an interview of an actress I'm fond of, to be one of her favorite movies of all time.I normally dont go for the old black and white movies, but I descided to give it a shot.I was pleasently suprised to see, though an older movie, the acting was rather good, and the plot wasnt borring at all.The 400 Blows, I still dont understand the title, is a French movie by a man named Francois Truffaut.Normally I'm not a fan of Subtitles because the reader can loose attention to the plot by trying desperately to read along.  But that wasnt the case here, the dialog went so naturally it was no trouble to keep in the moment.The story is about a kid named Antoine.  He looks to be in eigth grade.  Antoine doesnt behave in class and is a cronic lier.  Antoine's vandalism and theft start out at petty levels, but as the movie goes on they get more natural and in the moment.The back bone relationship of this movie is between Antoine and his Mother.  She seems to view him as more of a probluem then a child.At first glance of his father you are led to believe they are two pees in a pod.  Indeed, despite his faults, Antoine's Father is a good man and a good father.  Later we find out that he is not Antoine's biological father, to his credit I think it is wonderfull that he tried to be.Another important character of the film is Antoine's best friend.  The kid comes from an obvious upper middle class family, and is guilty of that common alement of not knowing how good you have it, and pretending your a tuff street kid.To his credit, Antoine's friend is loyal and tries hard to do right by Antoine.There is a school teacher in this film, Sourpuss, that makes me think the English Teach from a later film called, "Fast Times At Ridgemont High" was based on the Truffaut character.For the most part I was simpathetic of Antoine in his plight, but once he plagurized that essey things started to be stop being his parents fault, and started being his fault.All in all it was good movie.  I give it 4 out of 5 stars.  I may be a stupid American for wanting this, but I like to know what happens to a character.  The ending left me a little dissapointed, but maybe that was the point.  Art is complicated
Herskovitz and Zwick bring the drama of divorce to prime time television. I do not know if I can take another television series created by Marshall Herskovitz and Edward Zwick.  When they came out with "thirtysomething" in 1987 it was like watching our lives on TV.  I can still remember all the married couples that talked about how they recognized themselves in the myriad machinations of Michael, Hope and the gang.  Then in 1999 they came back with "Once and Again," and all I can is that I hate to think what would have happened if I was not already where the characters ended up in the third season, because if I was still in first season mode when this aired it would have been way too painful.  In fact, I would maintain that there will always be moments from this series that will threaten to rip off the scabs, twist the knife, or at least keep you up all night because they hit too close to home for those who have been involved with a divorce.You might have heard originally the idea with "The Mary Tyler Moore Show" was for Mary Richards to be divorced, and they could not get that idea to fly because the networks thought audiences would think Laura had divorced Rob Petrie.  But divorces are so painful, despite their regularity on soap opears, that there have been other concerns with having a show that is about divorce.  "Once and Again" is more about life (and love) after divorce, and the series dodges a major bullet by making sure the principle couple to be are already divorced and separated respectively when they first meet and sparks start to fly despite the train wrecks that are their lives.  This television series might be too painful to watch for some (I want to be Rick but I know I am a lot closer to Jake and that conclusion certainly hurts), but that is what happens with shows that are real rather than merely being considered reality programming.The fortysomethings in the main spotlight are Lily Manning (Sela Ward), who kicked her husband Jake (Jeffrey Nordling) out of the house for having an affair, and architect Rick Sammler (Bill Campbell), who has been divorced for three years from Karen (Susanna Thompson).  Lily works part-time at a bookshop with her sister, Judy Brooks (Marin Hinkle), while Jake runs the restaurant once owned by Lily and Judy's father, and Karen is a lawyer.  Both ex-couples have two children.  Living with Lily are Grace (Julia Whelan), an awkward high school freshman, and young Zoe (Meredith Deane), who has the ability to ask the pointed question at the wrong moment.  Living with Karen but frequently visiting Rick are Eli (Shane West), a high school junior who plays basketball and has some sort of learning disability, and Jessie (Evan Rachel Wood in the role that first got out attention), who is smart, thin, and working on her black belt in tae kwan doe.Lily and Rick meet at the high school when Grace has an injured ankle and Eli has academic problems, and from the start the couple find they are embarrassments to their children ("Pilot").  Rick is clearly smitten and Lily is surprised to find herself enjoying a relationship with another man ("Let's Spend the Night Together"), which is not easy when she finds herself working with his ex-wife at a school carnival ("The Scarlet Letter Jacket") and her sister clearly disapproves of the guy ("Liars and Other Strangers") and his involvement in Lily's life ("A Dream Deferred").  Meanwhile the kids have resorted to parallel euphemisms: Lily is "The Mom" and Rick is "The Dad" and have to deal with their own teenager crises in terms of sprained ankles ("The Ex-Files"), out of control parties ("Outside Hearts"), and the revolving door of adolescent affection ("Sneaky Feelings," "Daddy's Girl").  Then there are the ups and downs of the love lives of both Judy ("The Mystery Dance") and Karen ("Cat-in-Hat"), in the wake of Lily and Rick's romance, as well as Jake's ongoing involvement with young Tiffany (Ever Carradine) becoming painfully clear to Grace ("Letting Go").There is a major subplot in the first season regarding Lily's father, Phil (Paul Mazursky), who shows up for "Thanksgiving" expecting things to be patched up between Lily and Jake, who is clearly more like a son than a son-in-law, to Lily's absolute frustration.  Add to the interpersonal complications, which includes Lily's brother Aaron (Patrick Dempsey), the escalating financial problems of Jake that are putting the house that Lily and her daughters live in at risk ("Mediation"), and force Lily to go out and fin a job ("My Brilliant Career").  As for Rick, Herskovitz and Zwick introduce him to a new circle of hell when who else but familiar face by Miles Dentrell (David Clennon), who has relocated to the Chicago area from Philadelphia.  The conceit of the series was the use of black-and-white "interview" segments where the characters admit to themselves things they would never say aloud.  This matters on "Once and Again" because getting these characters to say what they are thinking without being prompted by anger or fear is often difficult and our feelings towards Grace, Judy and Karen are tempered because of these moments where their pain becomes most clear.  The season ends with an indication that the genesis for this series might have been the romance between Lily and Rick, but that what it is really going to be about in the next two seasons is how these two families become one, while maintaining tangible links to the families they were in the past ("A Door, About to Open")
Five stars--and not given lightly. The Life and Death of Colonel Blimp is one of the finest films ever made, period.  Michael Powell, a top director (49th Parallel) is at his finest as he masterfully recounts the tale of General Candy, an elderly British officer, in 1943.  We see the life of a just-wonderful human being, heroic and dashing.  As he evolves from a trim, swaggering youth of adventure to a stout and stoic old age, he never forgets his friends and never loses his faith in morality and justice, despite the travails of combat and personal loss.Roger Livesy ('I Know Where I'm Going') is absolutely endearing as the lead and Deborah Kerr does a magnificent job in a triple-role!  Anton Wallbrook is touching and credible as a German Officer befriended by Candy.Lovingly restored to its original length and color magnificence, this film is touching and credible as it shows the human side of war without being preachy.  There are many fine small performances and some surprising plot twists so that, despite its length, Blimp keeps viewers engaged.By all means, a fine addition to any collection!
An Eclectic Collection of Horror and Sci-Fi. This is an excellent collection of four films, once late night staples, which have fallen into obscurity in recent times. There are two excellent sci-fi flicks and two wonderful Karloff films. As with most Criterion releases, a bit pricey, but collectors and fans alike will find the collection worth while.ATOMIC SUBMARINE (1959) - Arthur Franz, Dick Foran, Tim Conway and Joi Lansing are a part of a crew of an atomic submarine that is tracking an underwater UFO, which is responsible for the sinking of several ships. They track the saucer to the North Pole, where it is using the magnetic field to replenish itself. They board the saucer and meet its occupant, a hairy octopus-like creature with one huge eye.CORRIDORS OF BLOOD (1958) - Karloff is in fine form as Dr. Bolton, a physician experimenting with anesthesia in the 1840s. Basing his mixture on opium, he becomes addicted in the process, which leads to his dismissal from the hospital. Needing money to purchase the supplies necessary to continue his research, he falls in with two grave robbers (Francis DeWolfe and Christopher Lee), signing false death certificates in order to get the money.FIRST MAN INTO SPACE (1959) - A space rocket recently launched into space crashes to earth, but there is no sign of its pilot. Strange things begin to happen: first cattle are killed for their blood, and later, humans. Investigators discover that the killer is none other than the astronaut himself, deformed by a coating of space dust, except for one eye. His brother, the project's commander (Marshall Thompson), realizes that he is heading back to the base and to the high-altitude chamber that he needs to breathe.THE HAUNTED STRANGLER (1958) - Another excellent Karloff film with Boris as a writer investigating the execution of a serial killer known as "The Haymarket Strangler" 20 years previously. He begins to suspect that the wrong man might have been hanged. However, when he picks up a scalpel used by the murderer, he becomes possessed and begins committing similar murders. The key to the mystery turns out to rest with Karloff himself.
Second season even funnier than the first!. Little Britain's first season is funny (in the vein of Monty Python) but it's the second season where the series really goes into overdrive. They've weeded out the less funny characters and added several great new ones. The characters are brilliantly portrayed by Lucas and Walliams. If you enjoy British humor, sketch comedy, guys in drag and outrageous costumes, you'll definitely love this DVD.
Theresa Ann Savoy... ... Rocks my world. I purchased this video only because of the deliciously beautiful Ms Savoy, who played the emperor's sister in "Caligula." The movie didn't dissapoint me as she frolics unashamedly throughout, however the film is a very disturbing look at a certain section of the Nazi government. Revisionists may disagree with the portrayal but I found it very realistic. Nothing they did surprises me anymore. Great film
Gritty and realistic portrayal of the Civil War in Missouri. "Ride With the Devil" is set in an often-overlooked theater of the Civil War although the action there was as much, if not more, brutal than the battlefields. Relatives and neighbors took stands against each other and everyone was subject to the viciousness of the Bushwhackers, the Jayhawkers, or both.Although the storyline is presented from the point of view of fictional Bushwhacker Jake, the script manages to give a balanced picture of the atrocities inflicted by both sides, even William Quantrill's raid on Lawrence, Kansas (which was in retaliation for the deaths of women and girls who were being held by Union officials merely because they were related to Quantrill's men).The filmmakers take great pains with authenticity and it's refreshing to see that the Confederate States Army WAS in fact ethnically diverse, and that African-Americans did indeed serve in its ranks while still managing to show the harsh racism of the period. If anything is less than convincing it's the romance...I thought the girl showed less moral character than typical women of the time, but Jewel gives an excellent performance. Tobey Maguire is simply outstanding.I highly recommend this movie. Excellent period piece, historically accurate, and well casted.
You Must Remember This.... My husband and I love As Time Goes By and watch it on BBC America almost every day.  We see a lot of ourselves in Jean and Lionel (even though we're 30 years younger).The Reunion Special was surprising.  We were afraid it would just be clips, but it actually had a new story line.  Everyone from the show was back except the guy who played Harry (Sandy's bloke), but who really cared about Harry :)The Special pretty good.  It was true to the show and the characters.  It wasn't just a "wrinkly's reunion" with the cast members sitting around.  If you really enjoyed the show, I'd recommend purchasing the Reunion Special
Bring It Back. If enough People love this show and buy the DVD they may bring it back (Remember Family Guy) And this summer, with the movie coming out it would be perfect for Comedy Central to revist Flat Point High and give Strangers with Candy a fourth season.  This unfortunaltly was the last but probably one of the best.  In it, Jerri tackles tough issues like finding her heritage, Venereal disease, insanity and censorship.  This was truly an original classic, everything about this show is just great.  It's edgy, dark comedy at it's bes
Verrry Funny specials you don't see in repeats. I ordered this just to see the QE2 episode my parents had talked so much about.  These special episodes are seldom rerun and if you're a fan, you must see them
west wing season 4. Love it like the other 3 seasons I've watched so far!
A True Classic. This is one of the smartest movies made in the last twenty years.  This may sound unusual since the title is Dumb and Dumber but it is true.  Each scene is absolutley perfect, there are a million rememberable lines, and the performances from Carrey and Daniels are terrific.  Seriously, try to name another movie where the quality remains so high scene after scene.
A Comedy Classic. Robin Harris was an incredibly talented and funny human being, and this DVD showcases that wonderfully.  This DVD adds to his already established reputation as a great comedian.  I think this DVD will become as classic as his other works: House Party, I'm Gonna Git You Sucka, and Bebe's Kids.  This DVD kept me laughing the entire time and I would recommend it to any fan of comedy who is looking for some new material to watch.  Even though Robin Harris is gone, he still continues to make us laugh
who's laughing now!. To all the Stankees Fans:  WHO IS LAUGHING NOW!  RED SOX NATION!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Veronica Mars - Best show ever!. This is my favorite show of all time, and I was extremely happy with my purchase!  No one who buys this could be disappointed!!! It's an amazing show for ANYONE!  Thank you
A TRULY GREAT COMEDY!. "Groundhog Day" is a one of the better comedies out there. From the opening, middle and ending of the film, the viewer gets more than the typical comedy fare churned out of the movie industry. This one is really, really funny. Bill Murray shines as an obnoxious weatherman who is sent to Punxatawney, Pennsylvania to do a report on the famous groundhog and its annual emergence from its hole. What he doesn't expect, however, is that he is going to be re-living every groundhog day forever. Or will he?Director Harold Ramis did a great job, not only with the picture,  but also in his selection of the actors in this film. Bill Murray is delightful as the obnoxious jerk who comes to realize that no matter what he does [suicide included] he will awaken every morning to the sound of 'I got you babe' and start the day all over again. This is where things in the film kick off great for  Bill Murray. Since he is going to live the day over and over again forever, why not learn a few things. Hmmm, like learning to play the piano, and do ice-art to name just a couple of things. Moreover, Bill Murray knows everything that is going to happen: Afterall, he's lived this life for who knows how long?Chris Elliott, who plays the smart-mouthed camerman, also plays his role great, as does Andie McDowell. And the part played by Stephan Tobolowsky as the equally obnoxious insurance agent is great too. Everything about the film is excellent. The premise of "What would you do if you had to live your day over and over again for eternity?" plays off very well in this comedy. The film is smart, funny and highly recommended.
A blade in the dark/Macabre. This double bill from Anchor Bay is excellent both films are from director Lamberto Bava son of director Mario Bava one of the earliest directors who did gialo films and has influinced other directors like Dario Argento and his son Lamberto. A blade in the dark tells the story of a young composer living in a secluded villa to finish work on composing a score for a horror film that his friend has made but soon finds himself caught up in a nightmare of murder and mystery. Lamberto Bava definently shows his talent behind the camera especialy when he sets up the intense scenes like the one where the killer is in the bathroom or the swimming pool scene which is stylishly made and the death scenes were very gory and bloody. If you liked the films of Dario Argento like Tenebrea or Deep red then you should deffinently check out A blade in the dark. Macabre is a different film from Lamberto and is more like a weird and twisted psychological thriller it is also his debut film, a married woman loses her lover who shes been having an affair with in a car crash that happened to decapatate him she is then traumatised by this incident and gets locked up in a mental institute, when she gets released she soon moves out to an appartment in New Orleans. This film has a shock ending but it doesn't quite work because you probably know whats going to happen unless you haven't read the back of the cover but still it was very wierd and entertaining I highly recomend this drive-in double feature from Anchor Bay it was fantastic
Melissa Yvonne Lewis?. I watch this bec. or Melissa Yvonne Lewis, remember Joe Schmoe where she play the rich bitch, she did a superb job on that show, but on this movie, her acting is just a mediocre.on the movie - just average, very predictable, nothing really excitin
Ignorance is Bliss. This is a great movie about a much miss-understood subject.  This movie seems strange even to me in its blatent acusations against American citizens of being Communists.  BUT THEY WERE!!!  Strange to me because of the brainwashing we American citizens must endure from the Liberal (leftist, socialist, communist) media (news, hollywood, TV).  We know now the McCarthy and others were right yet the term McCarthyism is a negative term!!!Ignorance = associating McCarthy with HUAC.  McCarthy was a Senator
In search of the populism as new!. The search for the forgotten average man as a publicity stunt require by a newspaper, and how backfired.A luxurious cast,headed for Gary Cooper (one of his best achievements) and Barbara Stanwyck (superb as always), a brilliant script and a gifted director makes of this film an exceptional picture.
MAGNIFICENT KUNG FU. Easily the best 70's collaboration between Sammo Hung and Yuen Biao minus Jackie as far as martial arts goes.  ZU WARRIORS takes the cake for spectacle and story but MAGNIFICENT BUTCHER gives a non-stop flurry of kick-butt kung fu that I can only compare to YOUNG MASTER.  Watch it widescreen on your projector and get ready to rumble
GREAT ELTON JOHN VIDEO!. THIS VIDEO IS FOR ANY ELTON JOHN FAN! I SAT AND WATCHED THIS WITHOUT LEAVING MY SEAT. EVEN IF YOUR NOT A BIG ELTON JOHN FAN, YOU WILL BE AFTER THIS VIDEO!
This concert is incredible. This is a fantastic show!  The staging and costumes are incredible and Kylie sings a TON of great songs from throughout her career.  I looove this dvd
Excellent. James Caan is fabulous in this movie and Sally Field is very funny. The sets are wonderful, the comedy almost tongue in cheek but side splitting if you pay attention. It's a must have as part of any comedy collection
Excellent Movies. I saw Mission Impossible I when it first came out in theaters, and did not watch it again until I bought this double disk set.  I enjoyed it just as much if not more than it's incredible sequel.  Both movies together, even though they are very loosely related, add up to a great buy
excellent addition to the series. The Death Wish series is an interesting collection of films, featuring revenge ("Death Wish 2", "Death Wish 5") and vigilante ("Death Wish", "Death Wish 3", "Death Wish 4") tales and starring Charles Bronson as "The Vigilante" Paul Kersey. The first three films in the series were surreal, hyped-out urban fever dreams with the first two being believable and serious (and with DW3 beginning seriously and slowly turning into an all-out cartoon culminating in an all-out street war with chainguns, rocket launchers, Home Alone-esque booby traps, and entire buildings exploding like a war zone). The first three films featured Bronson fighting various thugs, rapists, muggers, and "creeps". In "Death Wish 4", he abandons the street war and starts dismantling white collar criminal drug empires."Death Wish 4" takes a different direction than the first three by amping up the plot and easing back on the sleazy feel that permeated through the original Michael Winner-directed trilogy. Once again Bronson is propelled to vigilante action when a loved one dies, but this time the circumstances are different. Instead of a direct rape and/or murder, it's drugs that are the killer this time, so instead of attacking lowlifes, Bronson sets to work against the drug kingpins ruling the trade in LA as a favor to Nathan White (in a performance that goes from distinguished and calm in the beginning to hilariously over-the-top in the finale....those who have seen this know what I mean). It shouldn't be spoiling anything to say that, more or less, Bronson accomplishes his goal in no time at all, but to his chagrin White is more than what he seems.... The directing of J. Lee Thompson (Guns of Navarone, Cape Fear) gets the job done and the musical score is excellent (some have complained that the excellent Jimmy Page score featured in "Death Wish 2" and "Death Wish 3" is missing, but it seems fitting as Page's score had a more discordant and twisted feel that meshed well with the films' atmospheres, whereas almost all of that scummy atmosphere is gone in "Death Wish 4").This is an excellent 80s actioner and a definate improvement over "Death Wish 3". Bronson does what he does best and John P. Ryan gives a hilarious and memorable performance ("I warned you.....I'd kill her!!). Fans of Bronson and these types of movies should be pleased
A tentative review?. I shouldn't call this a review, really.  I haven't seen this copy of "The Church" as yet.  I have seen the movie a number of times in the past, but it has been a while, so my memory is a bit dimmed. I do know that I am very enthusiastic about this film.  I and some other Argento fans have bemoaned the fact that a DVD has not been available; at least that was our experience for a long time.  I'm elated that I've been able to obtain it.  I hope to write a real review soon, after I've caught up with my viewing.  Right now I can only express my appreciation for finally obtaining a copy.
North By Northwest 1959. Cary Grant (1904-1986) teams with director Alfred Hitchcock (1899-1980) for they fourth and final time in this superlative espionage caper judged one of the American Film Instutes Top-100 American Films and Spruced up with a NEW DIGITAL transfer and Remixed in DOLDY DIGITAL STEREO . He plays Manhattan advertising executive plunged into a realm of Spy ( James Mason 1909-1984 ) and countesy ( Eva Marie Saint (1924 - ) and variously abducted , framed a murder , chased and in another signature set pieces , Crop-dusted . He also holds on for dear life from the facial features of the Presidents on Mounth Rushmore (backlot sets were used ) But dont expect the master of suspense to leav star of audience hanging . A superb movie that take you thru America of 1959 , beautiful locations . High Quality transfer . Recommended Higly
A Family Drama Set in a Courtroom. There are really two kinds of lawyer films out there; the kind that is about the trial and the kind that is about the lawyers; this film is about the lawyers and the family drama of a father and daughter pitted against each other in a class action lawsuit.  The film is well constructed and acted, though there is the occasional corny dialoge in the father-daughter scenes that could have been written much stronger.The father (played by Gene Hackman) is a crusading support-the-little-guy type, but he is not without his warts and particularly not without the consequences of his giant ego.  Hackman is perfect in this role and gives his character the depth it deserves.  Mary Elizabeth Masterantonio plays the daughter and is really the center of the film since it is her evolution more than Hackman's that drives the plot.  She more than holds her own against a much more experienced actor and gives the film credibility.There are a few witty remarks in the film but I can't say that the dialogue crackles; since this is not an action film, the dialogue is how the film moves along, so that's a shame.  But the plot is enthralling and takes a few unexpected twists at the end; combined with the solid cast (this was shot so long ago that Fred Dalton Thompson was not yet a senator and Lawrence Fishbourne is listed as Larry) it makes the film engaging and certainly worth the low price of this DVD.The DVD itself is disappointing and carries no special features to speak of (trailers for this film and other movies DO NOT count as special features, at least in my opinion).  The only reason to get the DVD versus the tape is that it's easier to find and will hold up better over time.The bottom line is that this is a solid, well acted film whose David versus Goliath, Inc theme rings even more true in the post-Enron universe than it did when the film first came out
Infinite!. Lone star? Better make it FIVE stars for this cinematic masterpiece, a thoughtful sequel to "Taboo: Parts I-XII."
So bad it's hilarious. Let's get one thing straight. This is an ultra low budget movie with all of the trappings that come from that. It's Arnold Schwarzenegger's first movie appearance and it shows. So why does it get such a nice rating from me? Because the movie is so much fun to watch! I'll be the first to admit this movie isn't for everyone, but for those of you who enjoy a little camp now and then will truly get a kick out of Hercules in New York.Lets start with the dubbing. Oh, the wonderful dubbing. Arnold has been dubbed out of the movie and replaced by a voice that reminds me of a radio or TV personality. The new voice is completely out of character with the way Schwarzenegger looks. It's great camp value. I had the pleasure of checking out the included undubbed version with true Arnold dialog. Trust me, it's good they dubbed him (I am 'hur-koo-leeeeze'). Either dub you listen to will be very funny by the way. The "theatrical" version for it's too-perfect voice casting and the unedited version for Arnold stumbling over the lines with little or no actual acting.Suprisingly enough some of the actual acting is quite good. I particularly liked Michael Lipton as Pluto, Arnold Stang as 'Pretzie' and Ernest Graves as Zeus. Schwarzenegger, bless his heart, just isn't up to par on this movie. It's perfectly understandable as he just made the move from his body building career so he hasn't had the experience yet. Besides that's fun to watch too.Theres plenty more camp value where that came from. Sound effects can be out of place like when you hear car tires burning rubber while driving in the grass. Props are funny with things like Zeus' thunderbolts made from industrial galvanized steel rods. And wait until you see the fight scene with the escaped bear. Sure they keep mixing up the names of greek gods with their roman counterparts. Sure stuff like serious cinematography and lighting were thrown out the window, but as unforgivable those aspects are for many mythology and movie buffs I just can't help finish this movie with a smile on my face.One final thing to mention is the music. The opening credit score is extremely cheesy, but when you actually get to the movie you are treated with some authentic greek music. I mean the kind of music they play at traditional parties with mandolins and lutes. It's really fun to listen while you see Arnold romp around tossing people or things all over the place. Hats off to John Balamos for the music.In case you haven't noticed I love Hercules in New York because it was done bad, but with LOTS of style. If you're not into campy movies then you probably won't enjoy it. If you're a Schwarzenegger fan with a sense of humor go rent it. For everybody else it really depends on how forgiving you will be for all of the low-budget fallacies. I say check it out just for the experience alone. Just make sure you get the version with both the dubbed and the original Arnold dialog and get the best bang for your buck.
An absolute gulity pleasure !!!. ReviewA gang of Southern California surfers tear up the waves, while enjoying the sun, sand and the sea. But in their spare time they also double up as Bank robbers and commit their crimes masked as American presidents. The gang led by Bodhi (Patrick Swayze)have been making some serious hits.Finally the law in the form of FBI agent Johnny Utah (Keanu Reeves) and his partner, Pappas (Gary Busey)suspect the sand lovers and decide to infiltrate them by going undercover.Throw in skydiving, some pretty boy male bonding action and a little bit of love into this cocktail, this turns out to be a pretty decent film. The acting is saved with good pacing and a commendable script; which is not as predictable as 1 might think.It's worth a watch, definetly!!!The DvdThe film itself will be presented in 2.35:1 anamorphic widescreen, along with both English Dolby Digital 5.1 and 4.0 Dolby Surround tracks.Extras will include deleted scenes (Holistic Fitness With Agent Pappas, Agent Johnny Utah Thinks He Can Surf, Tyler Saves Johny From The Waves, Penetration Of The Social Infrastructure, Tyler & Johnny Spend Time Alone In The Water, A Basic Hit & Run, Tyler Accuses Johnny Of Using Her, and Johnny & Bodhi Talk About Robbing Banks), an It's Make or Break featurette, a Ride the Wave featurette, an Adrenaline Junkies featurette, an On Location: Malibu featurette, a still gallery, and three theatrical trailers++ Though the inital dvd loses the DTS track.. the DTS track was horrendous in the 1st place...So for me personally, i'd rather not have it...
I LOVE LIL BOOSIE. IM FROM JACKSONVILLE FL AND WE HAVE BEEN REPRESENTING FOR LIL BOOSIE DOWN HERE FOR ALONG TIME.  THE DVD IS GREAT. AFTER LISTENING TO ALL HIS CD'S YOU FINALLY GET TO SEE WHO HE IS AND WHERE HE COMES FROM.  I WOULD RECOMMEND THIS TO ANYONE WHO IS LOOKING TO GET MORE INFO ON WHO THE RAPPER LIL BOOSIE IS.  ITS A GREAT DVD.
"A  Picture From  Life's Other Side". It's many years ago that I read McMurtry's "The Last Picture Show" and it was one of the reasons that he became ,and still remains, one of my favorite authors. When I came across this video,I thought it might be a quick review of the book for me. Well,was I ever pleasantly surprised.I can't remember too many of the details of the book and I had not seen the movie.Let me tell you right here ; the video is a classic and is able to do so much more than the book.I often find that I prefer "the movie to the book" and for these reasons: First, the sound track,then the sets and scenery,and then, the actors;particularly when they are your favorites. On top of that,you can sit back,soak it all up;and all in a couple of hours.I graduated from High School in 1954. I lived in a small town in Nova Scotia of about 5,000,and it was just 9 years after the end of WWII.That is important since it was an Army base town,and nearby Air Force bases as well as Navy bases in Halifax.Although the town had never suffered as much as many during the Depression,it was going through great changes.We had 2 Movie Theatres,each showing a Matinee and 2 Evening shows.You could see 6 movies a week and then there was the Drive In;or more commonly called the "Passion Pit".They've all been closed. You also gotta remember there was no TV then, and certainly no way you could watch  home movies. Movies were very cheap in those days,around 35 cents,hence very popular.Then there was the Pool Hall,better known as the "Academy". This was the focal point of the teenage boys and even some of the other guys about town .However,once grown into manhood and settled down;pool halls became a thing that got replaced by family,Golf club,or more "respectable" endeavors. You would never find a businessman,Doctor,or any other "upstanding member of the community" in the Pool Hall,but they had all frequented them in their youth.The Pool Hall , the Arena or the Diner was the first place you headed for when you wanted to find out "What's going on". Little wonder I relate so to this story. Like,I said; our town hadn't fallen on such hard times as Thalia,we were more akin to Peyton Place.Music was much more to us in those days and unbelievably,much of it is still being played.I was a big fan of Country and Popular.Here is where the video really shines.It is loaded with our favorite music in the background. Ours was the time of music on the radio,top tens,Jukeboxes,car radios at the Drive-In Restaurants,record players and of course High School Dances.That has all been replaced by TV,Walkmans with earphones and now I-Pods and mostly Rock.There is an amazing array of familiar singers on the video;Eddie Arnold,Phil Harris,Hank Snow,Tony Bennett,Lefty Frizzell,Frankie Laine,Johnnie Rae,Kay Starr,Hank Thompason,Webb Pierce,Jo Stafford and more.However,the one that really haunts the whole video is Hank Williams.I can still remember when he flooded the airways with his songs. It was a stroke of pure genius to choose his "Why Don't You Love Me Like You Used To Do?" to end the video.If there ever was a case where the video outshines the book;this one gets my vote.Oh yes; my title. It was one of Hank's big songs,and pretty well describes this book and video
The Boys Are Back... Eight years after achieving box office success with audiences far and wide, director Michael Bay and uber-producer Jerry Bruckheimer joined together with Will Smith and Martin Lawrence to deliver another non-stop action packed movie featuring Miami's most disfunctional Detective duo, Mike Lowrey and Marcus Burnett (Will Smith and Martin Lawrence respectively) in "Bad Boys 2".When a new designer drug begins to plague Miami, detectives Mike Lowrey (Will Smith) and Marcus Burnett (Martin Lawrence) are assigned the task of bringing the drug peddlers to justice.  However, when the investigation isn't being wrapped as quickly as the government would like, enter a young, attractive government agent (Gabrielle Union) who just so happens to be Marcus' sister.  With his sister going undercover to break apart this drug cartel, Marcus becomes extremely overprotective of everything his sister does and is suspicious of anyone around her, to make matters worse for Marcus, his sister just so happens to be dating his partner Mike.  One thing's for sure with this much going on it's definitely going to be one exciting ride.Clearly 8 years has done nothing to dampen the comedic timing between the two leads, as Will and Martin easily fall back into the characters that made them huge stars.  The story is much better this time around, more depth is given to all of the characters, and the addition of Gabrielle Union brings a new level of disfunction and comedy-fodder to the proceedings.  The action is even more over-the-top and amazing to watch without becoming stale, the stunts require more from the stars who did a majority of their own stunts and even after an 8 year hiatus, their athletic prowess appears to have not waned one iota.  Michael Bay and Jerry Bruckheimer have once again succeeding in achieving huge amounts of box office gold as they have many times before with films, such as; "Bad Boys", "Armageddon", and "The Rock", and now the first sequel they've ever worked on together can join the list of their hugely successful films.If you haven't seen "Bad Boys 2" please do yourself a favor and watch this movie along with it's predecessor, and sit down to enjoy a night of laugh out loud comedy, extreme action, and excellent storytelling.  I promise you won't regret it."Bad Boys 2" is rated R for violence, language, and sexuality
This is a very good movie. I think that perhaps the people who reviewed this film negatively simply don't see it the way I do. I don't claim to know what the director had in mind, but I know what I take from this movie. I am NOT a golfer, but this film leaves me with an appreciation for golf which I have never before felt. Bagger Vance was okay, but more an entertaining film than a study of golf. Nor is A Gentleman's Game all about golf. There's a lot going on here, some of it is about golfing, some of it deals with the inside, or other side of the game, the &quot;loopers.&quot; Ultimately this movie is not about golfing, even though it chiefly centers on golfing and around a golf course. The overall story comes together with meaning greater than its several individual parts. Gary Sinise never dissapoints &amp; the entire cast delivers wonderfully in this film, but Mason Gamble is the one to watch. A very talented young actor. I am reminded of Kevin Spacey in Shipping News, wherein Spacey virtually tells the entire movie with his facial expressions. Gamble does not quite have as demanding a role here as Spacey had in Shipping News, but he does remarkably well with what he's given---&amp; considering his age that's all the more impressive. We easily know what his character, Timmy, is feeling at all times without having to hear any dialog. Mason Gamble has been around a while, &amp; I'm sure will have no trouble remaining in the industry as long as he chooses to keep making movies. Look for him in the quirky Rushmore, or in the hook-setting opening scene of Arlington Road, &amp; periodically thereafter throughout. I believe he was also Dennis the Mennace, &amp; I'm sure he's done a few other films.  I like gentleman's Game because it tells a story that centers around something I previously cared nothing about; now I at least have some appreciation for, and a much greater understanding of, golf. It's a good movie, and it's deffinately telling a worth while story. Plus it had the added bonus for me of coming as an unexpected surprise treat when I first saw it. (I had a cheap rental coupon &amp; never hearing of it before, happened upon it while browsing in Hollywood Video) I reccomend this movie as a great one to watch and a good one to own
The Adventures Of Teddy Ruxpin Vol  2. Now on DVD. See your friend Teddy Ruxpin on He's great adventures with Grubby & Gimmick & his airship
Nosferatu. Based on Bram Stoker's Dracula and Murnau's movie, the film is extremely beautiful and the sequence  of the woman crossing the square where they celebrate a final feast is impressive
GREAT WORKOUT!. I've seen the Pilates infomercials for a while now, but have been intimidated by the seemingly impossible movements. When I found this inexpensive "For Dummies" DVD, I decided to give it a try. WHAT A WORKOUT! I consider myself to be in moderately good shape, and this workout can definitely be felt! Within the first couple of days I IMMEDIATELY noticed a change in my posture, and a good burn in my abs, hips and thighs. I HIGHLY recommend this as both a great workout and a wonderful intro to Pilates.
WEDDING BELL BLUES. A surprise hit that was nominated for Best Picture in 1994, FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL is a marvelously performed romantic comedy.  Hugh Grant is superb as Charlie, the suave young man who is always late for weddings, and is looking for the right girl to speak his own vows.  Andie McDowell is the American who enters Charlie's life, but his refusal to make a commitment sends her into the hands of a much older man (Corin Redgrave).  What makes this movie so delightful is its marvelous supporting cast:  Simon Callow, Charlotte Coleman, John Hannah, James Fleet, and of course the sublime Kristin Scott Thomas as the acid-tongued but charming Fiona.    Rowan Atkinson also has a scene-stealing hilarious moment as a nervous priest really screwing up the wedding ceremony at Wedding # 2.  The movie is incredibly human and Hannah's recitation of a W.H. Auden poem at the funeral is extremely powerful.  For romantic comedies, they don't get much better than this.  Another high point:  the guitar strumming couple who warble both CAN'T SMILE WITHOUT YOU and STAND BY YOUR MAN.  A Fun film
EXCELLENT!. Definitely a great movie, Courage Under Fire, brings to the screen two stories as they unfold at the same time; a military investigation into whether a female officer should receive the Medal of Honor posthumously, and the inner struggle of the investigator as he tries to come to terms with his having been responsible for his friend's death in Iraq during Desert Storm.The film combines drama, action and adventure making it one of the best of its kind.Needless to say, Denzel Washington, Meg Ryan, Lou Diamond Phillips, Matt Damon, and the rest of the cast have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are outstanding to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)!The setting, the special effects, the music and the costumes are all wonderful!In short, it is a movie worth watching!  Strongly recommended along with Black Hawk Down.
Reality really does bite. Gibson's portrayal of a rogue pilot out to make some money above all else sheds light on an all-too-familiar situation that befalls war-torn countries;Gibson puts on a good performance and is, as always, reason enough to buy the DVD;recommended
FORT APACHE-THE GREATEST WESTERN EVER!!. I have another review of this GREAT John Ford classic under the "John Wayne-John Ford Collection",which includes eight(8) classic Wayne-Ford motion Pictures that include:"She Wore a Yellow Ribbon"(great Technicolor Western),"Stagecoach",(the film that made Wayne a Star and brought back the Western,along with DeMille's "Union Pacific",back to A-Level movie status)"They Were Expendable"(a WW2 film set in the Pacific,co-starring Wayne and Robert Montgomery)," 3 Godfathers"( Often filmed Western story that Ford made as a silent,starring Harry Carey,sr.,who this film is  made in Memory of),"The Long Voyage Home"(nearly forgotten Ford masterpiece,derived from four (4) Eugene O'Neill playlets,adapted by Dudley Nichols),"The Wings of Eagles"(the true story of Frank "Spig" Wead,WW1-WW2 flying ace and real life pal of Ford,with Wayne-O'Hara as husband & wife,with NOT ENOUGH MAUREEN!),and a special 2-disc DVD set of that great anti- racist post-Civil-War Western, "The Searchers".In "Fort Apache", Henry Fonda,as the new commander,of Fort Apache, is an arrogant Indian hating, and Irish-Catholic disliking,WASP who seeks glory for himself,no matter what the cost maybe!Great perfomances by Fonda, Wayne,George O'Brien,Ward Bond,Anna Lee,Irene Rich,Victor McLaglen,Dick Foran(who sings very well too),Grant Withers(as a corrupt Suttler),Guy Kibbe, Pedro Armendariz,and as a very sympathetic "Cochise" Miguel Inclan!Shirley temple and John Agar provide the love interest.A GREAT MOVIE! A GREAT WESTERN!! by AMERICA'S GREATEST DIRECTOR!!
Hysterical, Just Not The Full Episodes. If you want the entire story of each featured on here, then you'll be disappointed. If you want some of the funniest scenes of the series, then this is the place! And there are a lot of funny stuff on here. This is the Best of Bean. My personal favorite story is when Mr. Bean can't stay awake in church. This is a great introduction to Bean for those who have never watched an episode, for old fans like me, you get the best highlights of the series but just don't expect to get the entire episode.Overall great to get, especially if you don't mind not having the entire stor
A charme of a movie. I highly recommend this movie on a Saturday night with your partner cuddled on your side. It is sensual, suspenseful and entertaining. Ellen Barkin is the totally 80s beauty, sensual but tough. Al Pacino is marvellous as the cool detective being softened by the female spells. Enjoy!
Shockingly good sequel. Saw II is that rare movie that stays intriguing and believable the entire way through, while maintaining a cohesive storyline and gore to spare. The acting is solid, the scares are real, and the viewer is trying just as hard as Donnie Wahlberg's Detective Matthews to solve the mystery. What's most amazing is that all the clues really are right before your eyes.At the beginning of the film, Jigsaw has committed another grisly murder, and left his calling card for Detective Matthews to track him down. Matthews reluctantly takes the case and quickly locates Jigsaw (Tobin Bell) in his warehouse lair. But this is only the beginning of another one of Jigsaw's intricate games.Now eight people, including Matthews' son, are trapped in a house where deadly nerve gas is seeping through the walls and into their bodies. As the police try to locate the house and figure out a way to rescue the prisoners, they are also trying to figure their own way out together, while fighting amongst themselves to find out what connects them all.The suspense in this film is palpable and Tobin Bell's Jigsaw is one of the best horror franchise "bad guys" in years. His twisted sense of morality: "Those that don't appreciate life do not deserve it" is the kind of terrible explanation that makes a psychopath real and frightening.The twists that this film takes are surprising and show the kind of intelligence that the majority of horror schlock coming out these days is severely lacking.The DVD extras are truly spectacular. The viewer gets a look at how the set designers laid out every one of the various traps in the film, from the needle pit to the furnace trap. All the props are also examined (the bat with nails in it, etc.). Overall, this is the kind of horror film that is watchable over and over again and the kind of film that makes a great addition to any collection
The Special Edition treatment this film so richly deserves!. A DVD release of this film has been a long time coming with the studio waiting for Warren Beatty's involvement. He had been long resistant to doing DVD extras for his movies but seems to have changed his mind for this title perhaps because it was such a personal project. There are seven featurettes that can be viewed separately or altogether. For fans, there are brand new interviews with many of the major players: Beatty, Jack Nicholson, Paul Sorvino, cinematographer Vittorio Storaro and others."Witness to Reds: The Rising" traces the origins of the film. Beatty was interested in making a film about the development of the American left from 1915 to 1920 and, in particular, John Reed and his incredible, albeit brief life."Witness to Reds: Comrades" features Beatty talking about he cast the movie. Beatty convinced Jack Nicholson to play O'Neill by saying that he was the only actor who could take Diane Keaton away from him in a movie."Witness to Reds: Testimonials" examines the testimonial segments in the film with people who actually knew the historical figures depicted in the movie. It was an interesting conceit that gave Reds a quasi-documentary feel and provided exposition that Beatty wouldn't have to dramatize."Witness to Reds: The March" examines the pre-production phase. Beatty almost got the chance to shoot in Russia but made a political faux pas and so he had to shoot elsewhere."Witness to Reds: The Revolution - Part 1" takes a look at the politics of the film. Fellow cast members talk about how Beatty's personal philosophy is mirrored in the movie."Witness to Reds: The Revolution - Part 2" examines Beatty's fascination with Reed's internal conflict between arts and politics. He stuck to historical facts and chronology whenever possible. The attention to period detail is also looked at.Witness to Reds: Propaganda" examines the post-production and legacy of the film. The actor says that the studio was completely supportive of Reds but that he did not do any interviews for it at the time because he felt that he would just get in the way
Great soundtrack album to an unforgettable movie!!!. I am a huge fan of Bette Midler and thought her acting in this movie was sensational; I love the movie as well. All of the songs on this soundtrack album are excellent. This is a great album to have, the fact that there are only ten songs on it doesn't bother me at all (I have this album on all three formats: LP, cassette tape and CD). Every song on this soundtrack album is worth many listens, especially "Wind Beneath My Wings", which I believe is the most memorable song on here (and my most favorite song of hers). I also love "Oh Industry", with its weird sounding intro, instrumentation and lyrics. The final song, "The Friendship Theme", which closes out the album, is great as an instrumental, a piano being the only instrument played in this song. "Otto Titsling" has got to be the funny title on this album, as funny as the scene in the movie that this song is heard in. "I Know You By Heart" is excellent, with Bette dueting with David Pack. "Baby Mine" is soft and sweet with Bette's beautiful voice blending so wonderfully with the piano. "I've Still Got My Health" is fine with its jazz sound. "I Think It's Going To Rain Today" is great, too, but has a little bit of a sad sound to it. "Under the Boardwalk" is great. I heard the earlier version of it (I don't know who the vocalists were on it), but didn't like it too much. Bette's version of this song is more enjoyable with an upbeat sound; the other version was bland and too mellow. "The Glory of Love" is great to listen to as well. When Bette's character sings it at the end of the movie, it's really touching to see her raise her hand and wave to Hillary (Barbara Hershey's character) in heaven. So, for those of you who are big fans of Bette Midler, I strongly advise you to buy this movie and get the soundtrack album as well. No Bette Midler music library should be complete without this title. Get them while you can!!
The "Rael" Thing. I have been doing this DVD off and on for about a year now.  Even if you do not complete the pilates demonstrated, you can breathe when instructed and still learn a lot.  The accompanying music helps guide the flow of pilates.As a growing investor in home DVD workouts and mind-body buff, it is a comprehensive 35 minute set of stretches.  For me, it permits my body to gently inform my mind of what is aching.  Consider my bias though, I am a mat pilates die-hard fan.At this point, I have done this DVD work out with someone watching me from the couch, a 2 year old under my legs, and a cat dangling off the side of the pilates mat.  It is a good "one size fits all" and thus one of my favorite ways to start the day.  All you need is some loose clothing, a flat surface to do the exercises, and something to play the whole thing.
Wow. What can I say that hasn't been said already? Final Fantasy 7 is a gorgeous work of art. The voice acting (which wasn't implemented into the game, unfortuantly) was superb. Tifa sounded a little off, the voice didn't match the body, but it was good none-the-less.The CG graphics were awesome and absolutley flawless.This is the single best animated movie, ever
Quantum Leap- The Complete Fifth Season. I'm a huge fan of the show. I'm happy now that I owe all the series 1-5, and can watch them when I want.
Absolutely Amazing!!!~. This movie is a complex journey into the minds of the Wachowski brothers and how they have got the knowhow to put trilogy depth into one single movie. They have this movie so multilayered, that half the movie, V is talking through the other characters and since the whole movie is one idea, it turns out to be possibly the most wholesome movie I've ever seen! From beginning to end, its poses many questions and lets you create the answers within your own mind. Everytime I watch this movie, I find something new and Natalie Portman plays the part perfect... puts me in tears. It takes a couple time of watching it for it really to kick in. Very well made flick. Amaaaaaazing!!!
Awesome If it Were Available for Purchase!. I wish this were available for purchase.  RE-visited this site several times in the past month or so and still not available.    This collection is the best of all the JW weterns.   Hopefully, AMAZON will figure out a way to put it up for sale again!!!!B
Not just for fans of sexy pinoys. This flick surprised me. I was expecting acting along the lines of Macho and Midnight Dancers but these guys are really talented. What really impressed me is how universal gay emotions and personalities are. These guys could have been my friends down the street from me here in Honolulu working through the exact emotions. Intelligently made with attention to detail. The quality is surprisingly good considering it was made with non-industry standard equipment. I found myself talking outloud to the main character, it really hit a sensitive spot for me. I have certainly been in his shoes. Buy a copy and support this project. Looking forward to future projects from this guy
Fine acting, interesting, subtle. 'Personal Velocity: Three Portraits' is a touching and beautiful film that manages to remain unsentimental. The three heroines are complex and believable, as are all characters in the film, though most others are given only a surface glance. The acting is so well done, though, that even minor characters almost betray their backrounds with no words.Kyra Sedgwick plays Delia, a hard woman with a beautiful rear and a realistic attitude. Delia's story is a strong opening tale. Each story gives a brief boigraphy of its protagonist, and Delia's backstory is lightheartedly told. However, her past, and certainly her present, are heavy, and viewers see that her independence as a girl saves her in her adulthood. Sedgwick is viscerally real.Parker Posey is Greta. Greta's episode works well as a middle installment. It is not as dramatic as Delia's, but it is, in some ways, more depressing. Greta is a cookbook editor whose main antagonist is herself. She is intelligent, financially comfortable, and ambitious. Greta realizes that the lattermost quality, along with her tendency to stray from her devout spouse, must be met and dealt with. Posey is an understated and sympathetic Greta.The final episode features Fairuza Balk as a young, troubled woman with a compassionate heart. This is in some ways the strongest story, but I think that it is simply a solid conclusion. Paula (Balk) finds herself wandering in her car after witnessing a devastating car accident, the only aspect that connects the three portraits. Paula's story is at the same time the most grim and the most upbeat. She ends up being the kindest of the three characters, perhaps only because of her experiences.Families are prominently featured in this movie. As stated above, every part is well acted, from Delia's high school friend to the detached hitchhiker that Paula picks up. An artistic device used beginning in the opening shots involves freezing the frame like a snapshot. In this film, it is affective, and is not a gimmick.The three portraits are subtly connected, and there is no blatant summation. I found many of the choices made, including using a male voiced narration instead of a female voice-over, interesting and appropriate. This movie is recommended, but do not expect a certain kind of movie: let it surprise you
A lot like Resevoir Dogs... First off I hate Eric Stoltz. I think he is a bad actor and has a horrible movie voice. He irritates me to be honest. That being said he is at the top of his limited game in this movie.It is a very simple tale with a very simple setting. The whole French crew and their gregarious lifestyles and generally crazy demeanor is what makes this movie pretty good. These people live life to the fullest and are fun to watch onscreen. Delpy is great as usual, but I do not understand her attraction to Stoltz who is a dolt and largely uninterested in her on a deeper level it seems.Worth a watch. It is not stylish violence though like a Tarentino movie. It is gritty and grimy
Great for Core Strength. I have back problems and had therapy.  This video is just as good as the core exercises I got from therapy. You will definitely notice a difference
BUSKET. This film is so popular that I imagine there isn't much I can say that hasn't already been said. I will tell you that it is worth your time for the Dennis Leary 'Busket' scene (oh yeah and to hear him talk about his shoes)- Leary is always hilarious. Yes, this film is indeed dark and funny- but when have you known Walken to be anything different?! LOL  Hold on to your fingers (you'll understand after you watch), prepare yourself for the twisted ending and ENJOY!
Simply Hilarious. This show, on stage or on DVD, never ceases to amaze me. I enjoyed watching it and it never gets old. some slight understanding of shakespeare helps to understand the humor, but overall i thought it was awesome. definitely worth the money
Great movie. I had to watch this in a college course i was taking.  I enjoyed the movie.  My Family/Mi Familia describes the tale of three generations of an immigrant family's troubles and achievements. Maria and Jose, the first generation, come to Los Angeles in the 1930's, meet and marry, and then they face deportation. They establish their family on the east side of Los Angeles, and their many children Chucho, Paco, Jimmy, Memo, Irene and Toni.  This story starts with the father of the family, Jose Sanchez, who makes a one year journey on foot from Mexico to Los Angeles in order to track down his long lost brother. Once he gets there, he meets and marries the love of his life, Maria.  The two of them begin a family and the stories of their children begin to develop.  These stories involve Chucho who gets involved in gangs and has to deal with his father for his constant troubles with drugs and the police.  Jimmy begins to follow in the footsteps of his older brother but eventually realizes that he needs to think about the future and that this way of life will not cut it.  As the second generation become adults in the 60's, the focus of the story shifts to the son, Jimmy, and tells the story of his marriage to Isabel, their son, and Jimmy's journey to becoming a responsible parent.  This story shows the life of a family that sticks together through adversities, through crime, gangs, prejudice, no matter what they are faced with, they will be a family.
A life well-spent. Leonard Cohen's music brings together poetry, melody, sensuality and spirit in a way that hasn't been matched by any other performer i know. This movie alludes to the magic of Cohen's work but cannot fully capture it as it focuses most of its time on performers who, while trying hard, fall short of what was asked of them.As a previous reviewer quipped, I'd much prefer to see more of the man and less of the fans. I found myself fidgeting whenever the camera focused on others. Especially the Wainwrights seemed to be all over the place, undeservedly so, IMHO; and Nick Cave was vaguely dissapointing with his Sinatra mannerisms.  I liked the piece by Anthony (who I haven't heard of before) and especially the closing performance by Bono and his buddies together with Cohen; it was touching to see the respect these guys have for the old aristocrat.I have a lot of affection for Cohen and was sincerely touched by this movie. The humility, the nobility of character and mind and the sheer power of presence that emanate  from Leonard show how a well-spent life looks like.
SO much fun!. I just did this routine for the first time last night and I am hooked!  The instructor is easy to follow, and I love that there is a separate section that outlines the moves for you.  That way, you can learn the steps before you even workout.  It is a medium intensity video, and I was definitely sweating during this one!  My legs are even a little sore, and I am no stranger to exercise!   I would recommend this video to anyone who wants to spice up their workout routine (or their love life - this video has HOT moves.)
I just met a wonderful new man. He's fictional; but you can't have everything. Woody Allen's The Purple Rose Of Cairo ranks among his better films. The film centers on the experiences of a poor woman named Cecilia who is played wonderfully by Mia Farrow. Cecilia is trapped in a loveless marriage to a brute named Monk who is played by Danny Aiello.Cecilia has a job as a waitress in a small diner during the depression and although she tries to work hard she can't help but fantasize and chat about the movies with her sister who also works at the same diner. Cecilia's only comfort is in the movie theater watching glamorous but highly contrived movies about rich people who aren't suffering from poverty and the scorn of her husband. Cecilia eventually loses her job and after catching Monk being unfaithful to her she winds up watching The Purple Rose Of Cairo endlessly at the small movie theater in their town.Imagine Cecilia's surprise when one of the characters, the dashing all-American type guy Tom Baxter, decides to leave the film, jump from the screen into the audience, and run away with Cecilia! Tom represents the purity of heart and the true compassion that Cecilia longs for in her real marriage. She knows Tom is fictional because he came off the movie screen; but Tom maintains he's never going back because he wants to experience the real world with Cecilia as his new bride.Of course, all of this horrifies the movie theater manager and the Hollywood studio that produced the film entitled The Purple Rose Of Cairo. How inconvenient this is for Gil Shepherd, too, the actor who portrayed Tom Baxter in the film! The movie studio executives and Gil Shepherd hatch a plan to get Tom to return to the movie--but will it work? What would happen if Tom returned to the movie but took Cecilia with him into the land of make believe?The Purple Rose Of Cairo is a film you cannot afford to miss. Mia Farrow as Cecilia, Danny Aiello as Monk, Cecilia's husband and Jeff Daniels as both Gil and Tom all give some of the most convincing performances I've ever seen. Their performances moved me and engaged my attention much longer than I initially thought they would.This movie deals with the universal human desire to escape the pain and boredom of everyday life so many of us experience and to replace that misery with a world in which there are no real problems and everyone has money or at the very least a secure job. Cecilia represents us all as she delights to Tom's world of relative innocence and harmony. Therein lies the true strength of this film.The cinematography shines: I like the scenes in the movie house where you see the film being screened within Woody Allen's picture. The scenes filmed in the amusement park reflect careful forethought concerning lighting and camera angles. The choreography amazes me: I love the scenes in which both the movie theater patrons and the actors in the film are stunned by Tom's decision to leave the movie and they all move about simultaneously in ways that prove good judgment on the part of Woody Allen and his colleagues who worked on this film.Overall, The Purple Rose Of Cairo will remain an excellent film as long as the human condition and the quality of our lives are imperfect. Everybody dreams of a world where their true desires are reality and their troubles disappear. The Purple Rose Of Cairo elegantly explores this theme with sophistication, wit and poignancy.
A little short for major benefit - just do it consistantly :-l. This is a 3 disc programme.  The first two discs have 5 ten minute routines on them, each have Upper Body, Lower Body, Cardio, Pilates (abs) and Yoga (stretching).  Those two discs have the same order of routines but each routine is different (different abs to the first disc etc).  Within those routines, I find it's a little short to be of major benefit.  I think that if you do it on a regular basis though, you will feel better and possibly look better, but you should be looking for a minimum cardio workout of 30 minutes.Chris is a friendly instructor.  She has a body to motivate you.  She over uses the word 'awesome', but she's motivating and outgoing and offers words of encouragement.The third disc has tips on healthy eating and lifestyle and that's a great little bonus.  Each of the first two discs has a bonus 'conversation with Chris', but that is the same recording on both discs.Overall, this workout is good (to add to your existing routine).  The thing I like most about it is that EVERYONE can find 10 minutes to do even one routine.  It's not that hard to do.  You will need a stability ball, weights and they use those elastic bands, but I do this with the weights, and they use a step for the cardio.  This is worth a go for sure, especially if you are a beginner or if you want to add a little extra to your existing routines or if you are very time crunched
Bowie blows my mind. I'm sort of an emerging Bowie fan... I've only just begun to compile a collection...I found this DVD set at the video store and rented it on a whim, and all I can say is...Wow.Maybe it doesn't contain the best of the best, but the videos presented in this set are pretty amazing, from the earlier years (Rebel, Rebel and Drive-in Saturday) to the middle (Dancing in the Street with Mick Jagger, Time Will Crawl, and Fame) to the latest (Thursdays Child, Survive)... my mind was blown.This man is one of the most singular charismatic people in existance. His constant reinventions of himself and his music continue to thrill me with each turn.My favorites (and I'm weird, so don't get uppity... I know they're not the most popular) are "Time Will Crawl" and the easter egg live version of "Survive"
This is an excellent live concert of the fifties pop.vol. one of two,originally shown on pbs. This is an excellent live concert,volume one of two,originally aired on pbs...This concert contains 24 plus hits,and many musical clips of your favorite stars from the fifties era...It was very important,to get these great artists,on stage to help keep the music alive...Many of the artists are slowly passing in time...It is very important for people from future generations,be,able to hear this wonderful music...From any generation,whatever music you like today may sound weird or dated to future generations....Everything played today will be tomorows oldies...I love and own both albums from pbs..This set makes an excellent gift. 5 star rated...I thank you stewart L
This is the best of all the Twilight Zone Volumes. For those of you who are being selective in which Twilight Zone volumes you're buying; and, you plan on watching this DVD more than once, this is the best.  This volume includes (1) Living Doll (Talking Tina) with Telly Savales, (2) The Fever (a taunting slot machine), (3) The After Hours, with Anne Francis, who is left in a department store after the store closes and all the people have left.  (4) The Dummy (a ventriloquist).  The first 3 are great, the Dummy is OK, but again the first 3 are worth the cost alone.  Also, the fact that you don't have those annoying commercials anymore makes watching Twilight Zone that much better
Remains A Great Movie. This is a wonderful film.  Hopkins performance is a study in measured, method acting..it's one of the best performances I have ever seen on film. The character is so structured and duty bound, he misses his one chance at happiness, it's tragic and heartbreaking.  The score is dead on and the movie perfectly captures the arrogance of the English aristocracy preceding World War II.  The movie shows the way the classes interacted, and for an American, like me, this is fascinating..and so foreign.  This DVD has some nice extra's especially the deleted scenes.  This is my personal favorite of the great Merchant-Ivory collaboration, though Howards End and Room With a View are great as well.
Letter to the President. its refreshing to hear the rap, hip-hop point of view.  the prisons for profit are the crime of the century. its legal slavery...
a joan rivers bio?. geez was joan rivers this tormented waaaay back then when she was young?i guess she got themback by marrying a rich guy, having a career and er, all that plastic surgery.hmm, what would freud say?tina fey you are on deck. mean girls indeed!
Fun for Lucy Lovers. It is a wonderful complement to my Lucy collection. The Tango scene is some of her best physical comedy!!
Good Friends and Neighbors Separated by a fence. I love this wonderful Britcom and am glad to have acquired it, but it's beyond me why they released Seasons One through Three in one set and Season Four in another. Wouldn't a single, complete series boxed set have made more sense? And it's nice to have the bonus interview with Richard Briers, but why couldn't they have gotten some interviews with Felicity Kendall and the other cast members? What is that cute Felicity Kendall doing now
REMEMBER OF DEATH... ... or remember that you'll die one day. This philosophical statement is rather useful for accepting life the way it is and generally it perfectly describes Asian cinematic position. Korean movies specifically are usually composed not in an ordinary way. Their construction almost every time presupposes multiple interpretations and different levels of implications.Same thing here with "Memento Mori" - it's hard to comprehend this film after a single viewing. If you try to concentrate on one plot-line you'll most likely lose the others. Apparently it's necessary to watch it more than once to catch all the hidden layers. What's especially difficult in "Memento Mori" are the flash-backs which are almost indistinguishable from thepresent events."Memento Mori" shares a common theme with "Whispering Corridors" and is known as "Yeogo Goedam 2" also. They are much alike - "Memento Mori" has a girls' school, friendship, teachers' abuse, suicide and ghosts. It's not as morbid and dark as "Corridors", I even had a thought about whether it's possible to denominate it as a "horror film". All the more ghost theme is not the prevailing one here. Nothing terrifying happens on screen practically for the first hour. "Memento Mori" is mostly about friendship between two girls, even about love between them. It has an uncovered homosexual theme and explores all the edges of two girls' relationships. And the horror here is mostly of psychological origin. We see strange things happening, we see love and affection of the characters towards each other, we see some odd manifestations of their feelings and when one of the girls commits suicide we start wondering why - along with the whole school. We try to catch all the rumors like the whole school does to figure out what happened and finally realize the answer was right in front of us all the way, we just wasn't looking too good.I think "Memento Mori" is even better than "Whispering Corridors", its exploration of a person's psyche and nuances of girls' relationships is much more detailed and deep, this picture is ambivalent and alluring, it's a real piece of art and a very well done drama. School-life is so zoomed-in here, I guess "Memento Mori" is one of the most truthful retelling of it. I instantly recalled my own high-school and though I doubted Korean boarding school for girls can bear any resemblance with a Russian mixed school, for some time I definately returned into my teens. Only ours didn't have a ghost of its own...
"You Can Make Amends...". First introduced in "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" as the doe-eyed vampire-with-a-soul, Angel quickly became a fan favourite, and was deemed a strong enough character to carry a spin-off on his shoulders. A drunken Irish lout in his youth, Liam was turned into a vampire by the beautiful Darla, and quickly earned a reputation as the vicious and merciless vampire Angelus. Spreading bloodlust and panic wherever he went, Angelus finally met his match when he fed on a young gypsy girl. Her clan placed a vengeful curse on Angelus: they return his soul to him, so that he might experience guilt and remorse for his centuries of killings. But the gypsies wanted Angelus to suffer for his crimes, and not benefit from the gifts of having a soul - like love and joy - so they added a fatal clause. Should Angel ever experience a moment of pure happiness, when the weight of his soul did not bear heavily on his conscious, then once again he would have his soul ripped from him.Desperate to make amends for the way he lived his life (I suggest watching "Amends", the Season Three episode of "Buffy" that first hints that Angel's path lies elsewhere) Angel first finds a place fighting next to the Slayer; but on falling in love - and bound by his curse - realizes that he is simply putting her in danger by his continued presence. Now he leaves for L.A., to fight the good fight in his own way - in solitude. But fate has other plans in store...Season One is predominantly concerned with setting the themes and tone of the show to come. Considerably darker than "Buffy" (though its sister show caught up in this respect in future seasons), "Angel" originally played out like a film-noir detective series. The fact that Angel was a vampire was often inconsequential in some episodes, instead he bore more than a passing resemblance to Batman as he investigated leads, gathered clues, drew conclusions and eventually beat up the bad guy.Angel was initially joined by a fellow survivor of the Sunnydale Graduation Ceremony: Cordelia Chase, the one-time Queen B*tch of high school whose father's tax evasion has landed her scrounging for a living in L.A. and Doyle, a demon-hybrid whose painful visions provide Angel with information of people in need. Later, fellow Sunnydale reject Wesley Wyndam-Pryce also joins the team; bumbling and foolish at first, but eventually undertaking one of the most radical character developments of the entire show.The central theme is ultimately one of redemption; obviously for Angel who has a lifetime of heinous deeds to atone for, but also our three supporting characters: the spoilt Cordelia who made the Scooby Gang miserable for most of the first three seasons of "Buffy" now finds out what its like to be like them, Doyle has a secret in his past that explains his painful visions, and Wesley (utterly scorned by the Scooby Gang due to a steady succession of mistakes) finds a new place for himself in Angel's extended family.In terms of structure, the show is rather different from Buffy; especially in its portrayal of good and evil. Of course, both shows explore the shades of grey between the two, but each season of "Buffy" pitted the Slayer and her Scooby Gang against a particular `big bad', with Buffy herself (along with her ideals, such as teamwork and respect for human life) as the opposing force of good in the universe. Angel however, straddled the dichotomy of good and evil; with the mysterious Powers That Be on the one side, and the equally mysterious Senior Partners (and their law firm Wolfram and Hart) on the other. Choosing how to negotiate his own path between the two is the running plot thread of this initial season.The unique thing about the show (as compared to the next four seasons to come) is the singularity of each episode. Seasons Two and Five were similar in this respect, having a separate story with a beginning, middle and end per episode, but which also contained a story arc that was spread throughout several episodes - a trend that was even more pronounced in Seasons Three and Four. Depending on your preferences, you will either enjoy or feel frustrated at the way this series is set out: it has continuity in its characters but not its stories.Like any show, it has its up and downs. The death of a regular character nine episodes into the show came as a bit of a shock; particularly since he was immediately replaced by another character previously introduced on "Buffy". Although the passing of Doyle's visions onto Cordelia was an inspired touch, making the death so soon into the fledging series and having him replaced by Wesley (making all three regulars recycled "Buffy" characters) was a little mishandled. The introduction of Kate Locksley, a policewoman who is both ally and antagonist to Angel, had an intriguing relationship with the staff of Angel Investigations as well as a strong back-story of her own. However, most fans felt threatened by Kate, feeling as though she was an unwelcome love interest bought in to replace Buffy (little did we know, it was Cordelia that we should have been keeping an eye on!) and she was unfairly written out of the show in mid-season two. Given that the fifth cast regular, Charles Gunn, was one of the more useless additions to the show, it was a sad loss.But there are plenty of chances for crossovers with the "Buffy" cast: Oz, Spike, Darla, Faith and of course, Buffy herself turn up, and there are other introductions to fun characters: rival lawyers Lindsay McDonald and Lilah Morgan, Cordelia's house-ghost Phantom Dennis, and a range of one-off guest stars. One fun thing about the show is how many familiar faces turn up;  take a look at the first slain vampire of the season - it's Josh Holloway, a.k.a. Sawyer from "Lost!" He's not the only one, so keep your eyes upon
Clever. I thought this movie was very clever - the plot was so out there...so many things had to happen for things to work out.  I think the cast was AMAZING, they were perfect at their roles.  There was humor, but it wasn't normal humor.  It was humourous how George Clooney could have a conversation with Brad Pitt, with only one of them talking...the other one sitting there, stony faced, not saying a word.  Things like that were funny.  I think some people may find this movie boring, but if you're into really weird, abstract humor, and twisted plots, this movie is for you
A DIETRICH CURIOUSITY. An unusual film which will appeal to some for that very reason. The production values were obviously first-rate: the photography, musical score and direction are fine while the plot and characterisations are fairly rich and deep. As Domini, Dietrich is all nobility here. Seeking a spiritual rest after caring for her dying father, her advisor tells her to seek peace in the Algerian desert where she meets a trappist monk - who has broken his vows - in the person of Charles Boyer...This film wasn't one of Marlene's personal favourites: she thought the dialogue was in parts ridiculous - i.e. having to say such lines as "Nobody but God and I know what is in my heart" during a romantic interlude with Boyer. "The conceit of it! I tell you I very nearly died"! was her remark. Based upon the 1904 novel by Robert Hitchens, this curious film was shot on location near Yuma, Arizona. The film was sensitively directed by Richard Boleslawski and the still - gorgeous colour cinematography won an AA for Howard Greene
Love this show. Ordered this season because of the good price at the time, and I saw the show on Tv when, by chance, I would catch it on. When I received this first season, I started watching and could not stop until I saw every episode in this set....This is a great show!!!..I am now a loyal watcher of the show. Can hardly wait for season 2 to come out on DVD
This is great. This is a great collection. The Oliver Stone Collection it is extremely wonderful. I watched all of them. They all have great quality. I love Wall Street, Natural Born Killers, Nixon, and Any Given Sunday
Hot & but lean. Enjoy but keep the FF handy. Read David's review for great details (I won't belabor). Here's the skinny:The production - looks & sounds good, good cam movements, lighting & editing. Scenes tend to drag a bit (but that's why they make fast forward).The action - from sexy to veeerry hot. Basically a string of soft-core simulated sex scenes strung together by a story as thin and sexy as the babes in the movie. Even w/ the lean plot, still too much bad dialogue! And more variety in the scenes would have helped.The girls - 3 brunettes and one blonde (& 2 studs if you're counting) - 2 of the brunettes are cute and serviceable. The blonde and the lead brunette (Ander, I believe) are stellar. The pretty blonde has knock-out, busty Cali bod. Ander is cute, lithe and leggy with perfect little champagne glass boobies. Could have had a few more babes in the movie, though.Pink Factor - mild, not wild. We get a few open leg shots, a landing strip here and there, but not what you really want. Trumps skin-a-max though by having almost wall-to-wall skin.Bottom line- generally, if you like one Torchlight flick, you'll probably like the others, and vice versa. For what it is, it's pretty good, though
just wow!!. I love this movie. I saw it years ago and laughed so hard. I recently thought about and decided to buy my own copy and it was worth it and still as funny as the first time I saw it
Garfield - The Movie. I purchased this movie for my 6 year old grandson.  This is a perfect age for this movie.  He has watched it over and over again.  It is not so simplistic that he gets bored and is very entertaining and funny. Parents can at least watch it once without getting bored.  I highly recommend it
Nice Twist at the End. This movie had it all. suspense, very good humor, some action but the story line was pretty good. I don't see how some writers didn't get this movie. Exceptional actors I mean like the best stars. And the location was very good. I think the people are really like that in Connecticut lol. Just kidding. But this is a good movie to see and own. I think most will enjoy it. They could have done a better job with the lab scene. But all in all a good movie
It is stupid really to accuse a film of not sticking to the facts of.... the novel when the story of the film(which just follows the line of the novel) is better than the novel ever was
Excellent Ali. After reading ENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY'S hilarious interview with Borat, I decided to give these DVDs a try.After just a few episodes I was laughing until I was in tears.I LOVE smart, satirical, subversive comedies such as CURB YOUR ENTHUSIASM, RENO 911!, THE OFFICE (both the British and American versions), LITTLE BRITIAN, STRANGERS WITH CANDY, and WONDER SHOWZEN.DA ALI G SHOW fits nicely with those dark, sinister gems of humor.My only question is: are the interview and panel discussion guests for real? If I was being interviewed by Cohen in any of his guises, I would be cracking up. Are his guests in on the act, or are they hopelessly clueless?I'm not sure.Anyhow, great show, and i look forward to the movie
When Harry Met Sally for teens. Misery loves company. I became addicted to this quirky, somewhat surreal romantic comedy when a long term relationship of mine ended. To watch Freddie Prinze Jr. and Claire Forlani as long-time friends navigate through the minefield of failed relationships and teen angst only to eventually consider getting together themselves seemed like the perfect anecdotal medecine to relieve what I was going through at that time. Yes, it's ultimately a funny and touching drama that taps into that need for comfortable feel good stories to put the sparkle back into life. Really, it bears more than a striking resemblance to WHEN HARRY MET SALLY in both structure and themes. (Is it a surprise they are both favorites of mine).Ultimately my favorite part of the movie is the first half. The movie starts with a young Ryan and Jennifer meeting for the first time on a plane from New York to Los Angeles. Their encounter remains so memorable that five years later Ryan recognizes Jennifer during a football game. As luck would have it the two also eventually end up both in college at Berkeley and bump into each other in a series of When-Harry-Met-Sally-esque encounters over a number of years.Prinze definitely plays against type here, he doesn't play a hotshot high school football star but instead Ryan is a difficult, unsure teen attempting to make his way through an engineering degree and Forlani is the confident, assured college girl who has no trouble getting dates, but is unable to maintain  any long-term commitment.Providing possibly his funniest performance is Jason Biggs (of American Pie fame) who plays Ryans college roommate Hunter (well that's not his real name but he feels it sounds better when picking up girls). From his introduction  - getting stuck in a storage case to his eventual success in  the girl department - his all too rare screen moments provide some great humor and lend a certain charm to the movie giving it an edge over the adult movie that so clearly inspired it.I've seen this movie numerous times, its one of my guilty pleasures that speaks to me on so many levels.Incidently if you have seen this movie on television the chances are that you have not seen it all. I have seen "Boys and Girls" shredded to bits on network tv
Best of the Wiggles Videos. We own a few of the Wiggles Video and Toot Toot is my son's favorite as well as mine.  It is the most tolerable of them all and  my son would light up when we would watch it!  The Wiggles are so much fun for the little ones, I can overlook how annoying they can be.  This is the least annoying of them all and if I were you I would get this one
About time... Despite any errors on the cover of this DVD I enjoyed it greatly. It has been a long time comming that these very brave and loyal soldiers were explored on film.
A movie that makes you think... 'Little Children' is a superbly written screenplay. Without having a network of overly-complicated plots or incomprehensible themes, the film is engaging and thought provoking. Themes of isolation, romantic relationships and lost youth are approached from a fresh angle, bringing new interpretations to classic themes. The character's circumstances are especially relevant to our modern generations with their concerns laying in mental health, finding love and constantly battling the pervasive feeling of isolation. I recommend it for any night that you are looking for an intellectual movie that isn't quite feel-good but won't get you down either
beauty and the beast! the most touching romance of all the disney princess collection. this si without a doubt the most moving of all the disney princess movies I've seen. The ending of this movie had me in tears. When i first saw this movie i though the beast really had died and it was too late for him and then it turned out that belle's love for the beast brought him back to life and broke the evil spell that was cast on him by the enchantress. the ending couldn't have been more perfect. I'm so glad to own the dvd. The picure and sound quality is perfect. I now have the entire princess collection on dvd. Thanks amazon for carrying these out of print titles
A lost treasure. Stevie Ray Vaughan at Montreux is almost twenty five years old now, but it could have been filmed yesterday.  His playing and delivery are awe inspiring and original.  Stevie was one of a kind and is sorely missed.  For a fan of his this is a welcome addition to his body of work.  Even an unfriendly crowd in the first performance fail to keep him from delivering the goods the way he did every night.  He was the blues through and through and remained faithful to them for his entire life.  He lived the blues and was the real deal.  Although the first concert is short it is still absorbing as Stevie wailed through the boos and catcalls.  Somehow you feel he was misunderstood, but he remained unswayed.  He plowed through his set with his band close behind.  Tight to term this band is a gross understatement.  The second show was with the final lineup of the band with Reese Wynans performing as a skillful sideman.  But the main thing was still the blues even as Stevie shared the stage with Johnny Copeland.  He was a generous soul and was careful not to overshadow his friend but compliment him.  The second show was a complete triumph with the audience and with those who are priviliged years later to witness it for themselves.  Stevie was a rare star who never failed to be humble yet inspired at the same time.  He is badly missed by his fans and lovers everywhere of the electric guitar.  Fate is cruel sometimes but Stevie left behind a legacy that will never be forgotten.  The blues carry on but with a heavy heart.  I feel for Stevie but know that he is somewhere else with a guitar still firmly in hand.  This dvd captures the master at home in his element, live.  The only shame is that I never got to see Stevie in person and fully appreciate his style and genius.  The world will never forget Stevie Ray Vaughan
A Deep and Very Dark Western with a Message. Yul Brynner is a powerful and dynamic actor. He had donned the cowboy hat before in the 'Magnificent Seven' but quite arguably Jules was his greatest role ever.In the film Brynner plays a mysterious gun fighter hired to kill a rebel who's property was sold in the war. The man demands answers but is shot. Forced to leave he refuses and returns to his farm where a gun is drawn upon him and he has to defend himself. In killing the man he has a bounty placed upon his head and a gunman is hired. But this movie is more than just a simple Western. It is much, much, much more.In the town the Mexicans are treated as inferiors. The rebel is the only man that treats them decently. And they beg Jules not to kill him. Jules refuses yet Jules has a dark secret of his own that is similar to the Mexicans. Jules is a Creole from Louisana and is half French and African. His father was a slave owner and his mother was a slave. Because of this he was treated as inferior. When his mother argued with his father she was sold away because she was property. So naturally Yules is a cold and very dark because of the hardship and injustices of his past. And in Brynner, the Mexicans, and the Rebel there are three groups that are being discriminated against. The town claims to be against slavery but yet it stands by every injustice outside of it. And we see the conflict that surmonts between Jules, the Rebel, and the Town. So the film shapes into a morality play of sorts like 'High Noon' where the protagonist must choose between right and wrong. Brynner's role is very much like Eastwood's 'Man with No Name'. He is sort of an anti-hero or perhaps a divided one who has to make deep, difficult desicions. Does he do his job or does he do what is right? The film has romance, intensity, and passion and it all plays out well. The film is really a fine example of how great the past generation was in filmmaking. This film makes the viewer think, feel, and rationalize. The characters are very human and that is what I appreciate. Brynner's role is very realistic and intersting as he is more than just a hired cowpoke: he is a deep, complex, and intense. This film is truly a work of art and should be a part of any Western fans collection.
Passionate about skiing. &quot;The motivational dimension of &quot;Unlimited&quot; is equally powerful, as the DVD captures and presents the excitement and energy of our sport with a passion that makes you wish winter was 365 days long.&quot; - CROSS-COUNTRY CANAD
amicus anthology at it's best. this is the best anthology amicus ever put out (and they were all good)new doctor at an asylum must find out which of the people he is interviewing is really a doctor from the asylum that went mad.1.a man kills his wife after she wont divorce him and he cuts her up and puts pieces in the freezer,but she wont stay there2.a tailor who needs money takes a strange cloth from a man and is given strange instructions on how to make a suit out of it3.a young woman who is not well in the head is blamed for murders her best friend comited.4. a man belives he can bring toys with human like heads to life using his mind.and then we get the end of the test.one of the best
Must Have. We have every Einstein that has come out, but by far this one is my daughters favorite.  Maybe because there are other children in the movie and she is an only child.  Everytime we put this DVD in she gets really excited.  She has learned to do so many things from imitating the movie.  I have bought several copies to give to all of our friends
Still great after all these years!. Who knew that a kids movie made in 1979 would still be entertaining to me AND my two-year-old daughter many years later?  With all the technological advances, it seems this movie would be too "simple" for us now, but it's as great as ever!  I can remember all the hullabaloo about it when I was a kid....Kermit rides a bike!!!  Now, my daughter, who normally won't sit through a full-length feature film, is in love with the Muppets....especially Kermit.  The great Paul Williams did a wonderful job with the music in this movie (even making a cameo!--as do many other stars of the era: Bob Hope, Madeline Kahn, Richard Pryor, Carol Kane, Milton Berle, Elliott Gould, Charles Durning,etc).  The music is upbeat, sarcastic (only the adults will get that part!) and a joyful noise!  Sure, there are imperfections.....it's a little fuzzy here and there, and it was OBVIOUSLY made in 1979, but that's part of the fun of it.  The first time I watched it, I loved that the opening credits looked like something I saw in the movie theatre as a child.  My daughter doesn't know the difference (as most kids won't notice!), but it brought back a feeling of nostalgia for her dear old mom!  If you remember the movie from your childhood, you'll love it just as much now....maybe more (I do!).  Give your children a chance to share the joy and fall in love with Kermit and Miss Piggy....not to mention Gonzo and Camilla!  Dance and sing to the music of Paul Williams, and sing every word of "The Rainbow Connection"----you know you remember it
justice league and jlu, the greatest animated series ever. the title says it all. compelling storylines, interesting heroes, everything worked great on justice league and jlu (the only bad thing which i noticed (referenced in season 1 extras) was that superman got dominated non-stop in season 1. to the point where you just waited for him to rush in and give his crazy schwarzenegger-like yell as he got stomped. his main superpowers in those days were absorbing lots of pain. but it changed...)john stewart was a great choice as green lantern. i know everyone loves hal jordan but with the new twist as an ex-marine it worked out well.the flash is great, and keeps it light.hawkgirl was an inspired choice, and the relationship between stewart and her builds well.martian manhunter is a jla rock, and fits in well in a couple of episodes but is mostly reserved as befits his character.the big guns wonder woman, batman, and superman are the greatest superheroes of all. the big three. it's a can't miss type of deal.the greatest thing was having this jl and jlu series. the worst thing is they aren't making any new ones. and so ends the best run of an animated series ever...BRING IT BACK SOMEBODY PLEASE!!! (like futurama)
Wonderful Acting. The Animal Kingdom features one of the more shocking elements of the pre-code era. It revolves around a man, his former mistress, and his current wife. Leslie Howard plays Tom Collier, a wealthy man whose family wishes he would settle down and be more dignified. He does so with Cecilia (Myrna Loy), a somewhat haughty, controlling woman from high society. However, in order to make his marriage work, his mistress Daisy (Ann Harding) breaks ties with him. He is hurt by the separation and begins to pursue her without realizing his true feelings for her.The relationships between the characters are very believable and engrossing. It helps that the stars are phenomenal actors. Howard is particularly wonderful. His acting is subtle but charming, intelligent, and powerful. Everything he says seems important and thoughtful, even if he's delivering a casual response. Harding complements him well. Although some of her gestures seem very overt and stereotypical, it is difficult not to believe them to be true. She is entirely genuine and agreeable
The Real Chuck Berry Story. Very interesting You will learn a lot you did not know about this Rock n Roll legend.Some great performances and the one and only Johnny Johnson. Not to be missed.Good extras I have the two disc version
A deeply troubling and maybe brilliant film classic. D.W. Griffith's THE BIRTH OF A NATION (1915) deeply troubles me as a white caucasian.  The opening and closing scenes hint at a movie that will make a serious statement against all wars.  And the battle scenes in part one, including hospital recovery, are superb.  This is a movie that has the power to move and enrage audiences 92 years after it was made, so I consider it an important film classic.  I particularly am moved by hero Henry B. Walthall's return home from war to his sweetheart Mae Marsh, the scenes with Abraham Lincoln, and the impeccable re-creation of Ford's Theater on the night Lincoln was shot.  Miriam Cooper and Lillian Gish are also unforgettably poignant. So there is a lot to recommend to even black audiences nowadays, mostly in part one.If only Griffith had stopped at the 85 minute intermission point, he would have had a true masterpiece.  What on earth was he thinking in the remaining 100 minutes when he turns the movie into infuriating melodrama and the cinema of propaganda?  (The Kino archive print I watched, the definitive one to buy or rent, runs 187 minutes, with color tinting and an orchestra score.)  The Civil War is over, and the black characters are in control (and mostly played by white actors in blackface).  The blacks are in control of Congress, will not let whites vote, and unwittingly kill the lovely (white) Mae Marsh character.The logical and needed solution, for Griffith, is to have Walthall form the Ku Klux Klan to avenge his sweetheart's death and let the South not be under the power of the evil and all-powerful blacks.  This is when BIRTH OF A NATION becomes the infuriating cinema of propaganda.  I found myself getting all worked up and wanting all blacks on screen to meet a violent death.  When a whole army of KKK riders faces down a whole street of blacks, you cheer for the KKK  to kill all the blacks and restore order.  And they eventually do.BIRTH OF A NATION is a powerful and important film, despite its disturbing racism, because of its vast scope and its brilliant filmmaking.  It maintains interest for over three hours, has beautifully drawn and heartbreaking white major characters (again, especially, the three women), stunning battle scenes on a movie determined to make a timely statement to end all wars forever, and parallel cutting between blacks and whites in the admittedly exciting climax.  I'm not sure, but I think parallel editing was invented here, along with iris camerawork.  (All you see on screen is a circle or some other geometric shape.)  And there is again the mammoth length--187 minutes, plus intermission--at a time when Keaton was not yet on screen and Keystone was making 20-25 minute slapstick comedies with Chaplin and Arbuckle.  Griffith, with BIRTH, basically invented the modern cinema; and 92 years later we are still arguing over its merits and admittedly finding its pro-KKK climax blood-racingly exciting because of Griffith's melodramatic storytelling.  You are not allowed to cheer for the blacks.The NAACP will not allow BIRTH OF A NATION to be shown theatrically anymore.  Too bad.  As a white guy I'd love to see it with a predominately black audience.  Fortunately, we can still see it on DVD versions ranging from only 90 minutes, to Kino's definitive 187 minute roadshow version with color tinting and an orchestra score.  Kino also gives us the 1930 chat with D. W. Griffith and Walter Huston on Griffith's intentions with BIRTH; a 25 minute behind-the-scenes documentary; scenes from the roadshow souvenir program; fascinating legal/censorship records; and several Griffith Civil War shorts he made at Biograph Studios before BIRTH.Watch BIRTH OF A NATION with a sober head, some intelligence, and in the greatest possible print.  92 years later it is a masterpiece of propaganda that still has the power to enrage, excite, disturb, and move modern audiences as few silent films do.
Good Fun. Even if it's not necessarily the clean kind. I must say that I was slightly skeptical about how much I'd enjoy this movie but it turned out to be far better than expected. It is a mix of humor and drama wherein the humor outweighs everything else. Friday is very unique as the characters stand above the generic ones Hollywood usually offers. Ice Cube is great and plays a straight man to Chris Tucker's Smokey. The best parts of the film are when Tucker speaks. He has hilarious line after another. The one thing I had to disagree with, as far as the descriptions of this movie go, is that it is devoid of any moral element. This isn't a typical stoner celebration of weed because only after Ice Cube smokes the smoke does everything really fall apart for him. He nearly ruins his chance with a girl he really likes and then...well, I won't give any of the plot away. Yet, his dad's insistence that there is never a reason to use a gun turns out to be valuable advice, and, should any kids who see this film reflect on it, hopefully they'll reconsider "pulling out the nine" should they be stared down by their own Deebo's. Who knows? Even if it affected only one person it'd be worth it. A pleasant surprise overall
Trying to teach!. This is a great movie that I think is trying to teach the world that this kind of abuse does exist. It is very hard to get out and stay safe and there should be strong laws about violence. There isn't ever enough protection when you try to get out of that kind of relationship. Most times it does come down to him or you. This is so sad that people still don't get it and the laws can't help
Early Teens Movie. This movie seemed a little cheesy to me, however, I do think early teenagers would like it. Anyone who has a younger or older sister can relate to what the two sisters feel. Great ending to the movie and I like a movie that ends with a good moral, which this movie does have
WOW. jAY z CLASSIC MOVIE RETURNS.. ITS AMAZING TO FINALY HAVE IT ON DVD.. ANY JAY Z FAN SHOULD HAVE THIS AND LOVE IT.
Creative and daring---then and now!. Finally! I've been waiting for years for this ground-breaking, ahead-of-its-time spoof of soap operas to appear on DVD. There will never be another show like it. Current TV should be so bold and daring! The storylines were creative and the characters were colorful. Modern televison shows wish that they could be so memorable. It was totally escapist fun for hip people that understood the humor. (Personally, the show was influential on my sense of humor and my creative endeavors.) No subject was taboo, which made the show interesting and quite visionary. And bonus points for the writers for introducing TV's first gay male couple who were not portrayed as effeminate stereotypes but rather masculine strong guys. (As I recall, I think one of them was a football player.)  Now bring on the rest of the episodes, preferably in larger quantity DVD sets. Fernwood Forever!
Filthy and Fantastic!. Gilbert Gottfried is a genius.  THANK YOU for making a DVD that puts so many dirty jokes where they long--together!  Of course I knew a few, but I learned so many more!  Gilbert's delivery is priceless, and his impressions of comics like Bill Cosby and Jerry Seinfeld make some of the jokes even funnier.If you're a fan of filthy humor, this DVD is a MUST HAVE!  My personal favorite is about the guy who doesn't know if his wife has VD or TB...And at $13.99...it's a steal.  DO NOT MISS THIS ONE
Sarah has become family!. By the time you watch all of these (there are three) Sarah and her bunch are family.  You watch the kids grow up and there are these marvelous stories and it's just good entertainment.  Sarah comes to Kansas to marry a widower farmer to &quot;make a difference&quot; to him and his two children.  The first movie concerns their meeting and eventually marrying, the second movie shows their life through a drought and forced separation and the third brings them into WW1 and some personal family problems.  Everything is done perfectly and you'll enjoy these time and again.  I've watched them all several times
Here Is A Classic!. In the midst of Widower (Mortician?) (Colin Firth), Cedric Brown's troubles comes a frightful looking witch-of-a-nanny, hairy warts and all. With her stern-looking unibrow and bucktooth, she transforms the lives of seven children with one thump of her craggy looking cane. If childrearing were this easy, us mothers would all purchase a similar walking stick! (I noticed Emma had a similar one when she appeared at the premiere). Can I please borrow it, Ms. Thompson?My daughter and I were kept in stitches with all of the silly antics and we truly enjoyed this entertaining family movie written by the dame herself, Emma Thompson. It was loosely based on Christianna Brand's Nurse Matilda books, and who better to play the plum role of Nanny McPhee, than Ms. Thompson? One thing though, did disappoint me. Nanny McPhee was so good with the children and so pretty at the end--that my daughter and I wondered why Mr. Brown couldn't have married her?Angela Lansbury was wonderfully quirky as the hoity toity Aunt Adelaide who held the purse strings and coerced Mr. Brown into taking a bride. It was hilarious how, while he was wooing the opportunist Mrs. Quickly (Celia Imrie), his rambunctious little imps did their best to sabotage things. Colin Firth as Mr. Brown was dynamic. So was the scullery maid Evangeline (Kelly Macdonald). And, in the end, everything comes together like some magnificent fairy tale, snow in August, and all. Kirk Jones, directed.  Beware of dark undertones if you're wary of witchcraft. This review refers to the DVD
Better Than Average Suspense Film. Boy, there are a lot of jaded, really picky film fans out there.  I don't understand why this movie got slammed so much but maybe my standards are not very high.  Whatever, I enjoyed this story of the oily stranger who wins the heart of the mother, endangers the son, and brings the father/ex-husband to the rescue.  No, it's not original but I found it pretty scary and very well done by both Travolta and Vaughn.  Teri Polo didn't have much to do for most of the film but she did it acceptably and the young actor who played Danny was fine.In all, I found this to be a much more involving suspense tale than many I have seen and I would recommend it without reservation.
The Best Twice Over. This is a stellar version of a beautiful book, my very favorite in fact. Like most people, I am most often very disapointed when novels I love are adapted to the screen This film is one of the rare exceptions. Faithful to the book, Beautifully shot, expertly casted. Ralf Fiennes is the perfect Heathcliff,brooding, morose,obssesive, magnetic, jelous on an almost demented level. Juliet Binoche is Kathy flawlessly, wild and determined, together their chemistry is explosive.Jason Riddington's performance as Hareton Earnshaw is heart breaking. this alone makes the movie worth watching. My only complaint and it's a small one, is that Juliet Binoche plays both Kathy Earshaw and Katherine Linton. It's slightly disconcerting, not to say she doesn't play it well. It's just a little hard to buy. However, it doesn't really hurt the story. This is all and all a fabulous treat of a film, whether you love romance, historical, or dramatic films it's perfct
YET ANOTHER ''FATAL ATTRACTION'' WANNABE. BUT, THIS WAS GOOD. A DEMENTED TEENAGER [ROSE MCGOWAN] FALLS IN LOVE WITH A TEAHCER. ONLY PROBLEMS; THE TEACHER IS MARRIED, SHE'S A STUDENT OF HIS, AND SHE WILL GO ALL OUT TO HAVE HIM. BASICALLY, THIS IS JUST ''FATAL ATTRACTION'' FOR TEENAGERS. BUT, UNLIKE MOST OF THE OTHER IMITAIONS OF THAT MOVIE, THIS WAS ACTUALLY PRETTY GOOD. IT'S FUN TO WATCH, IT'S SUSPENSEFUL, AND IT HAS SOME PRETTY GOOD ACTING. A TREAT FOR PEOPLE THAT LIKE TO WATCH A GOOD THRILLER. FOLLOWED BY A SEQUEL
Do you really believe in the perfect murder?. Do you really believe in the perfect murder? Tony Wendice (Ray Milland), a former tennis player, does. That is the reason why he decides that asking someone to kill his beautiful and very rich wife is a good idea.But why kill someone just for the sake of doing so? Truth to be told, Tony is afraid that Margot (Grace Kelly) will ask him for divorce in order to marry Mark (Robert Cummings), an American writer she had a brief affair with after marrying Tony. Margot decided to stay with her husband, and is not aware of the fact that he knows about her past relationship with Mark, who happens to visit them when Tony decides he has to kill his wife. But how will he do it? And will he succeed?If you really want to know the answers to those questions, and enjoy a well-paced thriller, watch "Dial M for Murder (1954). Enjoy it...Belen AlcatPS: "Dial M for Murder" was the inspiration for "A perfect murder" (1998), a film starring Michael Douglas and Gwyneth Paltrow
Goldie Hawn; simply delightful. Goldie Hawn in arguably one of her best films (certainly one of her greatest performances of the 80's).PRIVATE BENJAMIN is the story of a "Jewish princess" called Judy Benjamin (Goldie Hawn), whose new husband expires on the honeymoon.  With very little on the horizon, she rashly  decides to enter the army, but comes under the wrath of tyrannical Captain Doreen Lewis (Eileen Brennan in an Oscar-nominated performance, and later a short-lived television sitcom spin-off).A classic "fish out of water" story, produced by Hawn and largely-tailored to her comedy talents.An amazing supporting cast too, with Armand Assante, Sam Wanamaker, Mary Kay Place, Albert Brooks, P.J. Soles, Craig T. Nelson, Barbara Barrie, Harry Dean Stanton, Gretchen Wyler and Sally Kirkland
An Interactive DVD for Everyone. I have read only one "Endless Quest" book which was about 20 years ago.  I read it so much it started falling apart.  I have never played the Dungeons & Dragons game and I don't intend to, but I love this DVD.  I played it 3 times in a row the first day I received it.  I finally came to an ending where they didn't die.  I will definitely play it again to try for the other 3 endings.  You don't have to know D & D or read "Endless Quest" books to understand and enjoy this Interactive DVD.
Amazing! Must See!. This is one of the best films I have seen in the past five years.  Bill Sage is fantastic!  He has done so much great work but this it the best performance I have seen him give yet.This film was directed by Hal Hartley who gave us incredible films like Trust, Surviving Desire, and Simple Men.   For someone not familiar with the Hal Hartley style of film where the actors speak in a stilted manner like in a Samuel Beckett play this film may seem strange but once you get used to this style you can learn to appreciate it and see that it actually adds depth to the performances.I have always loved Hal Hartley films but this one is my favorite.  This film explores many important present day issues and concepts in a  science fiction format.  It was incredibly moving to see important issues like terrorism, security and authority dealt with in an intelligent, honest, non propagandistic way.I can not recommend this film enough.  Every American should see this film.  You can check out more of Hal Hartely's (and Bill Sage's) films at possiblefilms.com.
Timeless Classic!. Nothing more to say, it's a great film, my entire family loves it
great. i this a great deal, movie in great conditoin fast shipping. smiply great sevice
THE BEST COMIC BOOK MOVIE EVER....... ONLY THE SEQUEL COULD BE BETTER. I loved this movie! Perfectly cast, great adaption to the comic book with many scenes visually right out of the classic comic pages. I thought the Goblin could have looked cooler, but no movie is perfect....Defoe played the part perfectly!....but I guess a guy in purple hot pants and an elf hat would look kinda rediculous in the real world!? Spiderman 2 was even better! I can't wait for # 3! The 2 disc DVD set is great! If you like the movie...BUY IT
Will be a classic for me. Based on the old tv show, Sgt. Bilko in my mind is one of my favorite movies. Steve Martin is an excellent actor and has a handful of other notable and funny actors such as, Steve Martin, Dan Akroyd, Phil Hartman, and Chris Rock. The jokes are hysterical and not a movie to be missed. &quot;These men are loyal, I mean they would take a bullet for you.&quot; &quot;Well not in the chest&quot; &quot;Well, no not the chest, maybe like the arm.&quot
A Good Anti-War Message. You will find the acting a little corney at times but themessage of the horrors of war are there.
The Pretender movies covers a lot..and still there is questions. The Pretender was a show that intriged and interested me. It was the Fugitive, part Quantum Leap (without the Leaping) and part Soap Opera/mystery plot.These two TV movies,both made especially  for TNT network in 2001, are, in my opinion, a expanded version of the TV show episodes. The original cast is all here, and It seem like the shows was almost never canceledThese two TV movies answer a few questions and asks more, leaving the door open to future TV Pretender movies which never came to pass..and that is too badIf you are a fan of this series, these two movies will enhance your collection. If not, the Prentender 2001 will bring the whole four season show (all available on DVD) into hazy focus.Either way, these two movies have quality...rare in TV movies these daysBennet Pomerantz AUDIOWORL
A long time but worth the wait. I will agree that some special features would have been nice, but it is not enough for me to bump this down to 4 stars.The picture quality is great!  The transition from video to DVD went very nicely for film that was done in 1969 (that's almost 30 years ago for those of you in Rio Linda).I don't know if anybody has mentioned this, but this appears to be the FULL length of the original movie.  When it aired on TV some time in the late 1970's, the song, 'Failure Face', was totally omitted.  Probably considered too mean spirited.  In addition, there are a lot of scenes such as Lucy video taping Charlie Brown kicking the football, Charlie chewing on the weed out of the sidewalk, the Kite flying (fight?) scene.  All of these are NOT on the VHS / clamshell version that I bought in the 1980's.If you grew up with Charlie Brown as I did and miss Charles Schultz, I highly recommend it.  It is great one for kids - be they 9 or be they 40.I hope that they will continue with the other two Charlie Brown movies and all the television specials to DVD
hot Stuff. It is a tight DVD...opening scene is great with all the flshing and g-strings, cuts to some good makeout/nude scenes in backrooms, with one crazy girl and some beads going where they aren't supposed to...ends with a hot oral scene of two girls, and then goes to a shower scene, but my DVD stops since it is scratched...shoot
Beautifully written series. Two minor complaints:#1 The picture quality of the first two seasons--while passable--could have been improved(for some reason the picture quality on the third season is superior)#2 The introductions by Diana Rigg are very informative, but give away key plot points. Make sure you hit the mute button or fast forward through them if you haven't watched the series before.The show itself is comprised of eight, two-hour episodes. Each one is superbly acted, written, and directed. If you've enjoyed Prime Suspect or Wire in the Blood and have not seen this show--you're missing out. Rent or buy the first episode, 'THE LOST BOYS', and you'll get just a glimpse of how brillant this show is...
Excellent movie, finally on DVD!. This has long been a favorite of mine, and I am thrilled to see it on DVD.  A totally opposite, non-Bond role for Roger Moore, he plays it to the hilt.  Anthony Perkins is also very good
Maybe it's because I'm a Londoner..?. I love this film (obviously being able to understand the dialogue helps a lot), to me it's the quintessential Brit flick - absolutely what we do best - but I don't consider it a Rom Com at all.  It's very bitter sweet, and if all you're seeing is the funny stuff on the surface then you're missing the point of this film.  Every character had a dark thread running through them, a secret pain or guilt or just sorrow at wrong turnings made.  But it's also about hope, and the message that I get from this film is that no matter what disasters lie in your past, you can always overcome them or redeem yourself.Adrian Lester was, as always, wonderful at the emotional epi-centre of the film.  BTW if you ever get the chance to see him do Shakespeare on stage then move heaven and earth to go, he is a sensational actor who absolutely understands how to act 'the beats inbetween'.So, my advice is to look past the tabasco jokes and see the real film
Tha weside, only for true rap fans. "Tha westside" was a good attempt at making a documentary of the westcoast rap game. As a whole the film is sub par, but it does have it's highlights. Any fan of Tupac will not be dissapointed, as it shows 5 to 7 minutes of never before seen footage of pac rapping on home video. The film also has indepth interviews that give you information on what it was like to be in the cali rap game at that time. This film is very similar to the "welcome to death row" dvd, cutting back and forth, from interviews of people who were there, and rare footage
You don't know the rules?!. Scream is a movie that doesn't let go of the thrills and nailbiting moments till the end. From the now Classic opening scene featuring Drew Barrymore, to the shocking end of this great film.The movie revolves around a character named Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell). One night two of her classmates are brutally murdered and now the killer is after her. Police believe there is a connection between this killer and the one that killed her mother a year before. Slowly, people around Sidney start dying and she has to try to survive and find out who the killer is.This movie is mysterious in a way because throughout the movie, the killer could be anyone. You have no idea who it is until the end of the movie.This movie also includes an allstar cast including Courtney Cox and David Arquette.I recommend this movie to anyone who loves slasher movies, or just loves movies period
Garfield - The Movie. I purchased this movie for my 6 year old grandson.  This is a perfect age for this movie.  He has watched it over and over again.  It is not so simplistic that he gets bored and is very entertaining and funny. Parents can at least watch it once without getting bored.  I highly recommend it
A film that takes you there............. Over the years I have worn out several copies of this film on VHS I have watched it so many times.I am so happy it is coming out on DVD.[I almost bought the box set but at release it was $80.00 plus]This film is so well written and acted and imagined that after watching it you almost feel that you have been through the war as part of a convoy escort....and yet this is not your typical war action film.There is action yet it is muted behind the story of the Captain and the men he commands and the price they have to pay to win the war.Don't buy this expecting a "Hollywood" sea adventure with cliche story lines and a typical ending.Get this film for the moving moments and drama that is war.There are several scenes that really pull at your heart..the men in the water awaiting rescue..yet it is not to be..and the cost on all involved.I would love to discuss scene by scene yet I would give away to much of the story...get this film and you will understand why it is a true classic.
Camille Caudel. Perhaps the only sculpture movie I ever saw. Very French. She finally looses her mind at the end. Much angst
Risque' Rene'. "Allo Allo!" Has been around since 1982 and has just recently become available in the USA on a decent media. This particular complete series one contains eight episodes:"The British are Coming" starts the series and explains many things that happen later in the series."The Fallen Madonna" with the big whatever. Will set a reoccurring theme as Colonel Kurk von Strom has pilfered the painting for his retirement. Keep you eye on it through the series as it becomes a shell game.------------Basic story is of a caf owner Ren; this is in France during the WWII occupation. He must balance dealing with the local Germans, the Gestapo, the good Resistance, the commie Resistance, having affairs with his female help, dealing with his wife and mother-in-law. Throw in some downed British airmen and some onion soup.I will not go though this series in detail because for those that have not seen it or if it has been while since viewing the series, the surprise factor and the one liners are worth discovering first hand.I will say that the highlight for me was when they mistakenly fed grain laced with nitro glycerin to the chickens.One nice thing about this series is that they place the name next to the actor at the end of each episode. Most of the actors are well known out side of this series. I was shocked however to find that Gestapo Herr Otto Flick (Richard Gibson) Played British Capt. Newman in Ken Follett's "The Key to Rebecca" (1985) and completely changed his accent.I hope the will release the others "Three Hail Mary's and two Heil Hitler's."
Awesome. A must have for anime comedy fans. Being a big fan of anime comedy (the intelligent, yet lame humor) I was eager to see El Hazard "The magnificent world". Because of the high price of the set, I had some hesitation (because of some poor reviews on Amazon).Well, I have to say that the bad reviews are wrong. This DVD series was totally awesome (although I admit it started a bit slow). I promise the more you keep watching, the better it gets. The plot is highly intelligent (involving dimensional and time travel) and the characters are very interesting (with distinctive special powers).Some say the humor in El Hazard is juvenile (but I would argue no more juvenile then southpark), and seriously what good comedy isn't juvenile?Some also say that the story is sometimes too redundant (because many episodes involve a doomsday device), to which I respond "Do we call the original starwars trilogy redundant because they involve the death star"? no, ofcourse not.yes this DVD set lacks some extras, but I think Pioneer did a great job. The DVD menu presentation is beautiful, and the box is very elegant too. Hopefully you can get this set for around 40 dollars on Ebay (beware of bootlegs). It's very hard to find a good authentic set. The sequel "alternative world" which I just ordered, individually should cost around 30 dollars if you shop smart.For my fellow anime comedy fans, I also reccomend "Niea under 7" and "His and Her Circumstances".animation=5plot=4music=4characters=5comedy=4Total= 4.4 Star
My kids can watch it every day, and I sat through it once!. My two boys love Bob the Builder and this is by far their favorite Bob the Builder DVD.  They can watch it every day.I sat through it once and enjoyed it myself.  Especially interesting to me was the rather adult issue of what happens when parents of their adult children will not acknowledge that their children are now adults and end up treating their adult offspring as if they were still children.  Been there; done that.The characters are well designed; the story moves fast; the colors are very nice on a good television, and the message is positive.If you or your children like Bob the Builder at all, this is a must for your DVD collection.
A worthy buy for the Sealab fan and newbie alike. While I'll still go back and watch the first season quite religiously, the second season is just as funny, if not moreso.  The second season is where the cast members really kick off into the realms of off-beat, spontaneous humor.  Very rarely will any of the plots actually have substance.  But that's why the show is unparalleled.  In nearly all episodes, the plot simply boils down to taking one single joke and running with it for 15 minutes.For example, in the episode "Der Dieb", there is a supposed thief running around Sealab.  Captain Murphy therefore finds it appropriate to declare "Martian Law" (unaware that it's actually called Martial Law), sets up a cavalry of Martian knights, and then starts engaging in savage beatings of other crew members.  What's the point? None, really.  In fact, my only warning is this: if you hate Aqua Teen Hunger Force, The Brak Show, or even movies such as Napoleon Dynamite, you'll want to steer clear of this.  Otherwise, this DVD will NOT disappoint.  Every episode maintains its own unique freshness, guaranteeing that there'll be something for everyone.  Without a doubt, this is the funniest show I've ever seen.  Excellent breath of fresh air for those who have moved past The Simpsons or Futurama (like me, for example).Now they just have to release Season 3 on DVD.  Until then, the first two seasons will more than suffice
Fantastic Entertaining Western! One of the Best ever made!. A true Classic!  Excellent story, fast paced yet, slow enough for the viewer to learn character development. In my opinion, it has one of the best director's of westerns, John Sturges, with a musical score composed and directed by the best man ever to develop a musical score for a western, Elmer Bernstein.  His music lends to the story and captures human emotion in every secene.  The acting is superb by a veteran cast of the best actors to be assembled for a film, Yul Bryner, Steve McQueen, James Coburn, Charles Bronson, to name a few.The interviews are interesting and captivating on the second disk, and give you a good a idea of what it was like to work on this film.Believe me, you won't regret buying this two disk version.  An excellent edition to a film library.  A great film that you can enjoy over and over again.John E. Matty, Springfield, V
Meet Mycroft in excellent 4th volume of Holmes series. Once again, Jeremy Brett and David Burke are at the top of their game as the immortal Sherlock Holmes and Dr. Watson in the 4th DVD volume of this classic TV series.  This time, Holmes must join forces with his even more eccentric brother, Mycroft, in solving the case of a kidnapping involving Greek nationals.  In the second case, a young lawyer is accused of murdering a former lover of his mother.  Only Holmes can save the lad from the gallows.  As always, Brett and Burke are the definitive Holmes and Watson, while Charles Gray (best known for his roles in a couple of James Bond films) is an eccentric treat as Mycroft Holmes.  The care and intelligence of this BBC/Mystery series is the same as ever, making this another must have for your Sherlock Holmes collection.  Highly recommended
Better than given credit, but not up to the other seasons. Season Five of The A-Team often gets bashed, and to some degree it's warranted.  The A-Team joining forces with General Stockwell holding them by the leash was awful since it never went anywhere.  These guys are suppose to be soldiers of fortune, outlaws for hire who play by their own rules, and now they're being controlled by someone else.  Then they added in Frankie Santana and forced him into a more prominent role than some other Team members.  I could see Frankie in an Amy or Tonya recurring role, but he got too much attention for my tastes.  The Simpsons once spoofed the fact that TV shows tend to add in new characters when they're desparate and that's exactly how Frankie and Stockwell came off.To top it off, some of the stories were awful and the production quality was horrible.  I know the production continuity wasn't perfect by any means during the other seasons, but it just seemed like they started to give up altogether.  The final episode, The Grey Team, was down right awful.  Come on, you got Frankie and B.A. running scared of a bunch of old folks?  B.A.?!  Watch the part where the car goes flying through the air then it cuts to a shot of the car dropping straight down.  Bad...really bad production.But for all the negatives, there were positives.  While some of the stories were bad, I thought some were excellent, too.  The opening threesome of The A-Team's capture, trial, and escape was very well done.  The episode where Face learns about his dying father and his sister is another one I liked.  It's that kind of character development, learning more about their backgrounds and tying up loose ends that really lacked in the first four seasons, and that was very refreshing to see.All in all, it was obvious they made a change of direction during Season Five and that they were desparate to make something work.  Unfortunately, there were too many issues from stories to production quality that made this season less than memorable.  It still had it's moments and it had some good character development as well, but the addition of Stockwell and Frankie definitely made it a different cup of tea that not all A-Team fans appreciated
pleasant, glossy romantic confection. THREE COINS IN THE FOUNTAIN is one of the more delightful romantic comedy confections from the `Golden Era' of Hollyood.  Spawning the hit single from Frank Sinatra and based on the book by John H. Secondari, the film is filled with fabulous performances and of course the highly-cinematic visuals of Rome at the height of summer.The story is about three American secretaries living in Rome (Dorothy McGuire, Jean Peters and Maggie McNamara).  All three women toss their lucky coins into the Trevi Fountain, hoping that their romantic dreams of finding `Mr Right' will come to fruition.  This being Hollywood, you can count on a happy ending...or in this case, three happy endings.The film gives equal screen time to the three romances, there really is no starring role in this film, it is happily an ensemble piece.  Dorothy McGuire and Clifton Webb are sensational and hilarious playing the unlikely, older pairing; with Jean Peters and Rossano Brazzi as the middle pair; and Maggie McNamara and Louis Jourdan playing the younger romance.Directed by Jean Negulesco (who had just come from the huge success of "How to Marry a Millionaire"), THREE COINS IN THE FOUNTAIN is still a delightful film experience with the stunning CinemaScope photography and outstanding performances from all concerned
pure genius. I am a big fan of Trey Parker and Matt Stone, but it wasn't until fairly recently that I actually heard of this movie.  After doing a few online searches I found more info about the movie.  My roomate bought it online and we waited.  When we finally got it and watched  we had no idea what to expect other than we knew it was a low budget movie.  This movie proves that you can make an excellent movie with a small budget.  The music in the movie isn't the best, the singers other than the girl and Trey Parker can bairly carry a tune, but the script, the camera work, the odd, but funny story, the cast, and the over the top funny songs make this movie a cult classic.  Most people might not like this film or even get it.  But I find it amazing consindering the Trey Parker film production experience he had at the time.  This was his first full length movie he had attempted up to that point to my knowledge.  Trey Parker and Matt Stone fans will sit back and enjoy this piece of pre south park history.  The rest of the world unless you have a open mind and are not expecting a big budget masterpiece don't bother.  I love this movie and I would recommend it to any south parkatteer.  By the way, after watching it, I went out and got lucky by finding it in the comedy section of a Circuit City store.  .....Fudge Packer.?
Elegantly Debauched Life, Whimsically Portrayed Death. Through John Huston's directorial talents, the colors of Toulouse-Lautrec's palette are duly celebrated as he recreates the night life of fin-de-ciecle Paris.Our story begins at the famous nightclub in 1890, the year after its opening, where can-can girls and a few professinal male dancers compete for customers' attentions and occassionally brawl with each other.Serenely sitting at a table sipping cognac and sketching the scene is Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec, the physically deformed son of a noble family, whose condition causes him to empathize with societal outcastes,played with all the elegance of the nobility  by Jose Ferrer, who, in a dual role, also portrays the artist's father.Before the last can-can of the evening, the raucous behavior of those on the dance floor is broken up by the appearance of Jane Avril(the always-exquisite Zsa-Zsa Gabor), who sings a ballad that sounds as hopeful as it is melancholy. Muriel Smith, who plays the exotic Aicha, provided Gabor's singing voice.One inaccuracy of the film is that Avril was the only dancer of the Moulin Rouge allowed to wear colored underwear.As the artist walks home down the dark, foreboding streets, fending off a potential pickpocket, and passing by one lady of the night beforehand, the audience reviews his early life; once expected to carry the traditions of his ancient family into the future, fate dealt him a cruel blow when an accident( in reality, two accidents within two years) revealed a genetic condition that stunted the growth of his legs. Rejection by the girl he loved drove him to make his life elsewhere.He saves prostitute Marie Charlet(Colette Marchand) from arrest, and shelters her, but suffers because of her ingratitude, then becomes even more unhappy when he tries to part with her. Depressed, he drinks even more heavily to the point where  even his mother, Adele(Claude Nollier)encourages a reconciliation in the hope that he will not drink himself to death. But the reunion is not sucessful. In the grand tradition of artists, Toulouse-Lautrec puts all his emotion into his work, which immortalizes such Moulin Rouge regulars as the wiry, hook-nosed Valentin Le Desosse(Walter Crisham), and Louise Weber, a.k.a., "La Goulue"(Katherine Kath).One interesting character who is absent from the story is the red-scarved insult comic, Aristide Bruant, who insulted everyone who came to the Moulin Rouge except for Henri.Gradually, we watch Toulouse-Lautrec make innovations in art as a draftsman, and gain stature in his profession,and the character of the Moulin Rouge change from a bawdy dance hall to a more sophisticated societal club. The flighty, fliratious Jane continues to have affairs, La Goulue becomes more superficially pompous and difficult, and the King of Prussia (Theodore Bikel)purchases one of Henri's paintings. The pauses in which the artist's sketches dance across the screen are truly a feastfor the eye.As Henri takes up with a society woman named Myriamme Hayam  (Suzanne Flon), the couple observe Jane's rise in status as a stage performer, and they manage to rescue La Goulue from oblivion.Elegant surroundings do not alter Henri's view of love or his cynical, self-deprecating humor.After his affair with Myriamme ends, his drinking increases, and his art dealer, Maurice Joyant(Lee Montague), and his housekeeper, Madame Louet(Mary Clare) stand helplessly by. But the film politely deals only with part of what leads to his demise and does not mention syphilis, as it would if it were made today.A tragic fall down a flight of stairs leads to the 36-year-old's return home to his family chateau to die. His mother expresses  her grief, and there is a fictionalized expression of remorse from his father.... But in the mind's eye of the dying artist, the characters he knew at the outset return to bid him farewell, led by the non-speaking Black male dancer, then Le Desosse on the arm of La Goulue, who stopped fighting with Aicha....Then out of the mists of time, memory, and imagination, his beloved Jane, who bids him adieu and then must be off...Soon, Henri leaves us too, amid the viewing of one last fiery can-can by dancers waving handkerchiefs...Would that the ends of all of our lives could be that whimsical
Friday. Looking forward to watching this movie.Rated R for pervasive strong language and drug use,and for a brutal fight
great dance movie. This is a nice movie.  Not an Oscar winner, but very pleasant and no sex (a virtue/shortcoming depending on your point of view).  I purchased the movie for the salsa dancing, but all of the dancing and music in the movie are great.  From the opening scenes staged in Cuba to the last dance scene the the movie is big time fun.  It also is beautifully filmed.  Chaynne and Vanessa are both easy on the eyes so each gender will enjoy it.  The movie is defintely worth a viewing
A good historic costume drama. This DVD is one of four in KINO Video's "Lubitsch in Berlin" series which is bound to become an integral part of our modern-day collection and understanding of silent films because it highlights the eclectic work of one of Germany's leading film-makers and subsequently one of Hollywood's legendary directors, Ernst Lubitsch.   Unlike the bulk of German silent films known today, many of which are in the Expressionist style, Lubitsch's films stand out as very different, and in particular his comedies have a unique style of their own.  But I also found this serious drama, "Anna Boleyn", interesting to watch in light of Lubitsch's other work and that of contemporary German directors.  "Anna Boleyn" is the tragic real-life story of Henry VIII's second wife who was persuaded into marriage after King Henry managed to annul his first marriage by making himself head of the church in England, then summarily dumped in favour of another woman when Anna gave birth to a girl instead of a male heir.  Both leading roles convey characters and emotions, so that "Anna Boleyn" is more than just a dry account of history.  Renowned German actor, Emil Jannings, is just perfect is his role of the lecherous King Henry VIII, and lesser known actress Henny Porten surely has the audience on her side throughout the film as the innocent but brave Anna Boleyn.  Although 2 hours in length, there are no dull moments, and the story moves along steadily to its predictable and tragic climax, and along the way we are treated to a grand display of period costumes.   This film shows that Lubitsch was able to match his contemporaries worldwide in this genre of costume or historic dramas, while also finding success with a range of comedies, both in his native Germany and later in the US.   I have just a few minor quibbles to this DVD, such as the picture quality being slightly less than perfect when it comes to faces and detail, and the old-style lettering throughout the film being just a little difficult to read at times.   There is a very good piano accompaniment, but I can imagine that an orchestral score with music of the period would enhance this film even more.  History buffs shouldn't be disappointed with "Anna Boleyn" though, and as part of the `Lubitsch in Berlin' series also an important addition for serious film enthusiasts as well.
Beautiful and Tragic Love Story. I had a lot of expectations when I picked up this movie. I expected it to be a silly little love story, poorly written and mostly just wanting to show off teenage bodies. I was very wrong. I could feel Pauline's pain and her love for this Tory. I could understand Tory's actions. We have all been in a situation where our hearts wanted one thing but our minds and society (whether it be family, friends, or society at large) have dictated that we go another way. I could understand Mouse (Brave) who was in the middle of all it. This movie brought up emotions in me and reminded me of the first time I fell in love and how beautiful and how painful it was for me. I will definitely add this movie to my collection
The Best. One of the best shows produceed for T.V.  Well written, sophisticated but not. Enjoyable on many levels and often inspiring.  This show holds you from the moment the moose walks through town to the ending credits
Stunningly beautiful and powerful. We just picked this up at the library as a family friendly movie.  We are ordering it ASAP.  I don't know how many times I cried during this movie.  The little girls in the movie were so genuine - especially the main character.  The whole package was just enchanting and magical.  No special affects.  Just a good old fashioned story of the strength of the imagination and the power of friendship.We ARE all princes and princesses!
Courtroom drama, sex, and murder!  What's not to like?. This is a classic 1950s murder and courtroom drama flick of the first order.  Jimmie Stewart plays the lead as a laid-back country lawyer as much into fishing as law, who gets handed a red-hot murder defense case.  The local prosecutor brings in a big-gun outside Asst. State Attorney General (George C. Scott) to stomp on Stewart, and the fun begins... It is David vs. Goliath time in the courtroom!Lee Remick is really good as the town floozy, whose boyfriend (Ben Gazzara) shot a chap who allegedly molested his girl.  I thought that Joseph N. Welch, as Judge Weaver, was particularly good, and in fact he was hilariously authentic.  (If only more real judges were like him...)This film manages to be both funny and authentic, and avoids crossing the line into slapstick.  The courtroom drama is more or less technically correct, although few lawyers are as skillful as Stewart and Scott are in this film.  Although the law on "irrestistable impulse" has changed since this film, that fact detracts not at all from what is an engaging story and enjoyable viewing experience.Don't miss this one.  The discerning viewer will enjoy this film many times
the kids loved it. When my 3 daughters (aged 6, 9 and 11) first got this video, they thought it was "baby-ish"- they even mocked the "animal" moves instead of joining in; however, the next day, early in the morning I caught the middle one hopping to the music and cheerfully trying it out!! the little one soon joined in (the 11 year old still refuses to, of course).. ever since they tried it, I wake up to the sound of the "elephant", which cracks them up EVERY morning- it sure beats other sounds that used to beam through the TV set those lazy summer mornings!!
One of THE best American films of the last 16 years. Apparently Sideways is one of the many "either love it or hate it" films, this being cemented by the countless one star reviews bashing and attempting to destroy the very fabric of its existence.Well, I love the film, I could watch it a few times a week for the rest of my life and never tire of it.The entire cast gives stellar performances all around, from Giamatti (a personal favorite) playing the sadsack, cynical loser who, yes, OMG STEALS FROM HIS MOM, HOW NOT NICE, I'VE NEVER STOLEN ANYTHING IN MY LIFE, to Church, the Wings guy, playing the male pig to a T, all the way down to the guy who tends the bar at the Hitching Post.Everything about the film is wonderful, from the music, to the cinematography, all the way down to the editing.  This was the first Payne movie I'd seen, and later went on to see Election & About Schmidt, both stellar movies, but neither can match Sideways.Yes, Miles is miserable, depressed, an alcoholic, and yes, Jack is a sexist, seemingly emotionless, manipulating a*shole, but these are REAL people, something apparently most film viewers can't deal with, too busy watching trash like Eight Below and RV.I heard this film once described as "the kind of movies Woody Allen used to make." and I have to say that I whole heartedly agree.  It is, beneath all the sex related humor, an adult comedy, with a naked fat guy's johnson flappin' in the wind, and it also, like any really great film, has heart
Dance instead of exercise!. I love this video!  It's easy to learn the steps during the video but there is a separate section with the different steps if you need it.  You can put more into the movements (raise your arms higher, sway your hips more, twist more, use more upper body motion)or you can take it easier by moving your body less.  I find that each time I do it, I'm upping the intensity just by getting more into it and moving more.  I feel like I'm really dancing not just repeating exercie movements.  The drumming was appropriate--it didn't overwhelm the dancing.  I suppose one could get more or less out of the drumming depending on your focus.  I am very happy I spent my money on this video!
How to remain young and vibrant. It was very informative.  We watch it often because it reminds us of what we need to do continue being healthy
Buy this for a good mindless laugh. One of the few times the sequel is better than the original (see my review for the significantly weaker Road Trip), this is just a fun movie that still makes me laugh out loud. The actors are great, from Buffy's Michelle Trachtenberg as the "guy who just happens to dress like a girl" to MAtt Damon as a thrash metal rock singer and Lucy Lawless as a dominatrix.  The theme song "Scotty Doesn't Know" is so ridiculously catchy that you don't even mind that they play 3 or 4 different versions of it throughout the film.  Yes, they do focus on only the most famous cities in Europe (although they do throw in Bratislava as a twist) and play on a lot of familiar stereotypes, they still manage to throw in some pretty funny observations that, having lived in Europe for 3 years, I can attest to their validity.  This unrated version is a real kick too, from the deleted scenes (some of them were hinted at in the closing credits, others are just as funny as the scenes they kept) to the "bootleg" version ("we bootlegged the bootlegger!), and the Green Fairy floating around the DVD menus, it's worth the cost of admission
One of the Best Movies of the 1990's. It is a tragedy that Brandon Lee died while making this film.  Had he lived, the Crow sequels would have been much better.The Crow is an action packed movie that moves at a quick pace.  It set the standard for the dark cinema of the 1990's.
Gilligan's Island. I am a true fan of Gilligan's Island, even at almost 40.  Every episode is terrific.  One question: If I bought the whole season pack it is $90.00, but if I bought it seperately it would be $70.00, big difference.   SL
It's a patriotic duty to view this documentary!!. 9/11: Press For Truth is one of the best documentaries made on this topic. Paul Thomspson the most thorough, honest, and brilliant political researchers in the United States together with the widows of 9/11 have done a wonderful job putting together this touching and truthful documentary that would reverberate deeply in every viewer's psyche. Although their voices have been unheard and silenced,this DVD will carry on the torch of truth forever.Buy it, watch it, and pass it around so the voices of truth are heard everywhere.
Flight of the Intruder. Great military movie.  It shows what airmen during the Vietnam War (or American War, if you're reading this in Vietnam) wanted to do - take the fight to the enemy.  A great wish for the airmen that did come true on the big screen.As a retired Air Force member, I can laugh at all the Naval antics on shore leave because today's military makes them VERBOTEN.  Carrier Landings in bars in Angeles City or Olongapo no longer exist since the US military was ordered out of there.  Still, the guys had great fun letting loose in this movie and then faced death when the time came.In the scene where Willem Dafoe and his pilot have an avionics failure, it made me sit on the edge of my seat, because as a former avionics technician who worked on F-16s, I could feel the fear and subtle panic they were facing during battle.  I always ensured my avionics components worked so our aircrews would not experience that sensation.Note: the captain, who was trying the aircrew for disobeying orders, was Fred Dalton Thompson; he wasn't mentioned in the credits for some reason.Great movie and storyline, superb antics by the troops on shore leave, and really cool aerial footage.  A must add to your war film collection
Absolutley Pertinent. Banned from American and British broadcast, this documentary is an essential look at the "other side." Whether you support the US war in Iraq, the informed citizen would benefit from a look at the control room.
Bugs bugs bugs. Hard to imagine Starship troopers with not a drop of blood in sight.  Great visuals -- dialogue doesn't always hold up
Katt Williams -  The Pimp Chronicles Part 1. These days I want laughter in my life and Katt Williams gives it to you in The Pimp Chronicles.  I thought Kat Williams Live was great, but this one was better!  His tell it like it is and living life approach is great. If you can't go to see him in a live performance this is the next best thing. Be prepared to laugh so hard your sides ache.  Keep an open mind and go for the ride!
the phantom. MOVIE WAS MADE FROM A GOOD COPY.PICTURE WAS VERY CLEAR AND CLEAN.THE STORY FOLLOWS THE ORIGINAL PREMISE VERY CLOSELY.ALL IN ALL IT'S A FUN SERIAL TO WATCH
Amazing !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I haven't got this box set yet but will have it soon. So my review is based on Nightmare On Elm Street part 1.The movie is what you get when superb acting, great special effects, an awesome director and a chilling story meet. The result is an amazing movie. I can't get enough of it. Only seen parts 1 and 2 so far and part 2 isn't really part of the series so I'm not reviewing it. Part 2 is not a bad movie if you disconnect yourself from the rules of what Freddy movies should be. But this review is not for part 2 so back to part 1.Everything about the film is amazing, the lighting, the acting, the music, the direction, the story, the pace, everything. I think there are not that many perfect movies, especially when it comes to horror, and this one is perfect.I can probably name a dozen perfect movies, but not in the horror genre, and that is what makes me like this movie more than any other. Because I always liked the idea of horror movies, but they never lived up to my expectations. But with this series it's as if it were made for me, well and everyone else who loves horror flicks. But my point is that most horror films are in a real world, and Nightmare On Elm Street films are in a dream world, or should I say nightmare.The other thing I can't get over about this movie is the soundtrack, it's awesome and has an absolutely horrifying theme song. I've never heard a more frightening theme song. The other songs are also great, like when Nancy is attacked by Freddy in her bath tub, now that's amazing. That is my favourite scene in the movie, has such a panicy feel that will leave you absolutely blown away. I love it.The cast is very likable and believable (very important in making a good movie).Well, my other favourite movies are Bill and Ted's Excellent Adventure (not Bogus Journey), The Terminator, Cyborg, Bloodsport, The Running Man, The Predator, Commando, Red Sonja, T2 (never T3), Unstoppable (Wesly Snipes), New Jack City, Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles, The Golden Child, Big Trouble In little China, Showdown In Little Tokyo, Cyborg Cop, and all of Bruce Lee's films (not so much Green Hornet), and there's probably more but just can't think of em right now. Oh yeah, Princess Bride aswell
A dead man goes to war. The true story of the British attempt to lay some heavy disinformation on the Axis in World War II.  Clifton Webb plays Lt. Cmdr. Ewen Montagu, the British naval commander who is both mastermind and chief promoter of The Plan, an elaborate concoction of forged papers, misleading faux orders, a convincing back story, and a suitable corpse meant to mislead the enemy about the Allied intentions prior to the invasion of Italy.  I don't suppose it's giving too much away to report that things more or less go as planned (although the suspicious Germans do send spy Stephen Boyd in to liven up the last third of the film.)  Even though this is indeed a war movie, bang-bang stuff, THE MAN WHO NEVER WAS practically wallows in minute details while eschewing the firefight and the foxhole.  That's not to say it doesn't have its share of situational suspense - are those depth charges going to sink the sub and scuttle the movie? - but detail is much preferred over violent action.Along with the likes of Monty Woolley, Webb more or less cornered the market on playing stuffy, condescending Englishmen. Here Webb's strength, a stiff and rather formal persona who needs a baby-sat seven-year-old to evoke his humanity, is put to good use.  There are no kids around and Webb doesn't unbend, but this movie doesn't care that much about the personal life of its characters, anyway, save for poor Gloria Grahame, who's given the rather thankless task of shedding some plot-directed tears and seems rather out of place for her troubles.Even though it's clinical and relatively bloodless - in every sense of the word - THE MAN WHO NEVER WAS is a great deal of fun.  Director Ronald Neame lovingly dwells on every step of the preparation, through to the execution of the caper, and has us deeply involved when the whole thing is threatened with the appearance of the Boyd character.  THE MAN WHO NEVER WAS is a fine, thoughtful film that should appeal to those who aren't necessarily great fans of action war movies.
Classic Vincent Price Film. I remember watching this film when I was a kid on the Saturday creature-features shows. It doesn't have the gore that the newer version has but it keeps you in suspense as only a Vincent Price movie could.I specially recommend the Warner Brothers version which is shown both in Full and Widescreen formats. The picture quality is great. There is a colorized version available also but, in my opinion, black and white is the best way to watch these classics.I recommend this film
Excellent Thriller. I really enjoyed this film. I have been wanting to purchase it for sometime and I am very glad that I finally did. It is full of suspense and has alot of plot twists in the movie as well. I did watch the special features section of "deleted scenes" and felt that there were some deleted scenes that should have stayed in the final cut of this movie. Scott Bakula was a very strong actor in this movie as well as everyone else. I highly recommend this movie for anyone that likes a "classic" horror film.
Inescapably Awesome. I tell my wife that I buy the Justice League season-releases for myself AND the kids. But it is me who sits most captivated in front of the TV with the kids as the episodes roll.Shushing the kids so I can hear "cartoons" on TV is the joke my wife likes to make. I quickly correct her, "Justice League is NOT 'cartoons.' It's an 'animated series.'" This clarification for some reason always seems to bring on even more chuckles over a bottle of wine with friends than it does clarify the matter.Anyway, indeed the kids sit captivated too. The Justice League stories are very well put together with a lot of detail. I'm not sure that my kids (age 3 - 7) appreciate or understand all of the emotion (sometimes pretty deep), heroism (of course), betrayal and just great story telling that goes into these Justice League productions. But rest assured, Justice League is definitely for kids too.As far as I know, there are no single episodes in Seasons 1 & 2 with the exception of the Christmas episode, Comfort & Joy; all the rest in Seasons 1 & 2 are two and three parters. This means on DVD you have the opportunity to watch a 3 parter in one sitting, which is as good as sitting down with a full length feature. I'll take Secret Origins (Season 1) and Starcrossed (Season 2) over Tom Cruise in War Of The Worlds any day. (And are the alien war machines in War of the Worlds deliberate imitations of those in Secret Origins or is that just too much of a coincidence?!)There are hours of entertainment on the Justice League Season 1 & 2 releases...and no dang gong Cartoon Network commercials! Well worth the purchase price.
Family Holiday Classic and Mood Lifter All Year Round. I've been a fan of Jim Carrey's version since it came out. I've burned through several VHS copies and now several DVD copies. My grandkitten doesn't care for Christmas and manages to destroy a DVD. I do subject the whole family to it.I just LOVE the town of Whoville and all of the Who's. Cindy Lou is beyond adorable and the movie set is so beautifully crafted. The story is cute and Jim Carrey adds his own personality to the character making it a truely unique Christmas Classic.
You get just what it is!. This and the first movie are not trying to make movie history or even create deep thought.  It's what movies were like when I was a kid and what they should still be...a fun light adventure that when you dismiss what would be real and what would be possible you can enjoy.  The acting is excellent for the material and the low budget does not stop your enjoying the fun everyone must have had making this "adventure hero" flick.  Now, for those who need blood and gore...look elsewhere.  For those looking for a good popcorn and family movie...which could lead to some good talks about "myth's" and "real history" this could be just the thing to watch instead of the latest "McRealality" brain junkfood the networks force on us
Vanessa Williams is fine, but, Chayanne Shines. I usually stay away from the chick-flick genre that I was forced to watch with my ex-wife, daughter and, prior to that various and sundry dates...but, from the first viewing of this contagiously exciting film, I was drawn into the world of proffesional Latin dancing. I readily admit that my initial interest was to see Vanessa, since, in my opinion, she makes too few films. But, the infectious sountrack and the easy-looking, but incredibly intricate dance performances of Chayanne and crew, made me say, to quote a line from the film, "I want to do that, too!"Chayanne, who is probably a superstar in latin circles, gives a utilitarian acting performance, however appealing his personality, and this whole movie was never in danger of being an oscar contender, however, I reiterate, the dance sequences are exilerating. A solid family movie, and with the popularity of "Dancing With the Stars," should be a must-see for fans of that show
Another Brian De Palma Classic. The very fact that Brian De Palma directed this film is a signal that this film is of a very high standard. Before Carlito's way he'd already directed Scarface, Carrie, The Untouchables, Casualties of War, and many many more, but this film with the possible exception of Scarface is, in my opinion, his best work.The film depicts the life of a former Puerto Rican drug lord Carlito Berganzi (Al Pacino) from the moment his appeal is succesful and he is released from a 30 year prison sentence after serving only 5 years. Carlito pledges to keep his hands clean of any criminal activities...but Carlito sitting at home watching Trisha and drinking tea simply didn't cut it with the filming commission so instead he gets dragged down into the underworld yet again, mostly by his cocaine-addicted lawyer David Kleinfeld (Sean Penn), whilst the opposing force in Carlito's life, Gail (Penelope Ann Miller) tries desperately to pull him back to a normal, crime-free life.The film is beautifully shot and there is no moment in the film, ever, when you think "oo I'll just pause it so I can go and make myself a coffee"...I have the attention span of a goldfish, and can rarely watch a 2hr 24mins movie without having a break in the middle for coffee, but this movie was non-stop and kept me completly engaged, 100%, from start to finish.I don't need to tell you that Al Pacino does an awesome job...you already knew that, but Sean Penn and Penelope Ann Miller compliment Pacino's incredble acting skills perfectly.If you are a fan of gangster/mob films (Scarface, Casino, Goodfella's, The Godfather Trilogy, etc) then you absoultely must see this film, NO gangster film collection can ever be complete without this momentous film.This film is fully deserving of each and every one of the five stars I've given it
Great video for work out. I received the training video and love it. The work out gets your heart going and it don't take all day to do. You don't regret doing it. I look forward to my workout days. Keep up the good work
Challenging but doable. 30 min + 15 min bonus powerhouse workouts and comes with a 4' long band. All are on the mat. Some are challenging but most of them are do-able. Ana cues very well but she doesn't encourage you by saying "you look beautiful, you look great, smile, auuuuuuuuuu, etc." (if you want to hear those). No shoes
BEAUTIFUL MASTERPIECE. The great Jean Gabin is world weary, elegant, elder crime king pin Max in Jacques Becker's understated 1954 TOUCHEZ PAS AU GRISBI (Criterion).The title literally translates "Hands off my loot!" But it's all about the details and relationships that are peripheral to the aftermath of big bullion heist that Max has just pulled off.  His plan is to retire with his pretty young girlfriend, but when long time not so smart partner Riton brags to his two timing moll Josy (Jeanne Moreau), Max is sucked back into the world he helped create and can never leave.Becker died in obscurity in 1960, but over time his reputation has grown.  This once forgotten gem is now recognized as a near perfect touchstone of the crime genre and it looks brand new in pristine black and white.Extras include interviews and essays and a TV documentary.  It would be nice if the subtitles were in yellow, but that is a small complaint for a terrific film.
Loved it!. A romantic tragedy portrayed by first rate Argentine actors.  A must see
I could watch this over and over again!. Whether you're Greek - or whatever - just about anyone can relate to Toula's life. After having deemed herself hopeless for thirty-odd years, then finally meeting the man of her dreams, Toula's real obstacle is surving her family! While his parents are quiet and typical Americans, Toula's clan embraces their roots -- telling strangers the intimate details of their medical histories, roasting a lamb in the front yard, Gramma in the old-country babushka. You'll laugh til you cry, 'cause chances are, you know someone exactly like each of Toula's relatives..
Criterion presents a great package of a great film. Yes, this edition of Bicyle Thieves costs more than hot contemporary releases, but it is well worth it.  You get a classic film along with great reading material about the film and a bonus DVD explaining why this film is a classic. Also, it sits nicely on any bookshelf.  I especially recommend this film to younger viewers as a warning againt allowing society and governments to dehumanize  its citizens (especially the poor).  This film makes you think about what it means to be a human being--something that today's films seem not to do, The Departed, for instance.   Obviously a worthy addition to anyone's film collection.
Great classic!. This wonderful classic is worth watching again and again. My sixteen year old son watched it for the first time and was very impressed (a pleasant surprise-since he's not hip on old movies). He thought the film would be so out of date as far as stunts, special effects, etc. that he'd be bored to tears, but this film has stood up to the test of time, perhaps because it was ahead of its time. I never get tired of watching O'Toole's performance as the brash, impressionable young Lawrence who strives to help keep Arabia in the hands of the Arabs, despite the wishes of his British commanders. At one point Lawrence develops a 'God complex', only to be brought back to the reality that he's just and ordinary man with weaknesses. This realization doesn't stop him from attempting to do something extraordinary...Chrissy K. McVay - Autho
Great Visuals Add To Already-Excellent Film. This was an excellent suspense film with outstanding cinematography and interesting characters played by a strong cast.There are lots of complimentary adjectives in the above sentence but the film deserves it, particularly the photography (see this on DVD). The lighting is as good as anything I've ever seen in film noir (this is not a film noir, as one reviewer correctly points out). In fact, outside of David Lean's "Oliver Twist, " this may be the best-looking black-and-white film I've seen. A good part of the visual treat is viewing the fantastic Victorian house where most of the action takes place.The lead character, played beautifully by Dorothy McGuire, is one the viewer cares about which helps get one involved in the story. All the other characters are fun to watch, and are detailed here in other reviews. I go along with most in saying Ethel Barrymore was the most likable.There are a few holes in the storyline, to be sure, but one doesn't care since the film movies rapidly, the story keeps you so involved and the visuals and audio are so interesting. This latter also features the longest thunderstorm on record!
Bridget Jones - The Edge Of Reason. Like the first movie "Bridget Jones's Diary", I found this one to be equally as funny as the first.  The love triangle between Renee Zellweger, Hugh Grant, and Colin Firth continues to be entertaining.  I loved this movie just as much as the first.  If you have seen the first movie I think you will enjoy this one
Bleak & Beautiful L.A. in the 80s. Friedkin's TO LIVE AND DIE IN L.A. gives us a sharp look at Los Angeles in the early 1980s as no one else has in my experience.  The film is as terse and taught as it's actors, giving the viewer especial insight into the L.A. art scene, particularly the performance art of the times.It's really good to see William Peterson's early work, since we are so accustomed to seeing his eccentric introvert on CSI.  Here he's a hotshot, fledgling Secret Service agent on the trail of a counterfeitor, Willem Dafoe. Dafoe is memorable as artist Rick Masters who is so high on his own ego that he has no boundaries---so it is interesting when he runs in to Peterson who lacks boundaries as well.  It's all very no-holds-barred.Friedkin has a real feel for the ambience of the town as I remember it, and it's no slouch as a thriller either, but don't expect hearts and flowers or a cozy mystery.  It's harsh and sometimes hard to watch, but worth the effort
Forgot i had this movie... I wouldn't recommend paying 12+ dollars for it like i did(stupid major electronic store)..but getting it on here for less than $5 is worth it.There are plenty of ninja in it(if i remember correctly) and sonny chiba is cool as always...go ahead and buy it if you like real Japanese flicks
Favorite childhood memory. I bought it because it is the only way to get Twas the night before Christmas TV cartoon special that I watched as a kid and my kids now get to enjoy it too
Raymond Briggs' The Snowman. This absolutely charming video has long been a favorite of mine.  Family members and friends who have received & viewed it are aslo overwhelmingly delighted.  It tells a story yet opens up the child's (or adult's) imagination.  I wholeheartedly recommend it
It's not "just" giant robot anime. If your interested in "giant robot anime" with a story this is for you. Other reviews as well as search engines can help you with the story line and deference's between the platinum and perfect collection...If you saw it's original basic cable US run on adult swim (late night Cartoonnetwork) you missed some things (not many though). For one reason or another certain parts where edited out, I'm not sure if it was for content or time (that or I can`t remember them all :p ). Little tidbits that may not really mean anything unless you've seen it up to that part were for some reason left out. Never the less if you have seen or own anime such as Coboy Bebop, FLCL, Samurichamploo this is good price to add it to your collection. Also the subtitles can clear up a few things as well.This is one of the most realistic sci-fi anime I have seen. There are times you can really relate to the things going on and find the utter stupid-ness of real life in this series. It's vary deep, not for light thinkers and if you wonder why you watched it all the way through after doing so you've probly missed something. It's no doubt that the characters in this have some problems upstairs, but you come to understand why later on (they kind of "breakdown the wall"). Most of the scientific content they talk about is lip service (I.E. esoteric and probly incorrect to those that don't know of it)  but it can allow the viewer get sucked in at times.Note:The directors cut's of episodes 21-24 are here and help with some things and considering your only paying about $7.70 per disk new as of this date (and a nice box to put it in) your almost steeling it compared to other sources
Wonderfully Kind. I just love John Hughes Romantic Comedies of the 80's. It gave the middle class boy or girl in the growing decadeance of the era with big money and big hair a chance to shine. A butch girl played by Mary Stuart Masterson hangs out with her best buddy ( Eric Stolz) and his infatuation for the it girl (Lea Thompson) who is going out with the rich and popular it boy (Craig Sheffer)the catch is the character played by Mary Stuart Masterson is not a dyke but much in love with her best friend. Cute movie , Cute ending. Sweet and Simple
Tune into your body. This is a great set.  I started using this set doing the Accelerated 2-3x/wk and the 20 or basic the other days.  I really became in tune with my core muscles and became more aware of my body.  I think it does a great job to tone up but not much for cardio.  If you are looking to lose weight try something different but if you are looking to tone up and loose some inches this is great.
Fantastic!. Fantastic DVD!  Well written, excellent cinematography, beautiful music, emotionally moving stories of five hymns that changed to world
"Born to Kill (1947) ... Robert Wise ... RKO Radio Pictures Film Noir". RKO Radio Pictures present "BORN TO KILL" (1947) (92 mins/B&W) (Dolby digitally remastered) --- Starring Claire Trevor, Lawrence Tierney, Walter Slezak, Audrey Long & Phillip Terry --- Directed by Robert Wise and released in May 3, 1947, our story line and film, Uncompromising film noir which sees psychopath Tierney marry wealthy girl Long, only to feel more in common with the black sheep of the family, his wife's sister (Trevor). Deliciously dark and directed with enthusiasm by Wise before he'd made it big, Born to Kill is a genuine oddity which explores the dark side of sexuality without moralizing, with the bonus of a cracking murder plot to add some spice. Tierney pitches his performance just right ... The film sits well with all those minor noir classics the late 40's and early 50's with apparent ease: Wise's own "The Set-Up"; Anthony Mann's "Raw Deal" and the "T-Men", "Kiss Of Death", and Ray's masterly debut, "They Live By Night".Under Robert Wise  (Director), Herman Schlom  (Producer), Eve Greene  (Screenwriter), James Gunn  (Book Author), Richard Macaulay  (Screenwriter), Robert de Grasse  (Cinematographer), Constantin Bakaleinikoff  (Musical Direction/Supervision), Paul Sawtell  (Composer (Music Score), Les Millbrook  (Editor), Albert S. D'Agostino  (Art Director), Walter E. Keller  (Art Director), Sid Rogell  (Executive Producer), Darrell Silvera  (Set Designer), John Sturtevant  (Set Designer), Edward Stevenson  (Costume Designer), Russell A. Cully  (Special Effects) - - - - the cast includes Lawrence Tierney  (Sam Wild), Claire Trevor  (Helen Trent), Walter Slezak  (Arnold Amett), Phillip Terry  (Fred Grover), Audrey Long  (Georgia Staples), Elisha Cook, Jr.  (Marty Waterman), Isabel Jewell  (Laury Palmer), Esther Howard  (Mrs. Kraft), Kathryn Card  (Grace), Tony Barrett  (Danny), Grandon Rhodes  (Inspector Wilson), Jason Robards, Sr.  (Conductor), Netta Packer  (Mrs Perth), Sammy Shack  (Crap Dealer), Philip Warren  (Chauffeur), Tommy Noonan  (Bellboy), Napoleon Whiting  (Porter), Ruth Brennan  (Sally), Sayre Dearing  (Crap Dealer), Jean Fenwick  (Margaret Macy), Lee Frederick  (Desk Clerk), Ellen Corby  (2nd Maid), Demetrius Alexis  (Maitre d'Hotel), Al Murphy  (Cab Driver), Sam Lufkin  (Crap Dealer), Beatrice Maude  (Cook), Ben Frommer  (Delivery Boy), Perc Launders  (Detective Bryson), Martha Hyer  (Maid)  - - - - - Film noir is a cinematic term used primarily to describe Hollywood crime dramas that set their protagonists in a world perceived as inherently corrupt and unsympathetic...Hollywood's classic film noir period is generally regarded as stretching from the early 1940s to the late 1950s...Film noir of this era is associated with a low-key black-and-white visual style that has roots in German Expressionist cinematography, while many of the prototypical stories and much of the attitude of classic noir derive from the hard-boiled school of crime fiction that emerged in the United States during the Depression...the term film noir (French for "black film"), first applied to Hollywood movies by French critic Nino Frank in 1946, was unknown to most of the American filmmakers and actors while they were creating the classic film noirs..the canon of film noir was defined in retrospect by film historians and critics; many of those involved in the making of film noir later professed to be unaware at the time of having created a distinctive type of film ... featuring top performances from the '40s and '50s with outstanding drama and screenplays, along with a wonderful cast and supporting actors to bring it all together ... another winner from the vaults of almost forgotten film noir gemsSPECIAL FEATURES BIOS:1. Lawrence TierneyDate of Birth:  15 March 1919 - Brooklyn, New YorkDate of Death:  26 February 2002 - Los Angeles, California2.  Claire Trevor  (aka: Claire Wemlinger)Date of Birth:  8 March 1910 - New York, New YorkDate of Death:  8 April 2000 - Newport Beach, California3.  Robert Wise (Director)Date of Birth:  10 September 1914 - Winchester, IndianaDate of Death:  14 September 2005 - Los Angeles, CaliforniaHats off and thanks to Les Adams (collector/guideslines for character identification), Chuck Anderson (Webmaster: The Old Corral/B-Westerns.Com), Boyd Magers (Western Clippings), Bobby J. Copeland (author of "Trail Talk"), Rhonda Lemons (Empire Publishing Inc), Bob Nareau (author of "The Real Bob Steele") and Trevor Scott (Down Under Com) as they have rekindled my interest once again for Film Noir, B-Westerns and Serials --- looking forward to more high quality releases from the vintage serial era of the '20s, '30s & '40s and B-Westerns ... order your copy now from Amazon where there are plenty of copies available on VHS, stay tuned once again for top notch action mixed with deadly adventure --- if you enjoyed this title, why not check out VCI Entertainment where they are experts in releasing B-Westerns and Serials --- all my heroes have been cowboys!Total Time: 92 min on DVD ~ Turner Home Video ~ (7/05/2005)
Unforgettable,  for those of us who are in love with love itself. I saw this first in 1997 on the Kraft something-something (CBS).  The very first part looked so refreshing that I threw in a tape and have absolutely been gone on it ever since.   I had read about the newly discovered manuscript and book publication at an earlier time.  I bought several copies of the book and gave them out as gifts to friends and relatives.  Everyone who has watched it with me has loved it.  My brother, in from Knoxville once, and after watching the usual popular movies at that time, was, up to that point fairly unimpressed.  I decided to put it in.  He watched and even though he had not even commented on any of the others, he looked at me after the end credits then lights on, and said, "That was a good one."  You have to know my understated Economics Professor-of-a brother to know how funny that comment was and how it pleased me.  The filmed presentation and its screenplay are more flowing, integrated and related to a self-contained start-to-finish story than is the actual book. The scene where Edith is with her ailing uncle, her innocence, her lack of guile or ability to deceive, contrive or lie, is unbelievably attractive in character and essence.  Edith is so transparently good and kind and always helping others without taking credit this story is about the rewards of that goodness and that sweetness.  There are hints from the beginning that are noticed after the fact, about where the relationships lie and why certain people do what they do and act the way they do.  How could the entire story be so simple and yet enchanting enough to cause me to think of it all the time.  When Edith first meets Percy by the horse, spilling her apples and yet touching his scratched face with her handkerchief I loved the way the directors let us know the magic was on.  When Percy comes in the house for the first time and meets her Edith cannot hide her bright-eyed, innocent crush and that she has met him already.  Her facial expressions are uniquely well done as she hides behind the curtain.  You can see that she is jealous already, even though she knows he is not there for her nor could there be a crossing of social barriers, yet he was hers, she thought. How many movies are there where one kiss, just one kiss is so dramatic?With all the thrills, spills and chills in modern movies, needed to even keep an audience awake, is this not a gem for those of us who are just plain in love with love?
Irresistably camp horror. The role of incorrigible ham Edward Lionheart fits Price like a glove. In the same ironic and grotesque spirit as The Abominable Dr Phibes (1971), the central character is a pitiable and tragic antihero bent on revenge. A cast of British stalwarts including Diana Rigg, Eric Sykes, Arthur Lowe and Robert Morley camp it up splendidly in this gruesome farce
Truly Astounding. It has been over one hundred years since Georges Melies first began making movies. He was a true pioneer in every sense of the word. He invented his own camera and projector and built his own studio so that he could have complete control over what he was doing. His use of nudity in 1897 created a scandal and some of his films had very unhappy endings. I bring this up only to illustrate the old French proverb &quot;The more things change, the more they stay the same.&quot; Of the hundreds of films that he made it's the trick films as he called them that he is best remembered for. It was in these that Melies developed the art of special effects. Double exposures, dissolves, and stop motion animation were used and refined to create films that even today are truly astounding. Even people who aren't film buffs are familiar with his 1902 A TRIP TO THE MOON (which is not included in this anthology. It's in LANDMARKS OF EARLY FILM, VOLUME 1). The shot of the rocket hitting the Moon in the eye is one of the most famous in film history. What makes this collection so valuable are the 15 short films presented in virtually mint condition that allow us to sample the genius of Melies 100 years later. While they are all fascinating and entertaining, there is a block of four in a row beginning with TCHIN-CHAO, THE CHINESE CONJURER through THE LIVING PLAYING CARDS that show off Melies at his best. There is even a short documentary GEORGE MELIES: CINEMA MAGICIAN that gives a brief look at his life and work which opens the set although the credits don't appear until the end of the DVD. I would have left the documentary at the end of the presentation as on the VHS edition. This not only puts the credits where they belong but doesn't give away the secrets until after the shorts are finished. The musical accompaniment by Alexander Rannie is ideal and enhances the magic of these enchanting films. They may be 100 years old but true magic remains timeless
Classic. We'll keep this one simple:-'Aliens' is the greatest action movie of all-time, and it's not a bad horror movie either.  It's one of the more unremittingly intense movies of all-time.  The final third is just relentless and even the various slow parts have an undeniable electricity to them, even after like 10 viewings on my part.-'Aliens' is an absolute masterpiece of practical special effects.  The aliens themselves, the set-design, the props, the costumes etc.  All brilliant.  The combination of all the disparate elements may not be completely seamless, but it's surprisingly close, and a helluva lot more convincing than the total CGI films inflicted on us so much nowadays.  (I'm not one of those knee-jerk opposed to CGI people. I just don't think you should use it when it can be done well with practical effects, which is, naturally, opposed to the modern practice of using it at all times and for all things for no apparent reason.)-It's got some atypically memorable good characters and acting for an action/sci-fi/horror movies.  Yeah, many of them are kinda cliched, but they're good well-done cliches, anyway.  Weaver really comes into her own as Ripley, making her quite a bit more interesting and likable than she was the first time around while still basically seeming like the same person.  Furthermore, Michael Biehn and Lance Henricksen give their definitive performances.-If, for some reason or another, you've never actually seen 'Aliens', I would recommend you actually watch the theatrical cut first.  Once you already know the overall plot the Director's Cut is better, and all the stuff that's added in is cool, but I think it tips its hand a little too early, and it's best not to give away that much info the first time around.  Not that it matters much either way, but I think this would be the better way to do it.Yeah, I'm done.  This movie's awesome.  Watch it or be lame forever.Grade:
The Weeping Camel. This is a beautiful documentary capturing a fast-disappearing lifestyle in Mongolia. Not only does it portray a gentle, loving culture dependent in part on camels, it shows the power of love, music, energy resonance and touch on both physical and psychological healing. It made ME weep
Great movie. I had to watch this in a college course i was taking.  I enjoyed the movie.  My Family/Mi Familia describes the tale of three generations of an immigrant family's troubles and achievements. Maria and Jose, the first generation, come to Los Angeles in the 1930's, meet and marry, and then they face deportation. They establish their family on the east side of Los Angeles, and their many children Chucho, Paco, Jimmy, Memo, Irene and Toni.  This story starts with the father of the family, Jose Sanchez, who makes a one year journey on foot from Mexico to Los Angeles in order to track down his long lost brother. Once he gets there, he meets and marries the love of his life, Maria.  The two of them begin a family and the stories of their children begin to develop.  These stories involve Chucho who gets involved in gangs and has to deal with his father for his constant troubles with drugs and the police.  Jimmy begins to follow in the footsteps of his older brother but eventually realizes that he needs to think about the future and that this way of life will not cut it.  As the second generation become adults in the 60's, the focus of the story shifts to the son, Jimmy, and tells the story of his marriage to Isabel, their son, and Jimmy's journey to becoming a responsible parent.  This story shows the life of a family that sticks together through adversities, through crime, gangs, prejudice, no matter what they are faced with, they will be a family.
A Luminous Hepburn Guided by a Masterful Zinnemann Makes an Introspective Journey Cinematic. Capturing one's spiritual crisis hardly sounds like the ideal cinematic subject, but master director Fred Zinnemann does an unparalleled job of dramatizing the inner turmoil and the quest for serenity and immaculate devotion in the life of a Belgian novice in the 1930's. This is no small feat as so much of the story has to do with evoking what is essentially a journey of introspection in this 1959 classic. Fortunately, Audrey Hepburn is luminous as the novice, Sister Luke, who begins the movie as Gabrielle ("Gaby") van der Mal, the daughter of a notable surgeon, who dreams of going to the Congo as a nurse for the natives. Proving she doesn't need Givenchy couture or an adoring leading man to complete her, Hepburn brings her character to shimmering life in a fully dimensional performance. It also helps that Robert Anderson has written an impressive screenplay based on Kathryn Hulme's expansive novel based on a friend who was indeed a Belgian nurse and a former nun.The story has three discrete parts. The first focuses on Gaby's induction into the Catholic order and the exacting transition she makes from postulant to novice. What strikes me most about this part of the movie is not so much the deeper spirituality at the foundation of the training but the near cult-like behavior demanded of the postulants. It's an impressive rite of passage with particularly effective turns by Mildred Dunnock as the humorless Mother of Postulants and especially Edith Evans as the Reverend Mother, a figure concurrently maternal and fearsome. The newly named Sister Luke is assigned to the mental ward of a Belgian asylum where she experiences an episode of terror with a young Colleen Dewhurst as a combative schizophrenic patient.The film's second section has Sister Luke fulfilling her dream to go to the Congo but only to treat the European patients at a white hospital. Still, she makes an impression on the native population as well as Dr. Fortunati, a bellowing atheist and brilliant surgeon who is soon impressed by Sister Luke's medical skills. The two bond, and there is an unspoken feeling of romance, especially during her bout with tuberculosis. However, her skills demand her to go back to Belgium now on the verge of WWII. The third and last part of the movie has Sister Luke back at the convent and struggling with her vows, especially as the Nazis invade and personal tragedy occurs. Zinnemann smartly avoids wartime action shots and lets the nuns recite news headlines as a means of visualizing the carnage surrounding the order. The film ends with an extremely moving, wordless sequence of Sister Luke deciding her fate.As a Belgian who suffered through WWII, Hepburn has an obvious affinity with Gaby/Sister Luke, and even covered head to toe by her habit, she lets her beautiful face express a full range of emotions. Peter Finch plays Dr. Fortunati with convincing swagger, and a gallery of fine character actresses make strong impressions despite the constrictions of their habits. In the Congo sequence, Peggy Ashcroft is a lively presence as Mother Mathilde, and Dorothy Alison makes the optimism of Sister Aurelie palpable and ultimately poignant. Dean Jagger plays the small role of Gaby's father with his requisite paternal appeal. Franz Planer's cinematography is first-rate, especially the National Geographic-like scenes in the Congo, and Franz Waxman does his usual sterling work on the stentorian music score. The new 2006 DVD only offers the original trailer as an extra, a shame since the film is so accomplished in many ways
Excellent!. This pack is just excellent... it contains the 3 movies with extra material, and the presentation is really good. I strongly recommend you buy it
This show is great Sci -Fi fun!. After they took Hercules off this show was one of the fillers.I do agree they really should have given it a full hour. It might have madeit as a prime time show.  I think Gina Torres, Jenifer sky, and VictoriaPratt rock in this show.  I am really glad somebody put this to Dvd.I am glad I own it and I know I will enjoy it for years to come.If you are looking for some campy Sci- fi fun check this out.You will be glad you did
The 2nd dvd of a favorite cartoon!. This is the 2nd set of episodes of the creativity-inspiring cartoon of the 80's, The Adventures of Teddy Ruxpin. Here, Teddy's friend Gimmick, the inventor, begins to discover how valuable the crystals they found are. When he plugs one into a machine, something incredible happens! These episodes also reveal more story about the humorous villain Tweeg.The plot continues from one episode to the next across the whole series, but at the same time each individual episode has it's own development and conclusion. Each story is very clever, and the music (both in the songs, and the background music) is memorable. Everyone who watched this when they were young will find themselves humming these tunes again as soon as they hear them!If you liked the first disc, then this DVD gives you more of the stories, characters, and songs that you loved. And if you haven't seen the first disc yet, you're really missing out on a wonderful series
Bedpan For Room 903... Boy, is Michael Ironside (Scanners, Starship Troopers) ever mad! He's just seen Lee Grant on TV, telling the world that an abused woman was right to shoot her brutish husband in self-defense. You see, Ironside's character, Colt Hawker (!), had a bad childhood w/ a drunk dad and a mum who tossed hot grease in dad's face. Now, Hawker hates all women and especially the uppity ones like Grant's character! He attempts to murder her w/ his footlong switchblade, but she has the audacity to survive! Hawker comes after her in the hospital, leading to many deaths and a game of hide 'n' seek between Ironside and Grant ala Halloween 2. I like this one! We even get Linda Purl as a nurse and William Shatner (Incubus, Devil's Reign) as Grant's utterly useless boss! Ironside was born menacing and always gives me the creeps! He's truly sadistic and twisted in VH, and that's a good thing. Lee Grant is strong and likeable in her role. Definitely worth owning...
That Carmalita is Hilarious!!. This could be the funniest movie ever! The kids crack me up... especially that Carmalita Chu! I wonder what that actress is doing now? I bet she rocks!
Satisfaction. Well as you can see all the reviews are 4 stars or better! I've been a fan of Shadow since like 98 or 99, i'll try to give an objective review! This item is well worth the money for Shadow fans or trip-hop fans or DJ fans! I highly suggest you check out any single song by Shadow before you buy this item, his music is not very conventional to any genre...even trip-hop which doesn't really have a standard sound! If you like a song, you'll like them all and this product!The DVD's main show is like an hour and half long live performance by Shadow! Its a cross section of every one of his albums, but songs mixed with each other in amazing combinations! With on-stage visuals (most are cued to the music) which are often editted to show on your screen clearly! You also get some other bonus performances of Shadow with Numark and Cut Chemist (I think) which is interesting!The CD is a shortened version of the same main performance on the DVD! I like this because i'd want to listen to it without a dvd player!This dvd/cd set is a really great reward for any of his fans in that you get to hear everything mixed in new ways while actually seeing how he does his thing! (Example: he blends What Does Your Soul Look Like 2 with Bloodstain) Then there's also the on-stage and on-screen visuals! Just in case anybody is worried about the sound quality, being that this is video of a live performance, fear not! The sound quality on the DVD and on the CD sounds as clear as studio production!As far as mildly interested people that aren't really fans of Shadow, I suggest you get any one of Shadow's albums or DL a song or two so you know what the music sounds like! Its not really conventional to any genre!*if my use of exclamation points makes this review seem less sincere, i apologize! please re-read and substitute periods for the exclamation points! Or for an entirely new spin on it, try using question marks at the end of each sentence! it really sounds less sincere that way!
All wrestling, no documentary. This set is the complete opposite of the Bret Hart set.  While the Hitman's set was stronger on the documentary side than the wrestling side, the Undertaker set has no biographical content at all.  There is nothing on Mark Calloway, the real man behing the Undertaker character, which is a shame.  Being that he has done such a good job with this character, the least the WWE could have done was give him some air time on his own DVD. With that said, if you want pure wrestling, this is a good set, especially at the sale price (19.95). I am told that "This is My Yard" (2001) is better if you want to learn more about Mark Calloway, though I cannot vouch for it personally.  Overall, this set was worth the price I paid, but I will be happier when a more complete set is released
From My "Growing Up" Years. I was around 10 years of age when this series ran on TV, and though I'm sure I did not see every episode I know I saw many of them. I'm glad that many DVDs are now coming out for us 'ole' TV western fans.When I grew up in the fifties, 10-cent Saturday matinees abounded; with serials running in 12 parts or so. See one or two this Saturday and come back to the local Bijou next Saturday to see a couple more installments. After a couple of these on any given Saturday the theatre would then run a couple Rocky Lane, Roy Rogers, Gene Autry, or Durango Kid feature westerns to round out your western Saturday late morning and early afternoon. It sure offered great babysitting for mom, too!Now with the Western Channel and release of such DVDs as this one on Wyatt Earp we can get all we want, and relive 'those thrilling days of yesteryear." And wasn't Hugh O'Brien just born to play this role; can anyone think of anyone else doing better than this man did week-after-week-after-week?Seriously this is a very well put together production, with only a couple flaws: One being the continual singing by the Ken Darby group, it gets inappropriate at times, and the other being only a selection of the entire shows. In one program on the first disc when Wyatt goes to Wichita you can tell at the end of the program that next week will be a followup, but the DVD doesn't have the next week, it skips forward to others. These are very minor complaints because for me just to have these DVDs are more than I ever hoped for.So load up the ole Buntline special, saddle the horses, and join Wyatt's posse to rid the range of rapscallions, western style.Recommended.Semper Fi
Frighteners if Fabulous. First saw this years ago and loved it.  Love it even more on DVD.  A fun movie with great special effects
Cimarron. One of the best films ever made in America..a milestone of the transition from silent films to talkies
Have you found Neverland?. Although I feel it's been hyped up a little too much and I don't feel it deserved all the attention there are moments in `Finding Neverland' where I'm touched.  The only problem is I've been touched this way before, and it was better.  There is a beautiful light found in the eyes of Kate Winslet who was robbed of the Oscar nomination for she was the far better actor of the two in question, and yet Depp was the only one to receive the nomination.The film, as everyone knows, is about J.M. Barrie (Depp), the writer of `Peter Pan' and it chronicles the events in his life that lead to the classic we all know and love.  Those events involve Widow Sylvia Llewelyn Davies (Winslet) and her four boys, in particular Peter (Freddie Highmore).  Peter is struggling to recover from his father's death and dealing with his mothers growing illness and Barrie offers him a form of escape.  As I stated, Winslet does outstanding as the dieing woman who wants nothing more than a good life for her children, but I would feel wrong if not to mention the brilliant acting on young Freddie Highmore's part for he truly commanding the screen.I will admit when I first saw this film I was smitten by its charm and human appeal, and even now I still love this film.  I just don't feel it's the greatest film on 2004, nor top ten.  It's sweet and alluring but it's nothing new and it's over hyped, as were a lot of films that year.  That's a shame for, when you take away the hype you have a wonderful film that's been...under hyped.Does that make any sense
Pride and Prejudice Revisited. The two Bridget Jones films are a modern version of Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice.
Adorable Internationals, Quirky Love Story. Va Savoir is one of my favorite international films. The humor alone always gets me. It's not a comedy nor a "dramedy." It's just about human relationships. Sure, all movies are about human relationships. However, this movie's narrative is compelling and the chemistry between the actors makes it humorous. Everything takes place around or behind a play. The main characters are actors in a traveling theatre troupe. The director and leading lady are stereotypically in love. However, it seems that their love is more an enduring friendship than a physical affair. All of the main characters are searching for something. If it is not a long lost play by an Italian playwright it's long lost dreams..
great for getting started. I am 50 and have always been thin.  Lately, I have a bit of a pooch and cannot seem to lose the 15 extra pounds of weight I have put on the last few years.  This DVD and book are a GREAT starting point for people who have resisted exercise.  Well worth the money.  The 10 minute segments are great if you are short on time, can be done twice, or all together. You decide what works for you!  Buy this set
An Amazing Year. The 2005 season for the Seattle Seahawks was an amazing year.  This video truly captures the excitement that was the most successful year in Seahawks history
Powerful masterpiece. Another Showtime masterpiece. Powerful, thought-provoking look into the relationships between fathers and sons. Three individual vignettes show three different sides to the issue and are loosely tied together by the fact all three families live on the same block. Ron Eldard's mesmerizing performance has to be seen to be believed. Far more talented actors would never have been able to give as magnificient a performance
Whole Lotta Woman!!. Pam Grier is THE dish in this blaxploitation Classic!!  Sleazy, campy lesbian undertones and some truly hilarious dialogue make this watchable again and agai
Classic Bond. This might not be the greatest Bond movie of all time (Though I'd say it's in the top three), but it most assuredly has the most breath-taking women.  They've never found anyone hotter than Claudine Auger in all the rest of the Bond Movies, and as far as villians go, Luciana Paluzzi, wow,if your going to be killed I guess sleeping with her before wouldn't be the worst way to go.As for the movie, great story, great action, classic Bond
Excellent, CHALLENGING workout. I recently purchased several pregnancy videos, Perfect Pragnancy Workout among them.  I am 5 months along in my pregnancy and was in decent shape before I became pregnant.  The Perfect Pregnancy Workout was the only one that challenged me.  I definitely recommend it.Important to note that this is not and aerobic workout.  It is a muscle strengthening workout and will require some dumbells, 3lb - 10lbs depending on your fitness level.  You will also need a step of some sort.  A regular sturdy stepping stool from your local hardware store will do.  Finally, a chair and some oversized pillows and you are on your way.
I give it 2 thumbs up. Love this movie one of the best
FANTASTIC!. Great movie.   Its a little old school as far as acting and cast, but great film.   This film does NOT express any homoeroticism in it, but just true care for human beings.   The religious undertows are awesome, and the paranormal wonder is so cool.   I highly recommend this film
Good Suspense Thriller. I know that I am a tough movie critic, however, I really loved this movie and own it on VHS.  This movie was perfectly cast and it will keep you on the edge of your sofa till the end!!! Just marvelous!
satisfied customer. I'm pleased with everything about this transaction.  The merchandise arrived quickly and the dvd plays beautifully.  Thank you
A Great Version of the Fairy Tale. I love this film very much and not just for the great songs, but for how well the characters are portrayed. They should release the Frog Prince and Sleeping Beauty on dvd also
Scarface Leaves Notable Scar on Film History. Produced by Howard "The Aviator" Hughes, the original version of "Scarface" depicts the rise of Tony, a young Italian-American gangster, to underworld power in the 1920's America. His unscrupulous, relentless and unsympathetic actions are portrayed in a bravura performance by Paul Muni, but other, mainly female players, are by no means worse. The black humour every now and then eases the tough, violent script (although it certainly is less difficult to watch than current violent movies). Melodrama and tragic overtones also occur and the finale has its particular gradation, which leaves the story as a prey to its inevitable ending. The creators evidently tried to infuse the movie with a solid piece of social commentary and they have mostly succeeded, turning "Scarface" into one of the best movies of the sound film era's dawn
Beautifully done. An interesting glimpse into a culture that knows how to live with death as part of life. Beautifully and sensitively filmed. I definitely recommend it.
Good movie. The action in this movie is amazing. The idea behind the movie is great. Actors are great. This movie is great as a date movie.
Outstanding Comedy: Fred Gwynne Shines!. This is an outstanding and hilariously funny comedy. Vinny Gambini (Joe Pesci) is excellent as an out-of-place lawyer in the out-of-the-way state of Alabama; where he finds he is out-of-his-elements: Sort of. With his rough and saavy Brooklyn charm, he and Fred Gwynn as the conservative, no nonsense Alabama judge make this a terrific film! The court scenes with Fred Gwynn, and Maury Chaykin were hilarious. I found the film not only great, but the Oscar awarded to Marisa Tomei were well earned. It's a shame Fred Gwynne passed away not too long after the film. He was just starting to do some really good films. Especially after so many years of being typecast as Herman Munster, however, we should all be grateful that he did this film. It would not have been the same without him as the tough judge. I highly recommend this film. It's a great comedy. [Stars: 5+
GREAT  GREAT Soccer Movie. a movie that is not un-realitisc in the world of soccer.  good acting and very good story line
Kay Kendall, Gene Kelly & Co. dance up a storm!. LES GIRLS is a wildly-exuberant, wickedly-funny musical featuring songs by Cole Porter and direction by George Cukor, not to mention a fabulous cast headed by Gene Kelly, Kay Kendall, Taina Elg and Mitzi Gaynor.Kay Kendall is the main reason for seeing this gorgeous film.  She died 2 years later from the ravages of cancer.  She is so beautiful in this film, not to mention hilarious!  Her drunk scene is priceless and her number with Gene Kelly ("You're Just Too, Too") is full of the joys of life which Kay loved and embraced so much.The story concerns Lady Sybil Wren (played by Kay Kendall) who has written a novel about her years touring as one third of the 'Les Girls' troupe founded by Barry Nichols (Gene Kelly).  Sybil is taken to court and sued for libel by Angele (Taina Elg) because a passage in the book recounts when Angele tried to commit suicide.  Angele is adamant that this never happened.  Both Sybil and Angele tell their accounts of the event (both completely different).  Could Joy (Mitzi Gaynor) hold the real story?...This is a sumptuous movie, best viewed in its original CinemaScope proportions.  Gene Kelly and the girls are in top form.  Taina Elg is breathtaking as the vivacious Angele and Mitzi Gaynor dances beautifully as Joy.  Though, as I mentioned before, Kay Kendall rises above all the others with her wit, acting and dancing skills.  She is sorely missed.Highly-recommende
Everyone can be a 13 year old boy. There aren't enough movies like this these days. Family oriented(centered actually), adventure with edutainmental attributes.Great cast, great score, great(albeit goofy) story.People give this film too much credit for being implausible, which is exactly what makes it so much fun to imagine the ramifications if it were true. If you're looking for adventure and fun, thrilling characters in a family film, this is it
That's The Way It Was!!!!!. Now, if you make every child see this film you are doing a service for the way America should be! This is what made it so great. A family stuck together and they showed each other respect and there was "ORDER" to a household and there was stability!!! This is a GREAT movie! It show's America when we feared no-one and had no muslims in our streets and was orderly and respectful. This shows when one could be truly free and when people were decent and God fearing! We "NEED" this again! Change the Immigration Policy of 1965 which Ted Kennedy put in place to ruin America forevermore! This is why we have so much chaos now. America was once a great and mighty nation, but, with this policy in effect, it will become a 3rd world nation with much chaos and bloodshed. Get invovled! If you love America
This is what romance is. Others have talked at length about the technical beauty of this film.  It is indeed very well-done, but what I enjoyed the most was its wonderful evocation of married love.  I've never seen a film that showed so well what it's like to be a newly-wed.  The couple are obviously seriously in love, but both are naive and discovering what it is like to live together, and making mistakes, the way you do in those first years.  It's wonderful to see a film that celebrates this.  So many films are about highly dysfunctional relationships nowadays.  This film celebrates the normal--not the perfect, but the normal--in a way that is charming and enjoyable.  If you are happily married (22 years in my case), it can really send you down memory lane.In contrast to the married couple, there is the crazy but fascinating first mate who has lived a much less conventional life than they are clearly going to.  (The man keeps his dead best friend's hands in a jar. Like two pickles. Nuff said).  He, and this sort of out-there boy who also lives on the barge help to keep the story from being just simply sentimental.  The eccentric Pere Jules clearly doesn't quite understand the love that the captain, Jean, has for his wife (he himself is into one night stands, like the one he has with a gypsy who reads his palms) but when he gets how much the young couple need each other, he is the one who goes and brings the wife home, where she wants to be. All of this takes place in scenes of what look like great poverty from a modern point of view, but was just normal life during the depression.  The wife only has one dress, besides her wedding dress, and spends most of the movie in her bathrobe, but although her eyes open up wide when she see beautiful and expensive things in the shop windows, all that really seems necessary to her in the end is her husband.The actors are wonderful--they make the movie seem so real that it's almost like a documentary.  When you finish watching this, watch Grand Illusion to see the beautiful Dita Parlo again.  She does a German peasant woman in that movie, just as well as she does the little French country girl in this one.  And then rent Boudu Saved From Drowning to see a another tour de force performance by Michel Simon, the first mate
It's on DVD. Fellows:I picked up the DVD in London, at a cost of 20 pounds, or about US$39.  There were still four copies left at the Virgin Superstore in Picadilly Circus.  So you got be able to find it somewhere, even not on Amazon.
I Am The Walrus. I give it 5 because it is the only known video of I Am The Walrus!! One of my favorite Beatles tunes. The movie itself was a flop, not going over well with the critics. I like it, and have been looking for it, and found it here!!
SRV Tribute. Clips of SRV, Raitt, Clapton, BBKing, Robert Cray, Buddy Guy and John Vaughan, Dr John on the piano Double Trouble all helping each other out in a great concert.This is one of the best since the Last Walt
"Go to Ludicrous speed!". Ah, Spaceballs is a classic.  Some of the jokes don't hit, but there are so many of them that theirs bound to be some that make you laugh.  I love the Ludicrous speed scene and when the ship passes overhead for 5 minutes.  Also"Who is he?""Hes a a@$hole Sir.""I known that, whats his name?""A#!hole, Major A!@hole.  Thats his name Sir."Then the end of the conversation after everyone stands up."I knew it.  I'm surrounded by a#!holes."The alien bit was pretty funny too.  Well I'll stop talking about the highlights and get to the negatives........................hmmmmm.................well okay there are no negatives.  Get this movie and have some fun
Misunderstood, yet brilliant and still accurate film.... When the idiotic TV pundits talk about this film, they always make it sound like it's this perfect, "isn't America wonderful" film that doesn't criticise our country in any way.  I have heard numerous times when pundits rally against current Hollywood and their supposedly "anti-American" practices, they always site this film as a great expression of how wonderful and perfect America is.  Obviously, they did not see the film.  The senators, representatives, governors, and their ilk are portrayed as cynical, corrupt individuals, and, sadly, that's still true today.  When Jefferson Smith is appointed, he's like a naive schoolboy.  He knows more about US history than all of Washington does.  But when he learns how corrupt Washington is, he refuses to be a stooge and decides to stand up for himself.  Then the political machines come down on him.  Instead of going away, he fights back (which leads to the famous filibuster scene).  This is a great film, but it is not the naive film the pundits suggest.  It's a sadly accurate portrayal of our political system.  It's actually more realistic than an episode of The West Wing.  The characters in this film are pretty accurate, as opposed to the silly, idealistic naiviete on the West Wing.  The dialogue is wonderful, all of the performances are superb, and Capra's direction are excellent.  Notice that Capra doesn't cut as much as modern directors do.  The film is still pretty fast, but would be considered slow by today's standards.  A great American film, one that probably couldn't be made today.  Let's hope that they don't remake this (they already did with Billy Jack Goes to Washington, which was one of the worst films I've ever seen)....
A big dumb action thriller... This is a big dumb action thriller, and I mean that in the best possible way.  Sure, it's not Die Hard... However I don't think it's fair to compare every Bruce Willis movie to one of the greatest action movies ever made.  It has more than it's fair share of excitement and the plot has enough twists and turns to keep me occupied.  The opening car chase is top notch.  There are quite a few excellent character actors who turn in great performances here... Look for Tom Sizemore, Robert Pastorelli, Andre Braugher, and Timothy Busfield (as well as his spindly little girl legs).  It's not going to change the world.  It's not going to make you forget Die Hard.  It's a fun thriller... especially with a couple friends, some popcorn, and a few beers.  Worth a rental!
I screamed like I was watching the Final 4. This is a great movie, you laugh, you cry, you cringe and shake your head but most of all the last scene the entire theater was on the edge of their seat SCREAMING and standing up like we were in a sports bar watching the FINAL FOUR of college basketball.   This should be required viewing for anyone involved in high school sports: parents. players coaches and fans
Disney Classic. I vaguely remember seeing this in the theatre when I was a kid.  Like a door opening in my mind, the flood of memories come back to me.  It reminds me of a time when there was no Harry Potter and we used our imagination to look past the mock up of special effects and what have you.  All in all the story is good and entertaining
I Love this Movie. If ever there was a movie I had a soft spot for, it would be Next Stop Wonderland.  If I'm down or need to relax or just want to sit back and see familiar sights from the time of the movie, I pop this in and immediately feel better.  It's like therapy to me.In some ways it's tough for me to really define the movie or the characters & I don't want to give it all away.  Erin struggles to overcome some of the losses in her life and to find a way to move forward while Alan is an individual who fights to fulfill his dreams, which he figured out later on in his own life, while maintaining his integrity.  But the movie is so full of coincidences and near misses for these two very honest individuals that you are left waiting for the moment when they come together, and when they do, it is actually just the right time.  From the dating service, to Alan seeing her while in the fish tank, to the photographer putting her in the picture... there are so many things in this movie that you may have missed after seeing it the first time that you'll catch the next few times around.I definitely recommend the movie.  I love it.  Can't say that enough.  And it takes place in Boston, and you get a good view of some of the sights and places in Boston.  I've actually been the the Burren & still sometimes hang out in the Somerville/Cambridge area.  And the New England Aquarium really has been renovated since then (1998) and is off of the Blue Line (the Wonderland stop is actually the last stop on the Blue Line - there's your symbolism!).I also love the movie because the soundtrack, done by Claudio Ragazzi and Arto Lindsay, is nothing short of stellar.  The original score perfectly fits the mood of the CD for both characters and other than the classic Bossa Nova by Elis Regina and Astrud Gilberto, you have some very nice works by Bebel Gilberto (daughter of Miucha and Joao Gilberto) before her feature album came out, that I haven't seen her release elsewhere, including a sensational version of "One Note Samba/Girl from Ipanema" with the amazing work of Vinicius Cantuaria
Ultimately beautiful. This was a very good film in many ways. Although it appears to be simple it's quite a complex examination of adolescent confusion, fatherly love and hope - all within a class, status based society that provides the film with a nuanced backdrop. Xiaochen did frustrate me at times, as he's so very often silent, and many of his actions are selfish and heartrending considering what it puts his father through. I wanted to grab him by the shoulders and shake him. But that's really one of the many things that's good about this. At 13 or 14 kids have a host of pressures put on them, a host of confusing things to work through, and they don't have the language or the experience yet to deal with it. Xiaochen is working through all that, but he also has the weight of his talent on his shoulders. So, reasonably enough, he's going to struggle to sort it all out.The ending of this is frustrating in some ways, but ultimately very beautiful also. This is a quiet film, no bells and whistles - but some satisfying complex characterization and quite wonderful music
2  words  BEAUTIFULLY ROMANTIC. This has to be one of the most romantic movies i have ever seen other than pride and prejudice of course. This movie was wonderfully done and the clothes for that era was just breath taking wonderful vintage clothing.. But the movie was so good and the emotions seem real and the ending was just wow, both actors did a great job and the guy his character just made you want to fall in love with him yourself...if your that hopless romantic then this is for you...ALSO RECOMMENDED FROM HALLMARK DVDs OR MOVIES: the seriesLove comes softlyLove's enduring promiseLove's long journeyyou have to watch and get those three you won't be disappointed...
Elektra - directors cut. Really enjoyed this movie. Crisp visuals with vibrant colours, great sound, interesting plot and character development (not always the case in comic based cinema). Plus Jennifer is a babe!The extras (sadly absent from the Australian release) were interesting though not all of them will receive repeat viewings!Well packaged too, also contains a mini comic book for fans of the Elektra "graphic novels". A worthy addition to "Superhero"/"comic book" dvd collections
So Far, So Good!. Finally available in the US in DVD format!  Boy, does this one bring back memories!  Admittedly, at the time of its release, Slade In Flame wasn't exactly what I was expecting from Slade.  The sudden departure from the hallmark sound that had made them a fixture at the top of the UK charts was surprising, to say the least.  The stomp and shout backgrounds were replaced by a horn section and a piano, and while Noddy's raw vocals are still quite prominent, it was clear that the group was making a conscious effort to put some creative distance between the new album and those that came before it.But like all of Slade's material, it took no time for Slade In Flame to grow on me, and I found myself wishing that I could get my hands on the film.  I had to wait almost 30 years, but it was worth it!  The boys do a fine job of portraying an average backcountry band that makes it big only to self destruct upon attaining the success they once desired.  Seedy managers, band rivalries, internal strife between band members, as well as conflict with their girlfriends, all comes across quite convincingly, especially when you consider that none of the members of the group were trained actors at the time.  The heavy Midlands accents in the film may be a little difficult for us Yanks who are more accustomed to the slower, less idiomatic London accent, but in  my opinion, it doesn't take too long to get used to it.The highlight of this DVD release is the lengthy interview with Noddy Holder, which was done in 2002.  You can tell that Noddy loves to talk about those days, and he does it with candor, humor and wisdom.  Definitely my DVD find of the month.  Possibly the year
THIS IS A SUPER LIVE ALBUM .THE DUO PERFORM 17  OF THEIR GREATEST HITS AND MORE. THIS IS A SUPER ALBUM .HALL AND OATES GIVE STELLA LIVE PERFORMANCES,SEVEAL BONUS TRACKS ,AND INTERVIEWS. IF YOU LOVE HALL AND OATES,YOU WILL LOVE THIS DVD.IF YOU DONT LIKE THEM,THIS PERFORMANCE,MAY CHANGE YOUR MIND. I OWN THIS DISC AND I HIGHLY RECOMMEND IT
The best love story of 2006!!!. I'm not going into the plot of The Lake House.  Other reviewers have already done a much better job on that than I can.  What I will say is that I've watched this movie on DVD at least eight times since I bought it, and the story line and acting still hold up magnificently for me.  What shifts this film from being a good love story to a great love story is the ending.  I didn't see it coming, though friends of mine said that they did.  The first time that I saw the ending, it hit me with a powerful emotional punch that left me breathless and my eyes full of tears.  That made this movie a winner in my opinion.  Like many of the other reviewers, I feel that Keanu Reeves and Sandra Bullock have the right chemistry with each other, and it was wonderful seeing them together again.  I would highly recommned this film to any individual who enjoyed The Notebook, Message In a Bottle, The Horse Whisperer, and The Bridges of Madison County.  Though the writers of the film used a two-year span of time between the main characters and their relationship with each other, it's still a movie about finding that one person you can love with all of your heart.  Good stuff!!!
Mambo Italiano. Nobody can send up the immigrant Italian experience like an immigrant Italian. They spoof themselves so well because they tell the truth, and the rest of us are afraid to be so truthful lest we wind up in the river wearing cement overshoes.For example, I remember Joe Dolce singing "Shaddap You Face." And so do you. When this song was popular, Mamma had married into another Italian family, and we'd be at the family-owned pizzeria, and we'd all be drinking beer on tap, and somebody would pop a quarter into the jukebox, and we'd all sing "Shaddap You Face." And hell, I'm not even Italian.This movie is absolutely hilarious. We were watching this and just cracking up. It was filmed in Canada, and even that was funny. One of the main characters, played by Paul Sorvino, was upset because there are two Americas. The real one, USA, and the fake one, Canada. They moved to Canada from the Old Country because they didn't know any better.Great, great movie. Oh, you want more? Okay, I got more right here. What's worse than being a gay Italian? Nothing! Fuggetaboutit!Seriously, it's hard to believe this is only 90 minutes. They covered a lot of ground, because they know it ain't new, and I just want to use the word hilarious again.
One of the best mob movie's ever. The definitive mob movie. Scorcese is the master of the genre. This is the way the real mob works, with the guys on the streets, not the man at the top. Masterful performances by all involved. Lorraine Bracco is gorgeous in this movie. Joe Pesci is never going to be cast as anything other than the character he plays in this movie, a wise mouth gangster. Shows a balanced account of the good and the bad about the mob.
I Know where I am Going. I wanted to see this movie as my father was one of the pipers in it.I thought it was a nice romantic movie for its time bearing in mind it was made in 1944!!
A nice fan for Lizzy. Four excellent DVDs are contained in this box, This is Elizabeth Taylor's box, and although our fascination goes more to the boxed set of the Legendary Duo: Taylor/Burton, this nevertheless is a must buy too.It covers almost thirty years of Liz Taylor's career, starting with "National Velvet" in 1944, followed by "Father of the Bride", the original version of 1950 which actually has Spencer Tracy starring in it, Elizabeth just having a secondary role there, cued by the mythical "Cat on a Hot Tin Roof" (1958) and ending with the melodrama "Butterfield 8", the only one in which Liz played opposite her own then husband: Eddie Fisher and co-starring Laurence Harvey in 1960.The first two come in a full screen presentation (Cinemascope and Panavision widescreen presentations were only introduced in 1953). The other two come in their correct theatrical ratio.There are no frills here, like specials, interviews or some other fluff, but the movies were decently transferred and the sound, although mono on all four, is fairly crisp and well polished.Well worth its price if you asked me, and you did not..
Billy Zane is the absolute sexiest man to ever live. This movie is where I first saw Billy Zane.  It is the most erotic movie I have ever seen.  I loved the amazing attraction between Billy and Joan.  It was an exciting ride from beginning to end.  Billy Zane is absolutely  devine!!
You should definately buy this right now!. Devil hunter Yohko is classic Anime at it's best! This show may be a bit dated, but it still has sexy girls, engaging plots, and great music. This DVD is absolutely exceptional in every way and I strongly recomend it for any anime fan(provided you can deal with the nudity of course)
The best baby video out there!. This is another winner for the baby faith team.  My child interacts with the cute and funny puppets shows and dances to the music.  I find myself humming the tunes throughout the day too.  The best was when the narrator (Jodi Benson of Disney's Little Mermaid fame) says "God Loves You" and my two year old turned around, gave me a big hug and said, "God Loves me and God Loves You too!"  Talk about bringing tears to my eyes!  These products are great!!
Dylan toys with the press for 50 minutes - Fun!. In December 1965 - less than 6 months after Dylan went "electric" at the Newport Folk Festival, he was in San Francisco for 3 concerts. Jazz critic Ralph Gleason arranged for a televised hour-long press conference at WQED and recorded it on video. Thanks to the late Gleason's son Toby (who has made many of his father's Jazz Casual" jazz shows available on DVD), the full press conference is now available. This is a MUST for true Dylan fans and an entertaining curiosity for those who were fascinated by Martin Scorsese's documentary on Dylan earlier this year.By technical standards, the print is top notch and sharp. The sound is the best that can be expected when the questioners did not use microphones to ask Dylan their questions. (You can hear his answers just fine!).There were about 30 reporters in the room, including poet Allen Ginsburg (who Dylan lists - in answer to one question - as one of his favorite poets).I won't give away all of the gems which come from Dylan during the 50-minute conference but He's really prophetic when asked: "If you were to sell out to `commercial interests', what would they be ?". He replies "Ladies garments" . 40 years later he was doing commercials for Victoria's Secret!Dylan is VERY relaxed in his manner and quite open. He chain smokes through the whole session.This DVD has no bonus features and is sort of budget priced, so it's definitely worth a watching and , if you are a Dylan completist, adding to your collection.Steve Ramm "In The Groove"
"Well, the only answer to THAT would be....." (just watch the show). Archie Bunker is the funniest sitcom character in television history. I own all five seasons and am eagerly awaiting the sixth. Of course, like most sitcoms, the humor of the first season does not have quite as much punch as the rest of them. But, I DID about split my side on the very last episode of this season, especially where Archie says...(see review title)
The British Style of Warfare. Britain has traditionally been a naval power but neverhad a large standing army.  This has prodded its militaryplanners to think in unconventional terms in strikingat its enemies.  This means using its naval forces tomove stealthily around its continental enemiesusing naval forces  and to try to use deceptionto get the enemy off guard, rather than confrontingthem head on.  The failed First World War operation at Gallipoli wasa good example of this, trying to strike at Germany"through the back door", rather than just head onin the blood-soaked trenches of Flanders on theWestern Front.In the Second World War, all the British leaders  andsenior officershad been traumatized by the slaughter of theFirst World War and were desperate to come up withways of avoiding a replay.  Thus, in 1943, after NorthAfrica had been cleared of Axis forces, the Britishmilitary leaders sought a way to distract the Germansfrom the obvious next target, which was Sicily.The result was deception of "Operation Mincemeat" which is portrayedin this excellent film. The film is based on EwenMontagu's book "The Man Who Never Was".  This filmis of a long-lost genre of films which are rivetingin spite of the fact that they don't have any "action",(i.e. shoot-outs, fist fights, car chases, etc), like another of my favorites "Twelve Angry Men".A close observation of the film shows, beside the mainstory, a lot of other information showing what wartimeBritain was like, such as how London became run-downand grimy during the long years of bombing and austerity,how the British learned to take the air raids in stride,the resignation to the on-going deaths of relatives andfriendsand the shortages of quality consumer goods. In addition,we see the manifestations of the traditionally tense relationship betweenBritain and Ireland as well as Scotland. For militarybuffs, there is a brief look at the legendary Mosquitofighter/bomber and the unsung British submarine force (ascompared to those of the United States and the GermanU-Boat force).One thing to keep in mind is that while Montagu makesno mention of German efforts to authenticate the existenceof "Major Martin", the film devotes a considerable partof its plot to that, which I assume is "overdramatized"to keep the interest of the audience.  The film claimsthat the German (actually Irish) agent actually gets incontact with someone who had a part in the whole operation,and I doubt whether this is factual.  However,this is a minor point and does not detract from the excellence of the film
Absolutely Hilarious. This is one of the funniest DVDs I have ever seen! You can watch it over and over again and its still just as funny.Definately a must for any video collection
Watch it for the elf!!. I won't bore you with another telling of the story, but will just tell you that the entire movie is worth watching just for Ed Gale as Stan the elf.  He did a fantastic job of playing a role that is usually kind of hard to make noticeable.  There are so many elves in so many Christmas movies that you start to feel you've seen it all.  The movie is well worth watching and I'll watch again just to see "Stan.
pleased as punch. I thoroughly enjoyed the DVD.  It told the story of his life, with great music, and included his family and friends.  It made him come to life for me, and was informative of his life and relationships with those close to him
Seriously Potent Stuff!. Larry Cohen's GOD TOLD ME TO is one of the most intelligent, gritty horror/thrillers ever made! In New York, a series of mass murders occur with each perpetrator saying the title phrase. But is there something more going on here? Tony Lo Bianco is excellent as the devout Catholic policeman who is investigating this bizarre phenomenon and discovers something really shocking about himself along the way! As with most cult movies, GOD TOLD ME TO must be seen to be believed; it's a genuinely thought-provoking and scary thriller that raises interesting questions about religion. The visual style is amazing; it inspired the look of shows like NYPD BLUE and 24. In the tradition of the best science fiction movies, GOD TOLD ME TO raises more questions than answers, and very important questions at that. Don't miss it
The best of the Dracula movies. Easily.  The eerie sets and atmosphere, the classy writing, the top-notch acting, the (for the time) daring use of color and sexuality...etc. Untouchable
Great for All Ages. This is a wonderful film that entertains our 6 and 4 year old granddaughters, and had all the adults captivated as well.  It can be watched more than once - an important feature with little ones - and still be enjoyed.  There are some scary moments, but nothing overwhelming - It is a safe PG.Pay attention to the small details as that is where much of the subtle and not so subtle humor lies.A lot of fun, and well worth more than one viewing
Still relevant after all these years (1970). Good old-fashioned slapstick comedy, Bananas illustrates the dictatorship to revolution to new dictatorship cycle of third world - and worldwide - bureaucracies. The most hoot-aloud hilarious of Woody Allen's films
Classic Swashbuckler. The movie that made Flynn a star.  One of five great pirate movies no collection should be without
Season 1-great 2-excellent 3...good but... I agree with most reviewers that the first 2 season were ofquality entertainment...Season 3 is good, but im sure the writerscould have written better stuff. Its starting to feel like CSIStill its one of the best show of its kind.Be ready to be entertained.......
Remember goal scoring?. Back in the '80s when teams actually tried to score we got Mario Lemieux's between the legs beauty, Wayne Gretzky scoring 802 NHL goals! and Bobby Orr flying through the air. A good selection of classic NHL goals are here and shows us all what we're missing in the NHL of the '90s and '00s
the best of the series. On reviewing this excellent Granada series, one must always keep in mind two separate criteria. One, the original writing of Doyle and two, the Granda production team, including of course the now legendary performance of Jeremy Brett, without question now the ultimate Holmes for the 20th century. You can't really fault the Granda production for what is unfortunately, some of Doyle's weaker stories such as Lady Carfax, for instance.In this series of 11 episodes however, both the writing and the production are top notch all the way, and it is arguably the best collection of the whole group.Doyle purists may prefer the Adventures, and with good reason, for the stories were fresh, creative and Doyle had not yet tired of writing about his famous detective.But was it luck or theatrical Fate that brought Edward Hardwicke into the series, precisely at the point where Holmes and Watson's relationship necessarily becomes more personal and complex - right from the first episode where Watson displays a range of emotions upon finding Holmes alive in "The Empty House"?Although David Burke does an admirable job in the first series, it is Hardwicke who is able to take us further into the personal ups and downs of their friendship with all the humor and understanding that fully fleshes out the two main characters.Hardwicke's subtle psychological insight into Watson's role is only one of the rewards of this magnificent series.Where else will you see the humanity of Holmes so revealed as in "The Devil's Foot" - the only time Holmes ever addresses Watson as "John" - as he battles his cocaine addiction? Where else will you see a more mature and compassionate Holmes comforting women in distress, as in "The Man With the Twisted Lip"?Holmes is never better than when solving a murder mystery, and you get that in spades here, as in "The Devil's Foot", "The Abbey Grange" and "Silver Blaze". "The Six Napoleons" takes us into the Italian subculture, and "Wisteria Lodge" into Latin American politics. And Jeremy Brett was never better than in the scenes where he discovers the ancient crown of England, or the consummate acting job - using only his facial expressions - to reveal his insights into the secret of "The Second Stain".There's something for every Sherlock Holmes fan here. And again, what really makes this group of episodes stand out is the richness and humanity between the characters, not only between Holmes and Watson, but also with Mrs. Hudson and the Scotland Yard inspectors. Even Mycroft, Holmes brother, makes an appearance in "The Bruce Partington Plans", which further humanizes Holmes character as we see the two brothers relationship developed more.What are you waiting for? Buy this series now! You'll enjoy it again and again.Michael Thurman
Hercules (Disney Gold Classic Collection)  ~ Tate Donovan. Hercules (Disney Gold Classic Collection)~ Tate Donovan is a great animated movie. Yeah it is Dinseys take on the greek classics but they do it with wink of the eye and they do not take themselves all that seriously. The animation is first class and I love the witty and smart dialogue. The songs and the music are some of the best in the business and right up their with Disneys other classics such as Shark Tale, Finding Nemo, Lion King and many others. The scene with baby hercules and baby pegasus is just too cute. Yeah it is totally different then from the old classics then again I did not expect this movie to be a retelling of a work of Homer or some other greek classical auhtor. That is the stuff that one reads in college or graduate school. This movie should not be missed. Totally recommended
me love movie. it a very good movies, especially if u have the new dvd you can acutally see two different movies, everything is the same but some on the dub version are really not on the original one, have fun if you have this movies, i have seen it 10 times since i got is and i still like it
"Best Movie Ever Made!". Probably the greatest biographical film ever made, "Mommie Dearest" holds a place in American pop culture not only as a film classic but a movie people still talk about nearly 26 years after its initial release. No matter what you think of it the film comes across as an absorbing drama that pulls the lid of Hollywood's elite. The film basically ruined Joan Crawford's image as a beautiful, articulate, hard working actress and Faye Dunaway's career has never been the same. Most know the whole story...it's excellent. So I'll go into detail about the DVD. Film is beautifully restored with a ton of bonus features including the trailer, picture gallery with still shots not seen in the film ,and a behind the scenes making of the film. A must for any Hollywood film buff
"Why are the Sartres always born on the other side?". World War II was over, and the imperial way of life that had brought it and its predecessor seemed to be crumbling. India, the Philippines, and other nations had gained their independence. France had lost Indochina to communist rebels, and around the hills and scattered towns of Algeria they were facing a new threat. A true danger, however, came in Algiers when the FLN, the proponent behind the revolution, began terrorist attacks against the French quarter of the city.Gillo Pontecorvo's "The Battle of Algiers" focuses on the Algerian struggle against French rule, as well as French retaliation for the terrorist acts. However, it looks at this conflict from both sides equally, and the French are never dehumanized to any degree. As Colonel Mathieu, the man in charge of most operations, says to his men, "There are over 400,000 Arabs in Algiers. Are they all our enemies? We know they're not." Through out the film he is very respectful and admirable of the FLN leaders and their strong faiths. Spike Lee, in an interview on the DVD's many features, says that even though Colonel Mathieu claims the French are not Nazis or sadists since many French officers fought against the fascists, they really are. I don't think director Gillo Pontecorvo would agree at all with that statement. In an interview on the DVD he says that it was important to get in the minds of both sides, and so there was no reason to portray the French paratroopers as monsters, specifically mentioning the SS. No scene drove this home to me more than the scene where an angry French crowd mobs a young Arab boy, beating him near death until a French policeman dives into the violence, sweeps the boy in his arms, and darts away from danger. Would you expect to see an SS soldier do the same for a Jewish boy assaulted by a German crowd? The blame of this conflict is not on the French paratroopers or the French themselves but, as Pontecorvo says, on "the error on error and transigince of colonialism."Sadly, I think much of this is lost on today's audience. Many TV clips or documentaries that mention the film will show French atrocities but not a single bit of French dead or the acts of Algerian terrorism. I've even seen (and I swear I'm not making this up) the scene where French paratroopers spot terrorists disguised as women re-edited and the subtitles changed to make it look like the French are firing on unarmed women. That's the problem with most political films nowadays - they are self-serving or one-sided, meant only to "preach to the converted" (as Mira Nair says in the DVD's interview) - and it is so hard for people to admit that maybe, possibly, the person they disagree with could be in the right. The film doesn't take that route: when Algerians are killed from a bomb placed by French officers, sad music plays; when French civilians are killed by Algerian bombs the same sad music plays. Life has an equal value no matter what your cause or nationality may be. Nowadays, the Algerians would be portrayed as strong, upright moral people who were fighting demons, and the paratroopers really would be portrayed like the SS.The film also looks at issues of counterterrorism often overlooked by reviewer and critic alike, such as the role of the press. When asked by reporters if he can win the war, Colonel Mathieu responds that "it depends on you," saying that they need to give him "political will, which is sometimes there and sometimes isn't."Gillo Pontecorvo, with experience in documentary work, shoots his film much like a documentary. Specific characters will have their background read to the audience by a narrator, and dates and times will be captioned under events. However, this doesn't make you feel distant from the characters and they are allowed to develop. The filmmaking is astounding, with camera work and use of music that seemed ahead of their time, or at least something you would not expect to see in a film from the mid-60's. One of my favorite shots came from the end, where a French policeman shouts into a rioting crowd, "What do you want?" and we watch the crowd slowly move through the smoke, shouting for independence.It's clear to everyone that the film touches the subject of terrorism and counterterrorism, as well as political and social issues. It's easy to name-drop current events and locations, but I personally think this detracts from the point of the film, which is stronger than that. Historical events happen only once - ideas and concepts are eternal
Surprisingly Mature Early Work. In only his second directorial effort, Allen hits the ground running.  Combining mockumentary with crime caper, he describes the life and loves of an incompetent thief.  Alot of the humor is stand-up comedy set precariously in film scenes.  Though often poorly staged, the jokes themselves are fast and hilarious.  Allen still had a ways to go but his moviemaking genius is on full display here.
A cult classic!. George Newman ( Weird Al Yankovic) is a daydreaming loser who just recently lost his job at Burger World, luckily his uncle Harvey ( Stanley Brock) wins a local TV station at a poker game before it's bankrupted. Uncle Harvey puts his trust in George to take care of the station and help keep the station from going down the drain, he creates popular new bizare shows like "Conan The Librarian", " Wheel of Fish" etc, making it the new highest rated station in the city but as a greedy rival network owner ( Kevin McCarthy)is getting quite jealous and wants to run the UHF station down, but it's up to George's friends to help battle against the tycoon.Entertaining and flat out funny satire on the media that was originally a box-office bomb turned into a cult fave on video and TV showings. It co-stars Billy Barty, Fran Drescher, Geedee Wantanabe ( "Sixteen Candles", "E.R.", "Mulan"), and Seinfeld's Michael Richards, the movie is in my opinion a successful breakthrough for Weird Al Yankovic into movies as he also co-wrote the script. There's plenty of good laughs including that funny yet cool animated dream sequence "Beverly Hillbillies"/"Money for Nothing".This DVD has good picture and sound quality even some cool extras like easter eggs, a hilarious audio commentary by Weird Al, Victoria Jackson, director Jay Levey, Michael Richards, and Emo Philips. A Music video, promotional materials, deleted scenes, widescreen and fullscreen presentations and production stills.A most recommended comedy for anyone who loves Weird Al, comedy and parody movies.Also recommended: "The Kentucky Fried Movie", "Amazon Women on the Moon", " Spaceballs", "Young Frankenstein", "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes", "Return of the Killer Tomatoes", " Freaked", " The Naked Gun", and "Hot Shots!"
Hall Leaves On A High Note. Conrad Hall went out with a bang. The great film photographer finished his illustrious career with this movie before passing on. He did himself proud as this is one of the best-looking crime films you'll ever see.Of course, the acting ain't bad when you have Tom Hanks and Paul Newman playing the leads! The amount of action in here is just right, too: not too much; not too little.None of the characters in here, frankly, are "good guys" as Hanks is a professional hit-man for town boss Newman. Hanks' only redeeming quality is not wanting his young son to wind up a killer like him, although he does teach him how to be the getaway man in robberies! Huh?As good as the acting is and as interesting as the story is, the real star of this film is cinematographer Hall, who paints scene after beautiful scene with his lens. His work is just awesome
Fantastic animated rendition. It's hard to believe, but I never heard of Wind in the Willows until I was about 16 years old, when it was first read aloud to me, around a glowing campfire. It was an instant love affair.Years later, I shared the classic with my children. So when we found an animated version of the book for sale in a neighbor's tag sale, we snapped it up. We've loved the film ever since.The animal characters--Badger, Mole, Toad, Weasel  and all the others--congregate often at Toad Hall and elsewhere, and the story takes many delightful turns.This animated version, directed by Dave Unwin, is every bit as classic as the book. Your children will surely love it as much as we did--including the child in this particular mom.--Alyssa A. Lappe
Sophie's Choice. Longish though compelling drama about a Polish woman, Sophie (Meryl Streep) who has endured Auschwitz; her schizophrenic Jewish lover, Nathan (Kevin Kline), who torments her; and a young Southern writer, Stingo (Peter MacNicol), who lives in the same Brooklyn tenement with them shortly after the war. Both Nathan and Stingo are in love with her, which figures into part of Sophie's "choice"; late in the film we are exposed to her other choice, made during her concentration camp days, which has riddled her life with guilt - a guilt that forces her to choose the sadistic Nathan and eventual suicide.The characterizations are excellent - we are drawn in despite the length and lavish development (the use of a narrator helps here); the acting is superb (Streep won an Oscar). It's a very moving and intelligent performance. An excellent movie; definitely worth a watch
One for the teenagers of the '90s. If you were a teenager in the mid-'90s (and enjoyed it), you will probably love this movie and relate to it.  It really captures the feel of the grunge era well.If, however, you're one of those people who hates grunge music because it's dark/depressing, you probably can't relate.Since I was in high school from '94-'98, I love Girl.  I happened upon it by accident (someone recommended Girl when he actually meant Party Girl), and I was so happy that I did.  But I know the time period has a bad reputation.  If you loathe Nirvana, Pearl Jam, Candlebox, My So-Called Life, and dyed hair, this movie probably isn't for you.All that said, I'm making my assessment of the movie without having read the book, so if you want a book/movie comparison you'll have to look at other reviews
Kaufman Lends Surprising Humanism to an Exceptional Mind-Bending Story of Loss and Regret. Screenwriter Charlie Kaufman's reality-bending work has become such a Hollywood staple that he is becoming more distinctive than the directors who give life to his wildly imaginative and solipsistic scripts. He dares to give dramatic form to nebulous psychological states that border on horror stories. Directed by Michel Gondry, this 2004 study in love and loss is no exception, as Kaufman takes the notion of a struggling relationship and inverts it into a manic piece of science fiction involving a medical procedure to scrub one's memory. At the same time, Gondry and Kaufman have injected a strong dose of humanism into this film by grounding it with characters that are relatable as much as they are quirky.The labyrinth plot focuses on shy, taciturn Joel Barish, who is swept off his feet by the raucous, unstable Clementine. Much to his dismay after a particularly ugly fight, he discovers that Clementine has impulsively decided to erase all memory of her relationship with him through a medical company called Lacuna headed by the benevolent Dr. Mierzwiak. A renowned leader in his field of memory erasure, Mierzwiak treats the heartbroken Joel to the same procedure as Clementine's. However, Joel is overcome by the intensity of emotion from this act of reciprocation and starts rebelling against the deep consciousness treatment to regain his memories of Clementine. The surreal twists and turns that occur boggle the mind of the viewer but not in a way that alienates us from Joel's plight.It helps that a sturdy cast has been recruited starting with a surprisingly subdued Jim Carrey as the depressed Joel. This is easily his most effective attempt at a straight dramatic role even though Gondry allows him to provide flashes of his manic personality when appropriate. Displaying no trace of her corseted Britishness as the bedraggled free spirit Clementine, Kate Winslet shows the right level of abandon and leavens it with her natural earthiness. Tom Wilkinson is his usual steady self as the somewhat remorseful Mierzwiak, while his spirited trio of assistants is played with relish by Kirsten Dunst, Mark Ruffalo and Elijah Wood. All three are fine with Dunst particularly affecting toward the end.The looping narrative could have spiraled out of control had it not been for the stellar work by cinematographer Ellen Kuras, production designer Dan Leigh and editor Valdis Oskarsdottir, all combining to bring much-needed fluidity to initially incoherent scenes. The only fly in the ointment is Jon Brion's overly intrusive music. The 2004 DVD has several extras, the best of which is the consistently informative commentary track by Gondry and Kaufman, which helps explain some of the more bizarre plot turns. There are two featurettes - a standard ten-minute making-of short and a fifteen-minute conversation with Gondry and Carrey that borders on banal. Seven minutes of understandably excised scenes are included, as well as a creative music video of The Polyphonic Spree's "Night and Day" and a faux-commercial for Lacuna
I love David Cassidy. Unfortunately,I bought it for my U.S mate who was crazy about David Cassidy so much as I would have loved to see it. I live in U.K so if ever you get U.K version Yes please I'll definitely order one.Happy New Year to you all.Catriona Burk
Sinatra at his best. I suppose much can be said about this movie's lack of faithfulness to the stage play. A hardened Joey, a more callous Joey, an essentially darker Joey... these things are worth exploring and would be interesting to see. Also, if the cut songs are as good as the ones included, then we have indeed lost much, for the numbers in the film are uniformly excellent. With that said, there is nothing wrong in having the cynic in us take a back burner for once, and watching a pretty decent feel-food movie with a fabulous cast, superb performances, and really excellent music.Perhaps the one downer in the film is Kim Novak who, even though she does a respectable job in "My Funny Valentine", still manages to irk. Reminiscent of a female Keanu Reeves (she was great in "Vertigo" for a reason: She just had to act doe-eyed and aloof. Perfect!) she is pretty annoying here. Oh, and lest we forget, the dream sequence is also burdensome, but it was almost a rite of passage before the ending of a whole lot of musicals, so we'll tolerate it here.As for the great aspects of the film, there are many: Rita Hayworth is excellent, with "Zip" as her defining moment in the film. Sinatra, of course, is simply fantastic, and elevates the "Lady is the Tramp" sequence to new heights of artistry.Buy it for Sinatra, fall in love with Rita Hayworth, and tolerate Kim Novak
Sean Penn and Nicholson make a great team. Penn is amazing what what he put to script hereNicholson or Jack Nicholson is brilliant as his rolethe movie touches you , scares you, shocks you, keeps you guessing a little about what will happen at the end. but overall a truly moving movie. have it on dvd and it never let me down. it never has and never will. the crossing guard is truly a gem like Chinatown with Nicholson in it. I could watch this movie again and again and again. Nicholson really shines in this role for a movie. and the cast is innovative and picked out quite well :
WOW!!!. The greatest show ever to hit T.V. You will never know what happens next on this show and that is one of the many elements that make this show great,It always keeps you guessing and wanting more.C.T.U(Counter Terrorist Unit) and C.T.U operative Jack Bauer(Keifer Sutherland)try and stop terrorist threats all within 24 hours which is in real time. What I like about this show is that Keifer Sutherlands character Jack Bauer is not afraid to do what ever it takes to stop a terrorist threat even if it is going against C.T.U or the President. Another great aspect of the show is they are not afraid to kill off main characters that you grow to love on the show, so you will never now what is going to happen next which keeps you wanting more. You still reading, stop and go buy the first season right now. Hell, buy all 4 right now thats how good it is
Legend. I must admit . . . I originally saw the movie because of the soundtrack.  I am a huge Tangerine Dream fan, as well as Brian Ferry.  I was pleasantly surprised by the movie's ability to take me to a very believable fantasy world.  The lighting and special effects were quite good for the time.  The scenes in which Tim Curry were present had a very dark, forboding feel.  The overall movie is a great time if you like the fantasy genre
Lessons never learned?. Watch this movie right before you watch Fog of War - you will get goosebumps and it might change how you see the world
!!!! Five Cary Grant movies never before released on DVD or video?  Thanks, Universal!!!. Cary Grant stars in these early films made before he becomes famous. Big Brown Eyes / Kiss and Make Up / Thirty Day Princess / Wedding Present / Wings in the DarkThirty Day Princess (1934) stars Grant as a newspaperman and Sylvia Sidney as the princess and the girl who impersonates her in this comedy.Kiss and Make Up (1934) has Grant in an unusual role for him, as a egotistical plastic surgeon who falls for his patient (Genevieve Tobin).  Co-stars Edward Everett Horton.Wings in the Dark (1935) pairs Grant with Myrna Loy as two troubled lovers.Big Brown Eyes (1936) features Cary Grant and Joan Bennett.  Grant is on the trail of jewel thieves with the help of Bennett.   Walter Pidgeon also co- stars.Last, but not least, Wedding Present (1936) stars Cary Grant and Joan Bennett again as reporters in this screwball comedy.All in all, great to have these lesser known films on video.  There is also a Rock Hudson Screen Legend Collection, Bing Crosby Screen Legend Collection and of course the Glamour collections of Carole Lombard, Mae West and Marlene Dietrich are already out.  Thanks Universal!  Now how about some more Deanna Durbin
The Summer Of 1963. This is my first time seeing Shag and it was pretty much alright. The music, dancing and girls in bikinis were, at the time, the chemistry for this comedy-drama. For those who like 1960's fun and troublemaking, I suggest All I Wanna Do and Hairspray
ANOTHER HARRYHAUSEN CLASSIC. This is another fine example of the incredible body of work the Master Ray Harryhausen has to offer. The dreaded 7 headed hydra and the famous 7 skeleton sword fight are two of the many highlights in this film. The DVD transfer could have been better, but there are some nice extras
good but not great. I was expecting more from this movie but it left me wanting more...The movie was strange and a little disturbing but there ws nothing scary or horror like about it...I would recommend this film if you're a Takashi Miike fan
Just Wondering. I think the movie is kinda a kip off of a nother movie but this one is better and the band in the move is very good and so are the songs and if anyone knows the name i would like to kno
A fine make-over for a so-so episode. Here is the Ark in Space DVD!  Compared to the earlier Tom Baker Doctor Who DVDs, most notably Robots of Death, this DVD is positively loaded.  Although this isn't my all-time favorite story, it does contain one of the Doctor's finest speeches about humanity.  What immediately comes to mind are the new CGI model footage shots of the space station that you can opt to have inserted in place of the old ones as you watch the story.  There is an unused title sequence that features the TARDIS against a black backdrop and then launching forward with different travel design.  There are two easter eggs.  One is of video of a clock with a voice counting down.  The other is this bizarre 2-3 second shot of Tom Baker announcing that he's running off to Blackpool and then telling us to brush our teeth.  There's a great Tom Baker interview that must have been done just after he took over as the Doctor.  All in all, this DVD release is first class; the five stars are therefore for the packaging and content of the extras and not necessarily the story itself, which is still not half bad-----just not as good as the Image of the Fendahl or Talons of Weng Chiang...
When was he watching me?. What a hoot! Arnold really captures the art of BEING pregnant. As a mother and a grandmother I can honestly say, 'he nailed it'. Never before have I seen anybody portray pregnancy with such a laugh a minute humor. It's a movie to watch over and over again
I have loved this little movie for 11 years of potty training!!. I have loved this little movie.  I wish the parents portion and the childrens portion were on different tapes/dvd's.I have the girls version and have used it for my 2 older girls and even my son, and am now using it again for my youngest.We use different terminology, but my kids have all loved it and have all potty trained while using it.I put their potty in the family room by the tv and they "sit, and sit, AND SIT..." while watching their "potty video"
It is all true. Maybe some people can get it through humor. I hope so.
Northern Exposure season 4   on DVD. I love Northern Exposure.  It never fails to entertain and make you think about things in a different way.  It often times touches me.  The characters are well written as well as acted.  There are outrageous scenes as well as the most tender moments
30 Days Makes You Think. This is an excellent series that provides many opportunities to examine your own beliefs.  It is also a wonderful starting point for a group discussion.  Spurlock gives facts and thoughts on both sides of each issue
A masterpiece: One of the original slasher films. I hadn't heard of Black Christmas until I heard about the remake recently. Instead of paying to see the remake in the theatre, I went out and got the original. And I'm definitely glad that I did.Black Christmas introduces the idea of the first person camera killer shot that we see used by John Carpenter in the opening scene of Halloween. And it uses this effect very effectively as we watch a man climbing the trellis of a sorority house into the attic.The film is paced very slowly, with the killer making phone calls in between murders to speak incoherently and scream into the phone. Everything coming out of the phone is clearly from the mind of a mad man, and leaves the recipient of the call, as well as the viewer, with goosebumps crawling over their skin.With each murder, the tension grows as the audience wonders when the killer will be discovered. With the momentum that the film starts out with, it's hard to fathom that it can maintain its pace, but it does so and it does so very very effectively.Black Christmas is a horror classic of the highest rank; it's the kind of horror movie that made the slasher genre so popular, before franchises like Friday the 13th, Nightmare On Elm Street, and even Halloween now, turned the genre into dumbed-down presentations of gore, nudity, and one-liners. While those franchises still hold special places in horror-buffs hearts, Black Christmas is the kind of film that brings back what makes horror films work.The special features are a bit boring, but it's still interesting to hear what some of the actors have to say 30 years later, as well as some Q & A by the director. If you haven't seen Black Christmas yet, and you're a fan of horror movies, definitely check it out
Stupendously awful. Cyborg is perhaps one of the worst movies I've ever seen.  The acting is bad even for a Van Damme film, the sets are terribly forced and the plot is simply pointless.  You will gain nothing from watching this movie.  Even the fight scenes aren't nearly as well choreographed as in Bloodsport or Kick-Boxer.  Plus it lacks an old Asian man to show our hero the way to defeat young and muscular Asian men (see Bloodsport, Kick-Boxer and The Quest).So why did I give it five stars?  The truth about this movie is that no more than one minute into it you are hooked.  It is like a train wreck and you cannot turn away until the full hour and twenty-six minutes have passed.  It isn't even that you are entertained, but more like in a trance.  Part of your mind says, "why am I watching this?  Turn it off" while the other says, "OK that had to be the worst scene in the movie so the next will be better, right?"  Wrong.  The ending (I won't spoil it) is beyond corny and is the capstone on the movie.It must be mentioned that in this movie, Jean Claude pretends he is Jesus.  Jesus Claude, unlike the other Jesus, found an almost miraculous way off his crucifix.  You simply have to see it to believe it.  Do not spend more than eight dollars on this movie, new
When The Truth Hurts. What happens when little Max Reede (Justin Cooper) blows out the candles on his birthday cake and wishes his Dad couldn't lie anymore? Fletcher (Jim Carrey) an unscrupulous lawyer (is there any other kind?) happens to be Max's father. When the birthday wish becomes reality things quickly begin to fall apart for poor Fletcher. After all, what good is a lawyer who can't lie? One thing is certain, Fletcher is about to discover how much the truth can both hurt and heal.First let me say that I'm not generally a Jim Carrey fan. I find his films inane, vapid and predictable. That along with his excessively loud, over-the-town acting style absolutely drives me crazy. With that said, I must now confess that I've found one exception to that rule. That exception is the unrelentingly hilarious 'Liar Liar.'All the things that drive me insane about Jim Carrey somehow work wonderfully in this film. It also contains a cast of some of my favorites; Maura Tierney as Fletcher's ex-wife Audrey and Cary Elwes as her new love interest Jerry. I also have to mention the very sexy Krista Allen makes a brief but memorable appearance as the 'girl in the elevator.
The Leopard be Damned!. I have enjoyed reading the reviews of The Leopard: Let us now bow our heads and praise Luchino...  I first saw The Leopard in a big movie theater, in Paris in 1971, in Italian with French subtitles.  My French, she is not so good, and my Italian, well, it is nonexistent!  But I got the point!  As the many reviewers of The Leopard point out, the film is beautiful, sweeping and grand, (a masterpiece!) the story of a nobleman faced with challenges brought on by changing times.  And with every new problem, the old cat deftly avoids catastrophe and steers his family into the future.  ... and the film is soooo boring!!!  Its beautiful, but the story goes nowhere.Some review writers of The Damned were shocked, some seemed to be amused, and others were disgusted.  In my opinion, all these views reflect the writer's circumstances as much, if not more, than the merits or flaws of the actual film.The Damned is simply the flip side of The Leopard.  Same basic situation, but this time the old man is killed off right at the start, and the family then slides into degradation, perversion, etc. etc. until the most immoral member is left in charge, offering his mother poison as a wedding present.  Nice?  No. But not at all boring.Perhaps I overstate the case, and maybe conflict and plot are less important in Visconti's films than character, music, sets, dialogue and costumes.  I'll let others argue those points.  What I do suggest is that neither The Damned or The Leopard should be praised or condemned too much without seeing, comparing and contrasting both of these remarkable films with each other.  Only then can Luchino Visconti's films be evaluated as expressions of a cinematic genius and/or a regional chauvinist
So many mutants, so little time. The third installment of the very successful mutant franchise ends with a very loud bang! Filled with more action and special effects that you could ever hope for... no to mention all the mutants they could cram in 2 hours.  This was a very good movie, if you can set aside the fact that it has no plot whatsoever.  XMen hardcore fans may be disappointed of the complete alteration of the Phoenix Saga... and of the complete moron the Juggernaut is turned into.The good: Many incredible fights and battles. Beast rules!The bad: Not a very interesting or profound plot. Juggernaut sucks!
The last seasons are the best seasons. I love this show and these last seasons are the best. My favorite is the one with Ruth Gordon as the grieving aunt who suspects that her dead niece was murdered by her niece's husband. She gets revenge by pretending to make him her sole heir. He buys it! While he is returning some legal documents to her home vault, she lets him in on her suspicions that she believes that he killed her niece. She then slams the vault door shut where he suffocates. However, she is out witted by her victim. He ingeniuosly leaves a clue leading to his murderer. It's brilliant. There is not one episode, in this set, that is not enjoyable! I am soooo happy that my Columbo set is complete. Now, I can watch one of my favorite shows whenever I want. February my collection of another one of my favorite shows will be complete, the Golden Girls.I'm a happy girl
Le French cooking tag-team!!!!. Simply wonderful!! That's about how to describe a thoroughly enjoyable way to spend some time with two of the greatest French chefs!!I have two opinions of this 4-disc set, with the first being the positive; the second opinion I label as OK, not negative, because there are no negatives when you watch these two veterans of classic French cuisine.To begin with, you have an beautifully filmed series that brings you into the home of the great Julia Child, so you feel very much a welcomed guest. And the grand dame of French cooking has invited Chef Pepin to join her in teaching you the finer points of this marvelous cuisine, so you have much to anticipate for both eyes and palate.They play off each other as old friends would, and you will be entertained as well as taught. You'll see Julia in a firefighters outfit ready with the extinguisher as she prepares for Jacque to make a flaming dessert or "calling all ducks" with a duck whistle; then you have Jacque in a Julius Caesar ensemble to introduce the namesake salad...............all of it as corny as you can get, and all of it exquisite morsels that hint of the friendship that existed between these two icons. You also cannot help but notice that our Julia has aged, and that makes the friendship between her and Jacque all that more touching. He shows his admiration and his loving respect for her by doing much of the physical work, but do not fret, she is as fiesty as always.Most of all, you will not be disappointed in the recipe jewels contained within these 4 discs of French cooking joy:(Volume I)BEEF:Steak DianeBistro SteakSteak au PoivreChateaubriandHamburger DeluxeDESSERTS:Strawberry SabayonGateau of CrepesCrepes SuzetteSALAD:Classic Caesar SaladPotato SaladSalad NicoiseComposed SaladSANDWICHES:Croque MonsieurCroque MadamPagne BagnatSeafood LoafLobster RollVEGETABLES:Stuffed ArtichokesMushroom DuxellesVery Green BeansHaricot VertsBruised PeasFrench Style PeasSTEW:Beef BurgundyPot Roast(Volume II)FISH:Sole Meuniere with Black Butter SaucePoached Snapper with CucumbersTURKEY FEAST:Giblet GravyCornbread and Sage StuffingCranberry ChutneyCreamed OnionsBraised Brussel SproutsSOUP:French Onion SoupLeek and Potato SoupVichyssoiseWatercress SoupMediterranean Fish StewEGGS:Scrambled EggsClassic OmeletteMushroom OmeletteOmelette PiperadeEggs BenedictPORK:Roast Prok LoinSauteed Pork Tenderloin with Port and PrunesGrilled Pork ChopsCREAMY DESSERTS:Creme AnglaiseIce Cream ProfiterolesCreme CaramelCreme Brulee(Volume III)SHELLFISH:Oysters and Clams on the Half ShellShrimp CocktailMoules MariniereBilli-bi SoupMoules RavigoteROAST CHICKEN:Savory Stuffed ChickenButterflied Chicken with Spice RubSOUFFLES:Cheese SouffleScallop SouffleChocolate RouladeWINTER VEGETABLES:Stuffed CabbageCauliflower au GratinGlazed Carrots and TurnipCelery Root RemouladeCHARCUTERIE (sausages and pate):Homemade SausagesSauages in BriocheCountry PateCOMFORT FOOD:Poached Chicken on a Bed of RiceChicken Pot PieCountry Style Apple Tart(Volume IV)SALMON:GravlaxSalmon TartareSalmon UnilateralOven-Roasted SalmonSalmon en PapilloteROASTS OF VEAL AND LAMB:Veal roast en CocotteSauteed Mushrooms in CreamEggplant and Zucchini GratinRoasted Leg of LambPOTATOES:A Perfect Baked PotatoPommes ByronGarlic Mashed PotatoesPommes BoulangereGratin DauphinoisePomes SoufflesDUCK:Skillet Duck with Parsnips and ShallotsTwo-Way DuckDuck Giblets and Escarole SaladNow for the "OK" part of all of this. As another reviewer mentioned, the packaging was a bit shoddy in that all the CD's arrived loose within their container because they had fallen out of the plastic grips; I think it would have been better if they had each been secured within separate plastic jackets.That being said, each disc begins with the commercials that preceded every episode of this wonderful series. But now being on DVD, they are only at the start of each disc and not each episode; they run only two minutes so they are brief. But keep in mind that theses companies helped to underwrite the cost of such an excellent series, therefore I think anyone would be hard-pressed to be upset.So for any gourmand of cooking, and even if that person is yourself, you will enjoy the series that brought you 85 recipes, 2 people, and one great time that you will appreciate. Besides, as Julia tells you, "it's real cooking, not for fluffies!
Different and fun!. I don't know why people are writing essays on this particular movie, but I thought it was pretty funny and entertaining.  I enjoyed it.  Some parts could've been funnier than they were, but for the most part, the movie did it's job....MADE ME LAUGH!!!!
more classic muddy. if your a muddy fan you will enjoy this set you wont be dissipointed
This Can Be A Real Experience For SOME People. General Leland Zevo takes over Zevo Toys and wants to secretly make weapons disguised as toys for the good of military, but that is not what Leslie Zevo wants. He only wants to carry on with his father's business who left it to Leland instead of Leslie and the general seems like he is mentally ill after a while in being convinced that he makes weapons and not toys and Leslie soon doesn't like it anymore, so the only thing left he has to do is to have his sister, his girlfriend and the general's son Patrick join him and go against the general and try to undo everything he has done with the factory. This has to be one of my favorite films. It either people love it or hate it according to every other review on this movie.
Terrifically funny, yet genuinely frightening!. This is one of my favorite horror movies of the 1980s.  It's an updated version on an old theme:  Save the young heroine from the evil, blood-sucking vampire.Chris Sarandon (Lifetime Movie Channel staple) has an absolute field day playing the villainous Jerry Dandridge.  Amanda Bearse ("Married with Children") plays Amy, the young high school target of Dandridge's desires.  And William Ragsdale (a Hollywood newcomer at the time) plays Charley, the young hero who does his best to convince others to help him save Amy.No one really believes Charley's rantings that his new neighbor next door is a vampire.  Charley's geeky best friend (played devilishly well by Stephen Geoffreys) doesn't believe him; nor does Amy.Desperate, Charley enlists the help of has-been horror actor and TV host "Peter Vincent, Vampire Killer."  Equally desperate, Vincent takes the job as Charley's "savior" because he was fired as TV host and needs the money.Roddy McDowall plays Peter Vincent extraordinarily well - first as an actor out to (wink-wink) "convince" Charley that Jerry Dandridge is NOT a vampire, and then genuinely terrified when he discovers evidence that Charley's suspicions are true.Dandridge, upon meeting Amy, sees her unearthly resemblance to a woman he once loved.  He is immediately infatuated with the young girl.But first, realizing his secret is out, Dandridge acts quickly to rid himself of the problem of Charley and his pesky friends.The special makeup effects in this film are terrific and imaginative.  The script is tightly written and well acted and Tom Holland's direction makes it work.  (Holland's other works include "Child's Play," "Thinner," "The Temp," and "Thinner").The DVD transfer is sharp and clean.  The disc features both a standard full screen version (4:3) and a widescreen version (2.35:1).  Sound is presented as 2-channel, Dolby Surround.The only DVD extra is the theatrical trailer.  Sub-titles are available in several languages:  English, French, Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, Korean, and Thai.  The disc is also close-captioned for the hearing impaired.Specs:  Running time:  116 mins.Copyright 1985 Columbia Pictures Industries, Inc.Copyright 1998 Layout and Design Columbia TriStar Home Vide
It is what it is... You can look at the cover and know it's not an A-list blockbuster. That being said, for a horror/comedy, I've always thought it was awesome. The aliens are reasonably original (obviously there was a first movie, but you know what I mean), they are cute and cuddly, with lots of teeth and poison darts in their heads; how can you not love them? The characters are reasonably well developed between the two films (they're best watched back to back, though I would skip parts 3 and 4). The special effects, while not stellar, are definately good enough to support the film in the necessary ways. And yes, who can forget the giant ball o' Critters rolling down fleeing citizens and leaving twitching skeletons in its wake (I tend to watch that part five or six times every time I watch this movie). Again, not a deeply fulfilling interpersonal drama, or whatever, but very entertaining, campy alien horror, with enough humor to keep it from being too dark. I definately recommend it
A whodunnit with (without?) a corpse. I first saw "Carnival of Souls" on the late-night show of I forgot which Australian channel. Black and white, as the original. We didn't have colour TV back then (it must have been 1969).Wow! Eerie, haunting, and the sound track disturbing, but spot on, jarring, but rightly so, almost as jarring as Kurt Weil's "Aufstieg und Fall der Stadt Mahagonny", or Shostakovich's "Charge of the Teutonic Knights" in Eisenstein's "Alexandr Nevski". Did I write "almost as jarring"? Quite as jarring.What is it about? A woman who drives off a bridge, into the river below, and is rescued.Now, spoiler ahead....Scroll downand down...and down...Do you really want to know?It is still time...All right, here it is...She has not been rescued, she has died, but she does not know it. The whole film is about how she slowly fades away from the world of the living, until she  ends up in the carnival of souls  (a carousel) where she is torn apart by the dead.No horror, no special effects, only subdued terror.I was so happy when I found this DVD in some shop, almost 30 years later, going for a song  ($10 or so). If you do happen across it, do not hesitate one moment
Excellent movie!. The Cheadle brothers teamed up to play the role of the young and adult Earl Manigault.  Supporting actors (Don cheadle, James Earl Jones, Michael Beach, Clarence Williams III, Glen Turman, Forest Whitaker, Kevin Garnett, the producer himself Eriq La Salle, and many others) were great as well.  I'm a fan of 'believable' movies and this one really pulls you in.  Eriq La Salle struck gold on this one and played a heck of a role himself!  This movie will leave you with a sobering outlook on how fragile and valuable life truly is.  I like it so much that I have it on VHS and I just orded it on DVD.  It's a must have
Nanny, Nanny Hating Bright!. Director Curtis Hanson has filmed many remarkable films: "LA Confidential" (1997) is his most awarded film, "8 Mile" (2002) is a very good movie and "In Her Shoes" (2005) a very successful incursion on a "Family Conflict" genre movie."The Hand that Rock the Cradle" (1992) is a dramatic thriller full of adrenalin. May be that to some viewers the plot is quite predictable... well it wasn't for me! I just seat at the edge of my couch for more than half the movie.The story is as follows: a recently pregnant woman pays a visit to the obstetrician and discovers that there is a new doctor there. Dr. Mott starts a check-up that ends in sexual molestation to Claire.When she returns home she shares her anguish with Michael, her husband. They decide to denounce Dr. Mott.From here on a series of dreadful events are triggered: Dr. Mott commits suicide unable to stand other patients denounces, his pregnant widow learns she's broken and have a spontaneous abort.Some months later the Bartels are enjoying their newborn and Michael convinces Claire to hire a live-in nanny allowing her to have free time for her occupations. After discarding some applicants, Claire, "casually" meets the "perfect nanny":  Peyton Flanders, who's actually Dr. Mott's widow seeking revenge.Little by little Peyton will disrupt Bartels' domestic life creating havoc amongst them, expelling the gardener, arousing jealousies, emotionally separating Claire from her young daughter and trying to seduce Michael. All this performed with reckless duplicity.Tension and violence increases arriving to a hair-raising final scene.Rebecca De Mornay as the hideous nanny gives an outstanding performance. I was particularly surprised by the economy of gestures she gives and yet transmits to the viewer all the volcanic passion of her sentiments.Ernie Hudson as the mentally impaired gardener gives an over par performance.Last but not least Robert Elwit's photography, especially home interiors, is very good.Thumbs up for this movie!Reviewed by Max Yofre.
Some missing, but still very good. This set is being criticized for what it's missing more than for what it has.  It's still pretty darn good.  This collection was broadcast on SNL in the fall of 2005, with a few notable exceptions.  I'm not sure where "Schmitt's Gay," "Trump's House of Wings," "McCain Sings Streisand," "Huggies Thongs" or "Smoke Alarm 3000" went, but they were replaced instead with commercials like "Hibernol," Tylenol BM," "Black Eyed Peas," "Tuna of the Dirt," "Mary Kate & Ashley Perfume," "Nikey Turkey," and "The Love Toilet," to name a few.  But did we need to see "Taco Town" and "Baby Toupees" one more time?Yes, it's heavy on the Will Farrell and after eras.  You will find precious few that are pre-1990.  Didn't Dana Carvey do any commercials at all?  Jon Lovitz, where are you?  The only four commercials from the 70's are "Bass-o-matic," "Hey You," "Little Chocolate Donuts," and the "79 Roadster."  Still, overall, what's is on here will make you laugh a lot!  I'm hoping for a second volume, but for now what's here is funny stuff
Beautifully photographed. A bit slow, but so lovely to see. BEST of ALL is the soundtrack - but why can't I find it on Amazon?
Great Flick. I dont need to explain the plot of "Trainspotting", as pretty much ever other review has already done that.  The film is half serious, half comical view of an extremely destructive, depressing lifestyle.  I dont know if this won any awards, but it really should have because for the most part it doesnt follow any hollywood clich'es.  Peac
The best of the beast. A rare war theme-the Russians in Afghanistan. I've seen this movie more than 20 times and never tire of it. I even know the lines the dialogue word for word. And stop moaning about the young Russian rat pack acting like American beach boys ofcourse they would the Russian way they are also cocky and immature. Pretend that the conversations are in Russian which actually is not necessary even without words just the excellent score of MArk Isham this is a sure winner
My favorite. Of all versions of Pride and Prejudice I've seen, this is far and away my favorite. The four-hour format gives more time to really tell the story than a traditional movie. All of the characters are wonderfully cast and played. And in particular, that most important and pivotal character, Mr. Darcy, is perfect. This character needs to be drop-dead gorgeous and as aristocratic as he**, and none of the more recent portrayals have come close to Rintoul's.I love Pride and Prejudice, and have owned this version on VHS since it was first offered. I danced for joy when I discovered it was available on DVD
Makes you think. In a modern world where money and success are now the only goals for many people this reminds us of the story of a man who gave up everything, ultimately his life, simply to care for those who had leprosy. The worst thing about this disease is that those who have it are often cast out from their homes &amp; families for whom the stigma is such that they would rather them have died. It was like this at the time of Fr Damien and in many parts of the world is still like this today. Don't forget to watch the Making of Molokai which is also on the DVD
Faithful to the Literary Spirit. This is a well-produced and written sequel. It is faithful to the original production and to its literary roots in a concise form. I extremely enjoyed it and found it to be a good follow-up to the lives of the central characters from the original ANNE OF GREEN GABLES. The cast was very good and gave very credible and memorable performances. I was very impressed with Frank Converse, an actor I always liked and it was good to see him in a substantial role once again. Megan Follows is once again brilliant and very charismatic as Anne Shirley. The print is very good making the details of the sets and beautiful outdoor photography emerge quite stunning. I highly recommend this one.
A Classic of coming of Age. Francis Lia..music score is breathtaking.The photo of all that takes pl;ace is a Magic of a Garden of Eden.Not dirty...but  pure beauty taken by the great Mr.DAVID HAMILTON. Patti D'Arbanville makes hard core...Disneyland.with MS.D'Arbanville hardcore is not necessary.She brings out the innocent that once was.I wish sometimes I lived back in the turn of the 20th century.A Pure Adult Classic.And the Music is so much Important to the movie.When at the end..she's once more left alone.DARN!I wish I was there for her! Jac
OK THIS IS GOOD JUST LIKE I SAW IT ON TV WITH MORE !. JUST LIKE KLA-TU I HATE STUPED JUNK BUT THIS DVD IS NOT ONE OF THEM IF YOU LIKE THE MOVIE AS A KID MAYBE WANT TO SHARE IT WITH YOUR KID GET IT !KAL-TU BA-RA-DA NECT-TU GORT
Fantastic. The film is a fantastic production made almost 20 years ago.The lack of technology let their creative side appears
Excellent Film. This film is really intriging.  For someone who doesn't consider herself a drama fan, this film [...] me in and kept me hooked.  The story of this writer really made me think about how art and drive and will to live can help someone overcome the most stacked of odds.  It is also a very interesting look into gay politics in that time and place in the world.As a person studying GLBT studies as a degree, I recommend you view this film.  As a human being, I recommend you view this film.  Most people see it because of Johnny Depp's performance (as 2 characters) but that fact is very minor, although he does an excellent job.  The main actor is astounding and makes you believe what is real, even though it is so unbelievable
(;D). Put the Bunny Back!This was a great movie! It's full of action! And it has lots of jokes! I recommend it! The DVD is spectacular!! Don't miss out on this movie
Individual vs. Collective Crime and Punishment. Clint Eastwood's 1967 debut in an American western after successfully starring in Sergio Leone's internationally reknown trilogy of westerns that made him a star.The screenplay is a more sober portrayal of the western genre without the surreal motifs portrayed by Leone.  The film follows Eastwood's character who was wrongly accused of being a cattle rustler and lynched by mob of thugs.  Out for revenge, Eastwood nevertheless wants to do it by the law and is deputized as a marshall by a judge who needs new necks to hang from his gallows to give his town the semblance of order.  Accepting the assignment, Eastwood's character tracks down his past attackers one by one.  Eastwood's character also seeks the affections of a woman who seeks revenge against those who raped her and murdered her husband.This is a good western in which the characters and their motivations are well developed.  As one reviewer mentioned, this film explores the concepts of personal vs. collective retribution against past wrongs and the personal conflicts they entail.  The story explores the notions of what is crime and what is proper punishment.  It explores how barbarism and lawlessness are treated where legal instututions are lacking and span as far as the boundaries of a small frontier town.  It looks at how rampant crime and the absence of law generate both a sense of injustice and an overzealous desire for retribution.  The film also explores the consequences of crimes committed by groups in which the perpetrators differ by intent and degree in their participation.  Who is really more to blame?  The only down side to this film is that the ending is somewhat abrupt and rather empty in light of the climax of the story.  Otherwise, this is a good film worth owning or renting
A MUST FOR ALL FANS!. This is what the fans have been waiting for!  This live concert featuring great R&B hits from the Shalamar days...through his solo career is a definite must-buy! Howard Hewett loves what he does and it shows through this DVD and his interaction with the audience...making them feel "intimate" with him. He delivers like no other, his vocals are exceptional, his range outstanding...what more can I say but...buy this DVD!! It is well worth it...fans who may not have seen his show in a while (or never have) will fall in love all over again with his music!!  If you love this, then be on the lookout for the audio CD version being released early May 2005
The Master Sleuth Is At It Again!. Anyone who is a fan of B-movie mysteries must have these films in their collection.  Warner Oland is the original--and best--Charlie Chan.  These early entries in the series are well written and the production qualities are above average for this genre
bratz blah blah blah. this is about my scene not bratz im really getting annoyed here abd you are making me really mad please do me and everybody else a favor grow up please and go review your bratz i want to hear about the my scene movie not the bratz one i know i cant force you to but please grow up and go away this is so pointless im so fed up with the stuff that people are doing theses days will the just stop it already please oh my goodness its so childis
A Calssic. Great movie. I bought it for my young teenage daugther and she loved it
Classic inspirational story, classic film, but do read the history too. This is a wonderful story and a riveting film, as the other reviewers have noted. This DVD version is crisp and clear, well done. The final narrator comment is on the mark -- A world in which there is no room for Gordons is doomed to turn to sand.If you would like to learn in exquisite detail what the Mahdi was truly like, his background, the games he played interposing himself between God and man, his private vices versus public face of holiness, the extent of his crimes against duped humanity, how he died [the narrator fo the film says we will never know, but Rudolph Slatin reported the cause of death more than 100 years ago], then by all means read "Fire and Sword in the Sudan," written by Colonel Sir Rudolph Slatin Pasha, an Austrian officer held captive inside the inner circles of both the Mahdi and his successor the Khalifa Abdullahi for twelve agonizing years. General Gordon's severed head was brought to Slatin in prison before it was taken as prize to the Mahdi. Slatin, an expert linguist and accomplished field commander, was appointed by Gordon as governor of Darfur and led troops in the field against rebels for one year after being cut off from all contact with his government. He played convert to Islam as a strategy to inspire his troops and to stay alive as a personal slave to the Mahdi and the Khalifa, biding his time until he could make good his escape. Slatin's story is at least as inspiring as the life of the legendary General Gordon. Several anecdotes Slatin reveals about Gordon give a special insight into the kind nature of the great but human general.My only complaint about "Khartoum" -- The movie was grossly slanderous toward General Hicks, who commanded the troops massacred in the opening scene. Rediculed in the movie as a "fool," the facts show him a great hero. When questioned by one of his friends before the fatal expedition in which Hicks died and his 10,000 troops were wiped out, Hicks said, "I am as Jesus Christ in the midst of the Jews." He knew he was about to become a martyr. He and his handfull of officers all agreed their chances were bleak. Still he marched off, thinking his honor might be impugned if he refused to advance. When the Mahdi made Hicks an offer to accept his surrender with terms and passed out hundreds of handbills along the route of march documenting that offer, Hicks refused. He died to protect his honor just as Gordon later died. An officer sent to his death for nothing by ignorant politicians. Sound familiar?Sir Winston Churchill's book "The River War" is a brilliantly told first-hand account of the retaking of the Sudan. Churchill's written description of the charge of the 21st Lancers is as vivid as any war scene ever filmed.General Gordon's Khartoum Journals are also available in several different printings."Khartoum" will open an entirely new world to those interested enough to study the history. Those were days when 3,000 men could be killed in one twenty minute clash by spear and sword, rifle and pistol. The scenes of bravery on a large scale are like nothing we could imagine today. Many of us tend to panic at the scale of human life taken in today's war on terror. We forget the huge scale of the battles our ancestors fought before the dawn of the age of modern weaponry and terrorist attacks. We underestimate the ability of a strong society to absorb incredible blows in battle, and risk joining the ranks of the terrorized and self-defeated. Abraham Lincoln once wrote that if this great nation is to ever die, it will be by suicide, not at the hands of foreign armies incapable of stealing a single drink from the Ohio river
changing attitude. It was a merciless struggle, back in 1939-'45 on the Atlantic Ocean. With German submarines seriously threatening Britain's overseas life-lines, losing this battle meant losing the European part of world war 2. Every participant, Allied or German, was fully aware of that.'The Cruel Sea' sets the normal, recognizable day-to-day life on a small English navy vessel against the background of this epic struggle. The book leads us through all suffering, sorrow, beauty, joy and hardship, experienced by the people involved  --  introduces us to many a tactical and technical improvement, making this struggle a breathtaking affair. It is as if we are participating ourselves.If this isn't enough, 'the Cruel Sea' also provides insight in the changing attitude of the vessel's crew during this war. The longer the battle of the Atlantic lasts, the more professional, efficient and ruthless they become. Not only against their enemy, but also among themselves. A bitter necessity, for up to mid-1943 the German 'U-boats' dangerously get the better of the Allied merchant shipping.For instance, a sailor missing the departure of his ship gets away with a warning  --  in the early years, that is. Later on the ship's captain reflects on this incident, announcing this capital offense punishable by a long term prison-sentence at least. The harsh reality of war doesn't allow for compassion anymore
Sexy, Emotional, and Spicy Penelope at the Top of Her Game. I have hesitated on seeing this movie, because I haven't really been impressed by Penelope's work, even though I have seen her previously in All About My Mother, Open Your Eyes, and Vanilla Sky. Finally, this movie made me take her more seriously as a good actress with more than just beauty, and that she's no longer trying to increase her fame by dating high-profile actors. She's actually very pleasing and enjoyable to watch in this romantic comedy about love, cheating, cooking, new life/career and reconcilation.Isabella(Penelope Cruz) is married to Toninho(Murilo Benicio), a musician/restaurant owner in a small town in Northern Brazil. She's the best chef and her cooking attracts a ton of business for the restaurant, and even job offers from America. One problem occurs when her "on top" sexual position made her dissatisfied husband to cheat on her, she decides to take off and headed for San Francesico for a new life.She reunited with her long time friend Monica(Harold Perrinear,Jr.), a fierce and funny drag queen and just got out of jail. She had to use some kind of black magic ritual in order to eliminate all her love for her ex-husband so that she could move on. She took a job as a cooking teacher, and one day she encountered a TV show producer named Cliff(Mark Feuodtein) who was looking for a host for a new cooking show, and she got the job. Her style, sophiscation, and sex appeal instantly turned the show into a sensation. Just when she thought she could give love a try again when Cliff pursued her, her ex arrived at the scene and accidently became involved as background performer in the show. Now she's confused about her position in life.....Harold Perrineau, Jr. did a great job as Monica, and he also did narration for this film. He is quite a comic relief. At first, I thought his role could have been played Rupaul, but then a less famous actor is probably more appropiate.This is a good date movie or chick flick even, and I think it's so far the best Penelope Cruz film to be seen by non-Spanish audiences.
Western Classic. Just a fabulous Western classic.  Gary Cooper, Lloyd Bridges, and Grace Kelly.Grace Kelly's credit is in a diagonal list of some dozen or so other players.This western diverged from its colleagues because it is about duty, responsibility,selfishness, greed.  Suspenseful and thought provoking, at 90 minutes it isfor every persons library
Just perfect for the bride who want to look GREAT!. I think the Bridal Bootcamp DVD is excellent!  One of the things I really like about the DVD is Christi keeps it simple.  Anyone can do what she does in the DVD.  I have to say "I'm not good with the whole coordination thing" and if I can get it down anyone can!  What I most enjoy is the dress specific training.  I love that I can put my focus on my arms for mystrapless gown.  I like that I can stick it in the DVD player in the morning and get personalized training.  It's a great workout and something I look forward to doing knowing I'm going to look my best on my wedding day
The Stuff of Legends. This movie has it all. It captures the independent spirit of Americans during the race to explore outerspace; the humor, the intelligence, the feistiness and pioneering spirit of the original seven astronauts; superb acting and well-written, well thought-out scenes. Though the movie is long, it seems like it's over in a blink of an eye. The additional information, such as the commentaries and behind-the-scenes footage, is also interesting. It should make all Americans proud of all that was accomplished in such a short period of time
BETTER THAN SCHINDLER'S LIST. I disagree with the previous reviewers.  This movie was far better than Schlinder's List.  For me it was  more emotionally moving than Spielberg's List.  In fact as far as I am concerned it makes  Spielberg look like an amature.  I also think Spielberg may have stolen the little girl's red coat idea from this movie.  After seeing this movie I was so turned on that I checked out 2 biographies of Wallenberg from the library.  The movie was very faithful to the biographies
Cheezy movie!. Viewed this movie alot in collage (Go Blue)! Great beer drinking movie with friends
Best UMD Movie!!!. Are you looking for a good UMD movie? Then please pick this one up for your PSP. This is one of the best movies ever made. Unfortunately Disney isn't making anymore Toy Story movies... :(If you haven't seen the Toy Story movies, then pick this one up!5 out of 5 star
Romance relies on ineffable mystery and destiny... We all want to fall in love... The experience makes us feel completely alive, where every sense is heightened, every emotion is magnified... It may only last a moment, an hour, an afternoon, but that doesn't reduce its value, because we are left with memories that we treasure for the rest of our lives...I love watching people fall in love... It must have something to do with the excellent chemistry between the main characters...Mark Elliott, a charming sensitive American war correspondent, arrives in Hong Kong at the dawn of the Korean war... He finds in Han Suyin an awesome beauty of true grace...Han Suyin, a lovely Eurasian doctor is captivated by Mark's tenderness and insight...It was instant attraction when they first met... The two commence a passionate affair, leading them to fall deeply in love...Their love is so strong, so wonderfully expressed that highlights Elliot's married status, and the difficulties of the troubled time of the Korean War, communism and race relations...Holden is an inspired choice for the role... Not only does he have an imposing screen presence, but he brings the perfect mix of enlightenment, compassion and emotion to the part...Opposite him Oscar Winner Jennifer Jones, perfect in her oriental look, radiantly beautiful in that traditional and modern Asian-inspired Cheongsam... Jones floods her role with personal emotion giving her character a charismatic life of its own... She delivers a heartfelt performance turning her character into a woman who undergoes a spiritual and emotional awakening...Her scene in that verdant hill where she takes refuge is exquisitely touching specially when we heard Mark's voice whispering: "We have not missed you and I... that many-splendored thing."Henry King - who has established himself as a masterful director of romances - spreads the theme tune (by Alfred Newman) in the air above the cosmopolitan harbor... His film is colorful, elegant, with excellent cinematography and set design...Nominated for eight Academy Awards, this beautiful and sensitive motion picture won three: Best Costume Design; Best Music and Best Score...
Horror Review. Overall, this is one of those late 80s horror films with cheap actors and low-budget settings. But, the script did not need high-paying actresses like Julia Roberts or Susan Sarandon in order to be successful. The film is trictly about the average horny teenagers who are looking for a cheap scare for the Halloween night at an abandoned parlor home. It was the sight of a gruesome massacre, according to the story. Apparently, the house is POSSESSED and the spirits living inside of it are considered demons. So, here comes the spirited crowd of partiers with a willingness to raise some hell. And, of course, you can predict the storyline as of what happens. The only thing that I can say is useful out of these B-horror films, just as I commented on "Puppet Master" and "Friday the 13th Part 6: Jason Lives", is that these movies provided some hintful ideas for women who might be having some sexual difficulties regarding getting their mates "in the mood" as frequently as they are. If you women are experiencing that problem or would like to spice it up, then pull out your debit card and order some horror flicks mentioned. Some of the best ideas have been pulled out from these films, not Playboy pornography. One peculiar scene is where two lovers are getting it on in a coffin. Out of all the women I have personally dated, maybe only one or two would be possibly open-minded enough to elaborate in some different settings for sexuality. Key word: POSSIBLY!So, take a glance at some of these horror films. You might catch an idea. But, in reality with all due respect to the fellas, I don't think the majority of us will get very lucky. As my father always said, "Only in the movies!"
bruce paved the way. about the life of the great lenny bruce who paved the way for so many great comedians to come.dustin hoffman plays bruce greatly and realistic,as well does valerie perrine as bruces stripper wife honey.the movie is slow going and could put anyone to sleep,especially to those unfamiliar with bruce.i suggest watching the documentary "lenny bruce:swear to tell the truth" first to get more acquainted with bruce the comedian.lenny bruce really is an important figure in our american history as he tried with all his might to beat the hypocritical system.unfortunately he lost but his work is some of the most important and fullfilling of any generation because he spoke the truth and informed all how screwed up it really is.i want to give this 5 stars because it is an important film but as i said most of the film drags,especially for the first half.but i do recommend it to those who want to see the great dustin hoffman at work and to those who want to familiarize themselves with bruce and all the hype surrounding him.bruce surrounded himself with strippers,sex and drugs and this film documents that side of him.so those looking for a comedy will be very disappointed as this is a full out drama, eventhough their are moments of bruces routine that are funny.those looking for a laugh should check out some of bruces work on disc.all in all i do recommend this for non-republicans(he he) and open-minds alike
FINALLY!!. I have been wanting to pick up this obscure movie for years, ever since I first watched it some 12 years ago.   Unfortunately, up until now it has been out of print - even on VHS.  I was un-willing to pay an obnoxious price for a used version on Video tape.  Now there is no reason to fret any more:  Gwendoline is here & she's on DVD!!!The original title of the film was The Perils of Gwendoline in the Land of the Yik Yak.  It is basically a low-budget INDIANA JONES type of adventure movie, only with a whole lot more erotica mixed in. One could say there are elements of Monty Python as well. Brent Huff plays a Harrison Ford wannabe.   He has a great physique for an adventure movie, but he's not a particularly good actor.  The third major character is Gwendoline's sidekick / friend, Beth (played by French actress Zabou).The overwhelming reason to buy this DVD may be summed up in 3 words: Tawny Kitaen topless!  While she has stripped down in a few other movies (such as WITCHBOARD), one needs to have the pause button on the DVD remote handy to get a good look.  Not so with this film.  She is topless throughout most of the 2nd half of the film - and that's a very good thing!!!I can't for the life of me understand why Tawny has not had a more robust acting career or why she didn't make many more movies.   For one thing, there have not been too many female redhead movie stars.   Tawny is gorgeous and there are a few scenes in this film where she is absolutely ravishing - to the extent that she took my breath away.   She is also a better actress than a great many women in Hollywood.To be sure, this is a very corny movie.   Tawny and Zabou are good actors;  the rest of the cast are all a bit stilted.   I believe it was originally in French as the people all suffer from dubbing-man's disease.  However, it is also a very fun movie, and I had forgotten just how cute Zabou is.So, if you are even a remote fan of Tawny Kitaen you need to JUMP at the opportunity to buy this one.   It's a feel good movie and Tawny is the one who will making you feel good!
Endearing. Jane Fonda was certainly lovely in this film, and her fey charm forgives the fact that she was clearly showcasing herself here and not truly interacting with her equally photogenic co-star, Robert Redford. Neil Simon's wit and clever use of human beings as props in sight gags has never been so polished in any of his other productions, and there is something truly endearing about this particular film.  I think it is the mixture of its time and setting, all combined with the fact its two lead actors are still fresh enough in the business to exude real life excitement about their roles. This movie is funny, effectively coy a time or too, and just bizarre enough to stand the test of time.
funny as hell!!!. Horror mocking is awesome, espessially for horror fans who know whats going on
SCHOOL FIELD TRIPS WERE NEVER THIS ROUGH!. "Battle Royale" is a truly magnificant film, and is highly recommended. There are a bountiful number of reviews here, therefore, I would just like to add that if you have not seen the film, buy it or rent it. I first saw the film a few years ago at the urging of a friend and was not disappointed in the least.Takeshi Kitano [who better for the role?] stars as the former school teacher who makes it a point early in the film to set the tone by letting the students know that this BATTLE ROYALE is no joke. [I don't want to give the movie away to those who have not seen it yet] And the point Takeshi Kitano makes with a couple of students in the beginning is not lost on the other students. The students must kill each other in order to survive.Only when one of the students is left standing will the game come to an end. Here you see loyalties and friendships part ways, or strenghten. I like the way Kinji Fukasaku directed the film. This is not like "Lord of the Flies" as I read in one of the reviews. "Battle Royale' is a totally different take on a future 21ST society of ADULTS, that have come to see unruly students as having to be dealt with severely in order to conform to Japanese society that they feel is being threatened. A truly great film. Highly Recommended!
On MY Top 10 List, funny!. Funny as can be!Bette Midler and Lilly Tomlin crack me up!! This movie probably never made big money at the box office, or won any awards, but I absolutely love it!Not going to give away the plot, don't want to ruin it for you! You just have to see it! A case of mistaken identities gone amuck!Midler and Tomlin, all four of them, are a hoot! Laughed myself silly! Bette milking a cow... Lilly on the elevator with the dog... eating sushi.. their friend from home.. then, meeting at the hotel, in the ladies room...  Oh wow, it was funny!My dear husband, Norman, even laughed at all the right parts. He seldom stays awake late at night, but he watched this with me, and my little eight year old granddaughter in bed with us, sweet thing, she fell asleep - shhhhh! adorable. Aren't grand kids a miracle?You won't be sorry if you buy, rent, or steal this DVD, watch it!
Great Dance Mix. After watching the film and wanting to get up and dance to the music this CD is a dream come true ! "Echa Pa'Lante" is now one of my favourite Cha Cha's and Ruby's Rumba "Eres Todo En Mi" is great to dance with a special partner."Jazz Machine - Black Machine" is a great Samba track which will also get you on the dance floor. If the film inspired you to get up and dance this CD should be on your playlist
Not quite perfect... This was my favorite show of all time... I was in high school the same time as the 90210 kids, and had the gang not had 2 junior years, we would have graduated at the same time... anyway, the reason I couldn't give this DVD set 5 stars was that I noticed the music I remembered was missing and replaced with bland, generic "rock"-- I am guessing they couldn't get clearances for all the songs they used, but in some instances it really makes a difference!90210 first caught my attention when they played a remix of "Star" by Erasure, one of my favorite bands, during the mother-daughter fashion show episode-- how cool and edgy was that?-- and hearing the song "Doin' The Do" by Betty Boo during the montage of Brenda getting ready for her big date with Dylan inspired me to get the Betty Boo album. I was really looking forward to both of those moments when I watched the episodes on the DVD set, and I was disappointed when neither song was used. Music played a key role in 90210, especially as the show progressed and the current pop acts would be the subject of or make an appearance on an episode (Flaming Lips, anyone?), and to not have the original music intact on the DVD set is really a shame.I didn't think I would need to do this anymore, but I am going to have to start DVRing reruns when I can in order to capture the 90210 I remember
A MUST-SEE FOR PEOPLE IN LOVE. This is pure moonshine. This is a piece of art. The freshness of the Colbert and Gable is a treasure to behold.The dialogue is smart and witty and even the 30s slang "Oh yeah???????????" and its like is used to great advantage in the film...  This is one of the rare cases when EVERYTHING in a film works. Enough said:-
I cannot find a flaw, or the missing five minutes, either. Much has already been written about the fidelity to history exhibited in this movie, and I won't pretend to improve upon it. Indeed, the excellent quality of all aspects of the movie's production is only enhanced by its accuracy.One reviewer pointed out that there is about five minutes missing from the earlier DVD version and this new 2-disk version. I have compared the new version against my old (but excellent) VHS widescreen version dating from several years ago. I cannot find that anything is missing from the new 2-disk version. The only thing I can think of is that the "intermission" period in the new DVD version may have been shortened. Intermissions were not uncommon in "blockbuster" movies of the 1950's, 60's, and very early 70's. They varied in length. I timed the intermission in this new DVD version at ~3 minutes, which would have been short by the standards of the day.I have read a number of books about the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor, including the best of all, "Day of Infamy", by John Toland. The movie and that book are very closely in alignment.Did the Roosevelt administration know the Japanese were going to attack? Watch this movie, read that book, and make up your own mind. And beware -- history has an unsettling habit of repeating itself, as George Santayana warned us...
one of adam sandler's best. adam sandler is far from the brightest star in the SNL pantheon. even brighter lights like eddie murphy, dan akroyd and chevy chase have had spotty movie output, and sandler has made some serious stinkers. but this goofy movie about a "regular joe" beer-drinking hockey player who storms the golf world is in sandler's sweet spot. good silly movie though not to be confused with masterpieces like caddy shack, meatballs or wedding crashers. older kids will love it but beware some serious swearing
An excellent interpretation of a classic novel. I loved Shelley's novel, and when this movie was released theatrically, I read the reviews and stayed away.  I heard vast criticisms of Kenneth Branagh and took them as correct, having never seen him in a film.  And mostly, I listened to my 20-something friends who had been disappointed at what they had assumed was a horror movie.It wasn't until AMC ran *Mary Shelley's Frankenstein* on a Friday night fear fest that I finally saw the film to judge for myself.  My assumptions and the assertions of friends and critics alike were simply incorrect.This film does take many liberties with the text, but that is the natural outgrowth of transferring the written word to the screen.  It stays absolutely true to the vision of the book and to the theme put forth by Shelley in her masterpiece.  The conflict, crisis and ultimate tension in Frankenstein's character are  there, as is the tearing ambivalence concerning the monster - should you hate him, pity him?  Perhaps a few of the more subtexts are missing, but once again, that is the nature of film.It is visually outstanding, bringing a viewer into the time and place quite well.  Further, the performances are incredible (Branagh included). Far from being "overly dramatic", they seemed to be the true reactions of people in overly dramatic circumstances.  I withhold the 5th star only because the beginning of the film felt just a bit rushed. Necessary, I suppose, in a film that already runs 2.5 hours, but still a bit dissatisfying.A good film entertains you.  A good film makes you think.  Only an excellent film can do both.  This is an excellent film
Think "Heathers" for the 1990's... If you enjoyed the movie Heathers, you will no doubt love Jawbreaker. In fact, a friend of mine who's all-time favorite movie is Heathers, almost refused to watch it. I told him it was similar to Heathers and if he hated it that much he could punch me when it was over. Well, he loved it too, and I'm talking about one of the most stubborn people I've ever met in my entire life. A dark comedy that focuses on the clique mentality. Jawbreaker is peachy keen in every possible way. Check it out...it won't disappoint
"I think I'll have a large order of...prognosis negative!". Long Island socialite Judith Traherne, the central protagonist in Dark Victory is going to face certain death. She has a crippling and degenerative brain disease that will eventually cause her to go blind and then die. This "prognosis negative" may not seem like the most optimistic subject matter for a movie, but under the sensitive direction of Edmund Goulding, Dark Victory takes on a shocking resonance and it's messages about death and dying are no doubt as timeless and probably just as significant today.Dark Victory is an embarrassment of riches, an unashamedly tearful melodrama that features an absolutely electrifying, compelling, tour de force, tear-jerking performance from Bette Davis as Judith Traherne. Davis is in top form here, playing the doomed socialite with a neurotic, disturbed, and formidable intensity; she encapsulates the screen being as redoubtable as ever, with Judith insisting on her dignity even as a grave illness she seems to have beaten returns with an unbeatable vengeance.Plagued by eye trouble, severe headaches, and a numbness in her arm, Judith is encouraged to meet with renowned doctor and brain surgeon Frederick Steele (George Brent). Judith knows deep down that something is terribly wrong, but she's a feisty strong-willed young woman who believes in just getting on with life. Consequently, she has slipped into a state of perpetual denial. Once Dr. Steele forces her to face the truth about her illness, Judith begins to fall in love with the handsome and dedicated doctor, admiring his affable and sensitive ways.Surgery is obviously the only option, and at first, things seem to go well, but her crippling disease eventually comes back to haunt her and she's given only months to live. Ann King (Geraldine Fitzgerald), Judith's secretary and best friend, conspires with Frederick to keep the seriousness of Judith's her illness from her. They both do it, not out of spite or selfishness, but out of a gesture of love, and a desire to see Judith happy in her remaining months.Judith gravitates between a whimsical carefree attitude towards her plight and a kind of stoic concern that things will be eventually work out all right for her. She friskily wrangles with her beloved doggies while still in bed, then bounces into the day in her silk pantsuit pajamas, all the while exchanging familiar niceties. It isn't until she learns the deadly ramifications of her illness that she starts to go off the rails, boozing with the playboys, smoking too many cigarettes, and soliciting the attentions of a smitten proletarian stable hand (Humphrey Bogart).Dark Victory, for all it's foreboding and depressing themes, is actually quite uplifting and is also deftly paced and smartly energetic. Judith gets a new lease on life when she falls in love with Frederick and even though certain death draws near, nothing can stop her from continuing her savvy business deals, keeping prospective suitor Ronald Reagan on drunken hand, and leaping atop a galloping steed. Mawkish sentimentality, the hairpin turns of the plot, and even the not-so-subtle changes of heart by the central characters, never bog down the film or make the story too heavy-handed and overly maudlin.Dark Victory ended up being one of Bette's biggest box office hits, and one can easily see why. This is a towering and commanding performance of unabashed melodrama and one of the most definitive pictures of her long and distinguished career. You never quite get used to seeing Bette this way, and you wish she'd been given even more chances to shine and play such a complex, intricate, and nuanced character as Judith Traherne. Mike Leonard July 05.
Beautiful cinematography. Once in a while, movie gem reaches out and touches your soul.  I have added this film to my collection of favorites, and those I will savor when I need a gut wrenching cry.  I was literally emotionally drained after watching it.The story is set in Hell's Kitchen, among the despair of poverty and addictions.  A young Irish couple with their two daughters move to the neighborhood to try to establish a new life....overshadowed by the loss of their son at five years old.I find myself drawn in the family, deeply sharing their anguish and triumphs.  One scene had me on the edge of my seat....at a street fair when the father is trying to win an ET doll for his youngest daughter.  I won't tell you the outcome.The youngest daughter, Ariel, has a spirit about her, a curiosity and charisma which brings caring people into the fold of the family.  She is bold and unafraid, yet she yearns for the love of her father, who is emotionally distant following the death of his son.The oldest daughter, Kristine, is wise beyond her years.  She successfully camptures life on her camcorder, which she uses constantly, almost a video diary if you will.The mother is strong and loves her husband with all her heart.  Her husband has shut her out of his emotionbal life, also, and she struggles to deal with that.  She is the glue which binds her family together.Their neighbor, the "screaming man" of the building, is a tormented young artist.  The words on his door say it all "KEEP AWAY".  I won't give away the plot with his role.A MUST SEE.....I cried, I stopped for a bit, I cried again.  I couldn't stop crying.  Okay, so I cried at Lion King, too...but that's beside the point.  I loaned this movie to my neighbor immediately after, with red puffy eyes.  She understands.
I love strawberry shortcake!. I have 1 boy and 2 girls, I grew up with strawberry shortcake! I love her!My 3 yr old likes her. I bought this movie for my 3 and 1 yr old daughters and they really enjoyed this movie. My 3 yr old didn't like the purple pie man she said he was a little scary. But he isn't scary just bad!It doesn't compare to the old strawberry shortcake but it's the new strawberry shortcake for this generation!
Thank you Mr. Lucas!. I am very happy to have the original theatrical release on DVD. I think that it looks and sounds great. It is just what I wanted from this DVD
Serenity? I think not. When they say this is an action film it is absolutely true. Most action films have a hero and that's a problem in this flic. Even the villian was heroic in the end. It is a rousing good time with many suprises and well worth viewing...several times
In a glass cage. First of all let me state that this is the firstmovie I have ever reviewed and may be my last.I love these kind of movies because they help meresolve things in my childhood that cannot andshould not be forgotten.This movie smacked me in my Solar-Plexus as if Iwas hit with a sledge hammer.  I have NEVER watcheda movie in my 66 years that had such an impact onme.KUDOS to Villaronga who had the courage and expertise to create a movie that should have won tons of awards but instead was hidden because of the ''We should never show what should be hidden''mentality of today's society.This movie should bring home the message that the Dr. Frankensteins of this world are creating Monsters that they could not possibly have perceived in their wildest imaginations.  Some of which, ultimately, come back to haunt them.Why does society try to repress these messages?Because of religious organizations, big business,governments and uninformed people that want to sequester their children in a make-believe world where this type of child abuse only happens to other people and could never possibly happen to them.I would like to compare this movie to another excellent movie ''The Boys of St. Vincent''which vividly shows how self-agrandizment hides and tacitly encourages child abuse.  This societal''DO AS I SAY, NOT AS I DO'' mentality will only serve to propagate an EVIL on the children of this world that will have ramifications, that will make this movie look like ''Alice in Wonderland''I am glad that Amazon.Com gave me the opportunity to get this off my chest because this movie really smacked me on a  visceral level of my soul and having written this I already feel like a load has been lifted off my chest.that makes me feel lighter
This is what defined ECW. Bloodsport: ECW Most Violent Matches include some of the most brutal, extreme matches in ECW history. If you are a fan of brutal moves and some extreme shows of violence, this is the DVd for you!Matches:ECW World Tag Team ChampiionshipsThe Public Enemy vs. Cactus Jack and Mikey Whipwreck:Okay match to start the show. The Public Enemy beats up Whipwreck and Cactus Jack brawls with them as well all over the building. Rocko Rock even moonsaults off the turnbuckle onto Cactus Jack through a table. Mikey Whipwreck rolls up Rocko Rock out of nowhere and gets the pin. 7/10Cactus Jack and Shane Douglas vs. Terry Funk and The Sandman:Brawling all over the building by all four men. Weapons included were kendo sticks, chairs, and even a section of guardrail. Cactus gives the Cactus Clothesline left and right, but The Sandman and Terry Funk take out Shane Douglas with the guardrail. In the end Terry Funk comes in with a FLAMING branding iron and brandishes Cactus Jack! Terry Funk and The Sandman win the match. 8.5/10Taipei Death MatchAxl Rotten vs. Ian Rotten:This is just very bloody and gruesome! Both men had taped hands with glue on them covered in broken glass. Let it be known that there is not one wrestling move in this whole match. Both men In the match get cut open and bleed heavily. In the end Ian gets slammed on top of thumbtacks and Axl wins with a big splash on top of him. 8/10Mexican Death MatchPsichosis vs. Rey Mysterio:A very high flying match that had Rey take a pounding throughout the entire match. They fight all over the ring and the crowd, the only way to win was to pin your opponent and then he had to get to his feet before a count of 10. In the end they fight behind the crowd and Rey gives a big hurricanrana to Psichosis who can't get to his feet and loses the match. 8.5/10ECW Television ChampionshipShane Douglas vs. Pitbull #2 vs. 2 Cold Scorpio vs. Chris Jericho:Fantastic wrestling match between all four men. A lot of chairs were used as well as some great wrestling moves. A great highlight included Scorpio kicking Jericho in the head as Jericho attempted a Lionsault! In the end Francine turns on the Pitbulls and gets powerbombed through a table from the second rope for her double cross. Shane Douglas wins the title after pinning Pitbull #2. 10/10Weapon's MatchTommy Dreamer vs. Brian Lee:Very short but wild brawl between these two. A lot of weapons spread all throughout the ring, it looked like a warzone! They fight outside the building and Brian Lee gives some HARD shots to Tommy by ramming his head into a garage door. They fight back in the ring and Beulah McGuillicutty and Kimona Wana Laya distract Brian Lee to allow Tommy to win the match. 8/10 After the match Tommy gets chokeslammed off a platform through a bunch of tables!Stetcher MatchRob Van Dam vs. Sabu:Another classic between these two. The only way to win was to roll your opponent out of the building on a stetcher. The two men fought with chairs, tables, and even the stretcher was used as a weapon. A great highlight was when Sabu DDT'd Van Dam through a table that was bridged between the guardrail and the ring apron. Sabu wins the stretcher match after Van Dam misses a splash and lands on the stretcher. 9/10#1 Contendership MatchTerry Funk vs. Stevie Richards vs. The Sandman:Great match. Some weapons were used such as trashcans, chairs, and a long ladder that is used to punish all three men. Stevie Richards is eliminated first, and Sandman pulls a length of barbed wire and wraps himself up in it before giving a leg drop to Terry Funk. Terry fights back and pins the Sandman to win the match. 9.5/10An extra match is shown as Terry won the world title from Raven.ECW World Heavyweight ChampionshipBarbed Wire Match [Born to be Wired]Terry Funk vs. Sabu:This is just the most extreme match you will ever see! Instead of ring ropes there were coils of barbed wire! Sabu misses a splash in the corner and rips his bicep completely open and bleeds profusely. They continue to fight and both men get wrapped up in barbed wire. Sabu puts Funk through two tables with himself wrapped in barbed wire. In the end Sabu pins Funk to become the new champ. 10/10Beulah McGuillicutty vs. Bill Alphonso:Short brawl that had Beulah kick the crap out of Alphonso using a cookie sheet, chairs, and Bill even gets a nasty cut above his eye. Beulah wins and the crowd was really into it which made this match something to see.ECW Death MatchTaz vs. Bam Bam Bigelow:This was a brawl that went all over the arena. Both men get thrown around against walls, on top of chairs, and into guardrails. They fight back in the ring and both men get put through tables by the other. They fight to the walkway and Tax gives a swinging DDT and both men crash through the floor! Taz wins after both men crawl out and Taz applies the the Tazmission for the win. 8.5/10ECW World Heavyweight ChampionshipTaz vs. Shane Douglas:This was an okay match, not much violence but a good table spot near the end. the crowd was chanting for Shane to win his belt back but Taz wins the match and retains the title. 8/10ECW Tag Team ChampionshipsChicago Street FightBalls Mahoney and Spike Dudley vs. The Dudley Boyz:This is one of my favorites! A true fight that had forks, chairs, tables, thumbtacks, and fire in it. Spike Dudley, bloody face and all, jumps off a section of the stadium onto The Dudleyz and even his own tag team partner. They fight back in the ring and the Dudleyz get taken out by steel chairshots by Balls Mahoney. Balls pulls out a table and pours lighter fluid on it but The Dudleyz counter and put Balls through the table that they set on fire! The Dudleyz wins. 9/10ECW World Heavyweight ChampionshipSpike Dudley vs. Mike Awesome:Spike takes a pounding by the 6 foot 6 300 pound man, who puts Spike through a table even before the bell rings. Spike gets back in the ring but almost immediately gets thrown out through two other tables! Spike continues to fight and even puts Awesome through a table, but Awesome wins after powerbombing Spike through yet another table from the top rope! 9/10Rhyno vs. The Sandman:Short match, only thing worth remembering is Rhyno goring Sandman through a table in the end. 6/10 Really short match.Super Crazy vs. Tajiri vs. Little Guido:Great fast paced match. Lot of back and forth action and a lot of near falls by all three men. Super Crazy even does a moonsault out of the ring onto both Tajiri and Guido. Little Guido is the first to go, then Super Crazy gets the pin on Tajiri. 9/10I Quit MatchTommy Dreamer vs. C.W. Anderson:This was a vicious fight. Both men get cut open with tools, chairs, razor wire, and tables. Anderson spinebusters Dreamer onto razor wire but Tommy fights back with chairshots and even puts Anderson through a table using a Death Valley Driver from the second rope! Dreamer uses parts of the table to make Anerson say, "I Quit!" 8.5/10Mike Awesome vs. Masato Tanaka:This was from last years One Night Stand ppv. Great match with a lot of tables used. Tanaka gets thrown through a table set up against the guardrail, then gets vicious chairshots by Awesome. However Awesome gets DDT'd by Tanaka through another table off the top rope! They continue to fight and Tanaka gets thrown out of the ring through a table on the outside! Awesome wins. 10/10This is a great DVD collection, worth every single dollar. Highly recommended.
A Perfect Comedy. One of the joys of the DVD revolution is the ability to study closely favourite films such as "The Lady Eve" and learn so much about its construction etc from commentaries and other extras offered.  This Criterion offering is expensive but there is so much on offer.  Thanks so much.The film itself is perfect - script, direction, acting, photography, costumes, score - the lot.  You can't help feel too that they had a ball making it.  The rapport of the leads is palpable.  The plot involves the seduction, twice, of a naive millionaire by a sexy card sharp.  The dialogue is very clever and Henry Fonda performs at least 3 hilarious pratfalls.  Stanwyck performs a marvellous imitation of an English Lady and although she is very attractive and amusing, there is a cynicism at the heart of her performance which conveys much deeper emotions.  When she is sad, she is deeply moving.With all those great players, it is probably churlish to single out Stanwyck but, what the hell, the title of the film refers to her and for anyone familiar with the cold hard Barbara from so many other films, the sexy and attractive Barbara here is a revelation. She is unique and memorable.Highly recommended.
Actors make uneven "Cooler" shine. Wayne Kramer's "The Cooler" is one of those movies that makes you glad for independent films.  This "little film," which probably spent in total less than Harrison Ford got paid for Major Box Office dreck like "Six Days, Seven Nights," is little more than a chance for some incredibly talented actors to take some risks and have a lark.  And it works.William H. Macy, possibly the most lovable schlub in the movies these days, plays Bernie, the ultimate loser.  Bernie's luck is so bad, he is the top "cooler" in Las Vegas.  As the "cooler," Bernie's job is to simply walk up to any hot gambler, whether slots, craps, blackjack, you name it.  A polite "hello" from Bernie is enough to halt the hottest streak.  The filmmakers, who clearly know Vegas, have a lot of fun with Bernie at work, and Bernie's scenes on the gambling floor are a highlight of the movie.  What makes them perfect is Macy's hang-dog expression -- he's got a meal ticket, but he's pretty sad about dispensing his unique brand of ill fortune.Bernie's bad luck isn't all projected - he's got more than enough himself.  The leading manifestation of that terrible luck is his "friendship" with Shelly, played by Alec Baldwin with beefy zeal.  This is one of those movies that reminds you that Baldwin really can act, and can be a genuine pleasure to see on screen.  Shelly runs the Shangri-La, the last "old school" casino in Vegas.  It's small time, but it's classic.Shelly's problem is that the money behind the Shangri-La wants to modernize, to compete with the big houses on the Strip. Shelly is aghast that anyone would want to throw away the perfection of the Shangri-La to be another "big fat whore competing for stroller money" like those sell-outs on the strip.  To make matters worse, the money is grooming a Harvard-trained shark to take over for Shelly.  He sees the play coming.Things for Bernie seem to change when he meets the cocktail waitress Natalie (Maria Bello, from "Payback" and "A History of Violence."  Somehow, this angel clearly out of Bernie's league ends up in his arms, and as the song says, lady luck rides with Bernie.But how can Vegas's top "cooler" work when he's got good luck?  And Bernie isn't working the Shangri-La for a paycheck - he's paying off a major debt to Shelly.  By the way, Shelly isn't about to let his top cooler just walk away 'cause he found a girl, either."The Cooler" has a great set-up, and the actors have as much fun as possible with their rather meaty roles.  Baldwin probably has the most fun, and he stays just this side of chewing the scenery.  The resolution of this story probably isn't as satisfying as one could imagine, as there is one very bizarre deus ex machinna and maybe the only unconvincing line in the otherwise well-written script."The Cooler" is a pretty hard "R" rating, with some pretty serious bed time for Macy and Bello, plus nearly as many f-bombs as Scorcese's gangster flicks.  This isn't a criticism -- these elements never seem gratuitous -- but just a warning that you may not want to recommend this movie to friends and family who might be shocked by such things.
GOOFY STARED IN 76 COLORED SHORTS FROM 1935-1965. The Disney treasures collection is the best and cheapest way of getting the entire series to their golden age shorts.I must warn you not to buy any of these mini DVDS if you are someone who would love the full collection being the mini DVDS are just repeats or shorts due on future disney treasures.GOOFY has Stared in 76 colored shorts in total from 1935-1965Below is a complete list of all his appearnces. it comes in 4 collumns: first the episode number, then the date, then the official clasification of the series it comes under, then the title.All Episodes clasified as Mickey Mouse are seen in both volumes of Mickey Mouse In Living Color, Any clasified as Donald and Goofy are seen in the donald Duck collection which you can check out the same details of on both donald duck dvds on amazon in my reviews.The Goofy DVD has all 46 classified as Goofy.the only 2 Goofy cartoons upto the 1960's that are still not available and have no furture treasure that are due out which could include them are his very last 2 original cartoons made in 1965 classified as Educational, which I think is why their not on his DVD being their not clasified as Goofy, nor are they part of any other disney series on the other treasures.ANY OTHER CARTOONS STARRING GOOFY OTHER THAN THE LIST BELOWwere either theatrical movies, plus movies that were shorts combine when originally released which you can get on DVD now such as Mellody Time which are all classified as part of disney's masterpiece collection, but their is one movie with a goofy short not classified as disney masters which is THE RELUCTANT DRAGON, you can get the reluctant dragon on the disney treasures volume of: BEHIND THE SCENES which includes the short of HOW TO RIDE A HORSE. Or TV series and Specials made in the modern age which are not part of the treasures really. but below is a complete list of all his original production golden age shorts.but I have to say, another Goofy cartoon famous to all Goofy fans not included in the Treasures: SPORT GOOFY IN SOCCERMANIA, it has not been released at all in the USA, but has on the UK Edition of Extreme Sports Fun,also it includes How To Ride A Horse, which means if you just want the goofy short and not the whole Reluctant Dragon Movie you can get 2 goofy shorts on this one UK DVD that are missing from Goofy's Treasure whicg just leaves his two educational shorts from the 60's left to find or hope a DVD to be released with and; you can get on amazon UK, as long as your TV is less than 5 years old it will have pal playback and aslong as your DVD Machine is multi region or free code then you will be able to play the UK DVD no matter what.ALL SHORTS STARRING GOOFY1	1935	MICKEY MOUSE	Band Concert2	1935	MICKEY MOUSE	Mickey's Fire Brigade3	1935	MICKEY MOUSE	On Ice4	1936	MICKEY MOUSE	Mickey's Polo Team5	1936	MICKEY MOUSE	Moving Day6	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Moose Hunters7	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Mickey's Amateurs8	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Hawaiian Holiday9	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Clock Cleaners10	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Lonesome Ghosts11	1937	MICKEY MOUSE	Magician Mickey12	1938	MICKEY MOUSE	Boat Builders13	1938	MICKEY MOUSE	Mickey's Trailer14	1938	DONALD AND GOOFY	Polar Trappers15	1938	DONALD AND GOOFY	Fox Hunt16	1938	MICKEY MOUSE	Whalers17	1939	SPECIAL	The Standard Parade18	1939	GOOFY	Goofy And Wilbur19	1940	MICKEY MOUSE	Tugboat Mickey20	1940	DONALD AND GOOFY	Billposters21	1940	GOOFY	Goofy's Glider22	1941	GOOFY	Baggage Buster23	1941	MICKEY MOUSE	Nifty Nineties24	1941	MICKEY MOUSE	Orphan's Benefit25	1941	GOOFY	Art Of Skiing26	1941	GOOFY	Art Of Self Defense27	1942	MICKEY MOUSE	Mickey's Birthday Party28	1942	MICKEY MOUSE	Symphony Hour29	1942	GOOFY	How To Play Baseball30	1942	GOOFY	Olympic Champ31	1942	GOOFY	How To Swim32	1942	GOOFY	How To Fish33	1943	GOOFY	Victory Vehicles34	1944	GOOFY	How To Be A Sailor35	1944	GOOFY	How To Play Golf36	1944	GOOFY	How To Play Football37	1945	GOOFY	Tiger Trouble38	1945	GOOFY	African Diary39	1945	GOOFY	Californy Er Bust!40	1945	DONALD AND GOOFY	No Sail41	1945	GOOFY	Hockey Homicide42	1946	GOOFY	Knight For A Day43	1946	DONALD AND GOOFY	Frank Duck Brings 'Em Back Alive44	1946	GOOFY	Double Dribble45	1947	DONALD AND GOOFY	Crazy With The Heat46	1947	GOOFY	Foul Hunting47	1948	GOOFY	They're Off48	1948	GOOFY	Big Wash49	1949	GOOFY	Tennis Racquet50	1949	GOOFY	Goofy Gymnastics51	1950	DONALD DUCK	Crazy Over Daisy52	1950	GOOFY	Motor Mania53	1950	GOOFY	Hold That Pose54	1951	GOOFY	Lion Down55	1951	GOOFY	Home Made Home56	1951	GOOFY	Cold War57	1951	GOOFY	Tomorrow We Diet58	1951	GOOFY	Get Rich Quick59	1951	GOOFY	Fathers Are People60	1951	GOOFY	No Smoking61	1952	GOOFY	Father's Lion62	1952	GOOFY	Hello, Aloha63	1952	GOOFY	Man's Best Friend64	1952	GOOFY	Two-Gun Goofy65	1952	GOOFY	Teachers Are People66	1952	GOOFY	Two Weeks Vacation67	1952	GOOFY	How To Be A Detective68	1952	MICKEY MOUSE	Pluto's Christmas Tree69	1953	GOOFY	Father's Day Off70	1953	GOOFY	For Whom The Bulls Toil71	1953	GOOFY	Father's Week-End72	1953	GOOFY	How To Dance73	1953	GOOFY	How To Sleep74	1961	GOOFY	Aquamania75	1965	EDUCATIONAL	Freewayphobia No. 176	1965	EDUCATIONAL	Steel and America
I Love Lucy 2nd season. I have always liked Lucille Ball, because she has always brought laughter into our lives. This season has one of the funniest stories-The chocolate factory job!!! We have laughed until we have tears in our eyes
Important documentary with some shortcomings. Because of the sheer length of this documentary and the number of topics covered, it's hard to pin down an exact analysis of it, since so much is going on.  I agree this is a historically important documentary, with many powerful scenes, both during interviews and just during scenes when the camera is wordlessly panning over what remains of the camps today.  Although it would be too easy and simplistic to just automatically give this a 5-star review and say it's the best most authorative film on the Shoah ever made.  This by no means covers nearly everything that happened during the Shoah, even in its massive length of nine and a half hours.  About the last hour is devoted to just the Warsaw Ghetto and the uprising, but apart from that the ghettoes aren't covered.  What this documentary does cover are five of the six Vernichtungslageren (annihiliation camps) in Poland--Treblinka, Sobibr, Belzec, Chelmno, and Oswiecim (Auschwitz), and what happened to the people on their way there in the death wagons.  There are interviews with people on all sides--survivors (including the only two survivors of Chelmno, Simon Srebnik and Michael Podchlebnik), ghetto guards and bureaucrats, people who ran the camps (particularly Franz Suchomel of Treblinka), villagers who watched the death wagons coming and going (their reactions to these peoples' fate and what they claim to have done for them seems mixed), the survivors themselves, and the Polish diplomat Jan Karski, who had begged the world to stop the genocide he knew very well was going on.  Among the survivors interviewed was Rudolf Vrba, one of my heroes, who escaped Oswiecim on 7 April 1944 along with his friend Alfred Wetzler to try to warn the world about what was being planned for Hungarian Jewry.  Another big plus supporting this documentary is that it was made in 1985, when there were more survivors around, and most of them were younger than they are today.  And though some people might be turned off by how much of the film is in subtitles, I enjoyed hearing all of that German, French, Italian, Polish, and Hebrew, and felt my own listening comprehension of German vastly improving as the film wore on, at times barely needing the subtitles.All of that said, this film at times feels like it overshot the mark, since it covers so much ground even within that specific topic of the extermination camps in Poland, and yet doesn't really seem to be very structured.  Many times this documentary has a very nonlinear feel and composition, which at one level works since when dealing with something like the Shoah, all concepts of time and place really did become unimportant and nonlinear, but even so, it can also have the feeling of just jumping back and forth between interviews and footage.  For example, we return to several interviews a number of times after having had long stretches in between covering other things.  There were also some segments that could have been cut and didn't really belong there, like the dancing couple in the German nightclub.  For the entire documentary, information is merely being presented; no conclusions are drawn, no analyses made, no archival footage used.  Some people might feel this is just as appropriate a technique as having such a nonlinear structure, but after finding out what Ron Rosenbaum has to say about Monsieur Lanzmann in the book 'Explaining Hitler: The Search for the Origins of His Evil,' one is led to question why he used some of these techniques and why he doesn't feel there should be any analysis of the Shoah, no attempt to explain why these awful things happened or account for the great evil that took place, as though accounting for it somehow justifies it.Certainly this is an important film everyone should see at least once, but some of the effect is lessened by the lack of archival footage, the nonlinear structure and layout, and the refusal to draw any conclusions, make any analyses, provide any historical background for why these events were set in motion in the first place.  It's an important film about the Shoah, but by no means the most important one or the most authoritative one ever made.  The price also seems a little hefty; is it because of this film's huge reputation that it costs much more than most other four-disc sets?
dvd. Second posting received very shortly after first went missing!  Very assuring that Amazon attended to
Slick, subtle, and worth a look see. This is a movie I did not fully appreciate until after it was over and I wanted to watch it again.  The premise is, poor girl Alicia goes to a rich person's school where everyone except her is amoral, meaning in plain English they like sex and drugs.  But wait a minute.  Who is really into sex and drugs in this movie?  Who is really envious of whom?  Alicia, who is supposed to be the moral poor girl, ends up in hospital due to a drug overdose.  Is Hadley, who is far wealthier than Alicia, really envious of her and not the other way around?  Why do we feel such intense sympathy for the comatose Alicia?  And why is some of the music, especially the music that plays at the end while the credits are running, so haunting?This film plays with your mind as you watch it and does not get caught in the process.  Great acting doesn't hurt, either.This movie critic says, check it out.
"Anybody else want to limp?". I don't usually evaluate movies in terms of acting, but there's something to be said about the way that Murphy plays his character in this film, which is simply spectacular. Out of all the movies that I have seen him star in, I'd have to say that this one single-handedly tops his most bitter role. Not only is his character - Reggie Hammond - bitter, but at times he is just plain emotional. For instance, there's a scene in the movie where Reggie's car gets blown up. Even before this event actually occurs, you can see that his feelings towards that car as well as his facial expressions are anything but pretentious, as he obsesses over the minutest details, like dirt. Speaking of facial expressions, after said event does occur, you'd think that Murphy had just seen a ghost!! Right after the final shot showing the vehicle after it has been consumed in flames, Reggie glances over at his blown-up vehicle convincingly sorrowfully, almost as if preparing to cry.The plot/storyline of `Another 48 Hours' is satisfactory at best, but that's not what makes it a great movie. It's a great movie because of its highly excessive comedic value and strong degree of impartiality. On top of that, there's a moral to be found here. If anything, it teaches you one very important lesson that can literally mean the difference between life and death. The lesson is as follows: never, ever under any circumstances challenge the superiority of a man pointing a gun at you, especially when he's in a bad mood. The scene portraying that moral was especially amusing, and it took full advantage of Murphy's supreme acting capabilities. Again, he shows nothing less than unfeigned sincerity in both vocal and facial expressions as he explains his bad day to the bar crowd.One last point I want to make about `Another 48 Hours' is its strong impartiality factor. Another important lesson to be learned here is that what goes around comes around. For example, there's a scene in the movie where Reggie is shooting basketball shortly before being released from prison and Jack Cates (played by Nick Nolte) comes to visit him. This is where we notice a certain bitterness in Reggie's personality as it relates to Jack, but it clearly shows itself when he pops him in the head with the basketball quite rapidly and unexpectedly. Also unexpected, at least on Reggie's behalf, is the scene where Jack punches him in the face in retaliation for the basketball incident, shortly after the bar fight scene. Then, there's the scene where Reggie strikes him in his gunshot-wounded arm with his fist, at which point HE calls it even. Although Jack's action was fueled by the basketball incident, one must take into account that the basketball incident was fueled by Jack's refusal to give Reggie back his money, after promising that he would give it to him after his prison release.While the plot/storyline of `Another 48 Hours' is a little weak, and not always quite as lucid as that of its predecessor, it more than makes up for that with superb acting, lessons to be learned, and a strong degree of impartiality. It's also a great movie which shouldn't be missed by anyone interested in seeing some of the most bitter sides of Murphy's acting capabilities as of yet.The KAB score -Plot/storyline: 6Interest Factor: 9Comedic Value: 10Impartiality Factor: 10Lasting Appeal: 10Overall KAB evaluation: 9.0 excellent.Reviewer: Kelvin.
Fantastic. This movie has DEFINITELY held up through the test of time - the ridiculousness is just as funny today as the first time I saw it!  Love this DVD
I really love Lucy. Great DVD collection with complete and uncut episodes.  I watch them with my children and we never fail to laugh even if we have see the episodes before.  I highly recommend this serie
excellent. i have all four of leisa hart's sexy series dvds and love them so much, i love them in differnet ways because i feel so good after doing each workout rotated during the week; i hvae lost weight, toned up parts of my body i ususally have hard times working, but most importantly i feel good about myself and my body, and my husband loves the new me, fit and sexy and ready to shock some classmates at our 20 year reunion.....get sexy, get these dvds, you'll enjoy them alot
Woo! Hoo!. This being director John Woo's first excursion in Western films he doesn't skip a beat from his Hong Kong triumphs.  The action here is exceptionally paced keeping you on the edge of your seat throughout.  Anybody who has seen Woo's prior work("The Killer", "Hard Boiled") knows the secret to his success as an action director is that he does not compromise character for kinetics and "Broken Arrow" is no exception.  John Travolta as the renegade Army major makes for a charismatic heavy.  As the film's everyman(and woman) heroes Christian Slater and Samantha Mathis more than fill the bill.  A definite sleeper in the action genre that deserves to be checked out or in my case revisited
Scariest Movie I've ever seen. I am not a horror movie fan, in fact there are very few horror movies that have truly scared me, but this one indeed made me literally crap myself. I caught this movie during the midnight hours on IFC 2 years ago, and luckily the movie was just starting, so I got to see it from beginning to end. This movie is basically about a man named Frank Zito (Joe Spinell) who's a psychotic serial killer who seeks pleasure by killing women, because he feels he's getting back at his abusive mother who was also a prostitute. After her death Frank feels alone, but cannot forget the mistreatment he received from her all those years.Frank lives in a tiny apartment in New York City, in which he keeps several mannequins. He uses these mannequins by putting his victim's bloody scalps, on it's heads. When he spots a woman named Anna (Caroline Munro), a photographer in the park taking pictures he gains a sudden interest in her, but not the type of interest in which he wants to murder her, but kind of a romantic interest. He takes her out to dinner and buys her gifts, but will he change his mind about her, and make her become another one of his victims?Some of the scenes in this film are so incredibly gut-wrenching, especially the scene when he chases a nurse into a subway station, and she hides in a bathroom stall. I felt my heart pounding the whole entire time. The effects were realistic (Nice Job Tom Savini!), they don't come close to todays, even though the movie was released in 1980.  Joe Spinell plays this part so well that you might think he was for real, and not only that, but he physically looked the part too . The scenes where he's in his apartment talking to his mannequins are some of the most creepiest scenes I have ever seen in a movie. I believe that this film is one of the most realistic horror films out there, because we get to see the results of how an alone, mistreated child might turn out. This isn't one of those lame zombie movies, it's the real deal. If you like horror, and a lot of gore, and you haven't seen this then I recommend you watching this.
guilty as sin. This dvd  is in perfect condition a 5 if I ever saw one.came package well and came when it said it would.I recommened this dvd to every body
Fun and Entertaining!. Ignore the critics and naysayers - Most of them wouldn't know entertainment  unless it exploded in front of their face - Also, people (especially young people don't read the classics anymore - I say this and I'm only 33) - One of the best things about this movie is the use of the literary characters (Love the casting) - I've never read the comic, so I had not been influenced by it upon watching this movie - However, I have read most of the novels these characters were based upon - Fantastic to see them brought to life on the big screen! - dark, somber - perfect mood for this time in history - but i can see why this movie didn't go down well - not enough dumb action, useless bloodshed, stupid jokes, and whiny characters for the masse
Great history of Johnny's career. I loved this tape. We see Johnny Cash as a young man, skinny and edgy, reckless and a bit foreboding, in his early days of music, then see him change into a somber serious minded artist who's dark side of music and earth bound ways grip us with his undaunted spirit. We see him mature, evolve, become a bit weathered with age, but no less believable. He commands your attention, the commentary from other stars and artists flourish this great documentary with a personal touch. It took me back in time, to my youth when I first met Johnny Cash and I purchased this immediately after his passing. Later, I read his music sales had gone up 300% after his death. If you love Johnny Cash this one is a collectors item of great memorabilia. Highly recommended as a memoir. You will be missed, Johnny
Learn from a Master Drummer. (...)I bought the John Yost Teaches West African Rhythms DVD last year.  That was a good DVD to learn rhythms and then I recently bought the Thione Diop DVD.  This one is even better! It sounds and looks ten times better. The notation lights up and and shows me when to hit the notes and there are so many different combination of instruments I can choose from as it plays.  The fast ensemble videos show Thione playing solo with the other drums.  I have never seen a master drummer before but after seeing the solo intro I want to see one in person. It is amazing that they can play as fast as they do. There are five rhythms to learn on this DVD but there are 5 parts to each rhytm. I've used the other drums before, and I wish I had the other drums to play with, but the djembe is my favorite
The end of texhnolyze. Wow... that is the only way to describe this ending.  With most cyber-punk films, you get a dreary conclusion that is steeped with philosophy with a sense of rebirth and renewal.  Usualy hope is reborn in one form or another, even if depressing sacrfices are necessary for it to happen.  That is not thew case here.  There is no great showdown or no great philosophy discussed with the future of humanity is at stake.  A boy has begun to change and desires to be different then what he was.  He wants to save a girl.  The ending seemed hectic and didn't fit the usual cyber-punk ending.  At first, I was shocked at what appeared to be mass violence and gorey deaths signaling a lack of a outline for the plot.  Nothing is further from the truth.  Watch these last two episodes, ponder on what you saw, then when you are ready, rewatch them.  You will be glad you did and you will see the reasoning behind what was once apparent anarchy.  The ending is not typical or happy or life affirming, but it is realistic for where the show was going and probably one of the best thought out endings I have seen in a while.  Certain people will hate this ending regardless of what I or anyone else sayts about it.  It is dark, depressing, disturbing, and quite sad.  Most of people who hate this would have probably been weeded out in earlier volumes.  To those that are left, brace yourselves and watch.  Give it a chance, you will be glad you did.  It is quite interesting to look back over the boy and how he has changed from the beginning.  Its a great series with a flawless ending.  A classic series, despite a slow beginninbg that lacked a detailed plot and a middle that tended ignor reality during the boy's fight scenes despite a stronger sense of reality everywhere else.
Awesome straight forward ROCK. If you are from that Deep Purple ,Foreigner ,Rainbow ,Whitesnake,Bad Company... era,just go ahead and grab this one .Good Sound ,Picture and The band sounds really tight
4.5 stars for a great film. I'm surprised the *'57 Caddy* didn't win an Oscar for this film. A classic "Character Study" which can never happen again - a remake would have Alma (Patricia Neal's character) as the one in control and Hud as a conflicted guy battling his "feminine" side.Actually, Neal's character *is* the strongest in this 1963 black and white masterpiece; her ahead-of-her-time (non-flamboyant) sensuousness underscores her strength here: she flirts, she beats guys at cards, she even admits to Hud that she's not invulnerable to his masculinity - that last one wouldn't be in any imagined remake. Point is, Neal's Oscar-winning performance should be appreciated at the same level as Newman's work (and for my money he over-acts just a tad).Paul battles with (Oscar-winning) Melvyn Douglas over the future of the ranch - dealing with cattle cannot sustain, especially at the prospect of drilling for oil. The elder Bannon shows his own stubbornness when he loses his grip when his cattle have to be removed due to disease.Not an easy film to embrace; not one to watch once a week with a microwave dinner. But worth collecting.
The Big Kick In The Head. What makes these films so enjoyable for me is that when they were made,they were intended as dead serious educational material.HA!Maybe that's why they're so facinating now or,at the very worst,surreal fodder.Some films are hilerious and laughable,such as a case study on LSD in which a girl trips that a hot dog turns into a troll.Others are just bizzare-such as Sonny Bono trying to make clear the good and bad about marijuana even while he behaves as if he himself is stoned.A couple of the films are rather dull such as the boring classroom instructional 'Human Growth' and some are actually pretty serious warnings about the dangers of syphillis and sex education for mentally challaged adults.And not to be missed is 50's movie star Sal Mineo's bizzare song at the end of thesmug 'LSD-Insight Or Insanity'.These are really fun if your looking for a good laugh at the absurdity of youth education of the day,or if your just into weird propaganda
"Rockin' from the Delta to the DMZ!". Good Morning Vietnam is one of Robin Williams' earliest forays into drama. While The World According to Garp is arguably his first attempt to be taken seriously and blend his comedic sensibilities with drama, Good Morning maintains a much better balance. The first half of the movie is an anarchic anti-authoritarian comedy while the second half has the comedy take a back seat in favour of an unrequited romance and the growing insurgency in Saigon.Mitch Markowitz's screenplay makes a smooth transition between these two halves by doing it gradually with elements of comedy and drama blending together naturally so that neither one is entirely abandoned in favour of the other.Director Barry Levinson successfully harnessed the comedian's wild, manic energy in this movie. Of course, the Williams' radio monologues (famously adlibbed by the comedian) are the highlights as he cuts loose with his trademark rapid-fire humour ("What's the difference between the Army and the Cub Scouts? Cub Scouts don't have heavy artillery."). Williams is an actor who needs a strong director to rein him in. His best movies are the ones where he collaborated with a director who had their own distinctive vision (Peter Weir, Terry Gilliam and Gus Van Sant) and this one is no different.Even though Good Morning is essentially a vehicle for Williams, Levinson wisely surrounds him with a strong supporting cast of character actors, like Robert Wuhl, Bruno Kirby and J.T. Walsh.Along with Oliver Stone's Heaven and Earth, Good Morning Vietnam gives a human dimension to the Vietnamese people. Unlike many other Vietnam War movies of the `80s, the Vietnamese are not portrayed as some anonymous enemy but real people with their own distinctive personalities.This incarnation is an improvement over the previous DVD. There is a six part "Production Diary" that runs 34 minutes. This is a retrospective look back at how the film came together and just how much of it is based on the real Adrian Cronauer who is interviewed. He sets the record straight and even talks about the origins of his famous sign-on (and the film's title). Director Barry Levinson talks about Robin Williams' extensive improvisations and how the director knew when to let him go and when he had to stick to the script. One part also focuses on the film's fantastic soundtrack of `60s rock `n' roll music and the role it played in the movie. Another segment focuses on the actual shoot that took place in Thailand and the logistical nightmare of filming there. Add to that the extremely hot weather which, incidentally, gave the film a certain amount of authenticity. There are lots of good anecdotes told but sadly, only cast members Bruno Kirby and Robert Wuhl are back with Williams no where to be found."Raw Monologues" features 13 minutes of footage from Williams' radio monologues that was not used or alternate takes of some of the jokes. There is some pretty funny material here but it is fascinating to see this material in rough form, watching how Williams would refine it by dropping some bits and keeping others with slight variations.Finally, there is the original teaser and theatrical trailers
Torch song Trilogy after 17 years. Its 2005 and only recently have I managed to catch the Torch Song Trilogy that was made in 1988. But since 1988, many gay oriented theme movies have popped up ranging from going through AIDs(Philadelphia) plus a more positive approach towards coming of age story (from Edge of Seventeen to Get Real to Beautiful Thing).Not to mention the French coming out with really raunchy coming out gay pieces like Wild Reeds and Come Undone.Thus, when I decided to watch this 1988 movie(due to boredom), I was a bit more reserved and wasn't expecting so much from the outcome due to the fact that there has been many movies since its time.Alas, after watching it for almost 2 hours, I have to admit - IT was GOOD! I could not say that it was good for its time back in 88 since I was eight back then. But now after watching so many gay movies, this is one good piece of writing and film adaptation! SuperbI am sure if you wish to know more about the greatness of the movie the other reviewers will have much to say. A must watch
Pirates of the Caribbean, review by SL. I was sceptical about this movie at first, but I was supricesed how good this movie was.We have sword fighting, romance, pirates, kiddnapping and funny skelletons!It is absolutely a great movie and I truly reconmand it for both young and old.An amazing great and funny movie with exitmant
a must-see. This documentary gives a brief introduction to Al-Jazeera, which, if you didn't know already, is the main arab language newschannel. It is a source which has won a great deal of respect in the arab world for it's willingness to go where other, stated-owned and controlled arab networks won't tread. In this sense it is more than a mere arab CNN in that it stands out more in the general landscape of arab media.The filmmakers here interview Al-Jazeera personel, as well as some american journalists, and the american official which liases with Al-Jazeera for Centcom, the american Central Command in the present Irak war (which happens to be 30 miles from Al Jazeera headquarters). It covers the timeline from just before the war, to just after Bush anounced main millitary operations to be over.By striving to be neutral, the documentary allows you to see how Al-Jazeera see themselves and how they conceive their mission in the world. They are very disappointed in the United States, but adhere strongly to its values.Also interesting is how being "on the arab side" gives them a very different perspective from western media in spite of the fact that they clearly espouse its values, like when they are angered by Pentagon protests at their having showed images of US prisoners, when western media routinely show Iraki POWs.An unexpected insight the documentary affords you is that it lets you see just how incompetent millitary media management can be. The american liaison doesn't speak a word of arabic in spite of being assigned by his goverment to the most important arab news source, and as if that weren't enough, he is barely articulate in english and clearly doesn't know anything about the local context and history. Another instance of bungled media operations is when centcom tells journalists about the deck of cards with the most wanted iraki officials, but doesn't have the foresight to have some to give to journalists, irritating the very people they are trying to win over.All in all it's a compelling watch which gives you a good look into the producers of news in the west and arab worlds. It gets four stars rather than five because of it's sometimes amateurish handling of flow, which makes it at times a bit unfocused
A different movie than I expected. I recently rented this movie due to the fact I needed a compremise between myself and my fiancee. She ususally picks very romantic movies and I would rather see an action movie, so I figured an Adam Sandler comedy would be a good change of pace and something we both would enjoy.Click in my opinion is not a comedy, it has some moments where you might laugh, but in general it is much more of a family movie with a few innappriopate language. Adam Sandler does a good but not great job pulling off the tired and relentless worker who is trying to reach CEO by the time he is 40. He soon finds out that in order to do this he is going to have to put work first, which many Americans do. After speeding through most of life in order to reach his real goal of moving up the corporate ladder, he finds that life has passed him by, his father is dead, his wife has left him for a man who wears a speedo, and his son is following in his footsteps and ignoring his family.Like I said I intented to rent a comedy, but what I got instead was a solid film, with a good message, and some funny parts to it, and not to mention the very beauitful Kate Beckinsale. So if you are looking for a good relaxing movie this is a great movie to select, but if you are looking for a good laugh, I would suggest The Waterboy, or Dirty Work or one of my all-time favorites Happy Gilmore
They finally got it right!. This movie rocks, man. I'm so happy that they finally produced a Stephen King script almost entirely true to the original story. More than that. It's about 99% accurate. They added some stuff like a new female character played by Julie Entwistle, that wasn't in the book, but it turned out to be integral to the enhanced ending. Normally I'm very critical of people who watch these movies without having read the books first, but this time I think I can confidently say that even non-readers should like this movie. It's a masterpiece of suspense and gore. Rent it, folks, and call him the "Night Flier.
kev@amberley christchurch new zealand. doobie brothers live at the wolf trap is like no other dvd i have watched:awesome is one word i can use.went to there concert here back in january which was also awesome.i think there no overuse of the horns.infact the sax player is a cool dude. keep on rocking doobies cause i know i will for a long time to come.
An Underrated Film. This is one of the most underrated war (or anti-war) films of all time. The story is a familiar one: a group of American and German soldiers call their own unauthorized truce during the holidays and learn that the enemy isn't such an enemy after all. The original took place in WWI; this one is "updated" to WWII. (Paul McCartney even used the storyline in an early music video-- Tug of War, I think.) But never has the story been told so eloquently and beautifully as in this film. If you're looking for an inspirational movie for the holidays-- one that doesn't involve Santa Claus, angels, or Ebenezer Scrooge-- you should definitely consider "A Midnight Clear."
The Devil's Backbone. Stark "ghost story" that some may compare to "Sixth Sense" yet, in my opinion, the two movies have little in common except on a very superficial level. The title, to me, only made sense upon a second viewing in the same way as its symbolism did. But then, I always watch movies I like more than once: the first time for the plot, the rest for the subtleties... The movie itself has none of the "sophistication" and the slickness of the typical American production. It is a raw and graphic drama set during the Spanish Civil War in a physically hostile landscape that fully complements the story. Although some questions remain unanswered at the end, I did not find this disturbing because, somehow, they were intellectual questions, rather than flaws in the plot. In other words, the answers were, somehow, not essential to the story. I would recommend this film simply because it is an excellent example of a "different" kind of movie making. Beyond that, it is convincingly acted, refreshingly and satisfylingly exotic. And eminently watchable
To the powers that be at Fox. Just for the record I will be ordering DVD's whenever this is released and sending them to thirty or so of my closest friends which is what I did when The Office (British version) came out and I was a hero. Please!!! We're begging you!
A tweedy delight. I first saw this BBC comedy series in its rerun phase on American PBS in the 1980s, and watched my home-recorded VHS tapes over and over again every few months or so. I felt some trepidation getting the DVD set this year, not knowing if the experience would stand up to my memories from so many years past. Now I see that I was silly to worry, for this show is just as fresh and funny as when it first aired in the late seventies. Penelope Keith is devastatingly dead-on as Audrey Fforbes-Hamilton, the unflappable, genteel traditionalist who adjusts her xenophobic upbringing to fall in love and hang on to a piece of her beloved family estate. Peter Bowles is at once dapper, arrogant, bumbling, and sweet as Richard DeVere, the new-money CEO who displaces Audrey from her manor and then proceeds to woo her, and be wooed by her, over the course of 20 charming (and highly addictive) half-hour episodes.The screenwriting is consistently deft and witty, with an ambitious reach that never weighs down the sparkle of its light touch. Audrey and Richard's exchanges remind me of the sophisticated repartees between Katherine Hepburn and Cary Grant, full of competitive verve and flirty intelligence. Plus, it's just that much more interesting to have your romantic leads battling it out verbally in English riding clothes and Wellingtons. Elsewhere, the show tackles traditional English mores and rituals with both satire and affection. Audrey decries the processed-foods empire that Richard has built and refers to him as "a grocer," only to find that even the village farmers are buying his frozen peas in the local market. Richard climbs to the top of the corporate ladder as a self-made man, only to be frustrated by the prejudices of colleagues who exclude him because he lacks "old school ties." Audrey strides proudly out to her flower garden, secure at being "at one with the seasons of the earth," only to get blown back by a gale-force wind kicked up by the blades of Richard's new helicopter. The country old meets the city new, with hilarious consequences. Will Richard succeed at "reprogramming" the estate farm with a computer? Can Audrey run all of her village errands using a horse-drawn carriage?And let's not forget all the foxhunts, charity balls, birdwatching clubs, and Sunday services that add to the rituals of daily life in this modern pastoral community. There are situations galore to occupy and mystify the unforgettable ensemble cast of supporting characters, who include Audrey's best friend Marjorie, Richard's mother Mrs. Polouvicka (wonderfully portrayed by Daphne Heard, whom some may remember as the forgetful "Nanny" from _Upstairs, Downstairs_), Audrey's long-suffering butler Brabinger, Old Ned the gardener and odd jobs man, Mrs. Patterson the cranky village store owner, the rakish Brigadier, and the sherry-tippling Rector. The acting is realistic and convivial, and the comic timing never fails, making Grantleigh Manor a place you will never tire of going home to.
the unsaid is an awesome movie. I brought the DVD because of VINCENT KARTHEISER, he is my favorite movie star. This is a very high quality film. Both Vincent Kartheiser and Andy Garcia performed excellent. I did got a strong feeling for the the scene and air in it, and highly recommend this great indie film.
Yet Another Excellent Connery Bond Flick... "You Only Live Twice" has many of the best elements of the entire Bond series; it has the best theme song of them all (which, as pop fans may recognize, was chopped into some super-popular mainstream song a few years back...and proved to be whatever "band"'s one hit for their one-hit wonder music career...anyway, who cares), the best villain (the original Blofeld...that's right...the one that Mike Myers spoofs in "Austin Powers"), and the best looking Asian women of any Bond movie.  This film, for me, ranks third in the series, behind "Goldfinger" and "From Russia With Love"; "Dr. No" is a close fourth (they're all so damn good, how can anyone even compare them?).  The only thing that detracts from this picture is the morphing of Bond into a Japanese man...but that's Roald Dahl for you, folks.  Strange.  However, this film is one of the most entertaining and best of the twenty, and I highly recommend it; it's a blast to watch!  In fact, it remained the best Bond movie made until "GoldenEye" 28 years later, as everything went downhill from here until then (only slightly with Lazenby's effort, then steeply with "Diamonds are Forever" (don't waste your time) into the Roger Moore era).  Bottom line: Buy it now and enjoy
Baywatch Is So Cool. I HAVE SEEN THIS MOVIE AND I THINK IT IS ONE OF THE BEST BAYWATCH MOVIES EVER. IT HAS SOME OF THE BEST PEOPLE IN THE WORLD AS STARS
Soon to be a classic... By now most people have seen this on TV for free several times, so a purchase may be only reserved for the fanatic.  If so, go for it.  A review of this is nearly worthless because Ron's reputation for popularity speaks for itself
Wonderful for those who believe Love is possible!. I was typing a review & lost the window, so I hope this isn't a repeat, but I'm starting over on writing this . . .I'm sorry to see the poor reviews by some on this site, whose cynical, jaded views say more about their own attitudes than they do about the film.Among the considerable charms of this independent film are it's personal, somewhat "home-made" qualities, the excellent script & total sincerity of the entire enterprise. It's such a refreshing departure from standard Hollywood fare & from those "independent" films struggling to emulate such formulas. I love the personal touch of ANGORA RANCH, it's considerable humor & eccentricity.Indeed, if you're open to the possibility that Love (yes, CAPPED!) exists, & that special people sometimes find one another among the teeming billions of this planet, you may find this film a treat. In fact, the virtues of this film seem to owe a lot to the director/actor Paul Bright, who also wrote the thoughtful & intelligent script. He's clearly a man of many talents & a film maker to watch.This film is a labor of love & anyone with an open mind & open heart, regardless of your sexual orientation, will find this more than worth your while. In fact, I consider the DVD an excellent investment & suggest you recommend it to others to support & encourage this kind of creativity & the message.What is the message? To me, it affirms the serendipity, the unexpected, quirky ways life may unfold, that Love can happen when you're least expecting it from something as seeminly unrelated as putting on the brakes to avoid running over a bunny. If anyone doesn't get it, that Love is what life is all about, too bad!Though some gay viewers may be drawn to the cute young blond protagonist, for me it was Paul Bright's older character, the "gay son Jackson" that shone & dazzled me. In fact, to me he's an incredibly hot, engaging man. All of the characters have dimension & nuance. This is an alternative gem & & hope it becomes a quiet hit.Especially fine is the performance of Tim Jones as Peter, the father of Jack. ANGORA RANCH will appeal to a range of folks of many kinds who have not given up on Love. The universe is full of possibilities. It IS possibilities! I'm really glad I own this DVD.Bruce P. Grethe
Julius Caesar. I am pleased with the DVD.  As a teacher, I strive to present the most up-to-date and high quality materials in my classroom.  I sometimes have difficulty finding classics in this format.  It is excellent.  Thank you
Where Is The Second Peak?. Considering the vast amount of TV and film garbage happily making its way out onto DVD, its scandalous that those who currently own the rights to something of the genuine quality of Twin Peaks don't let the public see it. Years have gone by since I purchased this fragment of the original program and yet still no word on the release of the rest of the shows.Whoever the current owners are - show it, or sell it because we want to see it.
Pure Entertainment. The Seven Samurai was the basis for that wonderful western The Magnificient Seven, but is in every way a superior movie.  The lighting, the camera angles and acting are all first class.  The director is brilliant.  Enjoy this treasure
Private Finnish Film Festival. Young Gods (Hymypoika) shows what happens when four male high school students in urban Finland make a pact to accelerate their personal growth by secretly filming themselves having sex with women and then viewing each others' films.  The four have a variety of outcomes and receive a variety of responses from the women involved.The blond on the DVD cover, Jere (played by Reino Nordin), pushes the idea the hardest and gets goateed, romantic Markus (Jarkko Niemi), and awkward Sami (Ville Kivela) to go along.   Well-off orphan Taavi (Jussi Nikkila) will compulsively film what he can get away with but does not want to be a performer.The women swept up in this are Jere's girlfriend, Reeta (Jenni Banerjee), Markus's girlfriend, Mira (Mervi Takatalo), and Jere's sister, Jenni (Evi Suppala).  Markus discovers an interest in a policewoman, Helena Paakkonen (Laura Malmivaara).The students' plots are found out.  Girlfriends change or drop boyfriends, there are rape attempts, there is a suicide, some women like being filmed, and one student discovers shocking films of his family's past.  To move the action along, there are nude parties, public nude celebrations, standard sex scenes, an S&M anal sex scene, sex with a prostitute, nude conga-lines and more.  Some even have homework.  There is a lot going on.Jere, Markus, Sami, and some extras provide full male nudity. The women do too, though they are more discretely positioned.  Although none of the characters is gay, there are enough bodies and borderline events to keep a gay audience entertained.The photography is remarkably good.  The actors are convincing.The extras are trailers, TV spot ad, music video, and English subtitles for the Finnish.Some ideas are so bad that seeing is believing
4.5; delightfully original. I have a theory: audiences are getting smarter. Whereas before a big Hollywood movie with a massive marketing push would've been all the rage, now people are starting to know better. They're realizing that a terrible movie's a terrible movie no matter how often we can see Julia Roberts deal with more romantic comedic mishaps or much stuff Michael Bay can destroy. So when a movie comes along like Being John Malkovich, or Memento or even visually impressive like the Matrix, we stand up and take notice. Building a career largely from inventive music videos, first time director Spike Jonze comes out of the gate with probably the most unconventional comedy you'll see.Loserly Craig Schwartz (John Cusack, always good) is an aspiring puppeteer who can't get any work. Then he has his dishevelled looking wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz) leaving in their small New York apartment with pets everywhere since Lotte's a pet store worker. Craig, due to his puppeteering skills gets accepted at a company located, amusingly, on the 7 1/2 floor, complete with cramped ceilings. He also has a strong attraction to one of his co-workers, feisty Maxine (Catherine Keener). One day while working, he discovers a small day and going inside he finds out he can see the world through John Malkovich's eyes for 15 minutes with an unceromonious dump on the New Jersey turnpike ditch.Craig and Maxine get an idea: charge 200$ for people to experience being John Malkovich which is a novel idea until Lotte goes through and feels a deeper connection, especially around the idea of Maxine. Then we have a bizarre love square or star or something since Craig loves Maxine who loves Lotte but only when Lotte is inside John Malkovich...'s head. Try not to wrap your head around it since it's better explained in the movie and after awhile you don't even worry about stuff like vessels or portals, you just go with it.Casting is of course important and no one seems wasted, even Diaz, who I normally can't stand. The real treat though is of course Malkovich since at times you almost can't tell if he's acting or if he's really that quirky. Then there's the comedy which is subtle to the first-was-funny-but-now-it-ain't like the 7 1/2 floor and the small ceilings but then the film shows you what happens when Malkovich steps through his own portal and it becomes not only a technical marvel but one of the flat-out funniest things I've seen lately. Only problem with the story is that at a certain point it shifts gears and the film almost speed walks to its climax rather than lurching forward, like it was shot in the foot.Like the Amazon review says, I don't know if the film can warrant repeat viewings and you can get more out of it every time you see it but that first viewing is quite something
Camille Caudel. Perhaps the only sculpture movie I ever saw. Very French. She finally looses her mind at the end. Much angst
Tame and often sweet compared to later seasons. Viewing the first season of Melrose Place, one would be hard-pressed to peg this as the over-the-top sudsy sleazefest it would become.  Conceived as a spin-off to the popular "Beverly Hills 90210," "Melrose Place" was aimed at the burgeoning Gen X demographic that was the darling of producers in the years post-Reagan/Bush.The cast is young and pretty, and servicably talented.  The characters they created are a little green around the edges in this first season, but there's substance in the proceedings, as a group of strangers forges a faux family out of socio-economic instability, flirty chemistry, and a genuine affection for their shared abode - an eden of greenery, wrought iron balconies and the ubiquitous pool in the courtyard.  Frankly, such a place would have been way out of the price-range for a pack of 20-somethings that includes a struggling actress, a social-worker, a construction-worker, and various office drones.  I suppose that's part of the charm of the show.So enjoy this year of Melrose bliss before the addition of Heather Locklear, crazy stalker girlfirends, backstabbing manstealing sisters, et. al.  While future seasons were more catty and fun, it's this first season that hooked me for being geniune, sometimes smart, and often sweet.
Young Ana Garcia takes on her mother and the world. The surprise in "Real Women Have Curves" is not that Ana Garcia (American Ferrera) is able to get into a first rate college, given that she is the daughter of a poor Latino family in East L.A., because we buy that she is smart enough. But given her family, it is rather surprising that she dares to dream the dream. Certainly it is nothing that was every discussed around the dinner table in the Garcia family. Her father, Ral (Jorge Cervera, Jr.) is a gardener and her mother, Carmen (Lupe Ontiveros) makes dresses at the sweatshop run by Ana's sister, Estela (Ingrid Oliu). Her mother dismisses out of hand the idea that Ana can go to college and insists she come to work at the dress shop. Although Ana's teacher, Mr. Guzman (George Lopez), continues to encourage her it is not until Ana endures working in the sweatshop for a while that she becomes desperate enough to sit down and write that college application essay.While the story of this 2002 film begins with a young girl graduating high school and ends with her on her way to college, as the title of "Real Women Have Curves" should indicate, this is really about notions of self-worth and body image. Estela's shop makes dresses that are sold for ten times what they are paid on consignment from a big company that is exploiting their cheap labor. Despite her overbearing mother, Ana has enough brains to know exploitation of the workers when she sees it and enough self-confidence to challenge the way of the world for all the good that might do anybody. But then another idea becomes more important as Ana gets her co-workers to wonder why big women (the size of say, cows, hippos, elephants and orcas) should not get to wear beautiful dresses cut to their own figures. The best scene in the movie is when Ana is sweating to death in the dress shop and decides being comfortable is a worthy goal. The next thing we know the ladies are comparing their bodies and driving Ana's mother absolutely crazy.This was originally a play by Josefina Lopez, who worked on the teleplay along with George LaVoo for this film directed by Patricia Cardoso ("El Reino de los cielos"). The flaw that most stands out in this film is that having created an ideal with regards to a beautiful dress for a real woman with curves, we never get the payoff, even though such a dress materializes. This is rather disappointing seeing as how the dress becomes pivotal to my deconstructing of the film, but while I endorse the ideological sentiments of the film regarding female body image I am obviously not in a position to do so from personal knowledge, which may well indicate that I am off base here.This DVD has a pair of above average commentary tracks, the first with actresses Ferrera and Ontiveros, and the second with the director and the screenwriters. Since all are committed to the message of the film, they actually discuss the importance of what is going on and how such issues resonate in their own lives and careers (especially in terms of Lopez), rather than simply telling stories of what happened on the set and other sundry topics. Ferrera is clearly the star of this film, and her performance is a winning one whatever problems we may see with the teleplay, but for those who were introduced to Ontiveros's talents on "Desperate Housewives" it is certainly nice to see here playing a more completely fleshed out (so to speak) character, and her participation in the commentary track is equally as strong. In the end the key thing is that this film is not merely for Latino women, but all real women with curves, and if this film teaches them anything it is to make sure they are exposed to its rhetorical position when they are still young
A clever, gripping film. This film keeps you waiting for the big event, and when it happens it's such a twist you're left shaking your head.A must see for anyone who likes good, solid suspense films
AN AWESOME REAL STORY PORTRAYAL AND... ...all of the actors and actresses did a SUPER fine job!!!! This was the first movie I ever saw with Cher as an actress and I really was impressed with her acting, as I was with all the others. This is a movie that yes will bring tears BUT also makes you really think and hits the heart chords and nerves. What happened to those people in the real story is portrayed in this movie EXCELLENTLY! This is a MUST HAVE
Two thumbs up!. Undoubtly David Mamet lived a glorious decade in these eighties. House of games , the untouchables a scripter and this one.Don't wonder if this movie belongs to cult movie status. It's a witty comedy about an inept , poor experienced and low level gangster who suffers the consequences of his acts when he goes against the orders to take an old shoe - shine boy on one last fing  just before the latter goes to prison being not guilty.Notice this disfunctional state of mind of this rookie gangster,  follows the ancient rule about the wisdom of the experience , despite this statement is not always true all the times , but it does in this case.The laughable side about the sordid universe that surrounds the underworld has been so irreverently told as in this case.Don Ameche (Coccon) and Mantegna (House of games and Alice) give a fine performance.Don't miss this funny comedy. A winner film
One of the best action films from this era!. This review is for the 2005 Warner Brothers DVD.The movie opens in a Texas prison where Doc McCoy (Steve McQueen) is doing time for armed robbery. He is denied parole and has to come to terms that the only way to get out early is to bribe a prison board member, Jack Beynon (Ben Johnson) by indulging him with sexual favors with McCoy's wife Carol (Ali McGraw).  The dirty deed is done and McCoy is then paroled, but Beynon coerces Doc into doing one major bank job with a collection of other crooks that Beynon has assembled.  This sets up a big heist with several twists and turns along the way for an action packed film.I've seen just about all of McQueen's movies and this is my favorite.  First, I like the opening scenes in a real Texas prison.  The guards and other prisoners aren't actors - they are the real deal.  This rest of the movie is shot in Texas also.  I don't recall seeing a single scene that appeared to be  made in a Hollywood backlot.  The plot of this movie is original.  It's more than just a bank robbery and car chases.  There are a series of interesting confrontations and slick double-crosses that add a lot of pizzazz to the film.  The street-smart character of Doc McCoy played by McQueen is what sets this apart from most action films.  His uncanny knack of figuring out what's going on and eluding his advisories is what makes it an extra special movie.  Ali McGraw is beautiful, but her acting is suspect at times.  Sally Struthers gives a wonderful performance as a ditzy, yet too sympathetic hostage.   Slim Pickens also does a stellar job as an older, but very spirited cowboy.As for the DVD, the widescreen color presentation is near pristine.  The stereo audio quality is excellent.  There are plenty of commentary features on this DVD.Movie: A-DVD Quality: A
Entertaining~. It was a great movie and arrived quickly from the date of purchase.  I was very satisfied with my purchase and overall experience
Great Movie, Good DVD. Being a masterpiece of the 90s, Reservoir Dogs is a movie I never get tired of seeing. It has everything that makes for a great guy flick. It has action, an intriguing story and tons of bad language. One thing that sets this movie apart from other movies is that they show that these robbers are more than criminals who care about no one or no thing, but these guys are strong like brothers and actual friends, which ultimately leads to their downfall. The acting in the film is just what I like. Tim Roth does excellent as Mr. Orange, and you really believe he is in pain the entire time. Steve Buscemi is the sarcastic Mr. Pink that provides a little of the comic relief of the film, even though he is being serious the entire time. It is just the personality of these characters that makes this film go by quickly and make everyone who watches this movie wish that it went on for another thirty minutes at least! For a debut film from an unknown director at the time, Quentin Tarantino does a remarkable job in front of and behind the camera; it is easy to see that he was going to be big.The box itself is something any collector would want, it looks and feels like a gas can which is a reference to the scene when Mr. Blonde tortures the cop. The top comes off easy to reveal the real DVD case which is made to look like a match book. The special features are a hit and miss, which kind of dragged this DVD to four stars instead of five. There are great things on this disc that are great, such as the stories told about Lawrence Tierney, but a couple of other extras on the DVD are sub-par. Such as the tipping guide, which is nothing more than a page that tells how a few characters would tip, depending on the amount of money. No videos, no sound, it is nothing that needed to be included.The deleted scenes and interviews with QT, Chris Penn, Michael Madsen and Tim Roth are great things that I'm glad where added to the DVD. Then there are interviews that have nothing to do with the movie Reservoir Dogs. There are also no behind-the-scenes documentaries or nothing in detailed is said about the movie itself. Everything said about the movie is either about how it was received or what impact it made in cinema. One of my favorite extras on the DVD is "Profiling the Reservoir Dogs", which a narrator gives a little insight to the past of Mr. White, Mr. Pink, Mr. Blonde and Mr. Brown. It is very interesting and informative, but you can't really take it to heart since it feels more like speculation instead of real facts about the characters.Overall, if you love this movie, get this DVD! Like I said, the extras feel like a hit or miss, but it is still worth while because there are a few hours worth of extras-whether they be good or bad.
Extremely Funny. All I got to say is this guy is hilarious! His ability to imitate people, music, and other sounds is what really makes him funny in my opinion. If you like laughing, then buy this dvd.
Not too easy, not too hard. Easy to follow.  Not a lot of chatter.  It really works you out. Intermediate level. Great workout. WOW
One of my favourite films. Franois Truffaut's first film in the English language still stands up well, in my opinion. It is a very fine adaptation of Ray Bradbury's book.I wonder what it says to us today? Possibly quite a lot. The world in which the story takes place does look, superficially, inviting. Maybe this is what it means to be living in a police state? Guy Montag, played with great style by Oskar Werner, is a cool character (and forget the moronic American meaning of the word "cool" here), in that he isn't passionate and lives a rather passionless life. Millie Montag, his wife, is played by Julie Christie, who also plays the role of Clarice.The film is powerful because it rarely overstates its case and keeps the violence to a minimum.The film was "futuristic" in the mid-sixties, when it was made, and it does have a decidedly '60s look about it now. However, it does present us with a people who have forgotten books and get their kicks from very large -interactive TV screens - not that that would ever happen, would it!
Good Old Movie. Love this movie, kind of old but always good to watch it
Dummy is one smart movie. Dummy is one of those movies you go in not expecting to like, but you wind up falling in love with. A quirky comedy with an offbeat sense of humor it'll have you laughing so hard your stomach will hurt. I'm so glad I didn't miss this intelligent clever comedy. It's one of the best movies I've seen in years.Dummy follows the story of Steven, a shy late twenties man who lives with his dysfunctional parents and bitter sister. Fired from his dead-end job he decides to buy a ventriloquist's dummy and embark on his lifelong dream of becoming a ventriloquist. He goes down to the unemployment office and becomes attracted to his counselor Lorena on the first meeting. (I love how they're both wearing the same bland outfit; a wonderful comment on the stifling conformity of the workplace.) The dummy becomes an extension of Steven's personality and helps him overcome his shyness. With the help of his foul-mouthed tomboy friend Fangora he starts to pursue a romance with Lorena. Despite a series of blunders, (I love the scene where Fangora goes to the unemployment office. It's so funny it'll make you cry, ditto the crazy scene where he spray paints a thank-you note on her door) Steven manages to go on a few dates with Lorena. Just when things are about to get close, she breaks it off with Steven. He thinks it's his weirdness, but it's her own fears of failure in past relationships that cause the separation. At a Jewish wedding Fangora and Steven perform at, things reach a climax as he overcomes his shyness to win the woman he truly loves.This is a great movie; like another one of my favorite movies, How U Like Me Now it uses a simple story as a platform to develop complex multileveled characters. Each character in Dummy struggles to overcome a fear inside themselves and it's ironic that these inner struggles contrast the exterior personality they express. Steven is shy on the outside, but his dummy's alter ego is extremely confident. Fangora is a foul mouthed extrovert but is extremely withdrawn when confronted by her mother about her Jewish heritage. Lorena is a woman who is the picture of stability and secure on the outside but is extremely insecure. Steven's sister Heidi is a wedding planner who can't maintain a relationship. Steven's mother always comforts everyone with food because she can't express her emotions in a constructive manner. Steven's father spends most of his time making model ships of past wars but is afraid to confront the turmoil in his own home. Each of the characters with the exception of Steven's parents find true happiness when they embrace the inner parts of their personalities they have conflict with and pursue their dreams Steven finds happiness in his ventriloquism, Fangora when she embraces her Jewish heritage by performing traditional Jewish songs, Heidi when she sings at the reception and Lorena when she stands up to a former boyfriend.Director Greg Pritkin creates well-crafted film. He tells the stories of all these quirky offbeat characters beautifully. It's easy to identify with each of them and their struggles; being shy myself I could particularly relate to what Steven was going through in his life. Production values on Dummy are top notch. I especially love the cinematography; I felt like I was walking on those suburban streets. The screenplay is well written with some hilarious lines too good to spoil.The acting in this film is some of the best I've ever seen. Adrien Brody is in top form as Steven capturing his shyness (he even does his own ventriloquism) beautifully. Mila Jovovich gives the best performance of her career as Fangora. She steals all the scenes she's in; I wish she'd do more films like this instead of fanticrap like Resident Evil and Fifth Element. A few more quality films like Dummy would elevate her into the A-list where she belongs. Jessica Walter and Ron Leibman are hilarious as Steven's parents. Vera Farmiga gives a strong performace as Lorena. She plays the counselor with great depth expressing her fear and insecurities. Illeana Douglas is brilliant as Heidi. You feel all her frustrations but understand where she's coming from. Jared Harris is extra creepy as Heidi's greasy accountant ex-boyfriend.Dummy is a top ten Shawn James essential video. Pick this one up along with the Clockwatchers How U like Me Now, two other great independent films.
Great beginner tape. I have to have a light aerobic tape and this is a good one.  The low impact cardio is similiar to Leslie Sansone but without the obnoxious chatter.  I loved the upper and lower body workouts as they have short reps on each exercise - each segment is only 8 minutes long.  I wish I could create my own workout and play it, like in Denise Austin's latest walk DVD.  Instead I have to play each segment, go back and pick out what I want next from the menu and then play it, or I can just pick the "play all" choice. Highly recommended to the beginner!
Great workout for BEGINNERS. I am amazed that the reviewer Cheryl is busy saying how weak the workout is and is only suitable for "beginners"   Maybe Cheryl needs remedial reading before writing reviews.  The title is Abs Yoga for BEGINNERS"  Its a good workout, I ve used it off and on for years and it will tighten up you abs after some regular use
Great Yoga for when You're Absolutely Alone. I loved this yoga--it left me with the tingly tired delicious feeling I get sometimes from bow pose. This is the real "heart" of yoga, I feel, apart from the desire to get a workout and a nice body.However, I definitely wouldn't want to be seen doing some of these poses by anyone! Though I do many types of strenuous yoga, I couldn't do everything here fully and it was kind of humbling--this is full of those exercises that look easy but really aren't. I borrowed it from the library and will definitely add it to my collection
Irish Angels. Non-stop entertainment.  The only thing better would be to have been there.  The music, the costumes, the singers, the fiddle player, the castle setting were all just wonderful.  I also bought the CD but the DVD far outshines the audio only disc.  These Celtic Women look almost as angelic as they sound.  Angels with Irish accents
Amazing show, amazing band. This Live show CD/DVD is an excellent illustration of this band's qualities.  With great lyrics and fantastic melodies, HATB are one of the best band's to survive the 90's rocket to fame.  This CD/DVD combines classics tunes from the 90's as well as songs from their latest ablumn, which are fantastic to hear.  If you ever liked HATB, pick this item up and discover why this band continues to impress
"Live life and be happy". A film of jaw-jopping beauty and deeply held poetical lyricism, Deepa Mehta's spectacular Water - the final installment of her devastatingly beautiful Indian trilogy  - is a film of overwhelming tragedy, a gorgeous homage to the country of her birth and a real testament to the resilience of her people's spirit.Steeping her story in Indian spirituality, Mehta sets her atmospheric film in 1938 Colonial India during Gandhi's rise to power. Times are changing for this country that for so long now has only known British rule. New laws are being passed and the young - particularly the men - are gradually opening to the new ways and becoming more liberal minded.Change, however, seems far from the young Chuyia (Sarala) when her father drops her at an ashram for widows. A child bride and married for economic reasons, her much older husband unexpectedly died. Now considered a financial burden by her family she is sent to a house where she is forced to live a life of rigorous penitence and is never allowed to remarry.Here she meets the Madame of the house Madhumati (Manorma), a hugely fat and authoritarian woman in her mid-70s, who runs the house like a nazi, lauding it over all the other women. Of course, Chuyia has a hard time adjusting to this new life of singing religious hymns every day, wearing only white and begging on the streets for money.People avoid them like the plague; many Hindus believe that if they bump into a widow, they will be polluted and must do rituals of purification. Chuyia doesn't really understand any of this, but she has a sharp tongue and her rebellious instincts upset the other widows who reside in this decrepit two-story dwelling built around a court and overlooking the river, most probably the Ganges.Soon the child befriends Shakuntala (Seema Biswas), a kindly woman who struggles to calm the girl down even as she herself struggles with issues of faith and self-worth. But it is to the young and beautiful widow Kalyani (Lisa Ray), whom Chuyia is most drawn to.Through Chuyia, Kalyani meets Narayan (John Abraham), a law student and Gandhi nationalist who is from a wealthy Indian family is an ardent believer in the civil disobedience campaign of Mahatma Gandhi. Narayan falls in love with Kalyani and their romance plays out against the backdrop of the rainwater and the sacred water of the Ganges where people bath, do rituals, and send the ashes of the dead.Narayan promises to take Kalyani away and marry her, but the ancient Indian faith is very firm about widows remarrying. And although a new law has recently been passed - supported by Gandhi - the men who still have the power are intent to ignore laws that cause inconvenience to them.Mehta totally steeps her film in the social and political - and even religious - ramifications of the day, with Gandhi - and the promise of reform always in the background. This leader has begun to speak against the harsh treatment of women and the caste system, angering Hindu fundamentalists. But to the widows and other outcasts, he is a guiding light and a symbol of hope.Lush and full of atmosphere, Water contains some of the most unforgettable images of startling beauty. Indeed the calm magnificence and spirituality of the landscape - the constant ebb and flow of the water - makes a violent contrast to the oppression these widows must face, all in the name of religion.The impact is devastating and to think that these women, are even today, forced to follow chauvinistic religious rules that were put in place thousands of years ago by texts that are still treated as revered and sacred. Mike Leonard August 06.
ANIMATED BUT STILL A HARD HITTING PROPHETIC PARABLE. ANIMATED BUT STILL A HARD HITTING PROPHETIC PARABLE ABOUT THE HUMAN CONDITION ---IN A NUTSHELL:I have just enjoyed "Animal Farm", the animated feature, for the first time and I was truly impressed. Its stark animated realism, augmented by its dispassionate style of narration, gave the film a sense of inevitability which added to its weight as a 20th century parable, created from the famous work by George Orwell.WHERE THE FILM GOES: "ALL ANIMALS ARE EQUAL, BUT SOME ANIMALS ARE MORE EQUAL THAN OTHERS!"As most people point out, it is a slightly simplified and more upbeat [in the finale] rendering of Orwell's original literary work, but it is still rather hard-hitting and prophetic. Nevertheless, the personifications of farm animals turned into historic figures like Napoleon the Pig are startling depictions, and mirrored much of what happened in the 20th century, concluding with the fall of the Iron Curtain in 1989.LESSON: ABSOLUTE POWER CORRUPTS ABSOLUTELY?!Neatly depicted are the "Commandmants" which, as the ruling pigs evolve and change hands, begin to be broken by simply revising them to suit the needs of the MORE EQUAL ANIMALS. Ultimately, the reasons for the original revolution -- a desperate need to end the horrible conditions that were brought about by the exploitation of the many by the few -- repeated in the stunning finale. The results are rather predictable, but maybe they weren't when Orwell wrote the book. In any event, it seems to be a parable which needs to be brought frequently to our attention as humans, not just to the animals that are more or less equal to their neighbors in the barnyard.
WHEN ARE WE GOING TO GET A REMASTERED CUT??. I give this movie 5 stars.  Outstanding story, outstanding performances from the entire cast, an unforgettable climax..everything working together as only Capra could do it!!  I enjoy watching this movie at Christmas time.  Cooper and Stanwyck were teamed twice in 1941...for this..(and for Ball of Fire).  They have great on screen chemistry and both turn in bravura performances....especially Stanwyck.....who should have won the Oscar in 1941 for her work in three of her greatest performances (Lady Eve, Ball of Fire and Meet John Doe).The only complaint I have is all of the transfers for this superb film have always been poor.  When it was released on VHS every copy of the film was cut from a poor negative.  Why is this?  When are we going to get a good, clear, remastered cut of this fine film???Look for this in the bargain bins at your video store or order it from here....it doesn't matter.  The film is great but the DVD quality is very poor.  It will always be like this until someone decides to restore it and release it in high quality.Whenever you see a DVD that is sealed at a bargain price...beware.....you are most likely getting a poor quality transfer........
M. Night's Masterpiece. A young boy has the uncanny ability to see and communicate with the dead....that's pretty intense.  This movie keeps you on the edge of your seat and wanted to pee your pants the whole time.  M. Night Shymalan is one of today's best directors.  The performances by the actors are fantastic and believeable.  The movie has a plot that is totally awesome with an awesome ending.  This is certainly one of my top 10 movies of all time
Totally awesome!!!. Awesome College Movie.  My only regret is that I did not see this movie during my college years.  Alas, they have the DVD now!Yay!
The most sentimental of Ford's movies... Ford's cavalry trilogy is, in its way, just as much Victor McLaglen's trilogy, for he appears once again in 'Rio Grande', still superbly filling the tough-soft sergeant part, still providing the Ford horse-play comedy element with just a touch of parody, still, one might add, probably fulfilling Ford's own particular vision of revering the heroes who have helped conquer the West...The McLaglen sergeant seems drawn on the spreading of lines, but in retrospect, one realizes that somehow, paradoxically, he has inspired a remarkable degree of realism into the three motion pictures... (They would be not the same without him.)'Rio Grande' has a very strong domestic flavor...John Wayne - a casualty of the Civil War - is a cavalry officer, under strict orders, with great family problems... He's a northerner who, not surprisingly, has left his wife, a southerner, because he obediently did his military duty and burned several southern plantations - including the one owned by his wife's family... Maureen O'Hara - bringing a fitting maturity to her stereotyped assignment in the film - never forgives her husband for burning her plantation, and abruptly takes their son and goes away, effectively ending their marriage...Fifteen years later, Wayne, promoted to the rank of Lieutenant Colonel, U.S. Cavalry officer, attempts to maintain the truce calm at his southwestern post, which is besieged by marauding renegade Apaches who are continually using the border with Mexico as an escape route after their raids, a lost cause since the U.S. and Mexican governments agreed that their military forces will not cross the Rio Grande under any circumstances...He hurries to put down an Indian uprising when his past and his wife cross his path again... He is confronted by a new recruit: his West Point dropout son (Claude Jarman Jr.) and, later, the arrival of his frigid wife, desperate to buy her son out of the cavalry...Everything, domestically and militarily is, of course, resolved successfully and, indeed, predictably, but it is the texture of the film that gives it its enjoyment - the gentle study of the reconciliation of a colonel and his estranged wife; the interplay of a father compelled to send his son on a dangerous mission; the peculiar supporting contributions of the 'beloved brute sergeant,' or the cavalry side-kicks, Ben Johnson and Harry Carey, Jr.The three films (even considered singly) give a feeling of frontier military life, however colored by a director's highly personal viewpoint, that has hardly been approached, let alone surpassed...There's a beautiful scene in which Wayne and Maureen are serenaded by soldiers of his troop... We can observe a husband meditating about all that went wrong with his marriage, and watch the inclination and desire that exist in his longing sideways brief look at his wife...With first rate acting and lushly sentimental score, 'Rio Grande' can never be missed... It is the last of John Ford's cavalry movies and the most sentimental...
More of the good old Jeeves humor. If you liked the original ones, get them all.  These are just as enjoyable
Great for Beginners. My fiance and I are using this DVD to practice for our upcoming wedding. We have viewed other dance tapes but Shawn's are the only one's that show how to lead and follow. The steps are broken down clearly and at a good pace for beginners. The only additional feature that might be helpful would be to view the dancers dancing to music. Customer service is excellent. I have both emailed and called Shawn directly to ask for imput on our "First Dance".We are so hopeful that we can learn to dance with lessons from Shawn and Joanna that I have just ordered a second DVD on Country Dancing
Old Fashioned Western Fun. If you like it when the good guys win...when justice prevails...or even just old westerns, this is for you. The color and quality are top notch. It sure looks as if it were shot in the Big Valley. Stars galore are on display here; James Whitmore, William Shatner, Charles Bronson, Bruce Dern, Richard O'brien, Jill St. John, George Kennedy, among others. Then there are the regulars; Lee Majors, Linda Evans, and naturally Barbara Stanwyck. There's lots of action in this set
Wizard of OZ (two disc special addition.). A classic must have in your family libary
How far we have fallen. To watch what was the first television program which drove itself by way of a moral compass and the concern for the public good, was refreshing and saddening. It felt so nice to see an honest reporter standing up for something despite endangering both his network and himself to do it. Also, it felt sad to know that this was in the 1950s and now...well, now we have FOX. It was Murrow who actually started the ball rolling in the long overdue decapitation of Joseph McCarthy and his fascistic crusaders...now we have FOX. Watch this series and know how far we have fallen, where television's morality and spine are concerned
A Time to Think. Grisham once said he wrote his other books, e.g., The Firm, et al., so he could afford to write important books, like this one, upon which the movie s based.  Matthew McConaghey gives a fantastic performance--and why hasn't Hollywood ever--EVER--given him another part this good!  Thought provoking, great acting, great story, highly recommen
Heart Pounding Film of Murder for Hire. This is my favorite Bogie film with our hero playing a tough Brooklyn District Attorney who has to find how and why witnesses are being killed. It is not a romantic film like "Casablanca", a cult-classic like "The Maltese Falcon," a social commentary like "Knock on Any Door." It is simply the most suspensful of all Bogie flicks.  The depiction of Mendoza, the man who invented murder for profit, is terrifying.  This is spine tingling film noir with a documentary nuance. Get scared...don't miss it
Very Raw, Very Ramones. Before I put Ramones Raw in the DVD player I thought it might seem bittersweet to watch, what with three of the band members now deceased. But instead of making me feel sad, the footage only made me happy that the world ever got to experience this thing called Ramones in the first place.The DVD contains five hours' worth of footage, including concert footage from 1980 to 1996, clips of television appearances (Howard Stern and Uncle Floyd), their induction into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, and "I, Ramones," a concert shot in Italy.With exception to concert footage, most of what we see was shot by Marky Ramone on his Super 8 camera. Apparently Marky was determined to capture life on the road for the band and it is his behind-the-scenes footage that makes this DVD worthwhile. The title is appropriate as some of what you see is indeed raw, and it gets a bit confusing at times because things aren't in chronological order.Some of the more interesting footage includes the band's van being mobbed by screaming and fanatical fans much like the Beatles in "A Hard Day's Night," and Johnny sarcastically giving tour manager Monte Melnick a hard time anytime things get chaotic: "Really well organized, Monte. Nice job." Not.We also get to see the usually stoic Johnny actually laugh and joke as well as sobering evidence of Dee Dee's physical and mental decline from drug use as we see clips of a youthful and vibrant Dee Dee and a hardened and somewhat narcissistic one. There are also lots of shots of the boys sitting on the toilet, which they themselves find hilarious.Joey appears to be an easy-going, laid back guy who gets along well with everyone. But the footage suggests, as has been reported since Johnny's death, that he and Johnny did not get along very well after Johnny stole his girlfriend. We don't see the two fight or bicker. Instead, they simply and quietly avoid each other.Diehard fans of  Joey, Johnny, Marky and Dee Dee won't be disappointed with this one. It's a lively snapshot into the life of four ordinary guys whose impact on music was anything but ordinary
Crochet Fashions in Motion is Fabulous!!!. What can I say...this dvd is great!!! It has everything you need to start crocheting as a beginner and challenging projects for experienced crocheters as well.  I tried to learn to crochet w/ an instrucitonal book and almost gave up until my friend let me borrow this dvd.  Ever since I purchased it myself from amazon I've been able to learn new techniques and take on new projects like twice a week=) This dvd will mature along w/ you as you get better at crocheting and is soooo fun to knitalong with. I would definitely recommend this to anyone that is on the fence about it. Buy this dvd!!
I never thought I would say a parody of the great 'The Fugative' would be this good, but Leslie Nielsen, take a bow!. Absolutely hilarious take off on 'TheFugative', 'Braveheart' and 'America'sMost Wanted', with timely cameos bymany, But the late Richard Crenna(Summer Rental ***.5's/Rambo[nehead]movies) steals the show. A PITY hedidn't get to work with his alterego, Tommy Lee Jones! Best Nielsenspoof yet! But don't miss 'Spy Hard'or '2001: A Space Travesty'!!!!!!!!
29th Street. This is a classic must see-especially for New Yorkers!This came out way before My Big Fat Greek Wedding. If you liked that movie, you'll love 29th Street.
Great Show, but quality of Dvd not great!. We love MASH and own all the previous seasons on DVD, so naturally we wanted Season 9. We had bought it from someplace other then Amazon and returned it because the quality of the shows were not that clear (blurry). So we bought it from Amazon and even though the quality was better, it still was not as good as the previous seasons we own. Seein that its a great TV series and if your not a perfectionist (like my husband) go ahead and purchase this as you will it enjoy it anyways
Study in Betrayal and Revenge. This moody Western is a film about betrayal and revenge directed by Marlon Brando. Brando's focus here is on characters. The way they walk, talk, eat, drink, dress, kill and die is poetic, enigmatic and disturbing under Brando's direction. This film is filled with overly beautiful photography and highly detailed sets. A strange and uneasy film it is remains offbeat yet very captivating
Soylent Green - Pure Fantasy or Potential Reality. My watching this film resulted from a conversation with a friend beginning with politics and spiraling down to the future of our world. The premise of the film was disturbing to say the least. I have never been a true fan of Charleton Heston who in my opinion always has overacted. However, Edward G. Robinson seemed as comfortable playing this character as he has been in the many different roles he has played. His performance was truly heartfelt, bringing to mind the current debate on "ending one's own life with dignity". I shutter to think that this is life as it should be though. But Robinson's character acted on the decision with the counterfeit courage and ultimate hopelessness that accompanied it in such a way that you could very well empathize with him. I found the other actors to be somewhat bland. Perhaps this was acting at that point in time, but some actors can make the most of roles and others cannot. The story line was unique, but the script was lacking. A re-make today by Steven Spielberg might be worthwhile seeing. Perhaps the most striking element I took from this film was an unshakeable chilling and unsettling feeling that this could very well be our world if we do not wake up
Not perfect, but when the results are so good, who cares?. "The best of youth" is a wonderful Italian miniseries directed by Marco Tullio Giordana that we can now watch thanks to this dvd. Truth to be told, this is the kind of great opportunity you simply have to take advantage of.Why? Because this miniseries entertains, but also allows you to witness some of the things that happened in Italy in the last 50 years, from the point of view of two Italian brothers, Nicola (Luigi Lo Cascio) and Matteo (Alessio Boni) Carati. They are both very different, but thanks to them, their friends and girlfriends we can at the very least have a notion of what happened in Italy during those years. Mafia, floods, terrorism (the Red Brigades), corruption, yes, but also the transformation of two young men from starry eyed teenagers to adults that struggle with reality and its challenges, and find different paths in their lives.All in all, I can say that I loved this miniseries. "The best of youth" lasts approximately 6 hours, but that was not enough, due to the fact that you want to know more about the characters and what is going to happen with them in the future. Of course, this series is far from perfect, but when the results are so good, and manages to transmit so much, who cares?. Highly recommended!Belen Alca
a real jawdropper. his film is completely different from what I thought it was going to be:  a sensitive nature outing about a man who researched grizzly bears and advocated for them, only to be tragically killed by them.  Alas!  After reviewing the case, I must conclude the bloke was duly consumed.Yes, folks, this is a movie about one of the stupidest mortals to ever walk the earth in recent years.  Regardless of how you feel about Timothy Treadwell, you'll be completely dumbstruck -- enthralled -- by this movie, masterfully wrought by Werner Herzog.Perhaps you'd like to know:  the audio file of Timothy and Amy being eaten appears nowhere in the film, after the credits, or anywhere on this DVD in the special features.  The woman who possesses this tape (and you'll see her in the movie) hasn't released it to the public.I mention this because many people, I think, might buy the DVD thinking it's going to be on there somewhere.  No, the special features are crud:  no director's commentary, and a 50-minute documentary on the recording of the film's music, which is pretty much snoresville.There are no other special features whatsoever.And I love how Amazon makes it look like Amie Huguenard is "starring" in  it.  Sheesh
best double feature of the year !!!. These are two of the best movies that I've purchased this year.
This Movie is Over Most People's Heads (Even Though It's D&ck & Fart Jokes). This comedy hits a little too close to home for some. What makes it so classic is that I can actually see this happening to our culture to some degree. Mike Judge is awesome
Well done!. This is probably the best dolph lundgren movie ever made. it has everything. you nee to see it
FUN and gets you sweaty !!. I do not like aerobics, but I really needed to do some cardio workout, so I found this, and really, IT IS A GEM! The workout is based on very easy Latin dance steps, so it is much more fun than doing plain floor or step aerobics! And you don't need to be a dancer to use it! It is great fun! Try it
I don't get mad, I get Lou. Thornton Mellon (the late Rodney Dangerfield) is an American success story.  The son of immigrants, he has worked hard and used business savvy to get fabulously wealthy with his chain of "Tall and Fat" stores (with "a-frames" for the ladies and "The New Hindenberg Line" for men).  But Mellon never made it to college, and now his son (Keith Gordon) is thinking of quitting school, too.  Mellon ditches philandering trophy wife Vanessa (Adrienne Barbeau) and goes 'back to school' as a middle-aged, clueless freshman, to try and help his son.There is a great supporting cast including but not limited to a young Robert Downey, Jr. (roommate), College Dean Martin (Ned Beatty), the Diving Coach (M. Emmett Walsh), and  a snobby foil (Paxton Whitehead). Sally Kellerman plays a surprisingly credible love interest and cameos by Kurt Vonnegut, Jr. and Sam Kinnison round out the impressive cast.A good soundtrack and classic academia sets help the film along.  But, in essence, BACK TO SCHOOL is a vehicle for the charming and ever-witty Rodney Dangerfield and his one liners ("The shape I'm in, you could donate my body to science fiction").  Don't expect anything serious or profound in this film, but it's gentle fun, holds up well after so many years, and has a consistently brilliant screenplay
I was crying, Laughing so hard that is!. One word for Full Metal Panic: Fumoffu,FUNNY! If you don't laugh at least one time or a MANY times at this anime. Well I feel sorry for ya! heheUnlike Full Metal Panic this series focuses on funny stories. So if your looking for serious drama you won't find it here. I have to give a cheer and hand to the Dub Cast! They all seem to have had a fun time dubbing the show and it shows. My favorite esps are 5, 8, 9 and the last esp was Funny as well. I've heard some people say this show is along the lines as Ranma 1/2. Being a lifetime fan of Ranma I can see why they say that. Anyway FMPF is SUPER Funny and I LOVED IT! Just sit and back and get ready to LAUGH! I'm so happy I got this one!
I LOVE THIS DVD. Oh wow one of Styx's most famous concerts for me to see whenever I please. When I got this I flipped out. I couldn't believe it. I was the luckiest man alive. I watched this thing over and over and over and I'm still not tired of it. 17 of their best songs performed live. I particularly liked "Rockin' The Paradise", "Blue Collar Man (Long Nights)", "Lady", "Show Me The Way", "Fooling Yourself (The Angry Young Man)", "Babe", "Come Sail Away", "Renegade", "Lorelei", "Too Much Time On My Hands", "Snowblind", "Miss America", "Crystal Ball", "The Best Of Times", "Grand Illusion", "Suite Madame Blue" and "Boat On The River" those are my favorite songs on this DVD. This is a must have for any Styx fan whther you new to them or you are a seasoned veteran
Rare Footage. If you lean towards being slightly more eclectic, this might surprise and delight you. The variety of interviews and stage performances show Jewel's rich singing tradition. She can yodel in her car or perform her music in any setting. When she sings, she becomes the music and there are moments where it feels as if music is as natural as breathing.Jewel's wild vulnerability, the soft pink lights radiating through her hair, the mixture of woman and child all make this DVD especially entertaining and meaningful. If you have ever wondered how a music CD is created, there is insight into the creative brainstorming and you get to see the photo shoot for the cover of the Spirit album.This is ten times more interesting than an unauthorized DVD. Jewel is actually singing and performing on stage. We find her on the tour bus, reading quietly while being filmed, singing in London under a chandelier, standing outside the Inner Change Coffee House where she was discovered. Jewel's brothers also make an appearance and Lenedra Carroll (Jewel's mother) talks about singing to her children and how Jewel grew up in a very artistic and musical family.What fascinating me more than anything is how Jewel adapts a song for the stage and for the audience environment in a smaller intimate setting. This alone shows how she connects with various audiences and how her music truly does appeal to the heart. I loved seeing how she tried to connect with a European audience and how she gradually won them over. This has Benefit Concert footage and you can see Jewel enjoying her trip to London.If you are a Jewel fan researching her history, then you won't want to miss this rare footage.Bonus Songs include: What's Simple Is True, Down So Long and Who Will Save Your Soul.Also look for her books:Jewel: Chasing Down the DawnA Night Without Armor: Poems~TheRebeccaReview.com
if your an nge fan...this is the collection. product arrived quickly and in perfect condition, the sound quality was perfect and the video quality was great...the overall condition of the discs was outstanding as well.  already being a fan of this legendary anime, I choose to review the product's condition as opposed to the content of this     thought provoking, controversial, and psychological anime that was maybe before its time.  Since its release, this anime is different than any mecha based themed anime ever made.  being more about the mental state of the drivers of the mecha than about the mecha themselves.  highly recommemded!!!
Rockfordphile. Packaging and additional content is mediocre. Fortunately I bought this because I love the series. If you're a Rockfordphile like me, every episode is a must-have. I'm collecting every release
Clarification. Just to clarify something: in another review it is stated &quot;at one point, it makes the erroneous claim that Rastafarianism was started by Marcus Garvey, which is not true&quot;. Well, it is true (sort of), although Marcus himself wasn't a rastifarian - a statement (prophesy) he made during a speech, that a &quot;king (of kings) will rise out of Afrika, from the line of David&quot; was what initially sparked the Rastifarian belief, which officially started when Haile Seliassie (a name that came with the crowning - his birth name was Ras Tafari, get it?), 225th in line from the house of David, was crowned as Emperor of Ethiopia. When Burning Spear sings &quot;Macus Garvey words come to pass...&quot; he is reffering to the prophesy..
Enjoyable 1950's Style Roman Movie. I will leave the pomposity of the movie critics where it belongs.  This review is that of an ordinary person who has seen the movie many times.  Long before the days of cable TV, this was traditionally shown around Easter on network television.  It is a story of a Roman Tribune who officiates at the crucifixion of Christ, and is transformed by the physical touch of the robe He wore.  Filmed in 1953, it would be done differently today (the same can be said of almost all movies from the 1950's.)  Today's teens will be bored within 5 minutes--given their attention span and need for constant stimulation.  However, if you enjoy historical pieces, in this case Roman civilization in the first century A.D., you will enjoy this movie.  Richard Burton plays the main character, Victor Mature plays Demetrius, his Greek slave.  The story involves Burton's personal inner transformation after overseeing Christ's crucifixion.  Jean Simmons plays his love interest.  Jay Robinson does a great job as the mad Caligula (try to recognize him in a 1992 movie--"Bram Stoker's Dracula").  I found the costumes and sets delightful.  The transfer to DVD is of reasonably good quality and is in widescreen, which I prefer.  The transformation undergone by Burton's character is of course directly related to the Christ and much of the movie relates to the early christians of that time.  Those who are not religious will still find the movie entertaining.  It is not the best acting I've seen Burton do but is acceptable.  Overall, this is a production which can appeal to a wide range of viewers, but those looking for an "American Pie", Teen-Slasher, or "Gladiator" type of movie will be disappointed.  You may also be interested in a movie released a year or two later, "Demetrius and the Gladiators" which is a sequel starring Victor Mature.
Top Ten Food Movie. I spent two weeks cruising the Italian neighborhoods of San Francisco looking for a restaurant like the one portrayed so richly in this movie. And I found one! Unfortunately, as might have been predicted from the film, it lasted only a few months before folding.There's more to Big Night than the food. It's outrageously funny, for one thing, a quality many reviewers seemed not to appreciate. The acting is brilliant; for once, everyone acts in ensemble. It's original, not quite any Hollywood genre. It's poignant, in emotional terms most people can find believable. Is it a GREAT movie? Dumb question! It's a movie you'll enjoy and remember
Good fun for kids. This was pretty cute and funny, really if I could have I would have given it 3.5 stars, but there's not half star rating here.All in all, it was well put together.. had the vein of fun from the old Scooby Doo cartoons I grew up on. The various worlds they visited during the adventure added to the story and kept you from getting bored of one scenario. I freely admit, I am more partial to the older ones.. they just seem a little more solid to me than the current ones, but overall I think this is good for kids to watch, they would have fun with it and learn a few things along the way.
Very good for viewers who don't always need to take sides. What I like most about this film is its characters. There's a Harvard professor, a depressed psychologist, a good friend, and last but not least, a pretty, intelligent girl. Not to mention the main character, a genious with an extensive police record who seems to enjoy getting drunk and fighting on the street.These characters have different points of view, but this does not mean that some of the characters are good and some of them are evil. Everyone has good intentions. But the "right" thing to do doesn't seem to be crystal clear.
Coming of Age Story!!. Very cute movie and a lot more fun than I thought it would be.Set in Britain, you have Jess, a teenage girl of Indian descent, keenly interested in playing soccer (or football in Britain) and very good at soccer as well! She idolizes British soccer player David Beckham and dreams of one day becoming a professional player herself! Unfortunately, her parents are very traditional and don't want her playing soccer as girls of her age should no longer be interested in playing sports.Jess secretly joins a girl's soccer team after being spotted by another female soccer player, Juliet, who helps recruit Jesse to play for her team. Jess's parents don't approve, but Jess decides to play on the team anyway and not tell her parents anything about being on the team.Jess excels at playing soccer, enjoys playing soccer as it is her passion, and becomes fast friends with the girls on her team as well as her coach. She also does a lot of funny things in order not to be caught playing on an all girl's soccer team by her parents, but still gets caught anyway. It doesn't help that the coach for the team is a male!Pros: Cute, funny movie, with great storyline about friendship, family, love, and finding the inner strength be fight for what you believe in and following your dream.Cons: Predictable. Hard at times to follow the British accents and British slang
USHERS IN NEW ERA OF BRAINWAVE CYBERVIDEO!!. This video hits you with a heroic dose of transdimensional fractallized morphing art! The synchronized musical soundtrack is easily on a par with Jeffrey S. Thompson's wildest brainwave music! AV3X is a BONAFIDE brainwave entrainment device that induces relaxing and meditative states in the theta and alpha ranges. Like a souped-up 21st Century Dream Machine, it sweeps the viewer away on a true cyberdelic experience! I was asleep within five minutes of the first time i played it, but was able to make repeated viewings later. This product evokes a rapid and pronounced relaxation response. It can be meditated to by experienced sound meditators, and can serve the novice by introducing them to sustained "clean wave" states. There are many forms of meditation including entrainment by sound. I recommend this primarily to people who want immediate relaxation and something beautiful to look at. While I have meditated to AV3X, I more enjoy its Journey aspects. The visuals consist primarily of highly detailed and aesthetically impressive computer animation which superimposes "multiple dimensional realities" if you will, on each other so your focus is making vast transitions. By which I mean you could be viewing subatomic, molecular and galactic objects simultaneously, as it were. As your attention shifts amongst  the various elements, you trance out. A strobe effect synchronized to the video and audio is a major cause of the immediate response, I think. It is SO intense i thought i might have a flashback after watching it for a couple of hours. in fact, i think maybe i DID have one! (Your brain adjusts to the strobe effect pretty quickly, so in a matter of minutes it seems peripheral - also, the new edition has a strobe disable feature which would be handy for showing it to other people, since some people initially are put off by it - not me!) This disc is like the lower levels of the psychedelic experience, where one sees all kinds of geometrics and morphing clouds of color, but the BONUS is that one gets entrained by fortune of a savvy use of the latest technology into extremely relaxing and salutary states. After many viewings, it seems to me that there actually IS a narrative movement of sorts which is a story of evolution from the interior view of consciousness moving into solidity, then embodiment, and then into more ethereal forms. Furthermore, the musical accompaniment is a solid and intriguing work of Visionary music that true aficionadoes MUST hear at some point. The genre is thoroughly modern dark Ambient brainwave music which at certain moments hints of rockbeat but never does. The primary wave is sometimes quite pronounced. It is not hard Techno. My use of it has been strictly solitary meditation or casual relaxation, so I can't comment on its party aspects. But it would no doubt be a great group experience with a pot of tea. Not only is Oliver using resonance, primordial sounds, and synthesized curliques, but there is a interesting use of what sounds like overtone singing. Lots of processed water sounds that are similar to the music of Boris Mourashkin (a Russian healing music composer,) challenging but in AV3X's case pleasing and "curiouser & curiouser...." At Last:  somebody has created a visual equivalent for cutting edge brainwave music! Although the price might seem high, if you are looking for instant deep relaxation while you lounge before the television, this will do it far better than low-priced brainwave machines that go for 10 times its price. I wanted to start this review by saying something like "Amaze your friends! Be the first one on your block! Convert your living room into a mighty realm of psychic adventure and ordered chaos!" But i didn't think you'd read this far if I did. lastly: this disc is extremely intense. not for the faint of heart or for anybody who has boundary issues and doesn't want to be swept away by the TV. it is as safe as playing with a strobe light, but is therefore NOT recommended for anybody susceptible to seizures from flashing light.
a view from a purely a beginner, an admirer. If you are collecting ballet, this production is highly recommended. If you are a fan of Nureyev and Fonteyne, especially Nureyev, this must be added to your collection. I can only post my honest opinion since I am only starting to be exposed to the great art that is ballet.The costumes and stage settings are on a grand scale, top notch. The color theme is very earthy, except for the prince and the swans. The various guests at the prince's birthday celebrations all dress elaborately and those who study costume design, I must recommend this to you.The way the story is told is mainly from the prince's point of view, and there are a lot of Nureyev's solos. Great solos they are too. So strong and graceful. His high jumps and fierce spinning will catch anyone's breath. However, there was so much of his solo and not Fonteyne's. I felt that this was a little unfair. From beginning to the very end of the death scene, the story focuses mainly on the tragedy of the prince. I must also add, that death scene is one of the coolest thing I have ever seen done on stage!!! I get chills every time.The first appearance of Fonteyne is also a sight to behold. She truly embodies the tragic swan princess. Their Pas De Duexs are not to be missed. Corps de Ballet is also a highlight of this DVD. The swans enter the stage endlessly, and dance like they were one soul. My favorite is the four swans dancing, hand in hand...I'm sorry, I am still studying and I do not know what this is called.This is not a recording of a live production, and therefore, there are no applause between the scenes. This also allows camera angles that would not be allowed otherwise.Classic ballet it is. Swan Lake a ballet lover must have. This one has Nureyev written all over it.
Rushmore. Another favorite by Wes Anderson. Mr. Anderson writes a great story and hires the right actors to make it work perfectly. This movie is the only one without Owen Wilson
A touch of Old Fashioned Charm. This is a Musical for the discerning. Someone who appreciates the way things 'use to be'. Mr Astaire executes with effortless elegance, grace and 100% charm.A Youthful Leslie Caron almost flawlessly mirrors Mr. Astaire's natural effortlessness and makes you wish that you had enough talent to look so relaxed partnering a legendary entertainer.If you enjoy the innocent/natural charisma of a bygone era with its genteel elegance....you cannot go past this classic!On the downside [purely personal taste] I think that Miss Caron's 'fade to dream dance sequences' are too long and too numerous to hold my attention and don't add enough 'value' to the overall storyline.Ultimately, Uncle Jervis is everyone woman's dream man [fully loaded, without the traditional 'drop dead/georgeous' skin deep covering...but what he lacks in 'looks' is outweighed by his endless charm, charisma and downright Godgiven talent! Delightful!
Drop Dead Hilarious!. Drop Dead Gorgeous has been a favorite of mine for years now. I can't even believe how underappreciated this movie was! For shame! It is filmed in the style of a documentary, but it's not real. But the documentary style makes it so different from the same old stuff we see over and over. Throughout the movie, we follow the lives of the girls of Mount Rose as they enter a beauty pageant. Kirsten Dunst is absolutely amazing in this movie. Other incredible performances are given by Ellen Barkin as Kirsten Dunst's white trash mom ("Bring me my smokes!"). You can't help but root for Kirsten's character the entire time, despite you'll love to hate Denise Richards as the daughter of Kirstie Alley, who is in charge of the pageant this year and wants her daughter to win.This is a movie not to miss, and at the price they're advertising it for, you seriously can't go wrong. It is darkly funny and the way to the crown is paved with death. Drop Dead Gorgeous is one of my absolute all-time favorites. I forced friends of mine who'd never heard of it to watch it and every one of them couldn't believe they'd been missing out on it this whole time. It's a wonderfully hilarious and intelligent dark comedy. You'll LOVE it
What Causes Zombies?. A sailboat arrives in New York Harbor.  It seems abandoned but a coast guard member is killed by a man on board.  The man is shot and falls into the harbor.  The boat belongs to a man whose daughter is concerned about him.  She and a reporter hire a boat to find her father.  Their destination is an island said to be cursed.  The boat they hire is run by a young couple.  Along the way the couple do some diving (she is topless).  She is scared when she sees a man under the water who attacks a shark and tries to eat it.  She is very upset and somehow loses the rest of her suit when removing her tanks.  The Continue to the island which is just a short distance away.Once on the island they discover researchers looking into a phenomena where the dead rise to attack the living.  Legend says it is the work of voodoo but the lead scientist is convinced there is a medical explanation.  Unfortunately the missing father has already died but at least now it is known.  But soon the zombie trouble gets out of control as cemeteries give up hordes of the walking dead.  In the end, only a few manage to escape the island to head back to civilization.  They keep one zombie as proof that they are not crazy.This is one of the better zombie films although the final battle is a little odd as zombies seem to appear out of nowhere inside buildings.  That aside the story builds nicely with the multiple plots weaving together smoothly.  There is plenty of nudity in this one and plenty of gore, although somewhat tame by today's standards.  The acting is reasonable for the effort and special effects are decent.  I enjoyed the ending which I gather was supposed to be a shocker but which I predicted from the beginning.  My guess is that most viewers will get too caught up in the rest of the movie to think that far ahead, or so the producers hoped.  If you like zombie films you will have to check this one out
not great movies but excellent dvd quality. As a huge Cary Grant fan I bought this collection as soon as it came out and I am very happy about it. The 5 movies are not the best films Grant ever made but the dvd quality is very surprising. The movies are in great condition and you could never tell that you're watching films from the early 30's!There is a very good one in the collection though: Wedding Present is a funny and clever comedy, which reminds me of the great masterpieces of the period. If you are a Cary Grant fan or if you love the period my advice is to buy this dvd collection, considering also the low price and the great quality of the dvd transfer
Great!. My 10 month old loves this video!  She picked up 3 signs just after watching it for about a week.  If she ever gets fussy we sit her down and watch it with her and she'll calm down and really watch it.  We love it
the Postman. I feel this movie was an attention getter, and should have been rated by the media for its content, not it's length.  I would reccommend it to anyone with half a brain
Excellent Movie. I was searching for this movie because I loved it when I was young. I came across it being on DVD and I bought it immediately. This is an excellent thriller involving hijacking the subway train and threatening to kill everyone. Walter Matthau and Robert Shaw are excellent actors and make you feel the action going on in the movie. I recommend it to anyone who loves movies about hijacking and killing (over 17 years old that is).
A Powerful Courtroom Drama that Still Resonates. The military courtroom drama,"A Few Good Men" is one of those films, that through endless cable showings seems to have taken a life of it's own. But even with countless viewings it retains it's emotional power and speaks to us about issues, that have become more important than ever. In the film we meet Lt. Daniel Kaffee (Tom Cruise) a young successful, military lawyer, who is considered so slick at plea bargaining out cases, that supposably he's "never even seen the inside of a courtroom". He is assigned the cases of PFC Louden Downey (James Marshall) and Lance Cpl. Harold Dawson (Wolgang Bodison). They are accused of murder and a host of other charges, when at the Guantanamo Bay military base they performed a "Code Red" (an illegal form of discipline within a military unit) on Pvt. William Sandiago, which unintentionally resulted in his death. While the two accused Marines admit they did the "Code Red", both claim they were under orders to do so by their superiors, which includes Base Commander, Col. Nathan Jessup (a brillaint Jack Nicholson) a powerful, highly decorated officer, who is being groomed for one of the top slots in the military command. With both time running out and a lack of legal evidence, Kaffee must get to the bottom of a conspiracy and present his case, even if it means putting his own career in jeopardy. Through a brilliant script (based on the play by Aaron Sorkin), Rob Reiner's steady direction and the cast's dynamic performances this film looks at the meaning of highly held military principles such as "code, honor & discipline". Should a soldier always follow orders no matter what? Whats' more important our ethics & principles (on which this country was founded) or our need for security? Is Col. Jessup right? Can we not "handle the truth"? It's hard to believe, that this film was made way back in 1992. In this post 9/11, post Abu Grebbe world, where our country is on a war footing the questions, that the film seeks to address have become more profound and important than ever. The film is filled with great performances. While I am not normally a huge Tom Cruise fan, I have to admit, that Cruise does a wonderful job as the young conflicted lawyer. The same goes for the great supporting cast which includes good acting turns from Demi Moore, Kevin Bacon and Kiefer Sutherland. But what really propels and turns this film into a classic is the brilliant, dynamic performance, that comes from Jack  Nicholson. When Cruise puts Nicholson on the courtroom stand and starts pointly egging him on, you just watch in awe as Nicholson just continually builds the character's palpable anger, until he just boils over and explodes in the now infamous "You Can't Handle the Truth" speech. Even though the speech and Nicholson's performance has been endlessly quoated & parodied, when you put it in the context of this movie it still has so much power and resonance. If you are interested in seeing a well made, movie courtroom drama, that is both thought provoking and entertaining then I highly recommend "A Few Good Men"
Fire walk away. The cult show "Twin Peaks" was reknowned for being weird and oddballish, but until fans have seen "Twin Peaks - Fire Walk With Me," they ain't seen weird yet. Without the restraints of weekly TV, David Lynch allows his unnerving imagination to run wild as it explores what happened before Laura died.It begins with another FBI investigation -- waitress Teresa Banks has been murdered, but not much of the investigation is going forward. Then the investigation is dropped, and the movie  skips ahead a year, showing us the last week of Laura Palmer's (Sheryll Lee) life.In the course of those days, Laura is slowly slipping over to the Dark Side -- drugs, prostitutional sex, and nightmarish visions that are increasingly consuming her life. But as the drugs and sex take over Laura's life, she doesn't realize that a worse fate awaits her -- death, "wrapped in plastic."David Lynch is known for making movies that are absolutely addling. They can make your brain hurt, and sometimes you never understand them at all. "Fire Walk With Me" goes under this heading. At the same time, it makes you think. And think. Like an Expressionist painting, it captivates as it bends your mind.Lynch doesn't follow a real plot; instead, he lets the storyline slowly sink into Laura's downfall. Lynch paints the whole experience with nightmarish, surreal images and visions, and allows it to drip into your subconscious. And along the way, he fills it with slightly offbeat direction, heavy atmosphere, and the ability to make anything -- ANYTHING -- look menacing.It's not exactly friendly to Lynch virgins -- if you don't know what to expect, this will simply tie your head in knots. And though this is a prequel, watch the TV show before venturing in here -- otherwise the appearances by Twin Peaks residents will simply go over your head. (Although it's fun to play "Spot David Bowie").Lee does an excellent job as Laura, careening through the movie with a sense of doom. Laura's not likable here, but Lee keeps her from being a two-dimensional "fallen woman." And Moira Kelly is amazing as her good-girl pal Donna, while Kiefer Sutherland and Harry Dean Stanton have brief but solid roles as the FBI agents.Though reviled when it was released, "Fire Walk With Me" This prequel was the last hurrah of the "Twin Peaks" series, but at least it was a worthwhile one
It's a real story. Very Touching, the legacy of the Mirabal sisters is an example of courage. "Vivan las Mariposas"
Excellent Workout, Cuing Not Great. Three years I've had this workout...and just until I spent the last three months doing Kathy Smith's Power Step Workout have I been able to complete her "Fat Burning Breakthrough" without losing pace or without injuring myself.The levels, cardio, weightlifting, and "100 Sit-Up Section" are all excellent.  You will see results. You will work your heart and lungs and legs and arms and abs.What is not so good is the cuing. I believe she is going on the premise that you should know what you are doing with a step workout.  However, once you have completed the tape several times, you know what's coming up and can move through all her sets on the tape pretty seamlessly without stopping or saying "huh?" "You want me to do what?"If you are new to step or a novice, purchase her "Power Step" and master it for several months until you are used to a step, and the cardio it brings.  Then, move on to "Fat Burning." She uses some of the same moves in Fat Burning as she does in "Power Step" but at a higher intensity.With these two tapes, I've knocked off about six inches off my thighs, bottom and hips
La Traviata. I recently purchased the Salzburg performance of La Traviata with Villazon and Netrebko which blew me away.  However I watched this 1982 Zeffirelli production yesterday and absolutely loved it.  Domingo in the role as Alfredo is magnificent, Stratus too is superb, beautiful voice, great acting and is so "right" for her role as Violetta.I have to admit I cried a couple of times it was very moving.  Bottom line, despite having seen this opera at the Met and La Scala, I have to say this performance is the best ever.  Beautiful production too
Ringo Starr!!!!. Ringo is the narrator.  I cannot believe the George Carlin was ever allowed or asked to narrate a children's' series.  I am glad that I finally found a set where Ringo does.Too much repeating of dialogue!After about a month I have found that about half of each episode is just repeated lines.Thomas said, "Oh no I cant stop! Oh no I cant stop."The trucks chuckled, "This is fun!  This is fun."The fat controller said, "Thomas a useful engine could stop.  A useful engine could stop."You get the idea..
Watch it! Love it!. This is one of my all-time favorite movies.Read the book if you want the backstory since the screenplay starts at the half point. It's entertaining and that's why we see movies in the first place, right? Matt Damon is just so darn likeable, you get drawn into his narration right off the bat. The screenplay was very well done. It IS a Coppola film, after all...he does work with some talented people. It was very nice to see Theresa Wright in this film, as well.
the best anime since cowboy bebop. i love anime, but lots of it cannot hold my attention.  full metal alchemist and inuyasha are dead boring, but this anime is probably the best ever. (tied with bebop)this is a stylish combination of breakdancing and an akira kurosawa type movie.very nic
The Last Day. The movie is excellent if you are a Gaspard Ulliel fan but for those that are not, it lacks a climax. The lack of climax works with the script, but proves to be quite boring to watch a movie that leads to nothing. I suggest that this movie either be bought by Gaspard fans or Garcia fans, because unless you like either one or the other, you will not be able to finish watching the movie
The original... the best Tarzan of all!. Without a doubt, Johnny Weissmuller's interpretation of Tarzan is the best of all! An excellent swimmer, Johnny Weissmuller makes the swimming scenes seem effortless and believable. Maureen O'Sullivan as Jane provides elegance, as a gentle yet brave and courageous woman, who falls in love with a man, king of the jungle, and yet completely unaware of civilization. The house Tarzan builds for her is a marvel of progress, with the latest technological advancements... in a rudimentary... simple... basic construction. When Edgar Rice Burroughs created Tarzan he played on our survival instincts, and surfaced the innate fears of confronting savage beasts, and yet, the fantasy that we can become friends with all jungle creatures.Tarzan and His Mate- Simply best in class. It explores how life should have been for Adam & Eve... in love, living in paradise, respecting nature, and living in complete harmony with the environment. Not spoiling and accepting the simple things offered by our planet Earth.Tarzan Escapes- From civilization, Jane's cousins visit the Mutia Escarpment, only to realize that she has found true love, family, and home in Africa. The marvel of the home created by Tarzan is highlighted, with the elephant-powered elevator becoming a fascinating process to watch.Tarzan Finds a Son!- Here we meet a new addition to the family, played by Johnny Sheffield as Boy. Both Tarzan and Jane now have a play pal, and he does a magnificent job at allowing the audience to see how we can grow up in this environment and learn survival skills that keep him active, healthy, and self-assured. Great for a younger audience, adding fun and adventure to this wonderful set.Tarzan's New York AdventureOne of the best scenes ever filmed is when Johnny Weissmuller dives off the Washington bridge, and makes it all look possible, doable... and easy. What precision! This movie is fun and Cheetah provides many a laugh. The struggle between good and evil are played to perfection in this series, where those in search for profit and wealth, are always trying to take advantage of the many natural treasures that surround Tarzan's simple life, and it is rewarding to see how the hero never gives in to avarice, defending and maintaining his world in its natural state.We loved the set... and when we visit the zoo... or go to the Circus... we find ourselves looking at elephants and monkeys and saying... "Simba... ungawa!" "Simba... ungawa!" Would highly recommend acquiring this set
Earth, Wind & Fire - Live From Japan. This is a must own DVD if you're an EWF fan.  While there are other EWF concert DVDs that may have a better version of "Reasons," overall this was one of their best recorded performances
The movie that proves the point that every family is nuts to a degree... I have loved this movie since I was a kid. And it's funny when you're young, but when I watched it again as an adult, it's even more of a gem than I'd previously thought. The movie focuses on familial relationships and centers around Gil (Steve Martin) who is married with 4 kids and trying to work his way up the corporate ladder to provide for his family. It not only shows Gil's relationship with the family he's created for himself, but it also shows his relations with the family he comes from. His 2 sisters, one of whom is married to a man who insists on over-educating their 4-year-old daughter with flashcards of math questions most adults couldn't answer; the other is divorced and has a 17-year-old daughter that's involved in an overdramatic relationship with her boyfriend and young teen son who's quiet and seems to be hiding something. And then, there's their parents, who shower their deadbeat youngest brother with all the attention and glory. Everyone can appreciate some aspect of this film, as everyone has a family of their own. And everyone thinks their own family is the only one that's completely nuts and offkilter...until they see the underworkings of someone else's family and realize that no family is without its' faults. This is a wonderful movie that adults and kids of a reasonable age can enjoy. It's funny yet sweet and reminds us all that if our families don't kill us, they only make us stronger. Definitely recommend
A Good Show. I Have read alot of reviews on the carebears show over the last few months and I can tell you that there really isn't a reason for kids to be scared of any of the episodes in this series. I am a collector and own about half of the Dvds with the Origanal episodes, all the movies including the recent new ones, and a bunch of the way origanal Dic Episodes. I have watched them all and I can tell you there is nothing on any of these discs that should really scare your children. but for those of you who might be weary of No Heart and beastly here are some discs that you can get that don't include no heart: "Journey to Joke-a-Lot", "The CareBears Big Wish Movie", and All of the Origanal Dic dvds, most of which are marked with animation station at the top of the disc above the title. I personally enjoyed The CareBears big Wish Movie. but really I think all of the shows involving the carebears are great for kids to watch, (and adults too). I guess if your child is scared easily or something I wouldn't get them the discs with no heart on them but the others are still great entertament. Oh, just to clarify, I personlly thought that this disc and all the episodes on were execellent. I recommend it to everyone who loves the carebears.
Northwestener's Required Viewing. I originally stumbled onto this video while routinely watching NOVA.  I sat spellbound and immediately ordered our own family copy.  While this geologic event may seem most meaningful to Northwestern residents, it has some ageless philosophical as well as scientific overtones.  It also provides a glimpse into the extreme natural swings in climate change that happened a relatively short time ago without any influence by man.  And it provides a classic historical lesson that valid scientific conclusions should not be based on a popular vote
Double the [fun]. Van Damme and Dennis Rodman in an action movie? Hell Yeah!! Van Damme palys Quinn, the top anti-terrorist of the U.S., who inadvertendly kills the son of super-terrorist Stavros(Mickey rourke), and is sent to an anti-terrorists retirement home as punishment by his superiors. He escapes to reunite with his wife and son, but soon discovers that Stavros has kidnapped them both in a bid for revenge against Quinn. Quinn joins forces with arms dealer Yaz (Dennis Rodman) to rescue his family and defeat the vengeful Stavros. Van Damme is just as quick and powerful as he ever was in this film,Rourke is a nasty bad guy, and Dennis Rodman balances between comic relief and noble hero. It's got all the kung fu action you'd ask out of an action thriller, and is just a fun time at the movies
Presented In All Its Original Black & White, Uncut CBS Glory!. This is a GREAT box set of a classic television show.  All 36 episodes are presented just as they aired on CBS so many years ago, in black and white with all original footage intact.  No syndication editing or horrid Turner colorization here!  The prints are very clean and crisp, too.  They look nowhere near 40+ years old.Also included here is the original version of the pilot with some different actors/characters that sold the show to the network but was never aired until 1992, albeit in a shortened version.  There is commentary by creator Sherwood Schwartz on the pilot, too.It's too bad that there was no involvement by Bob Denver on any of the three season sets for "Gilligan's Island".  All of them were released before his passing last month, so it would have been possible.  If only we had a little commentary from him or a short interview with him reminiscing about the role that will make him live forever in our minds, but I'm afraid that it didn't happen.Rest in peace, "Little Buddy"
Street Fighter is Chiba-tastic!!!. Critiquing the plot of this movie is pointless,likewise the acting,writing,cinematography etc. It's just one great fight scene after another. All the extraneous elements,such as the aforementioned few, are boiled away,leaving the distilled, pure essence of martial arts movies. But a little known fact is that Chiba studied directly under MAS OYAMA, creator of kyokushinkai karate. This is one nasty art. It cultivates the spirit but also emphasizes raw destructive power. The teacher character in the movie is an homage to Oyama, a genuine Master in the world of martial arts. So, at least one of the characters is based on a real person. Pretty cool!
U2 on Joshua Tree tour - it`s worth seeing!. U2`s trip through America performing songs from Joshua Tree and Rattle and Hum. The DVD is interesting, though uneven. Worth attention of any rock music enthusiast or a U2 fan, even if only for the performance of Sunday Bloody Sunday on the day of Enniskillen bombing which is a great performance
My favorite movie EVER!!!!. Kasi Lemmons is phenomenal as director, she also wrote it! The movie is well acted and written. Oscar worthy performances by Jurnee Smollett and Samuel L. Jackson. Excellent cast, Debbi Morgan owned the role of Mozelle! Jurnee Smollett really evolves into a great actress!In the film, Roz(Whitfield)is a devoted mother of three who can't admit that her marriage is falling apart due to Louis' (Jackson)philandering ways. The youngest daughter and middle child Eve(Jurnee Smollett), witnesses her father having an affair. Desperate to make sense of what she witnesses, Eve turns to her older sister Cisely (Meagan Good) who puts a creative twist on what Eve has seen. Still not satisfied, Eve turns to her Aunt Mozelle(Morgan) who warns that if she ever told a soul she'd kill her. Unable to find the understanding she is looking for Eve, turns to Elzora(Carroll) to put an ending to her family's suffering.The film opens with the Batiste having a party at their home where we meet the main characters. We learn that Eve is the middle of three children and is ten years old. Now as the film opens with a voice-over of adult Eve giving background to the movie, she starts by saying, 'Memory is a selection of images some elusive others printed indelibly on the brain...'which lets us know that the whole movie is from a recollection of a child. The events are seen through the eyes of ten-year old Eve.You immediately see the bond between Cisely and Louis instantly. She is the epitome of a Daddy's girl. Eve 's particularly close with Mozelle. She confides in her about what she has seen. Poe and Roz are close. All the children have a close relationship with an adult.There were so many scenes in the movie that screamed volumes but they were no words. We saw the relationship between Cisely and Eve when they were sitting on the chaise, after the storm and Roz hit Cis. When Cisely put her finger to her lip signaling to eve to keep quiet. The spider on the window when Mozelle and GrayRaven were kissing.(Mozelle was known as a black spider, because all the men she married died.) Amy Vincent was in charge of photography and she did an excellent job at capturing the Bayou, alot of great shots in the film.
A GREAT FEEL GOOD MOVIE. This will not be an Oscar winner but it is one that will be there for you when you had a bad day or when winter gets to you !!!!In the league of Full Monty it is all predictible.It is funny - soft and the actors are good looking too.A very good quality / feel good movie a good little wine and pizza to go with it  PERFECT.And you don't have to be a footy fan to enjoy !!!
Rock of Ages. ALthough nost of the videos on this DVD are on other Def Leppard releases the commentary and personal play order make this an important addition to your collection
Excellent workout!!. This is such a great workout! I love it!I just started doing Pilates and absolutely love the Pilates for You videos. I started with the Beginner, and then moved to the Intermediate. Unlike others I've seen, Sarah Picot explains each of the steps very clearly - so, I'm able to follow along.I've already started to see the difference - I'm getting in better shape! Thanks for such a great series!! I'm really enjoying them!
Women willing to carry things over the edge.... Well, if you need a mega dose of sex and violence to get the attention brought to an important issue - then be it.  I believe the message of this movie, and the reason it was banned in France is the emasculation of the male... Yes, there is a graphic rape scene. Yes, the girls also kill women. But I believe it goes much deeper than that. It addresses the underlying message of what is also beginning to happen in the world today. Women are saying enough!For so long we have been seeing so much graphic sex and violence on screen, and rarely is it even discussed...  Here the people who perpetrate the sex and violence are young women, so several alerts go off based upon our cultural and societal conditioning. Now when you consider that all of that conditioning has a very dominant patriarchal and masculine slant, you see most obviously why this film presents so many problems to the viewers...Again, in this film, the people who perpetrate the sex and violence are young women. Alert #1, that is just unacceptable in a patriarchal society.We hear a dialogue between the girls about and show menstrual blood. Alert #2, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.The women like sex, in their words, they like to f*@k. Alert #3, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.The women appear to use or violate or rape the men that they encounter, and then throw them away (or kill them). Alert #4, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.They laugh and joke after on of the girls vomits into the lap of the male she just performed oral sex on. Alert #5, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.They kill a man on the roadside who speaks in a vulgar way to them. Alert #6, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.These are just a few examples of the intolerance of this film by so many.In short, I think that most people cannot handle this film because it shows the raw feminine, Amazonian power of these two women who have had enough of taking the "normal" and "acceptable" crap that women must deal with on a regular basis and everywhere.The male viewers will get a mental castration with this film and they probably deserve one.  Does it make you uncomfortable that women can also be sexual predators? Does it make you uncomfortable that women can also be cold killers? Does it make you uncomfortable that they are not ashamed of who they are and what they do?If so, and your problem exists because they are "girls" who are doing this, then it sounds as though you are a big part of the problem on the planet today.  If this was your typical buddy film where the characters were men, who went on the very same rampage as these two women, this film would be mainstream and considered "normal".Therein lies the lesson and the powerful message of this movie.  If you think that a "family man" should not be shot on the side of the road for making a "harmless" remark, think again... Especially if that "family man" happens to believe that he has any right to say the following words to two young women walking by: "how would you like to feel my balls slapping against your a**".Does he deserve to get shot? I believe, Yes.  Why? Today it is a fantasy or comment on the side of the road. Tomorrow it is a strong urge. The day after it is a rape. And this man is a father? I wonder how he will "train" his own daughters.  People hate this movie because it shows men for what they are, rude, vulgar, desperate, pigs. And why do people REALLY have this film, because the women call them on it. They rub the viewers faces in it...  what "man" can handle that?Women have been on the receiving end of violence and sexual predators for thousands of years and if the sole message of this film is that women will not take it any more, it succeeds.... Bravo!
This will make you laugh & cry. If you can watch this film and not laugh at remembering what it's like to be in the 5th grade, and also not cry tears of joy, then you've lost touch with your emotions.This is at once a lighthearted documentary of pre-teens learning to ballroom dance, and a spectacle of competition as fierce as any Olympics finals you've ever watched. One young couple in particular, who dance the merengue, is mesmerizing. While most kids that age are awkward, uncoordinated, or painfully shy, when these kids dance it's as though they've been professional ballroom dancers for 30 years. Watching the dance competition judges react to these kids is as much fun as watching the kids
These DVDs are a MUST HAVE!!. My son loves the bright colors, moving objects, toys, animals, and music
My Twins Love It!. I have 4 yr old fraternal twin daughters and they both love Dress Up Days.  We own all of the Strawberry Shortcake series and this is one of their favorites.  Can't comment on the quality of the DVDs since we have VHS only
True to Life. Troy Kell is very charming, intelligent, .... yet also A cold blooded killer.  It is a very realistic look into the US prison system.  The death in this movie, is hard to watch- you'll be blown away that it was allowed to contuine for so long.  AFter spending the last 2 years working in the prison system, this film shows a realistic view as to the daily life there
nice watch. Peter Parker an ordinary high school kid is bitten by a genetically altered spider. From this point his love for next doors Mary Jane takes a back seat to his new web spinning skills. Nearby his best mates dad takes an experimental serum making him into The Green Goblin. The stage is set for Spider to do battle with Goblin.The CGI and animatio was amazin. Some of the fight scenes where good, but for some reason some of them where kinda funny. The end fight scene was a bit borin. Spider-man just kept on fallin down, what was the all about.It was a good action film but still smth not right. Its just hard to believe that Peter made the Spiderman suit himself. How the hell did he made it and kept in secret?
Action Packed. This is an excellent action packed movie that should keep you riveted to your seat if you love adventure. The characters are well developed and the action is marvellous. The special effects were superb.This is good entertainment that is well worth viewing. However, some of the scenes are very violent, therefore not suitable for the very young.
Disorganized Criminals...................................... I have to admit that I also LMAO!Hubby came home telling me that he had a movie with members from the ROC and I was very skeptical especially after viewing State Property (((YUCK)))Kevin Hart has an annoying voice, but he is semi funny as he pokes fun at himself!Vicariously seen through the eyes of Shawn a parolee who is desperate to just try keep the electric and gas running and his son off the bowls of cereal at night. As his options are none he decides to go into B&E with his eccentric crew!I'm telling you Capone, Beanie, Damon Dash and Memphis Bleek had me crying! I didn't see the point of Stacy Dash, but I loved Tiffany and Angie in here.Funny movie...
Wow! One of the best movies I've ever seen. This movie is pitch perfect in almost all respects.  It is beautiful to look at,the parts are all well cast and the acting is brilliant.  The happy redeeming ending made me feel good about myself and life though it comes after several tragic events. Some important themes are well examined in the plot and though melodramatic the story is well told and holds the viewer's interest throughout. I had to read the book after seeing the movie and was surprised how very faithful the movie was to it.  The book and movie really enhance each other!
Outrageously powerful in truth and suffering. This is a cult film in many ways even if time is making it a lot less poignant than it used to be. It is definitely a denunciation of the Cambodian caper of President Nixon. The bombing and then the invading of Cambodia were neither justified nor in any way effective. The Vietnam war was lost when Nixon decided to invade Cambodia and this invasion spread American troops and military means over two wide a territory to even pretend the war was not lost. The invasion of Cambodia was the last straw that broke the camel's back. We could wonder today whether Kissinger let Nixon do this mistake to bury him in this war and thus enable himself to negotiate some kind of a peace agreement. An American journalist lost in this chaos and overwhelmed by the arrival of the Khmer Rouge in Phnom  Penh was a witness to this senseless and absurd caper or continuation of a ridiculous war. But he had to use the services of a local journalist to be the interface between him and the locals. Unluckily this Cambodian journalist stayed too long and he could not escape from the claws of the Khmer Rouge. Then it is a story of resistance and resilience to survive the most horrendous conditions. He will manage to escape absolutely alone though he had started in a group of six or seven. Even the child he had been entrusted with will die along the way blown up by a mine. This is a true story, a testimony about one of the most astounding catastrophe and tragedy of our modern world, a war unjustified and lost even before being started waged by the USA in a country that they did not even know leading to one of the worst ever genocide in modern history performed by the Cambodians themselves onto the Cambodian people they made regress to some medieval state in just a few months and for a few years that lasted centuries. We westerners love exporting our worst nightmares to foreign countries and some of us never learn a lesson and are always ready to do better than some others before us. If the French lost the Indo-chinese war in 1954 there was absolutely no reason why the Americans could win it. If the French lost the Algerian war in 1962 and the British lost the Middle East and Egypt quite some time before there is absolutely no reason why the Americans could do better. This film is a testimony to the suffering the vanity of some of our inspired western leaders imposes onto millions of people around the world. For one case that ends with a little bit of joy, millions of cases end in plain death.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University Paris Dauphine & University Paris 1 Pantheon Sorbonne
Requires Active Viewing Participation. This is a singular masterpiece in film making but totally unlike anything, even for it's day.  By today's attention deficit disorder standards, this film is really really odd.  But no doubt it is a masterpiece if the viewer is willing to put the effort in to catch all the nuances because this is a film of nothing but nuances.  Tati himself is just one of many participants.There is a plot of sorts dealing with a group of female American tourists and the one women who is the odd duck among them.  She meets Tati and they spend the night together dancing at a night club and see in the dawn at a coffee shop.  Various bits of business are constantly swirling around them and you could view this picture 10 times before seeing everything.  There are many jokes but they are gentle visual puns.  Don't expect belly laughs, just a wry but amazing view on modern life.As is standard practice for Criterian these days the extras on disc two are spectacular.  The documentaries on Tati's life and this film are brilliant and helped me understand his art and this film much better.A gentle film with brilliant use of wide screen (this film would make no sense pan and scan) you need to fall into the picture to enjoy it.  But there is an endless wealth of material to enjoy
This movie is Afrolicious!,. I always see this movie as a great Harlem detective story. Shafts pulsate with street-level lingo and a deep sense of conviction you can help but admire. In the great tradition of detective movies Shaft is clearly a hard-bitten loner who spars with friends and foe alike, then gets just what he wants from everyone.Even though "Shaft" was an MGM release it was clearly intended for the black audience Hollywood had always ignored. The attitude of Shaft is what set it apart - it made no effort to court the white audience at all. John Shaft kept his mouth shut for nobody, and wasn't interested in carrying a civics lesson or being an ambassador from an alien race. He was openly promiscuous, keeping at least a couple of steady women on his string, and taking in the occasional admiring prostitute. He talked dirty, told white cops where to get off, pushed around the toughest of the black mobsters, and made mincemeat of adversaries both black and white. A year before "The Godfather," the Mafia of Shaft consisted of fairly accurate Italian goombah types; Shaft had no trouble letting loose with the ethnic slurs either. In other words, "Shaft" was a fresh dose of reality, in 70s parlance, 'telling it like it is.' This script showed no influence of studio influence, whatsoever.Shaft has a good New York look. The overall atmosphere is great, a mixture of dingy, claustrophobic hotel rooms and neglected city streets. A lot of the action appears to take place around Times Square, which was quite a different place in 1970 - much rougher, much more rundown. Shaft must hold the record for the number of movie marquees on view in one film; I'd guess it was filmed in late Summer-Early fall with what's playing in downtown Manhattan. Roundtree fills out the role believably while the surrounding cast work well together, even if the stereotype line is occasionally breached. Several nice moments in the script carry the film over its dull passages, all leading up to a great ending.
best teen movie of the 90's. I love Clueless. It's an amazing movie based on spoiled rich kids. The main character is Cher( silverstone), who likes to help out others in the school and likes to get her way. Dion is the funniest character of them all. I like her sense of humor.Mostly a teen could relate to any of these characters. Instead of using their popularity to bring people down, they made the new girl Tie, fill welcome.I'm so happy they made a special edition for ''Clueless.'' The packaging is brillant. Most of the talking was funny. Thanks Paramount for releasing it
A Subtle yet Powerful Western. Michael Winner's CHATO'S LAND may seem a bit below standard from other films that he directed but the strength in this film comes from Charles Bronson's stoic performance seen and unseen on the screen. Bronson's presence is there and is inescapable as is the baron land he habitats. The visual forsaken look of the film's characters and landscape makes the viewer wonder what the point of this whole film is.  Whatever Bronson's transgressions may really have been the forlorn posse tracking him are representative of the worst qualities of society. I saw this film when first released but with time I see the deeper social implications and commentary on society that director Michael Winner was making. This is a good Western but may be a difficult one to appreciate on an initial viewing
Interesting script!. This script has several points which eventually will engage you. A young couple fascinated by the idea of making easy money; a female cold blood assassin with serious emotional conflicts never resolved from her childhood , supported by dreamingly fly backs ad finally a man who will fall in love with...The mother instinct will work out as a fundamental device and dramatic spring ; both women practically will turn the orders and the male plains.The greed, the violence and the redemption will blend in this dark  picture with Hannah as the merciless murderer without any scruple. Twenty grand is the cipher.Good camera work and an intriguing thriller that gets its aim.
Loved My Big Fat Greek Wedding. This movie pictured a sizable segment of the U.S. population that has not gotten much attention in the movies - the high involvement Mediterranean family. Many Italians I know  said that it could have been their family. The movie works so well because the author and star really lived and knew the life she depicted. I enjoyed the wry humor.At the beginning I was prepared to hate her father. He was so sexist and bullying and anti-intellectual. And the women of the family were so cynically manipulative. It did not occur to me until late into the movie that the father was really afraid. He had only the best in mind for his family, and that included his daughters, and that he too felt out of his element in a different mix of cultures that is the United States.One other detail pleased me; the role of the community college in helping people break free from a confining life to move up in the world. Not only do they learn academic things, they meet wonderful people from other cultures there, fall in love, and marry them.The photography was wonderful and the acting was superb, especially since  the movie was made on a tight budget.This is one of the best films I have seen in the past ten years.
THE REAL MEANING OF SELF ADOVACY. ANGELA BASSETT DID A WONDERFUL PERFORMANCE PROTRAYING OF THELATE ROSAPARKS IN THE ROSAPARKS STORY. THIS BIOPIC WILL TEACH USALOT OF LESSIONS- ABOUT THE AFRO AMERICANS IN BLACK HISTORY, ILEARNED ALOT. THIS IS A REAL MEANING OF SELFADVOCACY- MY FAVORIATE SCENE IS WHEN ROSAPARKS ANGELABASSETT SAYS: WHY DO YOU PUSH US AROUND TO ME THAT'S THE BEST SCENE OUT OF HER BEST PERFORMANCE.CHRISBURKE LIFE GOES O
The Graduate. Would you believe I never watched it before this week? I've missed a lot of classics which I should have seen. So how did this one age? Quite nicely. Fine writing, laugh out loud funny situational comedy, many supporting actors and actresses who I recognized from elsewhere, funny hair, clever satire, solid content, garishly colorful clothes you have to love laughing at. At last I understand why Simon and Garfunkel, who I like, are so overrated. Anne Bancroft immediately became every schoolboy's fantasy, and Dustin Hoffman was brilliant in the starring role. I chose not to have sex as a teenager or a pre-teenager. But seeing Hoffman as a recent university graduate, all I could think was, "Damn, that kid needs to get laid." Even after he got laid. Great movie.
Murders in imaginary rural England. Delightful imaginary villages (probably mostly filmed in Surrey) are rocked by series of murders always solved by Detective Chief Inspector Barnaby (who never looses his cool)with the help of his assistant Troy who is a terrible driver.  The dialogue is pleasant, the relationship between the main detective and his assistant is that of kindly master and pupil, the detective work is interspersed with clues, so you can (maybe) guess the culprit, and the scenery is delightful.  What more could you want of a detective series?  I also love the eery theme tune.It has no intellectual pretensions, like a Morse might.  It has no really fast action, like an MI5 has.  It is not complicated like the CSIs. It is not as funny as a Rumpole. It does have some 'ancient history' of characters, like some Agatha Christies. Only drawback: sensitive souls (esp. children) might be a little shocked by some of the gruesome murder scenes - not that you see much of them at all.  All in all, a very civilized detective.In case you are looking for particular episodes, the episodes in this series are: Tainted Fruit, Ring out your Dead (featuring villages Church Bell Ringing competition), Murder on St Malley's Day (featuring an English private school),Market for Murder (about a lady's reading group), and A Worm in the Bud
funniest scene ever. I won't belabor the obvious greatness of this classic.  That's legendary.  What I'd like to point out is that the scene with Felix opening his eustachian tubes in the restaurant with the "phmeh" sound is possibly the funniest scene ever filmed.  If you don't laugh out loud at that, you have no soul
DVD is not a new production. If you already own the VHS, you may be wondering whether this is a new production, especially since the cover photo appears to be a 40-year-old Dunn.  Wouldn't you like to see the results of some 20 years of practice?  Imagine, too, all the ideas Dunn must have had over the years of what he could have done better on the video.  Well, sorry, it's the same production as on the VHS tape, the same 20-year-old Dunn, the same soundtrack, including the same minor errors in verbal instruction.There is, nevertheless, some advantage in the DVD format over the VHS, if you haven't learned the form yet.  There is a menu, with the form broken down into about 50 short pieces, and it will cycle through a chosen short piece repeatedly until you select "next" -- or you can play straight through the entire form.  If you're like me, you'll use that automatic repetition of short pieces quite a lot, on your way to learning the form
"White Heat Goes West". Exciting and well made western from acclaimed action director Raoul Walsh.  It stars Rock Hudson and Donna Reed (looking beautfiul as ever).  A tight pace and thrilling cinematography (the film was shown in 3-D originally)set this film apart from many westerns made at this time.  It would make a terrfic double feature with Anthony Mann's "The Naked Spur".  This film is a must see for western fans
All Great Things Must Come To An End. What can I say, Yu Yu Hakusho was a great, and I mean GREAT,  show.  I loved it
five stars just for the stylin of 1971. I wanted to pluck out each and every one of these guys and feed them a sandwich- they were so skinny- How refreshing- and Leon Russell's pale arms with no tatoos- and the long silver hair. Wow. how about all of the chainsmoking on stage- I do believe that Eric Clapton had a cigarette holder on his guitar fret- wow again. How times have changed .Seriously, if you want to buy this concert footage just for the music- that's ok too. There is a ton of stuff to enjoy . Most outstanding is the fact that this do-gooder deed- a benefit concert to aid a humanitarian effort - was totally groundbreaking , and they were all there to have fun and all that.Good stuff
HANNAH MONTANA ROCKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I love this show I have seen every episode so many times now when I watch it I say all the lines with them.The bonus episode will most likely be Money for Nothing, Guilt for Free (which I have already seen 6 times, I downloaded it)I can't wait for this to come out I already have the game, and have been to 2 of her concerts, so I am going to be first in line with both the CD and DVD.For thoes who don't already know there will be 3 episodes + the bonus one.This is my favorite show, and if you haven't seen it yet you should watch it, or if you think it won't be good at least give it a chance.~Sophi
Hilarious; worth owning for Leary fans. In the tradition of the New York Friars Club Roasts, Comedy Central's Roast of Denis Leary is deservedly the highest rated program to hit the cable network (next to South Park that is) as it shows the foul-mouthed, scathing comic getting a taste of his own medicine from his closest friends.  Hosted by Jeff Garlin of HBO's Curb Your Enthusiasm and featuring live remarks from Colin Quinn, Adam Ferrara, Lenny Clark, Nick DiPaulo, Dane Cook, Mario Cantone, Dr. Dre & Ed Lover, Jim Breuer, Gina Gershon (performing a musical and dance number), along with taped comments from Conan O'Brien, Rene Russo, Jon Stewart, Peter Gallagher, Christopher Walken, Michael J. Fox, and Joe Mantagna; the Roast of Denis Leary is full out funny from beginning to end.  It's definitely worth picking up for Leary fans (his rebuttal at the end is scathingly funny), although I wish more special features would have been put on the DVD
Just as good as a "Nature" program!. In my opinion, this video is not over-narrated at all.  The videography is amazing and clear, capturing moments the human eye would never see.  The narration is educational and provides wonderful facts about the birds.  This is a real winner with my 7-yr-old, 3-yr-old and the parents
"I Hope They Have Icies!". The martial arts comedy "Kung Pow: Enter the Fist" is like a film remix. Two Hong Kong films from the 1970s have been spliced together with new footage, so it now stars director Steve Oedekerk, who also dubs everyone in silly voices (including himself). It's an entertaining, silly film, and I know here in Australia it's already something of a quiet classic among the DVD rental crowd.Steve Oedekerk plays the chosen one, a young man raised by rodents, who has a talking tongue named Tonguey and a dog named Dog, and a young man who seems to attract trouble. The biggest cause of the trouble is a Mr "Betty" Pain, a man whose iron claws, triangular studs and boombox tunes make him virtually invincible. To top it all off, he is a master magician, and can make his associates clothes change colours halfway during a scene. To defeat him, the Chosen One must reach the next level, so he trains and the local dojo. He trains hard, and is an impressive fighter, but will he be able to stop Betty?Dubbing an old film with your own voice seems like such an obvious and funny concept I'm suprised it hasn't been done in a feature film like this before. Steve Oedekerk has a lot of fun playing with the dubs, camera angles, battle scenes and martial art film cliches. The new footage fits in really well. There is a bit of computer animation, but it is given the weathered treament along with the old footage, which is a really good look I think. It's a very, very quotable film. My favorite scene would probably have to be the intermission, where the characters recommend snacks for the viewers to eat from the lobby. "I have Chosen the large tub" says the Chosen One. "My nipples look like Milk Duds" says Wimp Lo. "I hope they have Icies!" the pretty Ling says. One of the martial arts masters makes a comment about yellow popcorn, but I won't repeat that here. That reminds me, the film does get a little crude at times, and a little bloody (in a silly way), but it's not too bad.The "Chosen" Edition is the one to get, as it includes features (like the audio modes) which are just as funny as the film, and give you an idea of how the film(s) was mixed together.I'd recommend this film to people who like to laugh at bad films (though this is a good film). It plays errors and such for laughs, and is goofy enough to be watched again and again
"Blacks are NOT dumb"...so the user says. Some critics of this artist believe that they are slick by saying that Tupac makes blacks look "dumb" and goes further to say that "blacks are NOT dumb". First of all, I'm black and we don't need other people to define what is intellectually acceptable for us. Thank you. He was a performer, an artist, a poet. NEWSFLASH! Sometimes in America, performers, artists, and poets are idolized and respected. In my opinion, Americans need to consider the cessation of 2 things: the criticism of the intelligence of artists and their fans(let them choose what they like) AND creating the imaginary scale which defines what a "smart black" and a "dumb black" is. Non-blacks should not perpetuate the idea that "the hip hop artist of the week" is responsible for the rest of the country's opinion of black intelligence. You ARE insulting our intelligence when you say things like that. Most Americans of all races know that Tupac is not the model of black authenticity. Black people don't walk around saying Kurt Cobaine (of Nirvana) was a junky that made white people look like junkies. (If they listened to his music, they might call Kurt a genius.) Keep an open mind, my friend
Fabulous and Creepy 70's Sci-fi!. I didn't see this 1975 film until about 12 years ago or so. Even though I knew the basic plot I was quite captivated by the events of the story. Well, I've seen it three more times since then and each time I'm taken in by the storyline, not to mention well entertained.THE PLOT: Katharine Ross and her husband move to Stepford, CT, where many of the wives of the village seem to be oblivious to the current women's liberation movement; they seem wholly dedicated to their husbands, home & garden and keeping themselves well-groomed and primed for sex. Meanwhile Katharine's husband joins a mysterious all-male organization. [Spoiler Alert!] It turns out that the men of this organization are replacing their wives with android duplicates. Katharine's best friend ends up duplicated and Katharine slowly realizes, to her horror, that she's next in line. [End Spoiler].Paula Prentiss and Tina Louise (Ginger from Giligan's Island) are on hand as Katharine's friends.The story is not campy at all. This is serious and creepy sci-fi of the highest order. "The Stepford Wives" powerfully succeeds where the similar-themed "Westworld" only passably gets by.
Beautiful. I've heard naysayers badmouth this movie, but I've never understood it.  They use descriptors such as "preachy", "overly dramatic", "self-important", and so on.  Good grief!  What are you, bait fishers (not that there's anything wrong with that)?  This is the story of this man's family, and it is truly beautiful.I guide trout fishing trips in Missouri, so, of course, I love this movie partly for the fishing.  This film explained my fly-fishing passion to my wife more effectively than my words and dragging her along on a few fishing trips ever could.  The scenes are filmed magnificantly and are done in such a way that you can follow the logic and instinct that each fisherman uses to catch each fish.  However, the story is so much more than this.The story begins with Norman making note that there was never a clear line between religion and fly-fishing in his family, and that parallel continues throughout the story and his life.  Success as a fly-fisherman is based on knowledge, physical skill, intuition, and emotion, but balance is also required.  That balance only comes through spirituality, whether you are stiving to be a Godly person, or whether you simply commune with nature in a spiritual fashion.  Without balance, a tangled line can cause you to pull your hair out.  With balance, even the most unsuccessful fishing trip brings joy.  And so Norman stuggles with understanding his younger brother Paul, who has attained such miraculous balance on the river, but whose life away from the river is rapidly spinning out of control.  In the end, the observant viewer should recognize that it is Paul's pride that eventually leads to his downfall, and it is the family's failure at their attempts to rescue Paul that they continue to struggle with the remainder of their lives as well.Norman spends his life trying to tap into God's balance through fly-fishing in the hopes that he will someday understand what happened to his family and why.  Perhaps finally writing his book helped him to answer a few of those questions.Walt Fulpshttp://www.MissouriTroutHunter.co
Fun. I truly enjoyed the fact of the DVD being interactive.  It is a hard game to beat.  I like all the different choices one has to make
is this for real?. Why in the world is it not out till 2010? or is that wrong
This will be absolutely AWESOME!!!!. I have been a Yankees DIE-HARD fan since 1961. This set will be totally spectacular! I own all Yankee DVD's and videos. These extras are mind-boggling. As soon as I finish writing this review I will be ordering this 5-disc set. If you are a Yankee fan this is a must have!
Furiously Effective Jab at Wal-Mart's Monopolistic Practices. Filmmaker Robert Greenwald has effectively made mincemeat of his targets in a couple of recent fiery documentaries - Rupert Murdoch and the FOX Network in "Outfoxed: Rupert Murdoch's War on Journalism", and the Bush administration in "Uncovered: The War on Iraq". His latest is no exception as he lays into Wal-Mart, its CEO Lee Scott and Sam Walton's heirs in this probing 2005 critique of corporate injustice. Instead of providing a single narrative voice, Greenwald structures his film as a series of vignettes focusing on discrete instances of where Wal-Mart has violated fair market practices, passed over women and minorities for leadership positions, restricted movements toward employee unionization, taken advantage of cheap labor in China and India, and disregarded environmental standards.The grievances seem endless, and the film even discloses the embarrassingly paltry amounts each Walton family member has given to charitable causes (compared to Bill Gates, of course). The most touching episodes focus on victims like Red Esry, who are experiencing the closure of their multi-generational small businesses in small towns where Wal-Mart opens and cannibalizes the competition. Much of the treatment seems ham-fisted, especially in the juxtaposition of Wal-Mart commercials and in-house training videos within the context of those being crushed by the corporation's economic clout. Moreover, the one segment about the rape of an employee in a parking lot, while horrific, seems more generic in nature than Wal-Mart's accountability in the incident. The abundance of conjecture and the lack of attributable facts tend to affect some of the film's credibility.However, Greenwald makes his points with clarity. Especially effective is the use of archived footage of Scott asserting to a massive audience of his employees that Wal-Mart has done nothing but good for the economy, even though many of them have to go on welfare to get medical care. The film ends with a montage of people who have successfully lobbied against the construction of stores in their towns. At the same time, Greenwald has not made a monomaniacal diatribe, as the takeaway never feels like the destruction of Wal-Mart but more a call for a severe overhaul of their internal practices. The filmmaker has certainly come a long way since his 1980 feature film debut, the ludicrous "Xanadu", and he seems to be continuing his streak of confronting those corrupted by their power.The DVD has several extras, the best being a twenty-minute making-of featurette and a separate 16-minute short, "The Big Meeting", on how the film came about. Greenwald also provides a commentary track, though much of what he shares can be gleaned from the featurettes. There are a couple of deleted segments that do seem redundant if they were included in the movie (one set in Quebec, the other in England), as well as a brief clip of local religious leaders condemning Wal-Mart's practices. Lastly, there are several fitfully funny Wal-Mart commercial parodies that apparently served as commercials for the documentary. Those looking for a more-in-depth analysis of Wal-Mart's business impact may want to read Charles Fishman's "The Wal-Mart Effect: How the World's Most Powerful Company Really Works - and How It's Transforming the American Economy"
Redemptive Power Of Love. This is a surprising relationship between an upwardly mobile, 27-year-old advertising executive and a 43-year-old waitress who works at a hamburger joint. What begins as a drunken seduction moves on to sexual obsession for both parties. Susan Sarandon gives a top drawer performance as Nora, a boozy redneck survivor whose heroine is none other than the self destructive Marilyn Monroe. James Spader is perfectly cast as Max Baron, a compulsively neat and sexually repressed widower who is brought back to the land of the living by Nora's erotic ministrations. Eileen Brennan does wonders with the minor role of Noras' sister, a fortune-teller. Luis Mandoski's direction of White Palace makes it into a convincing psychodrama about the redemptive power of love which can even overcome deep-seated class differences.
REQUEST SEASON 4!. Please write an email to disney requesting the release of season 4 of BMW. It was supposed to be released in Jan of 06' then supposedly Feb, but there is still no news of its release. If you want the other seasons of BMW to be released write a quick email to them telling them how much you want it. Here's their email:Disney: disneyinfo@disneyhelp.comThanks
Outstanding but Intense. I would rate the acting of the ensemble cast in Six Feet Under as one of the best ever in any TV drama Series I have seen.  The writing and directing are right up there too. However, a note of caution for those considering this set and are new to the show.  It is very intense.It is called "quirky" by many viewers I have spoken to, and that would make sense considering it revolves around a family-owned funeral home and each episode begins with a death.  The show does have a real ability to "pull the viewer into the story line," which is an obvious indicator that it is well written, but because of it's intensity, watching too many episodes at once "got to me," and may well "get to you" also.If you are looking for something light and easy going, this is not the show.  Not to say that there aren't plenty of "laugh-out-loud" scenes - the show has a very unique off-beat humor to it, but overall, the characters go through a lot of difficult "stuff."  I personally got a lot out out of it - for a TV drama, it offers an amazing amount of life-lessons and insight that makes a viewer think.Bottom line:  this is an A+ drama, and I would highly recommend it - but not for someone looking for a light-hearted comedy
BRILLIANT. The producers of Martha Stewart Television are brilliant.  The content is amazing.  The direction fantastic.  And the programming content unsurpassed.THIS wedding DVD COLLECTION is worth every penny
Chain of Fools - Great Film with one Rare Diamond - Elijah Wood. Chain of Fools? Comedy of Errors? Hard to say, except this extremely entertaining farce with a stellar cast and intelligent script engages the viewer at every turn. No lulls-no dry spots. Unfortunately, there's no heavy themes as well-except a thread that life is worth living and it can be lived without the benefit of three ancient Chinese coins called the Shiny New Enemies. Chain of Fools, released on such a limited basis most people still know nothing of its existence, has grown in popularity since its 2000 release through increased viewership, especially from the fans of some of its stars-particularly Elijah Wood.The comedy is dark, somewhat racy and at times downright bizarre-but in the good sense of that word (??). Lines and moods are juxtaposed to get a laugh. The characters are-well, a chain of fools, from the accidental killer barber, the ne'er-do-well entrepreneur, the centerfold police detective, the teenage hit man-to the drag-queen nurse and her gangster boyfriend, the spelling-challenged mobster and the insane boy scout leader. Mix them all together, you get-mixed nuts and a great deal of true entertainment. Who needs a theme when you have a plot so circuitous and convoluted that you need a score card to ride the roller coaster. Fortunately, as I mentioned, the script is clever and smart. The visual application supports the premise, if there is one; and most important, the cast is sound to superlative.The star, Steve Zahn turns in a strong performance as Kresk the lousy barber-comic, desperate and likeable. He's a lovable loser and we root for him. His antagonist, Salma Hayek, as Detective Kolko, whose claim to fame is her spread in Playboy, provides a solid foil to Steve Zahn's desperate bid to sleep with her. David Cross's Andy, the overgrown Boy Scout leader, bumbles well through his role with several funny moments, particularly when he brings a young scout to an avalanche of tears over tying a square knot.The bad guys are zany and energetic. Tom Wilkinson as the pompous, out of place Bollingsworth exudes humor. His versatility runs the gamut from his zany comments at the heist to his hiring of an unlikely hitman. It's a shame his character is in a coma for the majority of the movie. Jeff Goldblum's gangster, Avnet, is snaky and treacherous. We're glad to see him downed by a pair of accidental scissors to the neck and a Pastrami on Rye in the face. Other good performances (in some case fleeting) are turned in by Kevin Corrigan as Paulie, the local mobster; David Hyde Pierce as the insidious Mr. Kerner; Orlando Jones as an over-the-top drag queen, Miss Cocoa, and Lara Flynn Boyle as Kresk's ex-wife, Karen.Chain of Fools would probably be just another solid Indy comedy if it were not for the phenomenal performance of Elijah Wood as Mikey, the teenage hitman. Wood's intelligence focuses on the unlikely character, casting him against type. But, once again, Elijah Wood inhabits his character to grab every scene its in and turn it into the glue that transforms a B+ film into an A+ one. Elijah Wood projects a steel force character in a handsome, kid's body to the point we forget the kid and believe the villain. Then, he surprises us by resuscitating the kid, so much so, when he disappears from the film, the remaining fifteen minutes is just so much anti-climax. Wood provides the funniest scenes in the film from his assassination of a state politician (we are given three different versions), to his atonal response to suicide. We get hitman wisdom from a toilet seat and a Sartrian discussion of life and death during a hit. Elijah Wood may not be the star of Chain of Fools, but he is the most iconic link in this farcical bracelet.Without a doubt, Chain of Fools is underrated, because it never received a wide-screen release. For Elijah Wood fans, it was made in the shadow of Frodo Baggins and could have very well gone unnoticed like that other gem of gems released (or not released) during the same period, The Bumblebee Flies Anyway. In any case, the quality of a film should never be judged by the quantity of its viewers. If I were the only person to see this work, I would still give it an A+ as one of the smartest, nearly flawless films to commence the 21st Century.
Great Concert DVD. Hayley Westerna has a beautiful voice, Fans of artists like Charlotte Church or Sarah Brightman will enjoy this amazing 17 year old from New Zealand.  First of all anyone who can do a great cover of a Kate Bush Song (Wuthering Heights) has got to have talent.  This is a real nice concert.  The performance is wonderful.  The video and audio quality are exceptionally good.  The 5.1 Dolby Surround mix is as good as it gets.  Overall one of the best concert DVDs I've seen recently.
My Fascination with This Series Is Almost Embarrassing. Between CSI Miami and this, the original series, I think that this series wins hands down.  I remember first seeing Petersen (Gil Grissom) in Manhunter (the first movie based on Thomas Harris' book the Red Dragon and the perfect movie adaptation of that book) when he was quite a bit younger and thinner but it is not his leading man qualities that make him so appealing.The writers/producers/directors of this series manage to recreate some of the things that make British crime dramas so fascinating-- they 1) don't pull away from the dark to contrive a happy ending; 2)they don't hesitate to portray the lead characters as vulnerable and "strange"; and 3) they look for really great faces, not conventionably pretty or ugly actor, for the parts.Sure, it's science fantasy in the sense that things don't happen  in real life the way they happen in the CSI lab,  and it's not great art, but its a great way to pass time
Annie rocks!. Look at my review for the movie soundtrack.  I had a full vinyl copy of the voiced movie, but my mom sold it.  I hate that fact, but there isn't a thing I can do about it.  I wish I could get one back
Five stars (with reservations). Medium is a very good adult audience supernatural suspense series. The show is mostly convincing with a stellar performance on the part of Ms. Arquette, and most of the supporting cast is excellent. It is unfortunate that the part of Mr. Dubois (who is supposed to be a rocket scientist) is so unsympathetic, and seems to be a bit slow.  Now I am aware that many gifted mathematicians have a missing element socially, but the real Mr. Dubois in interview, does not seem so. However, in "Sweet Dreams"episode,(ala "It's a Wonderful Life"), Joe is what you would hope he would be for the rest of the series, so go figure. The children of the show are a mixed bag, but talented child actors are few and far between.The crimes that are solved are not family friendly, but the show is about half about the family dynamic of their unique situation. Which makes for pretty good drama, my reservations notwithstanding.  One of the recurring bad guys in the show is an evil spirit that is the source for psychosis in mentally ill criminals. I don't like the inference, but it is an interesting proposal.That being said, this show is fascinating, if you can accept that the real Allison Dubois is truly anything like purported in the show.
Catherine the Great PBS. I have both versions of Catherine the Great, A&E in their version was lacking in many areas and I was dismayed that they turned one of the great people of the world into something trival.  The PBS version which with Bruni is exceptional, though with all documentaries and movies time is trunicated and not all history is told PBS does an admirable job and presenting the basic facts.The documentary was a joy to watch and the scholars from Europe comparing her to other great people fits
Very good yoga DVD. Hi, I started Kali Ray TriYoga three months ago and I bought that DVD to deepen my practice. I have never practiced Yoga before so I cannot say something about this style in comparison with others. However I love the soft and gentle moves of Kali Ray TriYoga.The DVD starts with rhythmic breathing. The main practices on this DVD include leg strech, reclined butterfly, cat rolls, cat bow I, mountain heel press, cat bow 2 flow, runner, triangle, side warrior, and half tortoise twist.Kali Ray has a very gentle voice and explains the flow very nicely. If you have practiced Yoga before you should have no problems to follow her without looking on the screen. Beginners may have to watch the DVD first and then try the movements. However, no DVD will ever replace a yoga teacher who can correct you and help to improve your practices.For me it is a very good way to practice until my next yoga class starts again in a couple of weeks :)
The Troubles. 'Omagh' is the heart-wrenching true story of the 1998 terrorist bombing in Omagh, Northern Ireland and it's aftermath. The simple but well-crafted film follows a man named Michael Gallagher and his family after his son Aidan is killed in the blast which took the lives of 29 civilians. The bombing was carried out by "The Real IRA," an offshoot of the original IRA who did not support the peace process agreed to by the latter. There is very little historical context, so anyone looking to learn the background of "The Troubles" will not find it here. Instead, it is a moving story about the real effects of terrorism on innocent people caught in the middle of political warfare. The film maintains a very somber tone throughout, and I agree with the other reviewers about the lack of sentimentality. There is little action or suspense, and one could hardly describe the film as exciting. The film is more of an experience rather than "entertainment." The only shot of the picturesque Irish landscape is in the opening scene, where the bombers are shown driving through the breath-taking, yet dreary Irish countryside. The most moving part of the film is the immediate aftermath of the bombing, where Gallagher desperately searches for his missing son, only to have his worst fear confirmed. This leads Gallagher to form a support group for the victim's families and embark on a mission to bring the killers to justice. This is far from a heart-warming film, and it leaves the viewer with an empty feeling, along with a sense that true justice will always take a backseat to politics and abstractions.
Essential Hitchcock, But Not His Best. An early Hitchcock work, 'Foreign Correspondent' is one of Turner Classic Movies' "Essentials". Johnny Jones (Joel McCrea), a crime beat reporter is dispatched to Europe in August 1939 to 'get the facts' on what is really going on over there. What he finds is an outfit called the Universal Peace Party led by Stephen Fisher (Herbert Marshall), a secret clause in an international treaty, and a kidnapped diplomat. Jones tracks down a nest of traitors and falls in love with Fisher's daughter Carol (Laraine Day) along the way.In a classic scene, an escaping assassin's trail is revealed by an overhead shot of movement amongst tightly packed umbrellas.Others have wondered why this Hitchcock film is not ranked with say a film like 'North by Northwest'. The simple reason is that it's just not as good as his later movies. Take, the instant cornball romance for example - the cornball I can take, but they fall in love in about 12 seconds. Or the silly notion of a meaningful secret clause in a treaty between the Dutch and the Belgians.Of some interest is the movie's open appeal by Hitchcock for America to get in to the war, complete with patriotic music (Star Spangled Banner) at the conclusion. Trivia: Gary Cooper turned down the lead role that went to McCrea and later termed it his biggest mistake.Recommended
The Spirit of the WARRIOR!. This is a must-have DVD, not only for wrasslin' fans, but for all of mankind. You will learn the ways of the WARRIOR and hopefully learn something about yourself as well.
Everyone Loves To Get Hustled. I had heard this Brit TV show was very popular over the pond, and watched a few episodes on A and E, and was immediately hooked.  The acting, the story lines, the "catch you sleeping" at the end makes this show refreshing and fun to watch.  It seems on USA crime-con-action shows you see a recycled actor(s) from a cancelled show and it is hard to make their characters credible.  Robert Vaughn, formerly the Man From U.N.C.L.E. is the cherry on top of the sundae as well.  Solid show and looking forward to Season Two on disc and hopefully season three real soon.  You cannot go wrong with this DVD colection to anyone's library.
Odd Couple. It's hard to understand why Amazon would suggest that buyers of the Ann Coulter documentary would also enjoy 'Michael & Me' by Michael Moore!!! A reality check is needed for whoever made this recommendation!
Walking the Bible. This DVD was excellent and I have shared it with others in my Bible Study that I teach.  Everyone loved it
Maximus Movimus. Russell Crowe and this picture deserved their Oscars for this terrific movie. I wish they could make another. This was undoubtedly Ridley Scott's best turn as a Director since Alien. He also deserved the Oscar.A rare movie gets a great story which includes not only action but love and presents both to good effect. The set offers many great insights to those of us who need to know how things work. So buy it if you need to know, I did and was not disapointed other than to want even more! Again I say a 5 Star Bravo for this movie and an additional Star for all the variations and extras it contains
here's the list. hey amazon: please list the CD tracks and DVD songs so we know what we're getting!  Here's the songs (I got from www.alanjackson.com) on AJ Greatest Hits Disk 2:1. Remember When2. Who's Cheatin' Who3. Little Man4. Pop A Top5. www.memory6. Driv
A generic but entertaining adventure. "El-Hazard: The Magnificent World" is an anime very much in the "Tenchi Muyo!" mold: a romantic comedy/adventure in which blank-slate protagonist Makoto is thrust into a sci-fi scenario and gets to play hero while being chased by multiple women. Though the characters in "El-Hazard" aren't developed as deeply as the "Tenchi" crew and the show occasionally suffers from awkward pacing, "El-Hazard" has a charm all it own. The mysterious antiheroine Ifurita is compelling, and the kids' hard-drinking teacher Fujisawa is consistently funny. Most impressively, "El-Hazard" tells a complete and satisfying story, tying up its seeming plot holes with an ingenious last-episode twist. Usually these types of shows start strong, only to end up limping through anticlimaxes and false endings. Even the romantic tension is unambiguously resolved!The dub is also pretty darn good, though it tends to get overly shouty, especially in the segments centering on Jinnai. Can't the guy ever just speak in a normal tone?"El-Hazard" is hardly the type of show that will change your life, but if you like "Tenchi" or other anime in this vein, this box set is probably a good bet. (The set actually contains two separate shows: the original "El-Hazard" OAV and its 4-episode sequel "El-Hazard 2." The sequel is an inconsequential side story that unfortunately doesn't really add any value.)
One of the best. I read a few reviews about this movie.  Many disparage the movie.  So be it.  Live and let live I always say.First of all, I bought the DVD version here at Amazon dot com.Amazon shipped quickly and accurately;  thanx Amazon , you are the reason that I don't have to go to a myriad of book/video/DVD/CD stores to find in item that I am ISO.I guess I am one of those "sci fi" "cult movie" "fans".I'm very happy that a DVD version of this movie was made.  I thank Amazon dot com for having it available for purchase.I gave it 5 stars; cuz, "they just don't make 'em like the used to". Nowadays, "B" sci-fi flicks are just so bogus.  Buy this movie if only to see what making a film was like before the advent of C..artoon G...enerated I...mages, or...CGI.  It is a gas.Sean Connery did several low budget sci-fi flicks and I hold that by doing so, he showed his "range" of acting skills.  I personally view  him as one damn fine "jouneyman" actor.  Give the man a script, and he delivers no matter what.  A must have for Sean Connery fans everywhere.Last word_________Fantabulous flick
I could watch BEST IN SHOW 24 hours a day for the rest of my life. Set in the world of championship dog shows and cast with kooky characters who strive to have their pooch named top dog, BEST IN SHOW is a hilariously funny film that will easily have you laughing out loud.Though there is a scripted premise, most of the dialog in BEST IN SHOW is ad-libbed by comedic greats that include Christopher Guest, Catherine O'Hara, Eugene Levy and Ed Begley, Jr. to name just a few.The gist of BEST IN SHOW is simple: five dogs whose owners have virtually nothing in common with each other, travel to Philadelphia to enter the Mayflower, a prestigious championship dog show, loosely based on the Westminster event.Beatrice, the emotionless Weimaraner is shown by an uptight yuppie couple (Michael Hitchcock and Parker Posey) who are nervous wrecks, read the J. Crew catalog like it is a work of great literature and constantly bicker with each other about their dog's mental health and the subtle differences the colors putty and ecru.Rhapsody in White, the highly coiffed Standard Poodle is owned by a 90 year old kajillionaire's trophy wife (Jennifer Coolidge) who is having an affair with Christy Cummings, the dog's severe lesbian trainer (Jane Lynch).Winky, a spunky Norwich Terrier is adored by a former party girl (Catherine O'Hara) and her nerdy, two left footed husband (Eugene Levy) who at every turn is forced to confront his wife's promiscuous past and her sloppy bookkeeping skills.Miss Agnes, the fluffy white Shih Tzu is the prized pooch of two gay men, played brilliantly by Michael McKean and his campy live-in boyfriend (John Michael Higgins).Hubert, the sad-eyed Bloodhound is shown by a single country boy, played by Christopher Guest, who created the series of mock documentary films that BEST IN SHOW is one part of.There are far too many hilarious scenes in BEST IN SHOW to recount.  Particularly great ones include the scene when Winky's owner and her husband check into their hotel and are offered a room in the storage closet by a stiff inn keeper who you may or may not recognize as Ed Begley, Jr.Another great scene is when a very inappropriate color commentator (Fred Willard) reels off one bizarre observation after another about the dog's trainers, the judges and the clothing of its owners.But perhaps my favorite scene is when Winky's owners visit an old friend who works as a hostage negotiator and announces almost demonically that when people are on top of a building and threaten to leap to their deaths, "they all jump."BEST IN SHOW is a highly recommended DVD from the same mock documentary genre of This is Spinal Tap and Waiting for Guffman.  With star performances by some of the most talented comedians of our time, this movie will have you laughing out loud from start to finish
Soothing. Very spiritually uplifting.  Takes patience to a whole new level.  For those seeking spirituality, it bring to the forthfront what faith is all about
Well worth your time. Early Hackman, REALLY early Melanie Griffith.  Cohesive, provocative script that will stand you in good stead for repeated viewing.  Interesting photography, particularly the underwater shots.  With Hackman one expects excellent acting and you will not be disappointed in any of the cast.  The nude scenes are beautifully done, not blatant and fall naturally into the storyline.Good, solid, well-done film.  The director is to be complimented
Watch It Even If You Never Watched It On TV!. I never watched the Apprentice when it was on TV.  I thought I wouldn't like it because I am not into business or Donald Trump.  But I ended-up checking it out from my library just to see what the big stink was about, and I was HOOKED!  I watched it all weekend, one episode after the other.  I had to know what happened!  I loved the challenges given to the contestants - it was fun to see how they would work through them.  Plus there is plenty of personal conflict and drama.  GREAT show
Memories Are Made Of This!. What do the following have in common?A boy named Ralphie and the phrase 'You'll poke your eye out'!A Red Ryder BB Gun and a sexy, black-mesh leg that's a lamp.A bar soap wielding mother and an expletive shouting father.A pepto-bismol pink Easter bunny suit and a boy who eats like a piggy.You're right! They all add up to A Christmas Story!It is about Ralphie, wonderfully played by Peter Billingsley, who longs for a Red Ryder BB Gun!He repeatedly hears 'You'll poke your eye out' every time he mentions the gun.Darrin McGavin is terrific as the contest entering father who is ecstatic when he finally wins.His prize, a leg-shaped animated lamp complete with a black mesh stocking!In his eyes the leg of lamp (I coudn't resist) is absolutely beautiful and,much to the dismay of his wife, he proudly displays it for all to see in their front window.The lamp is a major source of contention between them as each one attempts to move it!His language when anything goes wrong - from the exploding furnace to the sparking wiringto the neighbors free roaming dogs has reprecussions when, in frustration, Ralphie repeats them.Enter Mom with the soap! Don't worry you won't hear the actual words being said but you will getthe gist or should that be drift as this is a winter story!Little brother, Randy, is a picky eater and is only successfully coaxed to eat by his mother, played perfectlyby Melinda Dillon, when she has him pretend to eat like his favorite storybook animal, a pig!With his face firmly in the plate he eats like one much to the disgust of his father!Although based on the Red Ryder BB gun, there are many other storylines highlighted in this wonderful movie.There are bullies, school friends, Christmas tree lots, Santa coming to town and the hilarious Christmas giftof a  pink Easter Bunny outfit poor Ralphie has to try on! You will enjoy this movie!It takes place at a time when I was growing up and many of the scenes recall my childhood.To those of us who grew up in the forties and early fifties it brings back fond memories of our past Christmases.We had real trees adorned with tinsel and glowing with big colorful bulbs, no themed trees with just whitelights, our trees glowed with a rainbow of colors. We had favorite radio shows, wore galoshes and hadbackyards with snow covered sheds just like the ones in Ralphie's backyard.All of those are in this film, and as such, A Christmas Story has a wonderful familiarity about it.You can almost smell the heavy scent of pine mixed with the delicious aroma of a roasting turkey.This movie is a classic and will, once again, be eagerly watched by our family.Ah! Memories are made of this!
Another Peter Sellers Gem. Sellers is appropriately low-key and gentle in his role of a latter-day (sixties Britain)cleric whose attempts to emulate the work of Christ are either thwarted by the rich (the aristocrats and church hierarchy)or misunderstood by it's intended beneficiaries (i.e. the welfare family who he's given shelter who are looting the church).  Ultimately this movie is both hilarious satire but somewhat tragic.  No fear, though, Sellers reverend gets the last laugh
Suicide Girls - The First Tour. The DVD arrived in a timely matter and the DVD was a gift for a friend who enjoyed watching it
Highly recommended by all our reviewers. We would just like to agree with the other reviews & say this is an excellent series. This is without doubt the finest collection of Miami Salsa dance moves available.This 3 dvd set is well worth adding to your collection or if you are an absolute beginner then this is the series for you.Highly recommended by all our reviewers (30+ Salsa teachers)
Better than the first. Awesome movie. 5 stars. Cant wait for the next one.. One of my favorite movies.
Exhausting. Robin Williams is an AFRS disc jockey in Saigon during the Vietnam War. He is fast-talking, zany, unconventional - and a problem for his superiors. Williams is so much at center stage behind the microphone, doing his imrovisational schtick as only he can, that whatever else the movie is about becomes inconsequential and quickly forgotten. The movie is an exhausting experience to watch, as it must have been for Williams to perform. It's an amazing one-man show, but the picture as a whole left me somewhat empty
Maximum WASSage... True, it shouldn't be compared to the other entries. I know its difficult considering the name. I thought Ted Wass would become a comic superstar. He is quite funny in this as well as "Oh God! You Devil." This is like many other comedies...not for all tastes. A nice widescreen transfer and a rare trailer are plus. Not the worst entry in the series. Worth the money for fans
A classic!. We all love a good B-movie, and "Q" tops my list of guilty pleasures. It is, simply put, a good old-fashioned B-movie romp, with all of the requisite ingredients- a fabulous monster, a scenery-chewing cop, an oblivious public, and an anti-hero (you can't decide if you love Michael Moriarty or hate him). I would definitely recommend "Q" for viewing on a laid-back Saturday evening with a bowl of popcorn.
Amazing. This movie was moving, and as always, Johnny Depp's performance was flawless.I got this movie on a whim because I love fairy tales and older Disney movies, and I love hearing history of where certain things came from.  So I had heard this story but the way I heard it, he was having the affair.  I love the way this movie was done, the intimacy and the tenderness and the closeness of Johnny Depp's character to the little boys was touching.I recommend this movie for a couple to watch, because watching it alone will make you feel lonely.
EXCELLENT, MUST HAVE VIDEOS FOR ALL KIDS. I bought the Talking Words Factory on a whim and it ended up being the best video I have ever purchased.  My daughter started watching it at 3 and after only viewing it about five times, she knew ALL of her letter sounds.  She already knew her letters, but I was amazed at how fast she picked up the sounds.  She is now 4 1/2 and her PK teacher told us she is at the top of the class for phonics knowledge.  When I told her why, she wrote all the information down to pass onto other parents whose children are struggling.Now, my 2-year old watches them and she only knows a few letters, but she knows almost ALL of her sounds when you ask her.  That is impressive!  After seeing the success with my kids, I bought them for my nieces, one of which was struggling with severe ADHD and classroom difficulty.  She mastered sound and blending concepts that she could not master in the classroom and she now has a great phonetic background.  I know she would not be where she is today if she didn't have these videos.  I am a Speech-Language Pathologist and I highly recommend them to ALL my parents at school.  I have also donated the Letter Factory to all of my kindergarten and PK classrooms.  I know they will enjoy them as much as my kids did (and still do!).
Solid dark comedy and strong metaphor. This is an underrated and little-seen film.  If you enjoy thoughtful dark comedies, this is the one for you.  Willem Dafoe's expressions and movements, John Malkovich's delivery....They are worth the price in and of themselves.  It's also a metaphor for filmmaking, sacrifice, how far some people would go for their art, and more.  Beautifully photographed in Luxembourg, with lighting and shadow as a work of art
Outsatnding Film: Despair And Rebirth!. This is one of the greatest films to come out of the UK in the past 20 years. That's saying quite a bit, considering the number of high calibre films the UK has come out with in the past 20 years. There are numerous great reviews here on amazon, therefore, I will be brief. I titled this as "Despair and Rebirth" What I mean by this is that the character Mark Renton (Ewan McGregor) finally comes to terms with his self-destructive nature as a heroin addict; and awakens to a new and better tomorrow, and therefore gets a new lease on life: A much better life. Moreover, it is a new life that many of his friends never get in the film. And the way the film depicts his life as a junkie, along with his friends, is nothing but depair. You can't help feeling empathy for Mark Renton, and you root for him to succeed in overcoming his terrible addiction.This film is great because it does not gloss over the terrible and destructive nature of drug addiction: And heroin in particular. This film does not glorify drugs as one of the reviewers wrote, on the contrary, it gives the viewer the ugly truth about a life of addiction: Especially with the graphic scenes of how horrible the life of a junkie really is. With the opening scenes dialogue of Mark Renton sarcastically mocking society as not the life he chooses to live, to the end of the film's dialogue of his wanting to become part of society; the viewer can understand his reasons: Because in between these two dialogues, which serve as book-ends, the viewer witnesses the despair and horrible life that he lives. And the comfort is in seeing that he has decided to take an alternate course: A life without herion. The entire film is great and highly recommended. [Stars: 5+
Horror In The Sky. I remember seeing this film when I was 7 or 8 years old and it scared me senseless.  Seeing people getting their heads chopped off and mutalated from who knows what that flies around a big city gave me an uneasy eerie feeling.  I didn't know what the name of this movie was and I was looking for it in the video stores.  I stumbled onto this accidentally and taking my chances of this being the dragon in the sky killing people movie that I saw 20 years ago, I bought it. After seeing it again, this is the movie that scared me to death so many years ago.  Though, by today's standards, this movie is rather cheap and cheesy, it still gave me that uneasy eerie feeling.  This movie is original, having a flying dragon that is summoned by ritual killings, that eats people like birds eat worms.  This movie is a hybrid of Godzilla and slasher flicks.  This is definately B-movie material, but it's fun to watch and brings back some childhood memories... and that is worth more than the price of admission
It's a pretty good anime, but it's great if you're a fan. I remember playing loads of Street Fighter II when it came out when me and my cousin would go head-to-head often or we would try to do the single player. After the incredibly lame live-action movie came out, the series actually gained a better respectability through its anime shows/movies. One such movie was the Street Fighter II animated movie which features some pretty cool fight scenes, a fan-favorite(well if you're into that anyways) shower scene and some spot-on characterization. If only it had a bit more story development and didn't have characters making glorified cameos.While in battle, Ryu displays some massive fighting capabilities which attracts the attention of General Bison, ruler of the Shadoloo syndicate. He's been researching the best fighters in the world and even putting some under control to do his bidding. So it's up to Ryu, his friend/rival Ken, detective and all-around cutie Chun-Li and soldier Guile to take down Bison.Like Mortal Kombat, Street Fighter II was a huge fan-favorite game when they first came out so it's of course obvious a film will be made. And this case, there is a story but it's not really the greatest. Characters drop out at times completely while others just merely get a cameo. Cammy is literally in 2 scenes, T-Hawk and Dee-Jay is in 1 and Fei Long is in one admittedly cool battle but that's it. The ones I mentioned before mainly get top billing alongside Vega, Balrog and E.Honda. It's really disappointing since it would've been nice to see more screen-time instead of the massive amount of time on Ryu and Ken(more Cammy for instance) but that's alright.How are the fight scenes? Well, if you're a fan of Street Fighter you'll love them since not only are they quite fast(and even brutal at times) they're filled with moves directly from the game such as Chun-Li's hyper kick, E.Honda's slapping, Zangief's piledriver, as well as the infamous "Haduken". Chun-Li's fight with Vega is a definate highlight since it's fast and it gets incredibly vicious at times. Not to mention it happens right after Chun-Li's shower scene which goes to show you the power of animation in getting you riled up over pencil drawings.Is it a good Street Fighter movie? Of course but this isn't a top-tier anime title like Grave of the Fireflies or Akira but it's enjoyable nonetheless and for a movie based on a fighting game, that's pretty surprising.
I wish I was in Dixie... This is one of the best movie about the civil war I've ever seen. It is the most instructive, realistic, with very good actors playing in it ! For once, just like in "Gods and Generals", the movie is more focused on the southern side, which is not very often the case.I am a fan of this part of the U.S. history, and especially of the South, and I was really captivated by this movie from the beginning to the end
Kurosawa's Swashbuckling Film. Of all the directing masters Akira Kurosawa is arguably the greatest. No matter how much praise and hyperbole is shoveled onto his films they always surprise me by how good they are. Not good in a, "this was phenomenal for the 1950's," but good as in, "this is better than just about anything we're seeing today." While watching this movie I was trying to think of an American director who even comes close, but no one quite matches Kurosawa. If Akira Kurosawa and Stanley Kubrick had a street fight in Heaven I gurantee you Kurosawa would kick Kubrick in the nuts and decapitate him inside of a minute.This film is often described as the impetus for Star Wars. After seeing the prequel trilogy I half expected The Hidden Fortress to be an exact blueprint for Episode IV, but they're really not that similar. It turns out that George Lucas was talented back in the day. If you're looking for simularities you'll find them, but if Lucas himself hadn't mentioned how much this film influenced him I doubt anyone would be drawing parallels. For example, the two peasant characters, Tahei and Matakishi, are supposed to be the inpirations for R2-D2 and C-3PO, but they're not similar in the least. Tahei and Matakishi are slow, bumbling, greedy, and selfish. They're a far cry from Lucas' creations. R2-D2 is the butch in the relationship while C-3PO is his more feminine partner. (I have to give Lucas credit for having the guts to put a gay robot couple in a film way back in the 70's, and it's even more amazing because no one has had the guts to do it a second time. Perhaps one day gay robots will get the screen time they deserve.)The story involves a princess and her general who are trapped behind enemy lines and must make it back to their own land. Of all the Kurosawa films I've seen this is the most commercial, and should satisfy fans of old action and adventure. Of particular interest is Toshiro Mifune who is a Kurosawa regular. He plays General Rokurota - an all around badass. When his party gets stopped by soldiers trying to hunt them down he quickly kills a couple of them, and then grabs a horse to go hunt down the two trying to escape, all the while letting out a warrior's cry. This action sequence ends in a duel between Rokurota and an opposing general he has a competitive but friendly relationship with. The duel is one of the greatest fight scenes in cinema, and not just because of the fine choreography (although that too), but because of how interesting these two characters are. They respect each other, but if they met on a battlefield then duty would prevail.This is much more of an action adventure film than something like Roshomon, but Kurosawa still manages to throw in a lot of themes. The princess has a slight epiphony while walking among the peasants, and decides to save a girl before she becomes a sex slave; Tahei and Matakishi are both morally bankrupt but they still seem to serve a purpose in society; and General Rokurota and his rival both seem to say something about the merits and limits of honor. These themes are great and add some depth, but are subservient to sheer adventure of the film, which is how it should be.This is a great swashbuckling film that is hands down better than any action film made in the last twenty years.  Some have come close, but I think most will agree that nothing beats The Hidden Fortress.  It is absolutely incredible that with all of the technical achievements over the years Kurosawa's action-adventure piece still holds up so well over the years.  Incredible
Volume Four Starts Strong, But Ends Weakly. This is the fourth set of DVDs that complete the WrestleMania Anthology.  Sadly, the last two WrestleManias (19 and 20) aren't that great.  However, this set includes some awesome matches from "WrestleMania 2000" (Edge/Christian vs. The Hardyz vs. The Dudleyz in a Ladder match, or Mick Foley vs. Big Show vs. The Rock vs. Triple H in a No DQ Elimination match for the WWF Championship)."WrestleMania X-8" from 2002 is also a solid PPV.  Hollywood Hulk Hogan has one of his best matches as he faces The Rock, and The Undertaker battles Ric Flair in a No DQ match.  Also, see Triple H in a rare turn as a good guy as he wrestles the first-ever Undisputed WWF champion Chris Jericho.But the real treat on this compilation is "WrestleMania X-Seven" from 2001.  This is the best WrestleMania ever released!  Vince McMahon and Shane McMahon in a Street Fight...TLC II...Stone Cold vs. The Rock (Match 2)...Chris Benoit vs. Kurt Angle...and the best match of the night - Triple H vs. The Undertaker!  This PPV is superb!Unfortunately, the last two events aren't that great.  "WrestleMania XIX" is forgiveable, because it has two stellar matches (Chris Jericho vs. Shawn Michaels, and Brock Lesnar vs. Kurt Angle).  But "WrestleMania XX" is merely okay because while it has some good ones (Chris Benoit vs. Shawn Michaels vs. Triple H---Eddie Guerrero vs. Kurt Angle), it has some stinkers too (Brock Lesnar vs. Goldberg), and also has three matches that WWE didn't even want to put on the VHS tape (Tag Team Titles matches?).The scratch logos are partially blurred in the first three PPVs, but no audio dubbing seems to have occurred.  My suggestion is that you simply purchase 16 (er, "2000") and 17 individually.  The 18th WrestleMania wouldn't be too bad of an investment either.  However, if you're a completists like me, you'll want to buy all six of them in this pack.  Even though I've written harshly about 19 and 20, they aren't bad.  They just simply could've been so much more and make some questionable decisions.Enough talk, go ahead and buy this.  "WrestleMania" does not survive through nostalgia.  This Anthology is well worth your time
GREAT  GREAT Soccer Movie. a movie that is not un-realitisc in the world of soccer.  good acting and very good story line
Pretty Darn Good. I admit it, I was surprised at how good this movie was. This was my first bollywood movie ever, I have yet to see even Bride & Prejudice. It wasn't nearly as over the top as people told me it would be. I enjoyed Raj's antics, even though his incredible, pathetic, story about how he needed that last seat on the plane because his son Babloo was sick from a heart attack had me rolling my eyes with a groan. I was outright laughing in the school scene when Raj lived up to Adi's boasting and jumped from the roof of the school and then had to kick a soccer ball back up onto the roof. It's a good thing for Namrata that Raj really did love her, because she was so stupid sometimes and stubborn that many a man would have walked away. All in all, even though this movie was surprisingly long, at 2 hours and 46 minutes, It's well worth the time to watch it
fun and cute. The morning I stumbled on this movie, I was intrigued by the title. I actually watched the whole movie and then watched again. I have read with the reviews before posting my own.The morning after i watched it, I got my partner and she and I watched it. True, it did not provide the blood and guts, but it was not intended too.  This movie would be appreciated by bands that are just starting out to make it big.Yes it was surprising that it was made in Africa.  But the best scenes in the movie were near the end.  The surprise in the band was cool and most definate, the selling of the land.We thought it was a great movie and away from the Friday the 13th predicative scenes.Awesome movie.  Yes, we would buy the movie.  The music in the beginning could fit the title and be a little more heavy, but thats cool!!
Yes, it's safe. So safe you wouldn't believe... Released in 1976 based on William Goldman's bestseller of the same name, 'Marathon Man' was a greatly anticipated film and it worked brillantly on screen. Goldman seemed to take two elements that spook people, Nazi's and dentists, so fused them into one character, Dr. Szell. Dr. Szell played to the hilt by Laurence Oliver (who was ill at the time and was considered uninsurable) has come out of hiding in Uraguay to collect his war booty and crosses paths with Dustin Hoffman, a graduate student who's drawn into the situation by his brother who works for a shadow element of the government. It's a complicated story, as you would hope for in a thriller. A world class cast of actors, skillfully directed by John Schlesinger, makes for a great film one that can be viewed repeatedly, I saw it when it opened at the Loews in Times Square in 76 and I still can watch it...but must confess, I still close my eyes when Dr. Szell is torturing the Marathon Man. Ouchh! Goldman was so right, a Nazi dentist nothing could be more fiendish
This is a classic.... I bought this DVD through Taiseng awhile back for almost $30.00. And, in a way it was definely worth it. Although, nowadays you can get this movie for a few dollars. I recommend this movie if you are into the whole asian cinema, Hong Kong, and samurai movies.The story is good. The sword play is awesome. And, there is plenty of blood that gushes out when the characters die!!! This movie is a blend of a solid samurai movie and a good chinese fantasy/Sword play/ kung-fu movie.I suggest that you rent this if you are not a fan of asian cinema, but if you are I highly recommend this movie. Oh, I think some of you who  listen to rap will recognize the music from this movie. The Rza from the Wu-Tang Clan probably sampled a few loops from this movie
Excellent, fun work-out!. If you liked Crunch Cadio-Dance Blast with Marie Forleo, you'll like this onewith Jennifer Galardi.  All the same good qualities are here.  I was happy tofinally find this so I can get to know it and alternate it with Forleo's and acouple of others
"Ninotchka, it's midnight. One half of Paris is making love to the other half.". *** This comment may contain spoilers ***"Those were the days, my friends" back in 1939 when Hollywood made the comedies that were funny, classy, and sparkling. Ernst Lubitsch directed the screen legend, the dramatic star Greta Garbo in her first and the best remembered comedy, "NINOTCHKA". In the title role Garbo plays a Soviet envoy sent to Paris to check up on the lack of progress in a sale of the jewels that used to belong to the Grand Duchess Swana, the relative of the last Russian Tsar who now lives in exile in Paris. Initially a fanatical "Bolshevik" and the Ice Queen who never smiles, as the movie progresses, Comrade Ninotchka falls in love with Swana's good friend, playboy Leon d'Algout ( Melvyn Douglas) who tries to interfere with a sale. The first half of the film is among the funniest I've seen. The dialogs and remarks by Billy Wilder are simply sparkling:Ninotchka: We don't have men like you in my country.Leon: Thank you.Ninotchka: That is why I believe in the future of my country.Count Leon D'Algout: Do you like me just a little bit?Ninotchka: Your general appearance is not distasteful.Ninotchka: Don't make an issue of my womanhood.Ninotchka: The last mass trials were a great success. There are going to be fewer but better Russians.When Ninotchka began to thaw, it became a little silly for my taste but the Moscow episodes (the omelet-dinner scene at Ninotchka's overcrowded apartment and her conversation with Bela Lugosi's Commissar Razinin) and the end were perfect again. Overall, if anyone had to make a funny and classy comedy making fun of the Russian Politics and fanatic "Bolsheviks", Lubitch, Wilder, and Garbo were the perfect artists for the task.4.5/5 or 9/10
GREAT blast from the past!!. I was absolutely addicted to this movie when I was a kid. I watched it over and over (several times a day, back to back). I wore out my VHS long ago, and I am thrilled that it is out on DVD.
Brilliant study of courage and redemption in the Nazi era. Remember that saying, "What if they gave a war and nobody came?"  It was around in popular culture back in the late '60s and early '70s when John Lennon was perhaps the best-known antiwar activist and the Vietnam conflict was looking increasingly like a lost cause at least among thinking people.  My best friend and I went to the local draft board and succeeded in being recognized as conscientious objectors.  Could I have done that without him?  I don't know.  Could we have done it if it was not somewhat fashionable?  Probably not.I was reminded of that while watching this beautiful film.  How difficult would it have been to resist the Nazis as a young boy in 1942, when this film is set?  The protagonist, Friedrich, is a working class kid who now has his big chance to enter the elite of the Third Reich as a star boxer while attending an elite academy.  He's handsome, Aryan-looking, and athletic, but early in the film he shows another side.  That side is developed when he meets Albrecht, a slight, somewhat effeminate boy who is the son of a top Nazi official.I read some other review where this film has been marketed as a "gay" movie. That's ridiculous.  Albrecht is not depicted as being gay; he is depicted as being smart and caring.  His stature and appearance simply serve to explain in part the contempt his father has for him as being weak.  He is a little weak in some ways, and that is part of why Friedrich protects him, or tries to.  But this film, like the best anti-Nazi movies, accurately shows who the really weak were--those who went along to get along or to get ahead.There are a number of films in this genre that I like, including "Europa, Europa", "Au Revoir Les Enfants", and one that really needs to be re-issued on DVD (and I am not sure if it was ever on VHS) called "Blood and Honor".   But this one is easily in that class.This film should be required viewing in high school classrooms. Some of us grew up with such weak anti-Nazi movies as "The Sound of Music", where the kinds of moral conflicts treated here were trivialized.  We don't see the death camps in this movie, but that is part of its power.  Albrecht sees just a glimpse of what he is in to and what his father is part of and there are several scenes showing that.This is a fairly long film at 110 minutes.  If I were asked how it could be improved, I might suggest adding more.  There is not a dull moment.  A terrific film that you should not miss.
The Lost Battalion - better than average war story. Schroder makes a believable leader in this story. Much of the action sequence is done in the same style as "Saving Private Ryan", if you liked that, you'll like this.Better than average story of the squad who makes their objective, and then is left for loss by their commander.The story and action captures your interest, and you develop a respect for friend and foe alike.
MTM fourth season. Timeless humor. Funniest episode was the one in which Sue Ann woos Lars away from Phyllis. Awesome
"Anyone?, Anyone?, Bueller?". Matthew Broderick stars in this very funny film about a high school student who decides to take a day off of school.  What happens next can only be described as remarkable and somewhat crazy.Broderick stars as Ferris Bueller, a somewhat clever and deceitful (in a funny way) high school senior who, along with his best friend Cameron (Alan Ruck) decide to skip school and visit the sights and sounds of downtown Chicago in springtime.  Ferris convinces Cameron to take his father's prized red Ferrari out for the day.  Reluctantly, Cameron agrees, and soon the two are off on their adventure.  Their next plan is to get Ferris' girlfriend Sloane (Mia Sara) out of school so she can go along.  Ferris and Cameron devise a plan to call the school and tell Dean of Students Ed Rooney (Jeffery Jones) that Sloane's grandmother passed away.  Dressed in a long trenchcoat and hat, Ferris arrives at the school to pick up Sloane, and the three drive happily away.  However, Mr. Rooney suspects that something is up and immediately suspects that Ferris is at the root of it.  He sets off to find Ferris himself and bring him back to school.  By the end of the movie, Mr. Rooney probably wishes he had stayed in his office.Meanwhile, Ferris' sister Jeannie (Jennifer Grey) has figured out what Ferris is really doing.  Angry that Ferris seems to get away with everything, she has to deal with the entire school taking up a collection for poor, sick Ferris while she really knows what is going on.  In the end, though, she proves to be a big help to him.After heading downtown, the trio take the Ferrari to a local parking garage.  Cameron's father knows the exact mileage of the car, so Cameron is already nervous about allowing Ferris to drive it.  But that's just the beginning.  The garage attendant decides to take the car out for a joyride and racks up over 180 more miles on the odometer.During their day,Ferris, Cameron, and Sloane manage to see the Sears Tower, a Cubs game, visit the Art Institute, and see Ferris sing "Twist and Shout" from a parade float.  But when they head back to the garage to get the car, Ferris finds out about the extra mileage, and Cameron goes crazy.  Ferris seems to think that by driving backwards that the miles will come off, so they jack the car up in the garage and put it in reverse.  However, the miles don't come off.  Cameron, having suffered through a tumultuous relationship with both of his parents, takes out his aggression on the car.  Soon, it goes careening out of the back of the garage and lands in a pile of trees.  Cameron actually feels relieved because now his father will actually have to talk to him.  But Ferris realizes that he has only 5 minutes to get home before his parents do.  Will he make it in time?This movie has attained a sort of "cult" status over the years and still remains as funny as ever.  Matthew Broderick is perfect as the scheming Ferris, while Jeffery Jones does a very good job as Mr. Rooney.  Jennifer Grey plays the part of the overlooked and jealous sister perfectly, and Alan Ruck's job as the reluctant and somewhat confused Cameron is the perfect companion to the wild and reckless Ferris.  Let's not forget the funny cameo by Ben Stein as the teacher who coined the term "anyone, anyone, Bueller?"I recommend this extremely funny movie very highly.  The acting is great and the story is very funny.  As a Cubs fan, I was glad to see the scenes in Wrigley Field and hear Harry Caray's voice.  Watch this great movie and see how much trouble and mischief three friends can get into in one day
A classic Movie. Charlton Heston does it again...a great movie for all to watch and learn much about history
A Fine Tune  Indeed !!. A great opportunity to see two of the worlds finest Actors toe to toe in this gritty drama about the Army in post war (1945) Britain. Mill's portrayal of Stiff Upper Lip Barrow and Guinness's 'Jock Sinclair' is a masterpiece. The resentment of the two officers to each other grows until the climax of the film.SPOILER BELOWThe most saddest moment is Guinness at the end supported by some his his fellow officers after breaking down following his animated version of the Funeral procession that will take place.
PVD = Divine Inspiration. I have the honour to attend in Boston a Paul Van Dyk concert and I must say that its mantra-techno is divine...sounds and good vibrations can be felt through a cd of course...but this DVD-CD Combo is the best deal you can get in a market where some "artists" love to feed you with musical and visual garbage too. PVD's "Global" are nothing else that pure sounds and visual images that will confirm you that you made the right decision...so listen, dance, and enjoy the visual and inner journey:)))
It ain't no shoot-um-up western... It's a little draggy but I liked the actors. Good actors can make a good movie great. I liked this movie and saw it when it first came out and have always wanted to own it. Jack and his buddies are horse thieves while Marlon is the 'regulator' hired to catch them. Marlon is an expert marksman and a little ecsentric while Jack is a down to earth horse thieving country boy. It's not your typical  shoot-um-up bar brawling western. It has a nice plot and a surprising ending..
Terrific Collection of Duke's 'Late' Westerns!. While a Western 'purist' would certainly prefer seeing a 'dream' boxed set of John Ford/John Wayne's 'Cavalry' trilogy, "Stagecoach", and "The Searchers" released together, the "John Wayne DVD Gift Set" is an excellent collection of some of the Duke's finest westerns from his last two decades.The classic of the collection is "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance", John Ford's 1962 'deconstruction' of the genre he'd helped to create. A visually simple, yet deeply layered tale of how a western legend was born, the film echoes Ford's "The Last Hurrah", as well as taking a tongue-in-cheek 'jab' at critics of his more idealized earlier westerns. While Jimmy Stewart, at 55, is far too old to play an idealistic young lawyer, his confrontations with desperado Lee Marvin, and pragmatic (yet ultimately doomed romantic) Wayne are terrific. And don't miss Edmund O'Brien's 'takeoff' on actor Thomas Mitchell, in support...Ford's directorial 'style' was never better than in this remarkable film."The Sons of Katie Elder" is an important film in Wayne's career, as it marked his 'comeback' after losing a lung to cancer. While much of his dialogue had to be 'looped', and oxygen was kept nearby throughout the filming, Wayne proved that he could still play an action hero believably. Certainly, he looked all of his 58 years, and the idea of Dean Martin being one of his brothers is farfetched, but when Wayne first appeared on the screen, 1965 film audiences stood and cheered...and his dominating presence still makes the film 'work', today."El Dorado" is, if you are unfamiliar with the film, simply a reworking of 1959's Hawks/Wayne classic, "Rio Bravo", but it stands very well on it's own merits, beginning with the terrific chemistry between Wayne and co-star Robert Mitchum. A very young James Caan offers a funny counterpoint to the two veteran stars, and wonderful character actor, Arthur Hunnicutt (who, for trivia fans, played Davy Crockett in 1955's "The Last Command"...thus making this a unique opportunity to see TWO Davy Crocketts in one film!) plays a rustic variation of Walter Brennan from the earlier film. With plenty of Howard Hawks' signature comraderie, the film is very entertaining."True Grit" is, of course, John Wayne's Oscar-winning role, as pot-bellied, one-eyed Rooster Cogburn. While many believe Wayne won for his career longevity rather than his performance, the film is, in fact, very entertaining and lyrical, and Wayne's portrayal is the glue that holds it together. Certainly, Glen Campbell offers a less-than-stellar performance, but it is more than compensated for by Kim Darby and Robert Duvall, and Wayne, guns blazing, reins clenched in his teeth, provides an image that has become classic.Finally, there is "The Shootist", Wayne's final film. Shot as the Duke's health was declining, dramatically, the production was a difficult one, with director Don Siegel struggling to work with the ailing actor (Co-star Ron Howard would say he learned more about directing from this film, than any other). Because of the Duke's fragile condition, many friends took roles at far below their usual salaries to work with him a last time (including James Stewart, Richard Boone, and Lauren Bacall). The finished film is a labor of love, from the "Classic Wayne" film clips that open the story, to the final gunbattle, with Wayne's character, the cancer-ridden John Bernard Books, going out in a blaze of glory. It may not have been among Wayne's 'best' films, but it was certainly a most fitting end to his career.It's easy to see why this is a worthy Wayne collection to own...But don't take my word for it; buy it, and see for yourself!
Exciting western with Brown, Reynolds, and Welch. 100 Rifles will never be considered a great western, but it is a fun watch with plenty of action and a good leading cast.  A Phoenix sheriff, Lyedecker, is pursuing a bank robber, Yaqui Joe a half-breed bandit, and ends up finding him in Mexico amidst an uprising.  Before Lyedecker can bring him in, he is captured alongside Joe who is wanted for giving rifles to the Yaqui Indians by the Mexican Army.  After a narrow escape, Lyedecker forms an uneasy, very uneasy, alliance with Joe to help the Yaquis fight back against the Mexican Army.  100 Rifles is one of many westerns that was released in the late 1960s trying to take advantage of the success of the Italian spaghetti westerns.  It has the feel of spaghettis and was filmed in Almeria, but was American financed.  All that aside, its a very enjoyable western with plenty of action.  Add a great score from Jerry Goldsmith and a great looking print on this new DVD, and you can't miss.Jim Brown stars as Lyedecker, the Phoenix sheriff trying to bring in Yaqui Joe for robbing a bank of $6,000.  Brown isn't considered a great actor, but he's very good here.  The man simply has a great presence on screen.  Burt Reynolds plays Yaqui Joe, a half-breed bandit trying to give rifles to the Yaqui Indians.  His part gives him some very funny lines, and together with Brown, they make a great duo.  Raquel Welch plays Sarita, the love interest who fights alongside the men.  She has a love scene with Brown, that at the time seemed shocking, but its pretty tame.  As expected, Ms. Welch looks amazing, and director Tom Gries gives the viewer plenty of chances to oggle her.  Fernando Lamas plays the evil Verdugo, the Mexican officer charged with wiping out the Yaquis while Eric Braeden offers advice as Von Klemme, a German advisor.  This long-overdue DVD offers a great looking widescreen presentation considering the movie is almost 40 years old, three picture galleries with about 60-70 photos, a 100 Rifles trailer, and trailers for three other 20th Century Fox westerns.  So if you're a fan of westerns, check out Jim Brown, Burt Reynolds, and Raquel Welch in the action-packed 100 Rifles
One of my favorite movies of all time. I loved this movie.  It helped me to understand that even though the Professor, (this could be your customer, or your boss) bites your head off, this happens, but it does not diminish you.I loved Kingsfield's Arrogance, earned Arrogance.  It amazes me that some people can achieve so much greatness (yes, I know this is just a movie), but as the first reviewer said, these old men still walk the halls of Harvard (and every other prestigious University in this country).Hart's innocence and his experience learning (I really enjoyed the TV series, and this to the downfall of TV, that such a great series did not last, or at least barely made it into syndication on Public TV for a short time)The young married student, sorry I have forgotten his name, the one with the "Photographic Memory"...  I loved it when he went over to the 3-L student's house, and the student gave him a hypothetical to work up and he'd figure out where his shortcomings in the Law were, and he'd help him merely from the answers he gives to the hypothetical.What a great movie about Great men (and women).  Again, those men and women set the standards for our lives today.  In our Government, Courts, Schools etc
Good Action. Not just another action film, but one with a stroy behind it. Makes you think about whether or not we will ever be safe in the USA again
Touching story about growing up gay in the black community. This touching drama lets you see how growing up gay has changed over two generations in the African American community in the United States.  I believe that this movie was one of the most under exposed looked movies of the year.
Brilliant! he knows how to make you laugh. The funniest show around!This is the funniest show i've seen since Mad TV. Dave Chappelle is a genius. I put him up with Chris Rock and Eddie Murphy any day.This dvd was crazy. I really loved the Crack Head (Tyrone Biggums). You really need to get this dvd. You do not know what you are missing!!!!
